a adamadenjo
A - a
a [á] inter. marque de désapprobation, de a ɲaa ma variante: a cogo ra. expr. fidèle, fidèlement;
1
réticence, ah !, oh !; mark of disapproval, of faithful; treu.
disagreement; markiert Misfallen, Ablehnung.
a sɔngɔ ka gwɛlɛ expr. c'est cher; it is expensive; es
a 2 [á] inter. ah ? vraiment? (marque la surprise; ist teuer.
prononcé bref et haut); ah ? really? marks a
a ye tag'a filɛ variante: atf. Confer, abrégé cf. est
surprise; pronounced short and high; ah ?
utilisée par une rédaction pour inviter son
wirklich? (Überraschung); ausgesprochen kurz
und hoch.
lectorat à consulter un autre passage; look also
at ..; schauen sie auch ...
a comparer: ale.[à] pron. 1 • il, elle, lui, son, sa,
3 áa interj. ah! oh! (marque d'embarras); ah, oh,
ses, troisième personne du singulier; he, she, it,
mark of embarrassment; ach! was! Aa ! A ko o
his, her, third person singular pronoun; sie, er,
es, ihr, sein. A nana. Il / elle est venu(e). He / ye ko gɛlɛn ye dɛ ! Ah ! dit-il, c'est une chose
she has come. Er / sie ist gekommen. A muso très difficile ! Ah! he said, it is a very difficult
lo. C'est sa femme. She is his wife. Sie ist seine
thing! Ah! sagte er, es ist eine sehr schwierige
Sache!
Frau.
2 • cela; that; das, dies, jenes. A fɔra. Cela a
abada [á-á-á] variante: abadalezi. Adverbe. jamais;
été dit. That has been said. Das wurde bereits never; nie, niemals. Abada! Jamais ! Never!
gesagt. Niemals! synonyme: pɛtu, habada, bada .
2 2
3 • pronom anaphorique, en question, dont on a abarika See main entry: barika .[á-í-á] Emprunt de
1
déjà parlé; anaphoric pronoun, of which we
: arabe. variante: barika. interj. merci; thank
have already spoken; von dem wir bereits
gesprochen haben. ... a foro malo ... ... le riz you; danke.
du champ en question ... ... the rice of the field Abijan See main entry: Bijan.[á-í-à] n.pro. Abidjan,
we have mentioned already... ... der Reis vom Capitale économique de la République de Côte
Feld, das wir bereits erwähnt haben... d'Ivoire; Abidjan, capital of Ivory Coast;
á See main entry: alu. Abidjan, Hauptstadt von der Elfenbeinküste.
comparer: aw.[á] comparer: aw. pron. vous, abɔneni Etym: fr.[á-ɔ́-í-í] Nom. 1 • abonné;
votre, vos, deuxième personne du pluriel; you, subscriber; Abonnent.
your, second person plural pronoun; ihr, euer, synonyme: bakurumasanna.
eure; manchmal als Höflichkeitsform für das
2 • client régulier; regular customer; treuer
Pronomen der zweiten Person verwendet. A
Kunde.
nana. Vous êtes venus. You (pl.) have come.
abɔniman Etym: fr.[á-ɔ́-í-ã́] Nom. abonnement;
Ihr seid gekommen.
subscription; Abonnement. a ye abɔniman ta
à ká ... expr. c'est..; It is ..; Es ist ... antonyme: à mán....
synonyme: bakurubasanni.
a kelen Nom. unité (une pièce de); unit (one piece of);
Abuza [á-ú-á] n.pro. Abuja, capitale du Nigeria;
Stück, Teil.
Abuja, capital of Nigeria; Abuja, Hauptstadt
a kɛra expr. fait à ..; done in ..; gemacht in ... A kɛra von Nigeria.
Bamakɔ fonɛnɛkalo tile 5 nan don san Adama [á-á] n.pro. Adam; Adam; Adam.
2025. Fait à Bamako le 5 février 2025. Done
adamaden [á-á-à-ẽ́] n.comp. personne, individu,
in Bamako on the 5th of February 2025.
Gemacht in Bamako am 5. Februar 2025.
être humain; person, individual person,
human; Person, Individuum, Mensch.
a ma bɛn ma ɲi expr. faux; wrong, false, synonyme: hadamaden, bunahadamaden.
inaccurate; falsch.
adamaden ɲɛfɛla Nom. partie intime; private parts;
à mán... expr. ce n'est pas..; this is not..; das ist
Schamgegend. Category: Body.
nicht... antonyme: à ká ....
adamadenjo Nom. droit de l'homme; human rights;
a ni ce comparer: i ni ce. interj. merci; thank you; Menschenrechte.
danke.
29/01/2026 1

adamadenw ka ɲɛtaga aladarisɛbɛ
adamadenw ka ɲɛtaga expr. progrès de Ala ka masaya expr. royaume de Dieu; God's
l'humanité; humanity's progress, progress of kingdom; Gottes Reich, Gottes Neue Welt.
humanity, advancement of humanity;
ala ka muru Nom. arc-en-ciel; rainbow;
Fortschritt der Menschheit, menschlichen
Fortschritt.
Regenbogen. Category: Sky.
synonyme: sanmurubilen.
adamadenw yiriwali expr. développement humain;
Ala ka nɔgɔya kɛ expr. bonne guérison; get well
human development, people development;
menschliche Entwicklung, Entwicklung des soon; gute Besserung.
Menschen. Ala ka tɔɔrɔ dɔgɔya expr. meilleure santé; my best
adamadenya [á] Nom. 1 • fait d'être un humain, wishes for your health; gut Gesundheit.
humanité, condition humaine, comportement Ala ni ... expr. à cause de..; because of..; wegen... Ala
humaine; fact of being a human being,
ni siratanya ... A cause du manque de routes...
humanity, the human condition, human
Because of the missing roads... Wegen den
behaviour; das Menschsein, Menschheit, das
menschliche Verhalten.
fehlenden Straßen...
synonyme: hadamadenya. alabana [á-á-á-á] n.comp. maladie inexplicable,
2 • humanisme; humanism; Humanismus. mystérieuse; mysterious illness; mysteriöse
Adamadenya bi cɛnin nin na dɛ. Ce jeune Krankheit. mɔgɔ bolonɔ tɛ, alabana lo
homme a l'amour du prochain. This young man Category: Disease.
has love for his fellow humans. Dieser junge
Alabato Lit: actes de prière; act of praying; das Beten.
Mensch hat Nächstenliebe.
comparer: seli.[á-á-á-ó] n.comp. prière,
adamadenyajow comparer: adamadenjo. Nom.
adoration de Dieu; prayer, adoration of God;
droits humains; human rights; Gebet, Anbetung Gottes.
Menschenrechte.
Alabatoso [á-á-á-ó-ó] Morphemes: Ala-bato-so.
adamadenyasira lɔnni expr. sciences sociales;
n.comp. 1 • lieu de culte, d'adoration de Dieu,
social science, social studies; synagogue; place of worship, synagogue;
Sozialwissenschaften, Gesellschaftskunde, Gottesdienst Ort, Synagoge.
Gemeinschaftskunde. Category: Think. Category: Building.
adɔrɔ variante: a dɔw la. Adverbe. peut-être, il se peut, 2 • église, temple; church, temple; Kirche,
Tempel.
parfois; perhaps, maybe, sometimes;
vielleicht, manchmal. Adɔrɔ kɔrɔfɔ tun tɛna Alabatosoba See main entry:
den faa tɔɔrɔ. Peut-être l'explication bato .[á-á-á-ó-ó-á] Morphemes: Ala-bato
1
n'aurait-elle pas fait de peine au père de -so-ba. n.comp. grande mosquée, temple
l'enfant. Perhaps the explanation has not hurt
principal, église principale; big mosque, main
the father of the child. Vielleicht hat die
temple; grosse Moschee, Haupt Kirchgegäude.
Erklärung dem Vater des Kindes keine Mühe
Category: Building.
gemacht.
alabatoyɔrɔ See main entry:
Afiriki [á-í-í-ì] n.pro. Afrique; Africa; Afrika.
bato .[á-á-á-ó-ɔ́-ɔ́] Morphemes: ala-bato-
synonyme: Farafinna.
1
yɔrɔ. n.comp. lieu de culte, mosquée, église;
Afiriki disidi Nom. Afrique du Sud; South Africa; place of worship, mosque, church;
Südafrika. Category: Country. Gottesdienst Ort, Moschee, Kirche.
Category: Building.
akisili [á-í-í-í] variante: a kisili. Nom. récupération;
aladaba [á-á-á-á] n.comp. grain de beauté;
recuperation, retrieval; Rückgewinnung,
Wiedererschaffung. birthmark; Muttermal. Category: Body.
Ala [á-á] Emprunt de : arabe. Nom. Dieu; God; aladari See main entry: .[á-á-á-í] variante: aladeli.
Gott. Ala de b'o dɔn. Dieu seul le sait. Only n.comp. invocation; invocation; Anruf,
God knows. Das weiß nur Gott.
Bittgebet.
synonyme: maŋala, ŋala 2 . aladarisɛbɛ See main entry: .[á-á-á-í-ɛ́-ɛ́] n.comp.
Ala k'a balo variante: Ala m'a balola. expr. longévité amulette; amulet; Amulett.
synonyme: sɛbɛnden.
à lui /elle (souhait en cas de naissance); may he
/she live a long time (wish for a newborn);
möge er / sie lange leben.
Ala ka kuma Nom. Parole de Dieu; Word of God,
God's Word; Gottes Wort, Bibel.
29/01/2026 2

aladeli alamisa
aladeli variante: aladari. Nom. invocation à Dieu, alalatigɛ See main entry: la-.[á-á-á-í-ɛ́] n.comp.
prière, chose sacrée, talisman, magique, divin, volonté de Dieu; will of God; Gottes Willen.
maraboutage; invocation of God, prayer,
alalɔn [á-á-ɔ́] Nom. croyance; belief; Glaube.
talisman; Gott anrufen, Gebet, Talisman,
Glücksbringer. alalɔnbaga [á-á-ɔ́-á-á] Nom. croyant(e); believer;
aladelisɛbɛ variante: aladarisɛbɛ. Nom. amulette; Glaubender, jemand der glaubt.
amulet; Amulett. synonyme: sɛbɛnkolo,
synonyme: dannatigi, lannatigi.
bagan. alalɔnbali See main entry:
1
alafarankan [á-á-á-á-ã́] n.comp. secours .[á-á-ɔ ́-á-í] Morphemes: ala-lɔn-bali.
providentiel, aide divine; providential rescue, variante: kafiri. n.comp. athée; atheist; Atheist.
divine help; gnädige Rettung, göttliche Hilfe. alamadogo Jula: alamandogo. Nom. ce qu'on cache
Alahu Taala comparer: Ala. Nom. Dieu; God; Gott. à Dieu; what we hide from god; was wir vor
synonyme: maŋala. Gott verbergen. Mɔgɔmandogo bɛ, nka
alamadogo tɛ. On peut se cacher aux
alajugu Alajugu [á-á-ú-ú] inter. ennemi de Dieu;
humains, mais pas à Dieu. (proverbe). We can
enemy of God; Gottes Widersacher.
hide from humans, but not from God.
alakaciden Morphemes: ala-ka-ci-den. (proverb). Wir können uns vor Menschen
variante: alakamisi. Nom. araignée rouge et
verstecken, aber nicht vor Gott. (Sprichwort).
veloutée du debout d'hivernage (lit. messager alamakɔnɔ [á-á-á-ɔ́-ɔ́] Nom. situation pénible,
de Dieu); small red spider at the beginning of situation de non retour, situation de condamné;
rainy season; kleine rote Spinne anfangs difficult situation; schwierige Situation. cɛ ka
Regenzeit. Category: Spider. trombidium
bana gɛlɛyara, bɛ kɔni, a bɛ alamakɔnɔ
tinctorium. synonyme: alakamisi.
dora
alakajɔ variante: alajɔ, ŋalajɔ. Nom. espèce de plante;
alamandi [á-á-ã́-í] bambara: alamadi. Nom. femme
kind of plant; Pflanzenart. Category: Grass,
herb, vine. cuscuta australis; cassytha
donnée en mariage au nom de Dieu, mariage
filiformis.
sans dot, personne consacrée à Dieu; Woman
given to be married in the name of God; Frau,
alakamisi Nom. araignée rouge et veloutée du debout die zur Heirat gegeben wird im Namen Gottes.
d'hivernage; small red spider at the beginning
alamani See main entry: worobɔ.[á-á-á-í] Nom.
of rainy season; kleine rote Spinne anfangs
Regenzeit. Category: Spider. trombidium
amende, contravention; fine; Geldbusse,
tinctorium. synonyme: alakaciden.
Geldstrafe. Category: Finance.
alamata [á] le moindre, même; the least, even; sogar
alakamurujan variante: ala ka muru. Nom.
das Geringste, nicht einmal. Alamata den
arc-en-ciel; rainbow; Regenbogen.
Category: Sky. synonyme: sanmurunin,
kelen t'a bolo. Il n'a même pas un seul enfant.
He doesn't even have a single child. Er hat
sanmurubilen.
nicht einmal ein einziges Kind.
alakira See main entry: .[á-á-í-á] Nom. le Prophète, alaminɛ [á-á-í-ɛ́] n.comp. résignation, acceptation de
Mahomet; the Prophet, Mohamed; der
l’injustice, fait de s'en remettre à Dieu,
Prophet, Mohammed. Category: Person.
confiance en Dieu; resignation, accepting
alakolo Nom. ciel, voûte céleste; sky; Himmel, injustice, to hand oneself over to God, trust in
Himmelsgewölbe. Category: Sky. God; Resignation, Unrecht hinnehmen, sich in
synonyme: kabakolo, ŋala , sankolo. Gottes Hand übergeben, Gott vertrauen. i bi
2
alaminɛ dɔrɔn
alakota Nom. grave faute, sacrilège; serious sin,
sacrilege; schwerwiegende Sünde, Sakrileg, alaminɛjɔn [á-á-í-ɛ́-ɔ ́] Nom. quelqu'un de résigné,
Lästerung. personne qui se remet à Dieu; resigned person,
person who puts himself into God's hands;
alakɔlɔn See main entry: kɔlɔn .[á-á-ɔ́-ɔ ́] n.comp. puits
1 resignierte Person, Person, die sich ganz Gott
sans fond; well without ground; Brunnen ohne
hingibt. alaminɛjɔn ti malo
Boden.
alamisa See main entry: .[à-à-ì-á] variante: alamusa.
alalandi Nom. personne qui aime Dieu; person who
Nom. jeudi; Thursday; Donnerstag.
loves God; Person, die Gott liebt.
synonyme: lamusa.
alalandiya comparer: alalandi. Nom. amour de/pour
Dieu, piété; love for God, godliness; Liebe zu
Gott, Gottseligkeit, Frömmigkeit.
29/01/2026 3

alamisalon alijinɛ
alamisalon alamisalon alawaadu Emprunt de : arabe. Nom. décret divin, arrêt
[à-à-ì-à-ṍ] bambara: alamisadon. Nom. du sort; divine decree; göttlicher Entscheid.
jeudi; Tuesday; Donnerstag. alawadu Emprunt de : arabe. Nom. décision divine;
alamusa variante: alamisa. Nom. jeudi; Thursday; divine decision; übermenschliche
Donnerstag. Entscheidung.
alanbara Emprunt de : arabe. variante: alhanbara, alawutaala Emprunt de : arabe. Nom. Dieu unique;
alihamara. Nom. ambre, parfum à odeur unique God; alleiniger Gott. Fɛn bɛɛ setigi ye
d'ambre; amber, amber-scented perfume; Alawutaala ye. C'est Dieu le maître de toutes
Bernstein, nach Bernstein duftendes Parfüm. choses. It is God who is the master of all
synonyme: kasadiyalan, lobaanɛ. things. Gott ist der Meister über alles.
synonyme: maŋala.
alaɲɛsiran [á-á-ɛ́-i-ã́] Nom. la peur de Dieu; fear of
God; Gottesfurcht. ale comparer: a 3 .[à-é] pron. il, elle, son, sa, ses,
alaɲɛsiranbaga [á-á-ɛ́-í-ã́-á-á] Nom. celui qui
troisième personne du singulier (emphatique);
he, she, it, his, her, third person singular
craint Dieu; God fearing person;
pronoun (emphatic); er. Ale nana. Lui, il est
Gottesfürchtiger Mensch. n'i kɛɲɛra
venu. Elle, elle est venue. He, he has come. Er,
alaɲɛsiranbaga ma, i ka ko bi gɛlɛya er ist gekommen.
alaɲɛsiranbali [á-á-ɛ́-í-á-á-í] Nom. celui qui ne alekabakuru variante: alikabakuru. Nom. cheville;
craint pas Dieu; person who doesn't fear God; ankle; Knöchel. Category: Body.
ein Mensch, der Gott nicht fürchtet. synonyme: ntamakuru.
alaɲɛsiranya [á-á-ɛ́-í-á-á] Nom. la crainte de Dieu, alekunsalam Emprunt de : arabe. interj. réponse faite
soumission à Dieu; The fear of God,
à salamalekun; greeting as answer; Gruss als
submission to God; die Gottesfurcht, sich Gott
Antwort.
unterwerfen.
aleluya [à-è-ú-à] excl. alléluia, gloire à Dieu;
alaɲɔ variante: ala ka ɲɔ. Nom. espèce de plante; kind
hallelujah, glory be to God; halleluja, Gott sei
of plant; Pflanzenart. Category: Grass, herb,
gelobt.
vine. uraria picta; chlorophytum senegalense;
cassytha filiformis. alhamdulilayi Emprunt de : arabe. interj. Dieu soit
alasira Alasira [á-á-í-á] Nom. 1 • la loi divine, loué, louange à Dieu; praise be to God; Gott
sei Lob.
justice divine; the divine law, divine justice;
das göttliche Gesetz. nin ti alasira ye alibasa Emprunt de : arabe. Nom. oignon; onion;
Zwiebel. Category: Food. allium cepa.
2 • espace entre les incisives; space between
synonyme: jaba .
the incisors; Raum zwischen den 1
Schneidezähnen. alifaatiya Nom. premier chapitre du Coran; first
alasɔn alasɔn See main entry: chapter of the Koran; erstes Kapitel des
sɔn.[á-á-ɔ ́] Morphemes: ala-sɔn. Nom. Korans.
1
1 • cadeau inattendu; unexpected gift; alifajiri Emprunt de : arabe. Nom. aube, aurore, point du
unerwartetes Geschenk.
jour; dawn, daybreak; Morgendämmerung,
2 • don de Dieu; God's gift; Gottes Gabe, Gabe Tagesanbruch. Category: Weather.
Gottes. Alasɔn ani mɔgɔsɔn ti kelen ye synonyme: kɛnɛmilikimalaka, kɛnɛjɛnda,
alasɔsɔyiri [á-á-ɔ́-ɔ́-í-í] variante: alasɔsɔyirinin. kɛnɛtigɛnda, milikimalaka, fajiri,
Nom. arbre (espèce) lit. «arbre qui contredit
kɛnɛfarada.
Dieu»; tree sp; Baumart. Category: Tree. alifurabi Emprunt de : arabe. variante: alorobi. Nom.
acacia albida, faidherbia albida.
caroube, espèce de poivre; carob, kind of
synonyme: balanzan, balansan.
pepper; Pfefferart. synonyme: alorobi.
alatando [á-á-ã́-ó] Nom. grâce divine; divine grace;
alijɛnɛ variante: alijinɛ, arijɛnɛ, arijana. Nom. paradis;
göttliche Gnade.
paradise; Paradies. antonyme: jahanama,
alatanun Nom. bienfait de Dieu, grâce divine; God's
alatasuma; synonyme: arijana.
kind deed, it is a godsend, divine grace; Gabe
Gottes, Gottes Gnade.
alijinɛ See main entry:
arijinɛ.[à-ì-í-ɛ́] variante: alijɛnɛ, arajana.
alatasuma Nom. enfer; hell; Hölle. antonyme: arijana,
Nom. paradis; paradise; Paradies.
alijinɛ, alijɛnɛ; synonyme: jahanama.
antonyme: jahanama, alatasuma.
29/01/2026 4

alijinɛtoro amɔrɔtisɛri
alijinɛtoro Nom. arbre du paradis, figuier du paradis; alimɛti See main entry: takala.[à-ì-ɛ̀-í] Emprunt de
paradise fig tree; Paradies Feigenbaum. : français. Nom. allumette; match; Zündholz.
Category: Tree. ficus capensis. Category: Tool.
alikaaba [à-ì-á-á] Emprunt de : arabe. Nom. La alimɛtikala alimɛtikala See main entry:
kaaba; The Kaaba; Die Kaaba. .[à-ì-ɛ̀-ì-á-á] n.comp. tige d'allumette; match;
alikama Etym: arabe.[à-ì-á-á] variante: alikana. Streichholz. Category: Tool.
Nom. blé, froment; wheat; Weizen. synonyme: alimɛtikisɛ.
Category: Food. triticum durum. alimɛtikisɛ Nom. brin d'allumette; match; Streichholz.
alikiyama Etym: arabe. Nom. l'au-delà; the next world; Category: Tool. synonyme: alimɛtikala.
das Jenseits. synonyme: nɛɛmaso, laharaso.
alimɛtisun See main entry: .[à-ì-ɛ̀-ì-ṹ] n.comp.
alikiyamalon variante: alikiyama, alikiyamu, eucalyptus; eucalyptus; Eukalyptus.
yomalikiyama. Nom. Le jour du jugement Category: Tree.
dernier; day of the last judgment; Tag des alimu comparer: lɔnnikɛla. variante: lalimu, malimu.
jüngsten Gerichtes. synonyme: kiyama,
Nom. un savant (musulman); scholar (Muslim);
jamajɔdon, siratu. muslimischer Gelehrte. Category: Person.
alikɔli Nom. alcool; alcohol; Alkohol. Category: Treat alimukaykayi variante: kayikayi. Nom. espèce de
disease. synonyme: dɔlɔbaga. plante, trompette des anges; kind of plant;
Pflanzenart. Category: Grass, herb, vine.
alikurana See main entry:
datura innoxia.
.[à-ì-ù-à-á-ã́] variante: alikuranlɛ. Nom.
Alizeri jamana
Coran; Koran; Koran. synonyme: kuranɛ,
[á-í-é-í-à-à-á] synonyme: Alizeri. n.pro.
kuranasaniman, kurana.
Algérie; Algeria; Algerien. Category: Country.
alimami See main entry: imam.[à-ì-à-í-í] Emprunt alizɛburu Emprunt de : français. Nom. algèbre;
de : arabe. Nom. imam, celui qui dirige la
algebra; Algebra, Grössenkalkül.
prière à la mosquée; imam, the man who leads Category: Mathematics.
prayer in the mosque; Imam. Alimami bi
alorobi Nom. caroube, espèce de poivre; carob, locust
mɔgɔw laseli misiri kɔnɔ. L’imam fait prier
bean; Johannisbrot. Category: Food.
les gens dans la mosquée. The imam leads the
synonyme: alifurabi.
people in their prayers in the mosque. Der
Imam leitet das Gebet in des Moschee. alu See main entry: aw.[á-ú] Variant: á. pron. vous;
Category: Worker, occupation. you (pl.); ihr.
alimamifalaki variante: alimamifalkɔ. Nom. adjoint aluwa [à-ù-á] Emprunt de : arabe. Nom. bonbon;
de l'imam, substitut de l'imam, celui qui répète sweet, candy; Bonbon, Süssigkeit.
les gestes et les paroles derrière l'imam; Category: Food.
assistant of the imam; Assistent des Imams.
Category: Worker, occupation.
Ameriki [á-é-í-ì] n.pro. Amérique, États-Unis;
America, USA; Vereinigte Staaten von
alimamiya Nom. poste d'imam, imamat, charge
Amerika, USA.
d'imam; the job/duty of the imam; das Amt des
Imams.
Amerikidisidi Nom. Amérique du sud; South
Aliman Aliman [á-í-ã́] Nom. Allemand; German; America; Südamerika. Category: Land.
Deutsch. Category: Community. ami [à-í] variante: amiin. interj. amen, ainsi
soit-il, réponse aux souhaits et aux
Aliman jamana [á-í-ã́-á-á-á] n.pro. Allemagne;
bénédictions; amen, may it be so; amen, so soll
Germany; Deutschland. Category: Country. es sein, so sei es.
Alimankɛlɛfɔlɔ [á-í-ã́-ɛ́-ɛ́-ɔ́-ɔ́] Nom. première amiina [à-í-á] variante: ami. 1 • excl. amen, ainsi
guerre mondiale; first world war; Erster soit-il, réponse aux souhaits et aux
Weltkrieg. Alimankɛlɛ fɔlɔ daminɛna san bénédictions; amen; amen.
1914, a banna san 1918. La première guerre 2 • Nom. vœux exhaussé; answered wish;
mondiale commença en 1914 et termina en erhörter Wunsch. Ala k'a ni amiina bɛn
1918. The first world war began in 1914 and
ended in 1918. Der erste Weltkrieg begann um
amɔrɔtisɛri Emprunt de : français. Nom. amortisseur;
1914 und endete um 1918. Note: Kibaru: shock absorber, damper; Stossdämpfer,
Nowanburukalo 2003, p.7 Schockabsorber.
29/01/2026 5

an arajaba
an comparer: anw.[ã́] pron. nous, notre, nos, anvɔlɔpu
première personne du pluriel; we, us, our, first comparer: lɛtɛrɛforoko.[ã́-ɔ́-ɔ́-ú] Emprunt
person plural pronoun; wir, unser, unsere. An de : français. Variant: anwulopu. Nom.
nana. Nous sommes venus(es). We have enveloppe; covering, envelope;
come. Wir sind gekommen. Briefumschlag, Hülle.
an bi sini expr. à demain (salutation); see you anw comparer: an.[ã́] pron. nous, notre, nos,
tomorrow (greeting); bis morgen (Gruss). première personne du pluriel (emphatique);
an bi wula fɛ expr. à ce soir (salutation); see you this
we, us, our, first person plural pronoun
(emphatic); wir (emphatisch), unser, unsere.
evening; bis zum Abend.
Anw nana. Nous, nous sommes venus. We, we
angɛrɛ See main entry: .[ã́-ɛ́-ɛ]́ Emprunt de : français. have come. Wir, wir sind gekommen.
Nom. engrais; fertilizer; Dünger. anwu [ã́-ù] Variant: annu. n.pro. nous; we; wir.
Category: Agriculture. synonyme: nɔgɔ.
2
anwulopu See main entry:
Angilɛ jamana [ã̀-ì-ɛ́ á-á-á-à] Variant: Angilɛtɛri.
anvɔlɔpu.[ã́-ú-ɔ́-ú] Emprunt de : français.
n.pro. Angleterre; United Kingdom, Great
Britain; Grossbritanien, England.
variante: anvulopu. Nom. enveloppe; envelope;
Category: Country. Hülle,Briefumschlag. synonyme: lɛtɛrɛforoko.
angilɛkan [à-ì-ɛ̀-ã́] Morphemes: angilɛ-kan. Nom. apolo
anglais, la langue anglaise; English; Englisch. comparer: ɲɛdimin.[á-ó-ó] variante: apoloɲ
Angilɛkan bi fɔ jamana caman na, i n’a fɔ adimin. Nom. 1 • conjonctivite, infection des
Gana, Kenya ani Afirikidisidi. On parle yeux; conjunctivitis, eye infection;
l’anglais dans beaucoup de pays, comme le Augenentzündung. Category: Disease.
Ghana, le Kenya et l’Afrique du Sud. English synonyme: tereɲɛdimin.
is spoken in a lot of countries such as Ghana,
2 • musique populaire mandingue; popular
Kenya and South Africa. Man spricht in vielen
Manding music; Manding Volksmusik.
Ländern Englisch, zum Beispiel in Ghana,
3 • orchestre (de musique populaire
Kenia und Südafrika.
mandingue); music orchestra;
Angilɛtɛri See main entry: Angilɛ Musikorchester.
jamana.[ã́-í-í-ɛ́-í] n.pro. Angleterre; araba See main entry: arabalon.[à-à-á] Emprunt de
England; Grossbritanien, England.
: arabe. Nom. mercredi; Wednesday;
Category: Country.
Mittwoch.
Angola Nom. Angola; Angola; Angola.
arabacanjo variante: arabakɔnjo. Nom. plein milieu
Category: Country.
de la nuit (vers 2 heures); middle of the night
ani comparer: ni 1 .[à-í] conj. et, et aussi (entre deux (around 2 a.m.); mitten in der Nacht (gegen 2
noms ou deux propositions); and; und. cɛ Uhr morgens).
ani muso Homme et femme. man and woman. arabakale Nom. dernier mercredi d'un mois lunaire;
Mann und Frau. last Wednesday of a lunar month; letzten
ankasa interj. ça alors; wow, well; wirklich. Ankasa! Mittwoch eines Mondmonats.
Yan de ye kabakojamana ye! Ça alors! C'est arabalon [à-à-à-ṍ] Variant: araba. Nom. mercredi;
un pays extraordinaire! Wow, that is an Wednesday; Mittwoch.
extraordinary country! Wirklich, das ist ein arabo [à-à-ó] Emprunt de : français. Nom. rabot;
außerordentliches Land!
plane; Hobel. Category: Tool.
annu See main entry: anwu.[ã́-ú] pron. nous; we; wir.
arabuka Nom. touraco gris; Grey Plantain-Eater;
anpili Emprunt de : français. Nom. amplificateur; Grauer Lärmvogel. Category: Bird.
amplifier; Verstärker. synonyme: koroko, koko 3 .
anpuli [ã-́ ú-í] Emprunt de : français. Nom. ampoule; Arabula [à-à-ù-á] Morphemes: arabu-la. Nom.
bulb; Glühbirne, Lichtröhre, Neonröhre. monde arabe; Arab World; arabische Welt.
Ántaritiki Emprunt de : français. Nom. Antarctique; aradi Emprunt de : français. Nom. radis; radish;
Antarctic; die Antarktis, Südpol. Radieschen, Rettich. Category: Food.
Category: Land.
arajaba Nom. septième mois de l'année lunaire;
antɛni Emprunt de : français. Nom. antenne; antenna;
seventh month of the lunar year; siebter Monat
Antenne. des Mondjahres.
29/01/2026 6

arajabamankɔnɔ aviyɔn
arajabamankɔnɔ n.comp. sixième mois de l'année arimonika Emprunt de : français. Nom. harmonica;
lunaire; sixth month of the lunar year; sechster mouth organ, harmonica; Mundharmonika.
Monat des Mondjahres. Category: Musical instrument.
arajo [à-à-ó] Emprunt de : français. Nom. Áritiki Emprunt de : français. Nom. Arctique; Arctic;
1 • radiographie; radiography, radiogram; die Arktis. Category: Land.
Röntgenaufnahme.
aritiso Emprunt de : français. Nom. artichaut;
2 • radio, poste de radio; radio; Radio. kuma
artichoke; Artischocke. Category: Food.
fɔra arajo ra Category: Machine.
arozuwari [á-ó-ú-á-í] Emprunt de : français. Nom.
arajolamɛnna Nom. auditeur; listener; Zuhörer.
arrosoir; watering can; Spritzkanne.
synonyme: lamɛnbaga. Category: Agricultural tool.
arajomaɲeto arɔndiseman See main entry:
[à-à-ò-á-é-ó] Morphemes: arajo-maɲeto. arɔndisiman.[á-ɔ ́-í-é-ã́] Emprunt de
Nom. magnétophone; radio-cassette recorder, : français. Variant: arɔndisiman. Nom.
stereo; Tonband. Category: Machine. arrondissement; district, administrative area;
synonyme: maɲeto, kantalan. Bezirk, Gau. synonyme: kubedadenin.
arajoso [à-à-ò-ó] Morphemes: arajo-so. Nom. arɔndisiman See main entry: arɔndiseman. Emprunt
station de radio; radio station; Radiostation. de : français. Variant: arɔndiseman. Nom.
Sura, n ye Faransi arajoso lamɛn. Hier soir, arrondissement; administrative district in a
j’ai écouté Radio France Internationale. Last large town; Stadtteil, Distrikt.
night, I listened to the French radio station. Category: Government.
Gensternabend habe ich RFI gehört.
asɛti [á-ɛ́-í] Emprunt de : français.
araka variante: arakan. Nom. posture de prière
Variant: asiyɛti. Nom. assiette; plate; Teller.
(debout et agenouillé); prayer position; Category: Container.
Gebetshaltung .
asipɛrɛzi Emprunt de : français. Nom. asperge;
aramɔri Emprunt de : français. Nom. armoire;
asparagus; Spargel. Category: Food.
cupboard; Schrank, Kasten.
Category: Household equipment.
asipirini Emprunt de : français. Nom. aspirine; aspirin;
Aspirin. Category: Treat disease.
aranze Emprunt de : français. Nom. rangée; row, line;
Reihe.
asiyɛti See main entry: asɛti.[á-í-ɛ́-í] Emprunt de
: français. Nom. assiette; plate; Teller.
arato Emprunt de : français. Nom. râteau; rake;
Rechen. Category: Agricultural tool. atayi Nom. thé vert; green tea; grüner Tee.
araye [à-à-é] Emprunt de : français. Nom. railles; ateliye Emprunt de : français. Nom. atelier, séminaire;
rails; Schienen. synonyme: tɛrɛnsira. workshop; Ausbildungskurs, Workshop,
Seminar.
aribitiri Emprunt de : français. Nom. arbitre ; football
Átilantiki kɔgɔjibá See main entry: . Emprunt de
referee, umpire; Fussballschiedsrichter,
Schiedsrichter. Category: Worker, : français. Nom. Océan atlantique; Atlantic
occupation. synonyme: filetigi, filefyɛ. Ocean; Atlantischer Ozean. Category: Water,
Region.
arijana variante: arijinɛ. Nom. ciel, paradis; heaven,
paradise; Himmel, Paradies.
avansi [á-á-í] Emprunt de : français. Nom. avance;
synonyme: alijɛnɛ, ŋala ; antonyme: alatasuma. advance; Vorschuss. Category: Finance.
2
arijinɛ Etym: arabe.[à-ì-í-ɛ́] variante: arijana. avirili See main entry: avirilikalo. Emprunt de
Variant: alijinɛ. Nom. paradis; paradise; : francais. Nom. Avril; April; April.
Paradies. avirilikalo See main entry:
arijinɛden [à-ì-ì-ɛ-ẽ́] n.comp. résident au paradis; kalo.[á-í-í-í-á-ó] Morphemes: avirili-kalo.
resident in Paradise; Paradies Bewohner. Variant: avirili. n.comp. avril; April; April.
Ala k'a kɛ arijinɛden ye
aviyɔn [á-í-ɔ ́] Emprunt de : français. Nom. avion;
arijinɛyiri arijinɛyiri [à-ì-ì-ɛ̀-í-í] n.comp. moringa air-plain, air-plane, aircraft, plane; Flugzeug.
ou Arbre de Vie; Moringa tree, drumstick tree; Category: Travel. synonyme: sannakurun,
Moringabaum, Meerrettichbaum oder pankurun.
Trommelstockbaum. Category: Tree. moringa
oleifera. synonyme: yiribulu, jirininbulu.
29/01/2026 7

aviyɔnso baa
aviyɔnso [á-í-ɔ ́-ó] Morphemes: awiyɔn-so. n.comp. aw comparer: á
aéroport; airport; Flugplatz, Flughafen. 09c9b71e-275b-4ccd-83ee-96343e0844
Category: Travel, Building. c .[á-ù] Variant: alu. pron. vous, votre, vos,
8
synonyme: pankuruntayɔrɔ, sannakurun
deuxième personne du pluriel; you, your,
jigiyɔrɔ. second person plural pronoun; ihr, euer, eure
aviyɔntalan (emphatische Form). Aw nana. Vous, vous
êtes venus. You (pl.), you have come. Ihr, ihr
[á-í-ɔ ́-á-ã́] Morphemes: aviyɔn-ta-lan.
seid gekommen.
n.comp. porte-avions; aircraft carrier;
Flugzeugträger. Category: Travel. Awafitinin Nom. Haoua la petite; the small Awa; Awa
avoka [á-ó-á] Emprunt de : français. Nom.
(Eva) die Kleine.
1 • avocat (fruit); avocado fruit; Avocado. awɔ interj. oui; yes; ja. synonyme: iyo, hɔn 3 , ɔnhɔn 1 .
Category: Food. ayi See main entry: .[à-í] inter. non; no; nein. Ayi,
2 • professionnel du droit (défense), maître;
fɔlɔ. Non, pas encore. No, not yet. Nein, noch
lawyer; Advokat, Rechtsanwalt.
Category: Person. nicht. synonyme: ɔnhɔn 2 .
avokasun [á-ó-á-ṹ] n.comp. avocatier; avocado tree; ayiwa [á-ì-à] Emprunt de : arabe. interj. d’accord,
Avocado Baum. Category: Tree. alors, bon, eh bien, mais; OK; gut! also.
Ayiwa, n bɛ taa. Bon, je m'en vais. OK, I am
going away. Also, ich gehe nun.
Azi [á-í] n.pro. Asie; Asia; Asien.
Category: Region.
azɔti Emprunt de : français. Nom. azote; nitrogen;
Stickstoff . Category: Agriculture, Sky.
B - b
b'a kɔnɔ expr. inclus; included; eingeschlossen, ba [á] variante: baa. Nom. rivière, fleuve, cours
6
einbezogen, inklusive. Category: Finance. d'eau; river, stream; Fluss, Bach, Wasserlauf.
ba Nom. marque de respect; mark of respect; Category: Water.
1
Respekt Zeichen. Ba Sedu -ba suf. 1 • augmentatif; augmentative;
Vergrösserungs-Suffix für Nomen und
ba
2
adj. grand; big, large; gross.
Steigerung für Adjektive. muru, muruba
ba [à] variante: baa. Nom. chèvre, caprin; goat; couteau, grand couteau. knife, big knife.
3
Ziege, Geiss. Category: Mammal, Animal
Messer, großes Messer.
husbandry. 2 • suffixe a valeur péjorative ou méliorative;
suffix of pejorative value or improvement
ba [à] variante: baa. Nom. 1 • mille, millier;
4 value ; Suffix, das verächtlich oder besser
thousand; tausend. Category: Mathematics. macht. muso, musoba femme, femme de
2 • cinq mille francs; five thousand francs; mauvaise vie. woman, woman of a bad life
fünftausend Franken. style. Frau, Frau mit schlechtem Lebensstil.
ba [á] variante: baa. Nom. 1 • mère, maman (et muso ɲumanba femme très gentille. very
5
par extension: tante maternelle, coépouse du kind woman. sehr freundliche Frau.
père, épouse de l'oncle paternel...); mother, baa [à] variante: ba. Nom. chèvre, caprin; goat;
1
mum; Mutter. Category: Person, Kinship.
Ziege. Category: Mammal.
synonyme: bamuso .
1
baa [á] variante: ba. Nom. fleuve, rivière; river;
2 • principe, essentiel, principal; principle, 2
essential, main; Hauptsache, Urgrund, Fluss. Category: Water.
Grundlage, das Wesentliche. i ba don a la. baa See main entry: waa .[à] variante: ba. Nom.
3 3
Mets-y toute ton application. Put all your mille (1000); thousand (1000); tausend, 1000.
effort into it. Stecken Sie Ihre ganze Kraft san ba fila ani naani l’année 2004. the year
hinein.
2004. das Jahr 2004.
29/01/2026 8

baa baara tɛmɛsira
baa [á] variante: ba. Nom. 1 • mère; mother; baan Emprunt de : français. variante: ban. Nom.
4 2
Mutter. Category: Kinship. banc; bench; Bank, Sitzbank.
synonyme: wolomuso, denba , naa, namuso, synonyme: sigilanjan.
1
bamuso 1 . baana [à-á] Nom. personne riche, personne aisée; rich
2 • tante maternelle; aunt (mother's sister); person; Reicher, reiche Person.
Tante (Schwester der Mutter). synonyme: nafolobatigi.
baa [à] Nom. Monsieur (terme de respect devant un
5 baanabaana Nom. petit commerçant ambulant,
nom d'homme); Mister, Sir; Herr. Baa Ali.
marchand ambulant; retailer, seller on the
Monsieur Ali. Mister Ali. Herr Ali. street; Strassen Händler. Category: Worker,
-baa variante: -baga. suf. suffixe verbale qui occupation.
indique l’agent, c’est-à-dire celui qui fait baanafolo See main entry: .[à-à-á-ó-ó] n.comp.
l’action; verbal suffix indicating agent, i.e. one grande richesse; riches; grosse Reichtümer.
who does the action; Agent-Suffix. dɛmɛ,
baanafolobatigi
dɛmɛbaa aider, celui qui aide. help, helper.
[à-à-ò-ò-à-í-í] Morphemes: nafolo-ba-tig
helfen, Helfer. kisi, kisibaa sauver, sauveur.
i. Nom. riche, richard, personne riche; rich
save, saviour. retten, Retter. ɲɛminɛ,
man; reiche Person. Category: Person.
ɲɛminɛbaa diriger, dirigeant. lead, leader.
leiten, Leiter. synonyme: -baga.
baanaya 1 • Verbe. enrichir; enrich, become rich;
bereichern.
baabaali [à-à-í] Verbe. effrayer, crier sur, menacer;
2 • Nom. richesse; wealth; Reichtum.
scare, threaten; erschrecken, drohen,
anschreien, Angst machen. ka denmisɛnw
baancinin Nom. frère cadet du père; father's younger
baabali menacer les enfants. threaten
brother; jüngerer Bruder des Vaters.
Category: Kinship. synonyme: faninncinin.
children. Kinder bedrohen.
synonyme: jasiran. baara comparer: cii , baarabololanin.[á-á] Nom.
1 2
baabu [á-ú] Nom. conversation, causerie, texte, 1 • travail, métier, profession, occupation,
œuvre, prestation, tâche, pratique; work, job,
chapitre, récit; conversation, chapter, story;
occupation, profession; Arbeit, Beruf,
Gespräch, Unterhaltung, Kapitel, Geschichte.
Beschäftigung. I ka baara ye mun ye ? Quel
baabugubaara Nom. travail forcé, rude épreuve;
est votre travail ? What is your work? Was sind
forced labour, hardship; Zwangsarbeit, Not. Sie von Beruf? Category: 6.1 Work.
baabumaana n.comp. conte à épisode; folk-tale; 2 • problème, ennui, affaire, histoire; problem,
Volksfabel, Volksgeschichte.
trouble; Problem.
3 • maraboutage, envoûtement; bewitchment,
baadɛ Emprunt de : arabe. Nom. bénédiction,
infatuation, enchantment; Betörung,
protection; blessing, protection; Segen, Verzauberung.
Schutz. Ala ka baadɛ kɛ i ye! Que Dieu
baara [á-á] vt. 1 • travailler un matériau, préparer
t’accorde sa grâce! May God grant you his
2
grace! Möge Gott Ihnen seine Gnade
qqch., faire, soigner, construire; work;
schenken!
arbeiten. A bi nɛgɛ baara. Il travaille le fer.
He works the iron. Er bearbeitet das Eisen.
baadɛbɛ Adverbe. violemment, sévèrement; violently,
2 • marabouter, ensorceler; bewitch, enchant;
severely; heftig, brutal. O y'a baadɛbɛ gosi. verzaubern, verwünschen, bezaubern.
Ils l'ont violemment frappé. They beat him
3 • réparer, arranger, opérer; repair, arrange,
violently. Sie schlugen ihn brutal. operate; reparieren, flocken, operieren.
baadi interj. n'est-ce pas, ou bien quoi?; isn't it, or baara bololasɛbɛ chronogramme; chronogram;
what?; nicht wahr, oder was?
Chronogramm.
baalan variante: baalannin, baala. Nom. baara bɔcogo ɲɔgɔn kɔrɔ chronologie;
poisson-chien; kind of fish; Fischart.
chronology; Chronologie.
Category: Fish. hydrocynus forskalii / brevis.
baara sariyasun Nom. code du travail; labor code;
baan variante: ban. Nom. raphia; kind of shrub;
1 Arbeitsgesetz.
Baumart. Category: Bush, shrub. raphia
sudanica.
baara tɛmɛsira [á-á ɛ̀-ɛ̀-í-á] n.comp.
méthodologie; methodology; Methodologie.
29/01/2026 9

baarabali baarakɛminan
baarabali Nom. chômeur, sans-travail, fainéant, bon à baarafɛɛrɛw yiriwali Nom. développement
rien; unemployed person; Arbeitsloser. technologique; technological development;
synonyme: fuyan. Technologieentwicklung.
synonyme: fɛɛrɛsiraw yiriwali.
baarabaliya variante: baarakɛbaliya. Nom. chômage,
repos, férié; unemployment; Arbeitslosigkeit. baarajiidi [á-á-í-í] comparer: buguyahakɛ. Nom.
synonyme: baaratanya, baarasɔrɔbaliya. productivité; productivity; Produktivität.
baarabila n.comp. démission, grève, cessation du baarakalan n.comp. formation professionnelle;
travail; resignation, strike; Kündigung, Streik. professional training; Berufsausbildung.
synonyme: baaralalɔ. baarakɛbali Morphemes: baara-kɛ-bali. Nom.
baarabololanin comparer: baara . n.comp. paresseux; lazy person; Faulpelz, Faulenzer.
1
programme; program; Programm. baarakɛbaliya Nom. chômage, absence de travail,
baarada comparer: cikɛda repos; unemployment, absence of work, rest;
1
Arbeitslosigkeit, Abwesenheit von der Arbeit,
baarada.[á-á-á] variante: baarakɛda. Nom.
Erholung. synonyme: baarasɔrɔbaliya.
service administratif, bâtiment administratif,
secteur, entreprise; administrative work, baarakɛbaliyalon Nom. jour férié; holiday;
workplace; administrative Arbeit, Arbeitsort. Feiertag. synonyme: selilon.
synonyme: baaradabolo.
baarakɛbɛgɛn [á-à-ɛ̀-ɛ̀] Nom. animal de trait;
baarada Morphemes: baara-da. Nom. lieu de travail,
2 draught animal, draft animal; Zugtier.
métier, occupation, habitude; duty, Category: Agriculture, Mammal.
department, place of work, service, job,
baarakɛbolifɛnw Nom. engins; devices, machine;
profession, trade, craft, habit; Arbeitsort,
Arbeitsplatz, Dienst, Beruf, Beschäftigung, Maschinen, Vorrichtungen, Geräte.
Gewohnheit. Category: Worker, occupation. baarakɛbolo
synonyme: baarakɛda.
[á-á-ɛ́-ó-ó] Morphemes: baara-kɛ-bolo.
baaradaba Nom. institution; institution; Institution, n.comp. main-d’œuvre, groupe de travailleurs;
Einrichtung. labour; Arbeit.
baaradabolo [á-á-á-ó-ó] Nom. structure; structure; baarakɛcogo [á] Nom. fonctionnement; functioning,
Struktur. synonyme: baarada . operation; Betrieb, das funktionieren.
1
baaradegi n.comp. stage, formation; intern-ship, baarakɛda Nom. lieu de travail, entreprise, service
administratif; workplace, business,
trainee-ship, training; Praktikum, Ausbildung,
Kurs.
administrative department; Arbeitsplatz,
Geschäft, Verwaltungsabteilung.
baaradegila Nom. stagiaire, apprenti; probationer,
synonyme: baarakɛyɔrɔ, baarakɛyɔrɔ,
trainee, novice, person being trained; baarada .
2
Lehrling, Lehrtochter, Praktikant.
Category: Person. baarakɛden Nom. ouvrier, travailleur; worker,
baaraden [á-á-ẽ́] Morphemes: baara-den. employee; Arbeiter. Category: Person,
Worker, occupation. synonyme: baaraden.
variante: baarakɛden. n.comp. ouvrier,
travailleur, serviteur, aide ménager, aide baarakɛdenya Nom. travail de manœuvre, travail
ménagère, ouvrier agricole, manœuvre; de domestique; job of an unskilled worker,
workman, worker, servant, household helper; household work; Arbeit für ungelernte
Arbeiter, Hauthalshilfe, Diener, Mitarbeiter. Arbeiter, Haushalt Arbeiten.
Category: Person. synonyme: baarakɛden. Category: Worker, occupation.
synonyme: baaradenya.
baaradenya Nom. travail peu valorisé, manœuvre,
domestique; unvalued work, labourer, baarakɛla Nom. travailleur, ouvrier; worker,
domestic; nicht hochangesehene Arbeit, employee; Arbeiter, Angestellter.
Arbeiter, Hausangestellte. Category: Worker, occupation.
synonyme: baarakɛdenya. synonyme: ciyakɛla.
baarafaranfasiyasɛbɛ n.comp. cahier de charge; baarakɛlaw ka kititigɛbolo Nom. tribunal du
job-description; Stellenbeschreibung, travail; industrial court; Arbeitsgericht.
Tätigkeitsbeschreibung.
baarakɛminan n.comp. outils, outillage; tools;
synonyme: baaraɲɛfɔsɛbɛ.
Werkzeuge. Category: Tool.
29/01/2026 10

baarakɛminɛn baasi
baarakɛminɛn variante: baarakɛminan. Nom. outil, baaraɲinisɛbɛ Morphemes: baara-ɲini-sɛbɛ. Nom.
outillage, instrument de travail; tool, demande d'emploi; job application;
work-tool; Werkzeug, Arbeitswerkzeug. Arbeits-Bewerbung.
baarakɛnafolo Nom. budget, capital (d'entreprise); baarasɔrɔbaliya Nom. chômage; unemployment;
budget, capital; Budget, Finanzplan, Kapital. Arbeitslosigkeit. synonyme: baaratanya,
Category: Finance. baarabaliya, baarakɛbaliya.
synonyme: baaralatigɛnafolo.
baaratan [á-á-ã́] Morphemes: baara-tan. Nom.
baarakɛnafolo bɔnɔman Nom. budget déficitaire;
chômeur, sans-travail oisif; unemployed
deficit budget; defizitäres Budget. person, idler; Arbeitsloser. Category: Person.
Category: Finance.
baaratanmɔgɔ n.comp. vaurien; scamp, no-good,
baarakɛɲɔgɔn
bad lot; Nichtsnutze.
[á-á-ɛ́-ɔ́-ɔ ́] Morphemes: baara-kɛ-ɲɔgɔn.
baaratanya Nom. chômage; unemployment;
n.comp. collaborateur, collègue, compagnon de
Arbeitslosigkeit. synonyme: baarabaliya,
travail; colleague, co-worker, fellow-worker;
Mitarbeiter, Arbeitskollege. Category: Person. baarasɔrɔbaliya.
baarakɛɲɔgɔnya Nom. coopération, partenariat; baaratigi [á-í-í] n.comp. employeur, patron;
cooperation, partnership; Zusammenarbeit, employer, boss, manager; Arbeitgeber, Chef,
Kooperation, Genossenschaft, Partnerschaft. Vorgesetzter, Meister. Category: Person.
synonyme: jɛnkakɛ, ɲɔgɔndɛmɛ.
baaraw bololali wagati yiranan expr.
baarakɛtaw Nom. activités, travaux; activities, work; chronogramme; chronogram; Chronogramm.
Aktivitäten, Arbeiten, Beschäftigung. baaraw bɔcogo ɲɔgɔn kɔrɔ expr. chronologique;
baarakɛyɔrɔ See main entry: baarayɔrɔ. chronological; chronologisch.
comparer: biro.[á-á-ɛ́-ɔ́-ɔ́] Morphemes: baa baaraw kɛcogo faranfasiyasɛbɛ Nom. cahier de
ra-kɛ-yɔrɔ. Nom. lieu de travail; workplace, charge; specifications, conditions of contract,
workshop; Arbeitsplatz. synonyme: baarakɛda, duty description, job description;
baarakɛda, baarayɔrɔ, cikɛda baarada. Dienstbeschreibung, Aufgabenheft.
synonyme: baaraɲɛfɔsɛbɛ.
baarakmelaw ka sara Nom. budget du personnel;
budget for salaries; Lohnbudget.
baarayɔrɔ Variant: baarakɛyɔrɔ. lieu de travail;
Category: Finance. workplace, place of work; Arbeitsplatz.
synonyme: baarakɛyɔrɔ.
baaralalɔ n.comp. grève, arrêt de travail; strike,
stopping of work; Streik, Arbeitsniederlegung. baarayɔrɔyɛlɛma See main entry: . Verbe. muter;
synonyme: murutili baara ra, baarabila. mutate; versetzen.
baaralatigɛnafolo comparer: bɔta ni donta. Nom. baari Nom. lutte, bagarre; fight, conflict, struggle;
budget; budget; Budget, Kostenvoranschlag. Kampf, Balgerei, Schlägerei.
Category: Finance. synonyme: nafolo, baarɔ Nom. épouse de l'oncle maternel, et toute mère
baarakɛnafolo.
dans la concession, toute tant e plus jeune que
baaranafolokundon Nom. budget la mère; wife of maternal uncle; Frau des
Onkels mütterlichenseits. Category: Kinship.
d'investissement; budget for an investment;
Budget für die Investition. Category: Finance. baase Emprunt de : français. Nom. camionnette
baaraɲɛfɔsɛbɛ n.comp. cahier de charge; bâchée; van with a cover; Kleintransporter mit
Plane. Category: Travel.
job-description; Stellenbeschreibung.
synonyme: baaraw kɛcogo faranfasiyasɛbɛ, baasi 1 [á-í] Emprunt de : arabe. Nom. mal,
baarafaranfasiyasɛbɛ. problème, ennui, inconvénient, chose grave,
tort; problem, vexation, ennui, wrong,
baaraɲini Nom. emploi, manœuvre, tâcheron, annoyance, inconvenience, serious thing;
travailleur journalier; job, employment, Problem, Ärgernis, falsch, Ärger,
unskilled worker; Arbeit, Anstellung, Unannehmlichkeit, ernste Sache. Baasi tɛ ! /
Arbeitsstelle, Tageslöhner, Hilfsarbeiter,
O tɛ baasi ye ! D’accord ! Pas de problème !
Handlanger. Baaraɲini demandi. Demande
Ce n’est pas grave ! OK! No problem! Gut,
d'emploi. job application. Arbeitsstelle
kein Problem!
Gesuch. Category: Worker, occupation.
baasi [à-í] Verbe. érafler, égratigner, écorcher;
2
scratch, graze; aufschürfen, zerkratzen.
29/01/2026 11

baasima baden
baasima grave, chose grave, qui porte tort; serious babin Morphemes: ba-bin. Nom. espèce d'herbe; kind
thing, wrong; ernste Sache, falsch, schlimm. o of grass; Grasart. Category: Grass, herb, vine.
tɛ baasima ye ce n'est pas grave. it's not vetiveria nigritana.
serious. Es ist nicht ernst. babisanbara [à-ì-á-á-á] n.comp. sandalettes en
baatara [á] Nom. fleur femelle du maïs; female corn plastique; plastic sandals; Plastiksandalen.
1
flower; weibliche Kornblume. Category: Parts babolo [á-ó-ó] Morphemes: ba-bolo. n.comp.
of a plant. affluent d’un fleuve, bras de rivière; affluent,
baatara Emprunt de : français. Nom. bâtard, de rien, branch of a river; Zufluss, Nebenfluss,
2
Flussarm. Category: Water.
sans valeur; worthless, bastard; Bastard,
wertlos. babon [á-ṍ] Morphemes: ba-bon. n.comp. maison
1
baaya [á] Emprunt de : arabe. Nom. serment (de ne mère (enfant de même femme); mother house;
Mutterhaus. Category: Building.
pas enfreindre les règles de la religion); oath
(not to break the rules of religion); Eid (die babon [à-ó] Morphemes: ba-bon. n.comp. case pour
2
Regeln der Religion nicht zu brechen). chèvre, étable pour chèvre; shelter for goats;
baba [à-á] Nom. 1 • Papa, père; Dad, daddy, Father; Ziegenstall. Category: Building.
1
Vater, Papa. Category: Kinship. babonda Morphemes: ba-bon-da. Nom. famille
synonyme: Buwa. maternelle; family of the mother, family
2 • marque de respect; mark of respect; mother's side; Familie mütterlichenseits.
Respekt Markierung. Baba Musa Papa Category: Kinship.
Moussa. Father Moussa. Ehrenvoller Vater babonya variante: babonyɛ. n.comp. 1 • respect dû à la
Moussa.
mère; respect due to the mother; Achtung, die
baba [á-á] Nom. grand fleuve, le fleuve Niger, le man der Mutter erbringen soll.
2
nord; big river, the river Niger, the north; 2 • cadeau offert à la mère (mariage); gift given
grosser Fluss, der Fluss Niger, der Norden. to the mother; Geschenk für die Mutter.
Category: Water. baboonsi [à-ò-í] variante: baboonsii. Nom. espèce
babaara Verbe. préparer, arranger, apprêter; prepare, d'herbe; kind of grass; Grasart.
arrange, get ready to do; vorbereiten, sich Category: Grass, herb, vine. chloris breviseta
bereit machen, arrangieren, zubereiten. / pilosa. synonyme: bakɔrɔboonsii.
synonyme: labaara. baci [á] Morphemes: ba-ci. Verbe. ôter toute envie
bababa [à-à-à] interj. indique la surprise, la de qqch. à qqn., dégoûter; remove all desire for
stupéfaction; indicates surprise, amazement; something. to someone, to disgust; jegliches
deutet auf Überraschung, Erstaunen hin. Verlangen nach etwas beseitigen. jemandem
Bababa, misi nin tɛ se ka minɛ. Ça alors! On gegenüber Ekel empfinden.
ne peut pas attraper cette vache ! Wow! We bada [á-á] Morphemes: ba-da1. n.comp. bord du
1
can't catch this cow! Erstaunlich! Wir können fleuve; river bank; Flussufer. Category: Water.
diese Kuh nicht fangen!
bada [á-á] Emprunt de : arabe. variante: badaa,
babagɛrɛnkelen [à-á-ɛ̀-ɛ̀-é] Nom. crabe du fleuve;
2
badabada. Adverbe. à jamais, pour toujours,
crab; Krabbe. Category: Small animals.
toujours, au grand jamais, continûment,
synonyme: kɛrɛkelen.
complètement; forever, never; für immer, nie.
babara comparer: kɔnkɔbaranin. Nom. tabatière arbre, synonyme: abada.
arbuste épineux; Fried-egg flower tree, badabada n.comp. postérité; posterity;
1
snuff-box tree; Spiegelei-Baum.
Nachkommenschaft, Nachwelt.
Category: Tree. oncoba spinosa.
badabada variante: bada, badaa, badaabadaa.
babi [à-í] Emprunt de : français. variante: babinin. 2
Adverbe. toujours, jamais, à jamais; always,
Nom. 1 • baby-foot; table football;
never, forever; immer, nie, für immer.
Tischfussballspiel.
2 • ancienne voiture de marque Citroën 2 CV; badawu variante: badawo. Adverbe. plouf, bruit d'une
old Citroen car make; Alter Citroen. chute dans l'eau; splash, sound of a fall into
3 • sandales en plastique; plastic sandals; water; Platschen, Geräusch eines Sturzes ins
Plastik Sandalen. Wasser.
babili [á-í-í] n.comp. 1 • pont; bridge; Brücke. baden 1 [à-ẽ́] Morphemes: ba-den. n.comp. chevreau,
chevrette; kid; Kitz, Zicklein.
2 • barrage; dam; Staudamm.
Category: Animal husbandry.
29/01/2026 12

baden baga
baden badoro variante: badugu. Nom. Andropogon (espèce
2
comparer: baliman
1
.[á-ẽ́] Morphemes: ba-de de plante); Andropogon grass, Gamba grass;
n. n.comp. 1 • frère / sœur utérin, enfant de la Andropogon Gras. Category: Grass, herb,
vine. Andropogon gayanus.
même mère; brother or sister of same mother;
Bruder oder Schwester von der gleichen badufalen Nom. espèce d'arbuste; kind of shrub;
Mutter. Category: Kinship. Baumart. Category: Bush, shrub. phyllanthus
2 • ami intime, personne avec laquelle on a des discoideus.
relations d'affection et de confiance; very close
badugawu Nom. bénédiction maternelle; Blessing of
friend; enger Freund oder Freundin.
synonyme: jɔnminteri.
the mother; mütterlicher Segen.
badugawuden n.comp. enfant béni; blessed child;
badendɔgɔcɛ [á] Nom. petit frère utérin; younger
gesegnetes Kind. synonyme: dugaden.
brother (of same mother); jüngerer Bruder
(selbe Mutter). Category: Kinship. bafaaro [á-à-ó] variante: bafaarɔ. Nom. lamantin,
badendɔgɔmuso [á] Nom. petite sœur utérine; génie du fleuve; manatee; Seekuh.
younger sister (same mother); jüngere Category: Mammal. trichechus senegalensis.
Schwester (selbe Mutter). Category: Kinship. bafaraka variante: baforokofaraka. Nom. plante
badenkɔnɔ Nom. loriot doré; golden oriole; Pirol. (espèce); plant sp; Pflanzenart.
Category: Bird. oriolus auratus. Category: Grass, herb, vine. ipomea aquatica.
badenkɔrɔcɛ Nom. grand frère utérin; older brother bafilabɛn Morphemes: ba-fila-bɛn. Nom. confluent;
(same mother); älterer Bruder (selbe Mutter). confluent; Zusammenfluss.
Category: Kinship. bafilamaden Nom. cousin germain (par les mères);
badenkɔrɔmuso Nom. grande sœur utérine; older first cousin (by the mothers); Cousin
sister (same mother); ältere Schwester (selbe mütterlicherseits. Category: Kinship.
Mutter). Category: Kinship. bafili [á] Verbe. changer, inverser; change, reverse;
badenman [á-ẽ́-ã́] Morphemes: ba-den-ma. ändern, umkehren.
variante: badenma. n.comp. parent, membres bafoolo [à-ó-ó] Nom. espèce de plante; kind of plant;
de la même grande famille, sœur ou frère Pflanze (Art). Category: Grass, herb, vine.
utérin, ami, proche; brother or sister of same commelina capitata.
mother, close friend; Bruder oder Schwester
baforokofaraka Nom. liseron d'eau, cissus; water
mit selben Mutter, Freund. Category: Kinship.
bindweed, Water Spinach; Wasserwinde,
badenmanw Nom. frère et sœur utérins; brother and
Wasserspinat. Category: Water, Grass, herb,
sister (same mother); Bruder und Schwester vine. ipomea repans ou ipomea aquatica.
(selbe Mutter). Category: Kinship.
bafulu Nom. enceinte acoustique; loudspeaker;
badenɲɔgɔn cɛman Nom. frère consanguin;
Lautsprecherbox.
brother (same father); Bruder (selbe Vater).
baga [à-à] vi. accuser à tord, attaquer sans raison,
Category: Kinship. 1
provoquer, offenser, outrager; accuse falsely,
badenɲɔgɔn musoman Nom. sœur consanguine;
attack without reason, provoke, offend;
sister (same father); Schwester (selbe Vater). falscher-weise anklagen, zu unrecht anklagen,
Category: Kinship. grundlos angreifen, provozieren, kränken. I
badenya Nom. fraternité, amitié, solidarité entre bagara n ba ma. Tu as accusé ma mère. You
enfants de la même mère, parenté maternelle, accused my mother. Du hast meine Mutter
affection, concorde, entente; brotherhood, angeklagt.
friendship, affection; Brüderlichkeit, baga [à-á] comparer: pɔsɔni. variante: bagan.
Freundschaft, Zuneigung.
2
Nom. poison, venin; poison, venom; Gift. Baga
badɛgɛ [à-ɛ́-ɛ́] bambara: batɛgɛ. Nom. bouc, bouc
bi adamaden faga. Le poison tue l'homme.
castré; billy goat; Ziegenbock.
Poison kills a man. Gift tötet den Menschen.
Category: Mammal.
synonyme: donnkɔnɔ.
badɛndɛla [à-ɛ ̀-ɛ́-á] comparer: bagwɛnna. Nom.
baga [á-á] Nom. 1 • bouillie (de brisure de mil, riz);
chevrier; goat herder; Ziegenhirt.
3
mush, mess; Brei. Category: Food.
synonyme: bagwɛnla.
2 • teinture bleue, bleu clair; blue dyeing, light
badingɛ Morphemes: ba-dingɛ. Nom. lit du fleuve; blue; blauer Farbstoff, hellblau.
river bed; Flussbett. Category: colour.
29/01/2026 13

baga bagangwɛnla
baga [á-á] variante: bagagwɛ. Nom. couleur bleu bagaji [à-à-í] Morphemes: baga-ji. Nom. pesticide,
4
claire, bleu ciel; light-blue, pale-blue; venin; pesticide; Pestizid,
hellblau. Category: colour. Pflanzenschutzmittel. Category: Agriculture.
-baga Nom. agent, faiseur de, suffixe verbal qui bagajiw ka tiɲɛni Nom. pollution agricole;
indique l’agent, c’est-à-dire celui qui fait agricultural pollution; landwirtschaftliche
l’action, agent non permanent; agent, doer of, Umweltverschmutzung.
verbal suffix indicating agent, i.e. one who
bagakisɛ [à-à-í-ɛ́] Nom. dard; sting; Stachel.
does the action; Agent, Macher von.
bayɛlɛma, bayɛlɛmabaga traduire,
Category: Parts of an animal.
traducteur. to translate, translator. übersetzen, bagakuru n.comp. grumeau (de bouillie); lump;
Übersetzer. synonyme: -baa. Brocken, Kloß, Klumpen. Category: Food.
synonyme: mɔnikuru.
bagabaga [à-à-á-á] 1 • vt. effrayer, menacer, faire
1
peur à, intimider; frighten, scare, intimidate; bagamakɛla variante: baganmakɛla,
Angst machen, erschrecken, einschüchtern. baganmalikɛla. Nom. offenseur, provocateur;
synonyme: japapa, jasiran. offending party, agitator; Beleidiger,
2 • Nom. menace, intimidation; threat, Herausforderer.
intimidation; Drohung, Einschüchterung. bagaman [à-à-á] bambara: bagama.
bagabaga 2 [á-á-á-á] Nom. 1 • termite; termite; variante: bagama. adj. venimeux, toxique;
Termite. Category: Insect. synonyme: bubaga 1 . venomous, poisonous; giftig. Nimafɛn
2 • fourmillements dans les membres; tingling bagamanw Animaux venimeux. Venomous
in the limbs; Kribbeln in den Gliedern. animals. Giftige Tiere.
bagabaga 3 Verbe. pousser rapidement (pour une bagamaɲadimin variante: bagamaɲɛdimin. Nom.
plante: mil, herbe etc.); grow quickly (for a conjonctivite; conjunctivitis;
plant: millet, grass etc.); schnell wachsen (für Augenentzündung. Category: Disease.
eine Pflanze: Hirse, Gras usw.) synonyme: tereɲɛdimin.
bagabaga 4 [á] adj. gluant, qui s'écoule et qui est bagan [à-ã́] Nom. amulette en cuir, gri-gri, talisman,
1
visqueux; slimy, runny and viscous; schleimig,
ceinture, bracelet; amulet, talisman; Amulett.
flüssig und zähflüssig. nunji bagabaga Nez
synonyme: aladelisɛbɛ.
morveux. Snotty nose. Rotznase.
synonyme: julujulu, yuluyulu. bagan 2 [à-ã́] variante: baga. Nom. poison, venin;
poison, venom; Gift.
bagabagagwɛ Nom. petite termite blanc, grains de
bagan [á-ã́] Emprunt de : arabe. variante: bɛgɛn,
mil ou de maïs non arrivés à maturité; small 3
white termite, unripe millet or corn grains; bigan. Nom. 1 • animal domestique ou
kleine weiße Termite, unreife Hirse oder sauvage, bête, bétail; animal, beast; Tier,
Maiskörner. Category: Insect. Biest. Soo ye bagan ye. Le cheval est un
bagabagalan Nom. ce qui sert à menacer, à faire animal. The horse is an animal. Das Pferd ist
ein Tier.
peur; instrument to threaten, what serves to
threaten, to scare; was dazu dient, zu drohen, 2 • personne stupide, imbécile; fool;
Angst zu machen, Drohinstrument.
Dummkopf.
bagabagaso [á-á-á-á-ó] n.comp. termitière; bagana variante: baganan, baganayiri, baanan. Nom.
termite-hill; Termitenhügel.
arbre (espèce), gommier rouge; tree sp;
synonyme: ntonkun, nton, bubagaso. Baumart. Category: Tree. acacia niolitica.
1
bagandɔgɔtɔrɔ
bagabagaton [á-á-á-á-ṍ] n.comp. termitière;
[á-ã́-ɔ́-ɔ́-ɔ́-ɔ́] Morphemes: bagan-dɔgɔtɔr
termite-hill; Termitenhügel. synonyme: nton ,
1
ɔ. Nom. vétérinaire; veterinary, vet; Tierarzt.
ntonkun.
Category: Worker, occupation.
bagafɛnw Nom. matières toxiques; toxic materials, synonyme: misisɔgɔla, bɛgɛndɔgɔtɔrɔ,
poisonous substances; giftige Materialien. misidɔkɔtɔrɔ, misidɔkɔtɔrɔ.
bagafu Nom. fibres de sisal; sisal fibres; Sisalfasern. bagangwɛnla Nom. pasteur, berger, vacher, chevrier;
Category: Parts of a plant. shepherd, cowboy; Hirte. Category: Worker,
bagajɛ bambara: bagagwɛ. Nom. bleu clair; light blue; occupation. synonyme: bagwɛnla, gɛnnikɛla,
hellblau. Category: colour. dɛndɛla, gwɛnnikɛla.
29/01/2026 14

baganin bajalan
baganin [à-ã̀-í] Nom. atrophia, espèce d'arbuste; bagaw ka soo variante: baaw ka soo. Nom. colonne
Physic Nut, Barbados Nut; Purpurnuss. des milliers; column of the thousands;
Category: Bush, shrub. jatropha curcas. Tausender Kolonne. Category: Mathematics.
synonyme: mugu 2 . bagaya [á] Verbe. bleuir, teindre en bleu; turn blue, dye
baganma [à-ã̀-à] Nom. accusation, offense, affront, blue; blau werden, blau färben.
1
provocation; accusation, offence, affront, bageren [à-ẽ́-ẽ́] Nom. chevreau, chevrette; kid (goat);
provocation; Anschuldigung, Beleidigung,
Zicklein, Kitz. Category: Mammal.
Affront, Provokation.
bagi [á-í] Nom. tissu en coton, cotonnade dite
baganma [à-à-á] comparer: bolodimi. n.comp. 1
2
«guinée»; cotton cloth; Baumwolle Stoff.
panaris; whit-low; Nagelbettentzündung,
Category: Clothing.
Umlauf. Category: Disease.
bagi [à-í] Nom. lèpre à pustules; leprosy; Lepra.
baganmako variante: baamako. Nom. châtiment 2
Category: Disease.
immérité, offense; undeserved punishment,
offence; unverdiente Strafe, Beleidigung. bagi 3 [à-í] variante: bagigwɛ, baki. Nom. acacia
baganmara Nom. élevage; livestock farming; sieberiana; kind of acacia; Baumart.
Category: Tree. acacia sieberiana ou acacia
Aufzucht, Züchten, Viehhaltung.
des oueds.
Category: Animal husbandry.
bagi [á] Verbe. être habitué (à un lieu); to be
baganmarala Nom. éleveur, pasteur; breeder; 4
accustomed (to a place); (an einen Ort)
Tierzüchter, Viehzüchter. Category: Worker,
gewöhnt sein.
occupation.
bagibagi variante: bugubugu. Adverbe. très chaud;
bagannɔgɔ Nom. fumier; manure; Mist, Dung.
very hot; sehr heiß. I fari bɛ gan bagibagi.
Category: Agriculture, Animal husbandry.
Ton corps est très chaud. Your body is very
bagansonya [á] Nom. vol de bétail; cattle theft; hot. Dein Körper ist sehr heiß.
Viehdiebstahl.
bagifin Nom. acacia spirale; kind of acacia tree;
bagansugu
Baumart. Category: Tree. acacia raddiana ou
comparer: garabali.[ɛ́-ɛ ́-ú-ú] Morphemes: b acacia spirale.
agan-sugu. n.comp. marché à bétails; animal bagimugu Nom. étoffe non cousue, rouleau de tissu;
market; Tiermarkt. synonyme: bɛgɛnlɔgɔ. fabric not sewn, fabric roll; ungenähter Stoff,
bagantan Nom. non venimeux, non toxique; not
Stoffrolle.
poisonous, non-toxic; ungiftig. Sajɛ ye sa bagipisi Nom. pièce d’étoffe comprenant six pagnes;
bagantan ye. Ce serpent n'est pas venimeux. piece of cloth comprising six cloths measures;
That snake is not poisonous. Diese Schlange
Stück Stoff bestehend aus sechs Stoffen.
ist ungiftig. bagitɔ Nom. lépreux; leper; Leprakranker.
bagasabali variante: bagasabali, buasabali. Nom. Category: Disease.
1
espèce de plante; kind of plant; Pflanze (Art). bagugunin [à-ú-ù-í] variante: baabugunin. Nom.
Category: Grass, herb, vine. haemanthus fourmilion; ant-lion; Ameisenlöwe.
multiflorus. Category: Insect.
bagasabali 2 Nom. espèce de plante; kind of plant; bagwɛnla variante: bagwɛnna. Nom. chevrier;
Pflanze (Art). Category: Grass, herb, vine. goatherd; Ziegenhirt. Category: Animal
urginea altissima.
husbandry. synonyme: badɛndɛla,
bagata dumuni fɛ [à-à-á ú-ú-í ɛ̀] Nom. bagangwɛnla.
intoxication alimentaire; food poisoning;
bagwɛnla-ka-dɛgɛ Nom. dèguè des chevriers;
Nahrungsvergiftung.
degue food of the goatherds; Degue Nahrung
-bagatɔ variante: -baatɔ. Nom. état d'un sujet, valeur der Ziegenhirten. Category: Food. coccinia
d'agent subissant; state of being subjected to, grandis ou coccinia cordifolia.
undergo; Zustand eines Erleidenden. bana, bajaga Nom. bouc castré; castrated billy goat;
banabagatɔ maladie, malade. illness, ill
kastrierter Ziegenbock. Category: Agriculture.
person. Krankheit, Kranker. kɔngɔ,
bajalan [á-á-ã́] Nom. canal, port, fleuve sec; canal;
kɔngɔbagatɔ la faim, affamé. hunger,
Kanal. Category: Water.
hungry. der Hunger, hungrig.
29/01/2026 15

bajan bakɔɔri
bajan [à-á] Nom. chèvre du Sahel (race de grande bakelenɲɔgɔn [á] Nom. frère ou sœur de mère
taille); Sahel goat; Sahel Ziege. commune, frère / sœur utérin(e)s; brother or
Category: Mammal. sister of the same mother; Bruder oder
bajanbila [à-à-í-á] variante: bajanyaala,
Schwester von der gleichen Mutter.
Category: Kinship.
bajanbilaya. Nom. vagabondage, errance;
bakɛ Nom. coucal du Sénégal; Senegal coucal;
wandering, restless wandering;
Herum-schweifen, Landstreicherei. Spornkuckuck. Category: Bird. centropus
synonyme: jajaja. senegalensis. synonyme: baɲandi, ɲamatutu,
kɔnɔwara.
bajeli Nom. pagne tissé de coût élevé, fait des bandes
étroites; kind of fabric; Stoffart. bakɛɲɛ [á] Nom. enfant rebelle (généralement une
Category: Clothing. fille), mal éduquée par sa mère; rebellious
baji [á-í] Morphemes: ba-ji. Nom. eau de la
child (usually a girl), poorly educated by her
mother; rebellisches Kind (normalerweise ein
rivière, du lac, eau fluviale, eau du fleuve;
Mädchen), das von seiner Mutter schlecht
river/lake water; Flusswasser, Seewasser.
erzogen wurde.
Category: Water.
bakilu Emprunt de : arabe. Nom. avare; miserly;
bajibolo Nom. affluent; tributary; Nebenfluss.
geizig, knauserig. synonyme: tɛgɛmagɛlɛn.
Category: Water.
bakiluya [à-ì-ù] Nom. avarice; stinginess,
bajigi Nom. bouc, vieux bouc puissant; old billy goat;
miserliness; Habsucht, Geiz.
Ziegenbock. Category: Animal husbandry.
synonyme: bologwɛlɛya, tɛgɛmagɛlɛnya.
bajiw kafoli expr. drainage; draining; Entwässerung.
bakisɛ Nom. prix de revient, capitale; cost price,
Category: Water. synonyme: jilabɔ, jisubɔ.
capital; Selbstkostenpreis, Kapital.
bajo [á] Nom. personne stupide, imbécile; stupid Category: Finance.
person, imbecile; dummer Mensch, Idiot. bakogo Nom. mur de berge; wall of river bank;
bajɔ [á-ɔ́] Nom. espèce de couverture; kind of Kanalmauer. Category: Water.
blanket; Decke. Category: Clothing. bakolo Morphemes: ba-kolo. Nom. essence, fond,
baju 1 [á-ú] comparer: jujɔn. n.comp. base, partie essentielle; essence, main part, essential
fondement, raison première, principe; base, part; Essenz, Wesen, Kern, Hauptteil.
root, foundation; Basis, Wurzel, Grundlage. bakongo Nom. végétation touffue des bords des cours
baju 2 Nom. chèvre peu féconde, chèvre qui met bas d'eau; dense vegetation at the water place;
tous les deux ans (au lieu de deux fois par an); dichte Vegetation am Ufer der Gewässer.
low fertility goat, goat that gives birth every Category: Land.
two years (instead of twice a year); Ziege mit bakɔ [á-ɔ̌] Nom. tante maternelle (sœur aîné de la
geringer Fruchtbarkeit, Ziege, die alle zwei
mère); maternal aunt (mother's older sister);
Jahre (statt zweimal im Jahr) ein Junges zur
Tante mütterlicherseits (ältere Schwester der
Welt bringt.
Mutter). Category: Kinship.
bajukalan Nom. enseignement de base, enseignement
bakɔden variante: bakɔ. Nom. enfant dont la mère est
fondamental; basic education;
morte après l'accouchement; child of whom the
Grundausbildung. Category: Learn.
mother died after giving him birth; Kind
bajuru [á] Nom. luth à quatre cordes; four-stringed dessen Mutter nach der Geburt gestorben ist.
lute; viersaitige Laute. Category: Musical bakɔnɔ Nom. rive, côté d'un fleuve; bank, shore, side
instrument.
of a river; Ufer, Seite eines Flusses, Flussufer.
bajuruntan [á-ù-ù-á] Nom. personne qui traîne, Category: Water, Land.
traîneuse, enfant laissé à lui-même; person bakɔnɔnin variante: bakɔɔnin, balakɔnɔnin,
who hangs around, loitering, child left to his
balakɔnɔninfin. Nom. pluvian d'Égypte;
own devices; Person, die herumhängt und
herumlungert, Kind sich selbst überlassen. crocodile bird; Vogelart. Category: Bird.
pluvianus aegyptius.
bakelennan comparer: wagakelennan. Nom.
bakɔɔnkɔn Nom. espèce de poisson; kind of fish;
millième (rang); thousandth (rank, position);
tausendste (Rang). synonyme: tilan Fischart. Category: Fish. synodontis sorex.
bakelennan. bakɔɔri [à-ɔ́-í] Nom. espèce de plante; kind of plant;
Pflanzenart. Category: Grass, herb, vine.
abutilon muticum; sida cordifolia.
29/01/2026 16

bakɔrɔ bala
bakɔrɔ Morphemes: ba-kɔrɔ. variante: bakɔ. Nom. bakulan [à-ù-á] Nom. ce qui permet de soumettre,
tante maternelle, vieille mère; aunt (mother's fétiche personnel qui permet de soumettre;
side), old mother; Tante, alte Mutter. which allows you to submit, personal fetish
Category: Kinship. which allows you to submit; Ding das dir etwas
bakɔrɔboonsii variante: baboonsii. Nom. espèce de
oder jemand unterwirft, persönlicher Fetisch.
plante; kind of plant; Pflanzenart. chlorsi bakun 1 Nom. tête de chèvre; head of a goat; Kopf einer
breviseta; chloris pilosa. synonyme: baboonsi. Ziege. Baa kun. Bakun. La tête de la chèvre.
bakɔrɔfɔrɔkili variante: bakɔrɔninfɔrɔkili. Nom.
Tête de chèvre. The head of the goat. A head of
a goat. Der Kopf der Ziege. Ein Ziegenkopf.
espèce de plante; kind of plant; Pflanze (Art).
Category: Grass, herb, vine. oxystelma bakun 2 [á-ú] Nom. capital de départ (commerce);
bornouense. starting capital (trade); Startkapital (Handel).
bakɔrɔkuri variante: bakɔrɔkuru. Nom. civette; civet; Category: Finance.
Zibetkatze. Category: Mammal. viverra bakunbere Nom. espèce de plante; kind of plant;
civetta. Pflanze (Art). Category: Grass, herb, vine.
bakɔrɔkuru [à-ɔ̀-ɔ̀-ú-ù] comparer: jakumawata.
indigofera dendroides.
bakuru [á-ú-ú] Nom. entier, tout, la totalité; whole,
variante: bakɔrɔnin, bakɔrɔninkuru,
bakɔrɔnkuri. Nom. civette d'Afrique; civet; all, the total number; ganz, alles, die
Zibetkatze. Category: Mammal. viverra
Gesamtheit.
civetta. bakuruba [á-ú-ú-á] Nom. groupe; group; Gruppe.
bakɔrɔncɔgɔn Nom. plante qui pousse dans des synonyme: jɛkulu.
endroits humides; plant that grows in humid bakurubafɔ See main entry: . comparer: surunya .
2
places; Pflanze, die an feuchten Orten wächst.
n.comp. 1 • résumé; summary;
Category: Grass, herb, vine. fimbristylis
Zusammenfassung.
pilosa.
2 • synoptique; synoptic; Synopsis.
bakɔrɔnin [à-ɔ́-ɔ́-í] bambara: bakɔrɔn. Nom.
bakurubasanni
1 • bouc; billy goat; Ziegenbock.
Category: Mammal, Animal husbandry.
[á-ú-ú-á-á-í] Morphemes: bakuruba-sann
i. Nom. achat en gros; bulk-buying;
2 • impudique, débauché; shameless person;
unzüchtig, unkeusche Person. Grosseinkauf. synonyme: abɔniman.
bakɔrɔninbɛlɛkili n.comp. aubergine noire; black bakuruma [à-ù-ù-á] variante: bakuruba,
eggplant; Aubergine. Category: Food. bakurunba. Adverbe. entièrement,
bakɔrɔnku [à-ɔ̀-ɔ̀] Nom. vaurien, personne sans intégralement; entirely, completely; völlig,
ganzheitlich, vollständig.
valeur, bon à rien; worthless person, good for
nothing; wertloser Mensch, zu nichts taugen. bakurumasan
bakɔrɔnson Nom. varicelle; chicken pox; [à-ù-ù-á-ǎ] variante: bakurubasan. Verbe.
Windpocken. synonyme: faritɔntɔn, lawɔɔrɔ, s'abonner, acheter la totalité, acheter en gros;
subscribe, buy in full, buy in bulk; Abonnieren,
kulensɔn.
komplett kaufen, in großen Mengen kaufen.
bakɔrɔpeku comparer: benbekuna, pekubaŋɛɲɛ. bakurumasanna Nom. abonné; subscriber;
Nom. raisinier velu; kind of tree, hairy grape
Teilnehmer, Inhaber eines Abonnements.
tree; Baumart, behaarter Weinbaum.
synonyme: abɔneni.
Category: Tree. lannea velutina.
synonyme: benbemuso. bala [à-á] Nom. porc-épic; porcupine;
1
baku [à-ú] Verbe. 1 • apprivoiser, domestiquer, Stachelschwein. Category: Mammal. hystrix
eristata.
dresser; tame, win over, domesticate, train,
drill; zähmen, zutraulich machen, dressieren. bala 2 [á-á] Nom. bande; strip, band; Streifen, Band.
2 • s’installer, s'établir; settle in; ansiedeln, synonyme: walan 1 .
niederlassen.
bala [à-á] Nom. personne au teint rouge, rouquin,
3
bakubaku Nom. pigeon domestique (région de San);
âne roux; reddish person, red donkey; rötliche
domestic pigeon; Haustaube. Category: Bird. Person, roter Esel.
bala Verbe. surprendre, prendre au dépourvu;
4
surprise, do suddenly; überraschen, plötzlich
tun. synonyme: bali.
2
29/01/2026 17

bala balansen
bala [á-á] Nom. espèce d'arbre; kind of tree; balakɔnɔninfin [à-à-ɔ́-ɔ́-ì-í] Nom. pluvian
5
Baumart. Category: Tree. pterocarpus lucens. d’Égypte; Egyptian Plover; Ägyptischer
bala [á] Nom. tracé d'un terrain à cultiver, parcelle; Regenpfeiffer. Category: Bird.
6
layout of land for cultivation, plot; balan 1 [á-ã́] Nom. balafon, xylophone; balaphone,
Anordnung des Anbaulandes, Grundstück. xylophone; Xylophone, Balaphon.
Category: Land. Category: Musical instrument.
balabala [à-à-à-à] variante: barabara. vt. 1 • cuire balan [à-ã́] variante: bala. postp. fourche (entre
1 2
à l’eau, bouillir; boil, cook in water; in Wasser deux branches), à califourchon (sur cheval,
kochen, sieden. synonyme: fɔti. vélo etc.) sur , en haut de; forked branch, sit
astride, on, on top of; Gabelung, beidseitig
2 • périr de chaleur; die of heat; sterben an
Hitze.
sitzend, auf. O y'o pan kayɛlɛn sokɛw bala.
Ils sautèrent à cheval. They were jumping
balabala
2
Nom. serrure; lock; Schloss. konbalabala
sitting on horses. Sie sprangen auf
serrure de porte. door lock. Türschloß. Pferderücken.
synonyme: konbalabala.
balan [á-ã́] 1 • Verbe. se coincer, accrocher, fixer,
3
balaban Nom. delta; delta; Delta. Category: Water. attacher; get stuck, to hook, to hang, to fix; sich
festklemmen, aufhängen, festmachen.
balabilen variante: bintubala, alibe. Nom. sorgho
2 • Verbe. faire obstacle, empêcher,
rouge, variété de riz; red sorghum, variety of
contrecarrer; to hinder; hindern, behindern.
rice; rotes Sorghum, Reissorte.
Category: Food.
3 • Nom. accrochage, empêchement; clash,
impediment; ein Zusammenstoß, ein
balabɔ 1 • Verbe. flatter, vanter; flatter, boast; Hindernis.
schmeicheln, prahlen.
balan [à] Nom. barrage; dam; Damm, Stausee.
2 • Nom. flatterie; flattery; Schmeichelei.
4
Category: Water. synonyme: barasi.
balaka [á-á-á] Nom. parent maternel; kin mother's
1
balan [à] Nom. pinces, tenailles de forgeron; pliers,
side; Verwandter mütterlicherseits. 5
Category: Kinship. synonyme: namama.
blacksmith pincers; Zangen, Schmiedezangen.
Category: Tool.
balaka [à-à-á] Verbe. se précipiter, se hâter;
2 balanako comparer: cunkanko. Nom. incident;
precipitate, hurry up, rush; überstürzt handeln,
incident; Vorfall, Zwischenfall.
sich beeilen.
balanbala Nom. plante (espèce), herbe puante; plant
balakabalaka 1 • Verbe. faire précipitamment, faire à
sp; Pflanzenart. Category: Grass, herb, vine.
la hâte, se précipiter; to do hastily, to do in
cassia occidentalis. synonyme: npalanpalan.
haste, to rush; hastig tun, in Eile tun, sich
beeilen. balanbalan Verbe. entraver, faire obstacle, empêcher;
2 • Adverbe. précipitamment, hâtivement; hold up; hindern.
hastily; hastig.
balanden variante: baladen, balankisɛ. Nom. lame de
3 • Nom. précipitation; hurrying; Eile.
balafon; balaphone bar, balafon bar;
balakawuli 1 comparer: garagara. Nom. ganga de Balafon-Stab.
Gambie; four-banded sand-grouse; Birkhuhn.
balanfɔ variante: balafɔ. Nom. jeu du balafon; playing
Category: Bird. pterocles quadricinctus /
pterocles exustus / senegallus.
the balafon; Balafon-Spiel.
balakawuli Nom. espèce de plante; kind of plant; balanfɔkalaw Nom. mailloches; beaters; Schläger.
2
Pflanze (Art). Category: Grass, herb, vine.
Category: Musical instrument.
dicoma tomentosa. balanfɔla [á-ã́-ɔ́-á] Morphemes: balan-fɔ-la. Nom.
balaki Adverbe. précipitamment, d'un trait, à la hâte; balafoniste, joueur du balafon, xylophoniste;
hastily, in one go; hastig, auf einmal.
balaphone player, xylophonist; Balaphon
Spieler, Xylophonist. Category: Worker,
balakorana Nom. plante (espèce); plant sp; occupation.
Pflanzenart. Category: Grass, herb, vine. balansan [á-ã́-ã́] Nom. faidherbier, arbre (espèce);
stylosanthes erecta.
Ana-tree, Apple-ring acacia; Anabaum.
balakɔnɔ Nom. oiseaux aquatiques; water birds; Category: Tree. acacia albida; faidherbia
Wasservögel. Category: Bird. albida. synonyme: balanzan, jirijɛ, alasɔsɔyiri.
balansen [á-ã́-ẽ́] n.comp. une partition de balafon;
part of the balaphone; Teil eines Balaphon.
29/01/2026 18

balanzan balikukalanden
balanzan [á-ã́-ã́] comparer: yirigwɛ. Nom. arbre bali [à-ì] variante: bari. vt. 1 • empêcher,
1
(espèce); kind of tree; Baumart. interdire, invalider; hinder, prevent, prohibit,
Category: Tree. accacia albida. ban, invalidate; hindern, verhindern,
synonyme: balansan, alasɔsɔyiri. verbieten, ungültig erklären. Te tɛ n bali ka
balaɲama [à-à] Nom. dysenterie (sorte de); dysentery sunɔgɔ. Le thé ne m’empêche pas de dormir.
Tea doesn’t prevent me from sleeping. Der Tee
(kind of); Ruhr (Art von). Category: Disease.
hindert mich nicht am Schlafen. Sanji ye n
balawu
1
[à-à-ú] Emprunt de : arabe. Nom.
bali ka taa. La pluie m’a empêché d’y aller.
1 • catastrophe, accident, désastre, ravage,
The rain prevented me from going. Der Regen
calamité; catastrophe, accident, disaster,
hinderte mich hinzugehen.
calamity; Katastrophe, Unfall, Unheil.
synonyme: haramuya.
2 • bagarre, émeute, querelle, bagarre
2 • échouer, ne pas réussir, tenir en échec; fail,
sanglante; fight, riot; Streit, Aufstand.
not succeed; mißlingen, fehlschlagen, nicht
3 • belliqueux; warlike, quarrelsome;
gelingen. Ne balila tiga la. Mes arachides
streitsüchtig, zänkisch. cɛnin yɔrɔ bɛɛ balawu
n'ont pas réussi. I did not succeed with my
balawu [á] Adverbe. embrasement instantané du feu; ground-nuts. Meine Erdnüsse sind nicht
2
flash fire; Blitzfeuer.
gelungen.
balawuma [à-à-ù-á] Nom. catastrophique, bali 2 [à-ì] variante: bari. Verbe. surprendre;
conflictuel, catastrophe; catastrophic, surprise; überraschen. synonyme: bala 4 .
conflictual, catastrophe; katastrophal, bali [à-ì] Nom. jeu d'enfants avec noyaux de karité;
konflikthaft, Katastrophe.
3
game for children with sheanut kernels;
balawumɔgɔ [à-à-ù-ɔ́-ɔ́] Nom. bagarreur, Kinderspiel mit Karite Nüssen.
querelleur; bruiser, fighter, quarrelsome -bali comparer: banbali. suf. suffixe qui indique
1
person; Streithahn, Raufer, streitsüchtige
’sans’, qui ne ... pas, in-; suffix indicating
Person. synonyme: kirifuntun.
’without’, that isn't ..; ohne, Suffix für «-los»,
balawumɔgɔya Nom. propension à la querelle; das nicht ..., un-. furakɛ; furakɛbali soigner;
propensity to quarrel; Neigung zum Streit. incurable. treat, incurable. behandeln;
unheilbar.
balayi Emprunt de : arabe. Nom. gratitude,
balibali [à-í-à-í] variante: balibalisaga. Nom.
reconnaissance; gratitude, recognition; 1
Dankbarkeit, Anerkennung. mouton race du Sahel de forte taille; kind of
tall sheep found in the Sahel area;
balayitanya 1 • Verbe. être ingrat; to be ungrateful;
grossgewachsene Schafart vom Sahel-Gebiet.
undankbar sein. Category: Mammal, Animal husbandry.
2 • Nom. ingratitude; ingratitude;
balibali Nom. plante (espèce), séné du Sénégal; plant
Undankbarkeit. 2
sp; Pflanzenart. Category: Grass, herb, vine.
balen [à] Nom. sommet de l'arbre, cime d'un arbre;
cassia italica.
top of a tree; Spitze des Baumes.
baliku [á-í-ú] Emprunt de : arabe. Nom. adulte;
balenbo variante: balemo. Nom. quinquina des
adult; Erwachsener.
chèvres, crotte de chevreau; kind of shrub;
balikukalan
Strauch (Art). Category: Bush, shrub.
crossopteryx febrifuga. [á-í-ú-á-ã́] Morphemes: baliku-kàlan.
balenma [à-è-á] Nom. poteau fourchu servant de
Nom. alphabétisation (des adultes); literacy
(for adults); Alphabetisierung. Balikukalan
support; forked pole used as a support;
karamɔgɔ. Enseignant d’alphabétisation des
gegabelter Pfosten, der als Stütze dient.
Category: Building.
adultes. Adult literacy teacher. Lehrer für
Erwachsenen Alphabetisierung.
balɛ Nom. zone d'épandage d'un cours d'eau; Category: Learn.
spreading zone of a water area; Wasserzone
balikukalanden
eines Wasserlaufes. Category: Water, Land.
[á-í-ú-á-ã́-ẽ́] Morphemes: balikukalan-de
n. Nom. alphabétisant, adulte qui suit un cours
d’alphabétisation; adult who is taking a basic
literacy class; Erwachsener der die
Alphabetisierung als Lernender mitmacht.
Category: Learn.
29/01/2026 19

balikukalanfa balofɛnwolomabaliw
balikukalanfa balimanya [á-í-ã́-á] fratrie, parenté collatérale,
comparer: kalanfa.[á-í-ú-á-ã-́ á] n.comp. parenté, fraternité; brotherhood, siblings,
alphabétiseur (formateur), animateur pour blood relationship; Bruderschaft,
l'alphabétisation; literacy teacher; Lehrer für Geschwister, Verwandtschaft.
Alphabetisierung. Category: Kinship.
balikukalanso balinanko [à-ì-ã̀-ó] n.comp. surprise, empêchement;
[á-í-ú-á-ã́-ó] Morphemes: balikukalan-so. surprise, unforeseen difficulty; Überraschung,
Verhinderung, Behinderung.
Nom. centre d’alphabétisation; literacy center;
Alphabetisierungskurs Ort. Category: Learn, balo [á-ó] 1 • vi. vivre, survivre; live, stay alive;
1
Building.
leben, am Leben bleiben, überleben. I mɔcɛ bi
balikuya [á-í-ú-á] Nom. atteindre la majorité civile, balo la wa ? Est-ce que ton grand-père vit
devenir adulte, état d'adulte, âge adulte; get toujours ? Is your grandfather still alive? Lebt
major of age, adulthood; volljährig sein, dein Großvater immer noch?
Erwachsensein. a balikuyara 2 • vt. nourrir, faire vivre; feed, nourish,
longevity, lifespan; ernähren, Langlebigkeit,
balimadugaso variante: balimadunge. Nom. famille
Lebenserwartung. Ala ka den balo ! Que Dieu
unie, ensemble des parents proches, êtres
fasse vivre l’enfant ! (ex. bénédiction donnée à
chers, intimes; united family, close kin and
un bébé). Longévité à l'enfant ! May God keep
relatives, dear ones; vereinte Familie, enge
the child in life ! (e.g. blessing given to a
Verwandtschaft, die Lieben.
baby). Möge Gott das Kind am Leben erhalten.
Category: Kinship.
(z.B. Segenswunsch für Kleinkinder). Yesu ye
baliman
1
comparer: baden
2
.[á-í-ã́] variante: balima.
mɔgɔ waa duuru balo. Jésus a nourri cinq
Nom. frère, sœur, parent, allié; sibling, brother, mille personnes. Jesus fed five thousand
sister, relative, ally; Bruder, Schwester,
people. Jesus speist die fünftausend Leute.
Verwandter. Category: Kinship.
3 • Nom. vie, nourriture, conduite, mœurs; life,
synonyme: somɔgɔ.
food, behaviour; Leben, Nahrung, Benehmen.
baliman 2 [á-í-ã́] vt. chanter les louanges; sing praise balo 2 [á-ó] Nom. nourriture, vivres; food; Nahrung,
songs; Loblieder singen.
Nahrungsmittel. N bi balo feere. Je vends de
balimanbolo n.comp. membre de la famille; family la nourriture. I am selling food. Ich verkaufe
member; Familienmitglied. Category: Kinship. Nahrungsmittel. Category: Food.
synonyme: dumuni.
balimanbolofanga variante: balimabolofanga.
Nom. népotisme; nepotism; Nepotismus.
balocogo
balimancɛ [á-í-ã́-ɛ́] Morphemes: baliman-cɛ. comparer: lamɔcogo.[á-ó-ó-ó] Morphemes:
1
balo-cogo. Nom. façon de vivre; way of life;
Nom. frère, parent masculin, proche, ami;
brother, male relative; Bruder, Verwandter Lebensweise. Fulaw balocogo ka gɛlɛn. La
Mann. Category: Kinship. façon de vivre des Peuls est dure. The way of
balimancɛ bambara: balimakɛ.
life of the Fulani people is hard. Die
2 Lebensweise des Fulani Volkes ist hart.
Morphemes: baliman-cɛ. variante: balimacɛ.
balodɛsɛ [á-ó-ɛ́-ɛ́] Morphemes: balo-dɛsɛ. Nom.
Nom. 1 • monsieur; Mr, mister, sir; Herr. N
sous-alimentation, malnutrition; malnutrition;
balimancɛ ɲamɔgɔba, ... Monsieur le
Unterernährung. Category: Disease.
directeur, ... Dear Sir, ... Sehr geehrter Herr
Direktor, ... balofɛn nafamanyɔrɔ Nom. nutriment; nutriment;
2 • parent masculin, frère, proche, ami; male Nährstoff. Category: Agriculture.
relative, brother, relative, friend; männlicher synonyme: dumuni nɛɛmayɔrɔ, fari balofɛn.
Verwandter, Bruder, Verwandter, Freund.
balofɛnsɛnɛ Nom. culture vivrière; subsistence
balimanmuso
crops; Anbau von Lebensmitteln.
[á-í-ã́-ú-ó] Morphemes: balima-muso. Category: Agriculture.
Nom. sœur, parente, fille de la maison, cousine; balofɛnw Nom. source alimentaire fondamentale;
sister, female relations, female kin; Schwester,
basic food source; Grundnahrungsmittel
Cousine. Category: Kinship.
Quelle. Category: Food.
balimanmusoden Morphemes: balima-muso-den.
balofɛnwolomabaliw Nom. omnivores;
Nom. enfant (fille ou fils) de la sœur ou de la
omnivorous; Allesfresser. Category: Food.
cousine, sœur au sens large; sister's child;
Kind der Schwester. Category: Kinship.
29/01/2026 20

balokogwɛlɛya bamananya
balokogwɛlɛya [á-ó-ó-ɛ́-ɛ́-á] n.comp. insécurité balɔntankulu [à-ɔ ̀-ã̀-ú-ú] n.comp. club de football;
alimentaire; alimentary insecurity; unsichere football club; Fussball Mannschaft.
Nahrungsversorgung.
balɔntanna [à-ɔ ̀-ã̀-á] Morphemes: balɔntan-na.
balokojuguya Morphemes: balo-ko-jugu-ya. Nom. variante: balontanla. Nom. footballeur, joueur
malnutrition; malnutrition; Fehlernährung, de football; footballer; Fussballspieler.
Unterernährung. Category: Disease. synonyme: ntolatanna, tolatanna.
balokojuguyabana
balɔntanyɔrɔ [à-ɔ̀-ã̀-ɔ́-ɔ́] n.comp. terrain de
Morphemes: balo-ko-jugu-ya-bana. Nom.
football; football field; Fussballplatz.
maladie de croissance, kwashiorkor; growth synonyme: balɔntankɛnɛ.
disease; Wachstumskrankheit.
Category: Disease. baluku [á-í-ú] Nom. adulte; adult; Erwachsener.
balokoɲuman fɛɛrɛlɔnbaga expr. nutritionniste; bamaana variante: bamananna. Nom. milieu
nutritionist, dietician; bambara, société bambara; Bambara society;
Ernährungswissenschaftler, Bambara Gesellschaft. Category: Community.
Ernährungsberater . Category: Worker,
baman [á-á] variante: bamanbilen, bamanfin,
occupation.
bamangwɛ. Nom. tous les Barbus et les Labeo,
balolen [á-ó-ẽ́] Variant: balonin. vivant; living;
espèce de poisson; Small-scale Yellow-fish;
lebend, lebendig.
Karpfenfisch. Category: Fish. barbus et labeo.
baloli [á-ó-í] Nom. nutrition; nutrition; Ernährung. bamanakɔɔri Nom. espèce de coton, coton cultivé
Category: Food. traditionnellement; kind of cotton; Pflanze
balonan comparer: lamɔnan. Nom. éleveuse; brooder; (Art). Category: Grass, herb, vine. gossypium
Brutkasten. Category: Animal husbandry.
barbadense. synonyme: kɔɔriba.
balonin See main entry: bamanan [á-à-ã]́ Nom. 1 • bambara (ethnie);
balolen.[á-ó-ĩ́] Morphemes: balo-len. Bambara (ethnic group); Bambara Leute.
vivant; living; lebend, lebendig. I mɔmuso
Category: Community.
balonin don wa ? Ta grand-mère est-elle
2 • féticheur, animiste, cafre, païen; fetish
priest, animist, pagan; Anhänger der
vivante ? Is your grandmother living? Lebt
traditionellen afrikanischen Religion, Animist,
deine Großmutter noch?
Heide.
baloɲɔgɔnna Nom. chaîne alimentaire, réseau bamanankan
alimentaire; food chain, food web;
[á-á-á-ã́] Morphemes: bamanan-kan. Nom.
Nahrungskette, Nahrungsnetz. Category: Food.
langue bamana; Bambara language; Bambara
balɔgɔ [á-ɔ́-ɔ́] n.comp. 1 • tante plus jeune que la Sprache.
mère; aunt younger than the mother; Tante, bamanankandegila
die jünger ist als die Mutter.
Category: Kinship.
[á-á-á-ã́-é-í-á] Morphemes: bamanankan
2 • jeune épouse du père.
-dege-la. Nom. celui qui apprend le bambara;
student learning Bambara; Student der
balɔn [à-ɔ ́] Emprunt de : français. Nom. ballon;
Bambara Sprache.
ball; Ball. synonyme: tola .
2 bamanankanfɔla Morphemes: bamanan-kan-fɔla.
balɔntan [à-ɔ ̀-ã́] Morphemes: balɔn-tan. Nom. Nom. locuteur bambara, bambara-phone;
football; football, soccer; Fußball. U bi speaker of the Bambara language; Bambara
balɔntan na. Ils sont en train de jouer au
Sprecher.
football. They are playing football. Sie sind bamanankankalanna
am Fußball spielen. synonyme: tolatan. [á-á-á-ã́-á-ã́] Morphemes: bamanankan-k
balɔntanfani Nom. maillot de sport; football shirt; àlan-na. Nom. celui qui apprend le bambara;
Sporttrikot. Category: Clothing. student learning Bambara; Student der
Bambara lernt.
balɔntankɛnɛ Nom. terrain de football; football
bamananya Morphemes: bamanan-ya. Nom.
ground; Fussballfeld. synonyme: tolatanyɔrɔ,
connaissances traditionnelles des
balɔntanyɔrɔ.
non-musulmans, animistes; traditional
balɔntankilɔti Nom. short (sport); shorts; kurze knowledge of the non Muslim Bambara
Hosen, Shorts. Category: Clothing.
people; traditionelles Wissen eines nicht
Muslims der Bambara.
29/01/2026 21

bamanbilen ban
bamanbilen [á] Morphemes: baman-bilen. Nom. bamutu [á] Nom. capitaine de rivière; Nile perch,
espèce de poisson; species of fish; Fischarten. captain (fish); Kapitän Fisch. Category: Fish.
Category: Fish. Barbus occidentalis. Lates niloticus. synonyme: saalen , kapitɛni,
1
bamanfin [á] Morphemes: baman-fin. Nom. espèce salen.
de poisson; species of fish; Fischart. ban [á] 1 • Nom. fin; end; Ende. synonyme: sa .
1 1
Category: Fish. Labeo coubie.
2 • vt. finir, terminer, achever, mourir; finish,
bamangwɛ Morphemes: baman-gwɛ. Nom. espèce de bring to an end, conclude, terminate; beenden,
poisson; species of fish; Fischart. Schluß machen, aufhören. A banna. C’est fini.
Category: Fish. labeo senegalensis. C’est tout. It’s finished. That’s all. Es ist
bamasantɔntɔn [á] Nom. dilemme, situation sans Schluß. Das ist alles. Buuru banna. Il n’y a
plus de pain. There is no more bread. Es hat
issue, affaire louche; dilemma, dead end
situation, shady business; Dilemma, kein Brot mehr. U ye dumuni ban. Ils ont fini
Sackgasse, zwielichtiges Geschäft. la nourriture. They finished the food. Sie haben
bamayɛlɛma [á-á-ɛ̀-ɛ̀-á] Verbe. transformer;
das Essen aufgegessen. A ma ban fɔlɔ. C’est
pas encore fini. It’s not finished yet. Es ist noch
transform; verwandeln.
nicht fertig. O san bannin A la fin de cette
bamɔnjɔ [á] bambara: bamanjɔ. année-là. At the end of that year. Am Ende
Morphemes: ba-mɔn-jɔ. Nom. filet de pêche; jenes Jahres.
fishing net; Fischernetz. Category: Hunt and 3 • vi. décéder, mourir, s'éteindre; die; sterben.
fish. Mamadu banna. Mamadou est mort.
bamɔnna Morphemes: ba-mɔn-na. Nom. pêcheur; Mamadou has died. Mamadou ist gestorben.
fisherman; Fischer. Category: Worker,
synonyme: fatu.
occupation. synonyme: dolendala. ban comparer: sɔn .[ã̀] vi. 1 • refuser, renoncer,
2 2
bamugu [á] Morphemes: ba-mugu. Nom. farine de résister; refuse, renounce, resist; verweigern,
abweisen, sich weigern, absagen, verzichten. A
mil qu'on ajoute au fur et à mesure de la
cuisson pour faire épaissir le tô; millet flower banna Ala la. Il a refusé Dieu. He refused
used for cooking porridge; Hirsemehl zum God. Er hat Gott abgelehnt. Madu bi ban
Hirsebrei kochen. Category: Food. baara ma. Madou refuse de travailler. Madou
bamun [à] variante: bamu. Verbe. 1 • porter (un refuses to work. Madou hat sich geweigert zu
1
arbeiten.
enfant) sur le dos; carry (a child) on the back;
auf dem Rücken tragen (Kind). 2 • refus; refusal; Weigerung, Ablehnung,
Absage.
2 • former un épi; to form an ear of grain; eine
Ähre bilden. Kaba ye den bamun. Les épis de ban [ã̌] Nom. palmier, bambou; palm tree, bamboo;
3
maïs se sont formés. The ears of corn have Palme, Bambus. Category: Tree. Raphia
taken form. Die Mais Ähren haben sich sudanica. synonyme: nban.
gebildet.
ban comparer: sigilan.[ã̌] Emprunt de : français.
bamun [á] variante: bamu. Verbe. rassembler, 4
2
variante: baan. Nom. banc; bench; Bank,
entasser; gather, pile up; sammeln, stapeln.
Sitzbank. Category: Household equipment.
bamunan variante: bamunanfinin, bamunfinin.
ban [ã́] variante: ba. postp. encore (après
5
Nom. pagne qui sert à attacher au dos l'enfant
négation); yet (after negation), still; immer
qu'on porte; cloth used to fasten a child on
noch (nach Verneinung). A ma na ban. Il n'est
one's back to carry it; Stoff mit dem man ein
Kind auf den Rücken bindet um es zu tragen. pas encore venu. He hasn't come yet. Er ist
immer noch nicht gekommen.
bamuso [á-ú-ó] Morphemes: ba-muso.
1
ban [á] part. 1 • encore; still, again, yet; noch,
variante: namuso. Nom. mère, tante 6
wieder. Jɔn bɛ ɲɛ ban. Mais qui donc est
maternelle; mother, aunt (mother's side);
Mutter, Tante mütterlicher Seite. encore devant? But who is still ahead? Aber
Category: Kinship. synonyme: ba , baa . wer hat noch die Nase vorn?
5 4
2 • pas encore; not yet; noch nicht. O y'a sɔrɔ
bamuso [à-ú-ó] Morphemes: ba-muso. Nom.
2 kibaru ma jɛnsɛn ban. Il se trouve que la
chèvre; goat (female); Ziege (Weibchen).
nouvelle ne s'est pas encore répandue. It turns
Category: Mammal, Animal husbandry.
out that the news hasn't spread yet. Es stellt
sich heraus, daß sich die Nachricht noch nicht
verbreitet hat.
29/01/2026 22

ban a ra banakisɛsɛgɛsɛgɛ
ban a ra comparer: bali. vi. invalider; invalidate; banabagatɔnin [à-à-à-à-ɔ́-í] Nom. enfant
ungültig erklären. permanent malade; child that is permanently
bana [à-á] 1 • Nom. maladie; sickness, illness;
sick; dauerhaft krankes Kind.
1
Krankheit. Bana b’i la wa ? Ayi, n ka kɛnɛ banabanbali synonyme: furakɛbali, nagasilibana.
kosɛbɛ ! Tu es malade ? Non, je me portes très adj. incurable; incurable; unheilbar.
bien ! Are you unwell? No, I’m very well! Bist banabiri [à-à-í-í] variante: banamini. vt. mettre à
du krank? Nein, ich bin gesund. Bana y’a travers (obstacle); put across (obstacle);
minɛ. Il est malade. He is unwell. Er ist krank. querstellen (Hindernis).
Category: Disease. banaburuku [à-à-ú-ú-ú] Nom. épidémie; epidemic
2 • vi. tomber malade, être malade, rendre plague, plague; Seuche, Epidemie.
malade; become unwell, sick, ill; krank
Category: Disease. synonyme: banajɛnsɛ.
werden, krank sein.
3 • vt. faire mal, blesser; to wound; verletzen. banafurakɛla Nom. guérisseur; healer; Heiler,
synonyme: majogin. Medizinmann. Category: Treat disease,
Worker, occupation. synonyme: furabɔla,
bana [á-á] Nom. extérieur du village; outside the
2 filatigi.
village; ausserhalb des Dorfes. Dugukɔfɛla
ye bana ye.
banajɛnsɛ [à-à-ɛ ́-ɛ́] variante: banajɛnsɛn. Nom.
épidémie; epidemic plague, plague; Seuche,
bana furakɛli Nom. traitement curatif; treatment to
Epidemie. Category: Disease.
get well; Heilbehandlung. synonyme: banaburuku.
bana juguyawagati expr. phase d'évolution (de banajuguba Nom. maladie très grave; very serious
maladie); stage in the trajectory of the
disease; sehr schwere Krankheit.
illness, disease evolution; Krankheitsphase,
Category: Disease.
Krankheitsverlauf. Category: Disease.
banakisɛ [à-à-í-ɛ́] synonyme: denkisɛ. Nom. germe,
bana kɔrɔsili [à-á ɔ̀-ɔ̀-ì-í] Nom. surveillance
microbe, virus, agent pathogène; germ,
médicale; medical supervision; ärztliche
microbe, virus; Keim, Mikrobe, Virus.
Aufsicht.
Category: Disease.
bana ɲɛkɔrɔtigɛfɛɛrɛw expr. modes de prévention; banakisɛ cayakojugu expr. surinfection;
methods of prevention;
super-infection ; zusätzliche Infektion.
Präventionsmöglichkeiten. Category: Disease. Category: Disease.
bana ɲɛkɔrɔtigɛli Nom. traitement préventif; banakisɛ kuturunin Nom. bactérie; bacterium;
preventive treatment; vorbeugende
Bakterie.
Behandlung, Präventiv-Behandlung.
banakisɛbana Nom. maladie infectieuse; infectious
bana tagamasiɲɛ Nom. symptôme; symptom;
disease; infektiöse Krankheit.
Symptom, Begleiterscheinung.
Category: Disease.
Category: Disease.
banakisɛdon synonyme: banakisɛta, kɔlɔn. Nom.
bana yɛlɛmali Nom. transmission (de la maladie);
infection; infection; Infektion.
transmission (of a disease); Krankheits-
Category: Disease.
Übertragung. Category: Disease.
banakisɛfaga synonyme: dumufɛnfaga, tɛtɛban.
bana yɛlɛmasira expr. mode de transmission; mode
Nom. déparasitage; getting rid of parasites; von
of transmission; Übertragungsmethode,
Parasiten befreien.
Übertragungsart . Category: Disease.
banakisɛfagafura Nom. antibiotique; antibiotic;
banaba Nom. lèpre, épilepsie; leprosy, epilepsy;
Antibiotikum. Category: Treat disease.
Lepra, Epilepsie. Category: Disease.
synonyme: banakisɛfagalan.
synonyme: binnibana.
banakisɛfagalan Nom. antibiotique; antibiotic;
banabagatɔ
Antibiotika. Category: Treat disease.
[à-à-à-à-ɔ́] Morphemes: bana-bagatɔ. synonyme: banakisɛfagafura.
Nom. malade, patient; sick person; Kranker.
Category: Person, Sick. synonyme: gantɔ, banakisɛnin [à-à-ì-ɛ̀-ĩ́] Nom. virus; virus; Virus.
sogoratɔ. banakisɛsɛgɛsɛgɛ Nom. dépistage; screening;
Feststellung, Nachweis, Früherkennung.
29/01/2026 23

banakisɛta banbe
banakisɛta [à-à-ì-ɛ̀-á] synonyme: banakisɛdon. banbada n.comp. coiffure (masculine) traditionnelle
Nom. infection; infection; Infektion. Bobo, Bambara; traditional male hairstyle;
banakɔ [á] Nom. à l’extérieur, dehors, aux toilettes;
traditioneller Haarstil für Männer.
outside, at the toilet; draussen, auf der Toilette. banbaga [à-á-á] synonyme: sɔsɔlikɛbaga,
banakɔtaga [á-á-ɔ́-á-á] bambara: banakɔtaa. sɔsɔlikɛla. Nom. contestataire; protester;
Protestierender.
n.comp. selles, excréments; stools excrements;
Stuhl, Kot. synonyme: sokɔtaga, boo. banbagaci variante: banbaganci. Nom. entêté,
banakɔtagasɔrɔbaliya [á] Nom. constipation;
obstiné dans le mal, révolté, rebelle; stubborn,
obstinate for bad things, rebel; Dickkopf,
constipation; Verstopfung. synonyme: kɔnɔja. hartnäckig, Trotzkopf.
banakɔtagayɔrɔ Nom. W-C, toilettes, lieu d'aisance, banbagaciya
anus; water closet, toilets, bathroom; [à-à-à-à-ì-á] variante: banbaganciya.
Toiletten, WC, Abort.
Nom. rébellion, insoumission, révolte;
banamini [à-à-í-í] variante: balamini. Verbe. rebellion, insubordination, revolt; Rebellion,
Ungehorsam, Revolte.
mettre à travers (obstacle), mettre en
bandoulière, s’interposer, croiser; put across banbagatɔ [ã́-á-á-ɔ́] synonyme: tagabaga. Nom.
(obstacle); querstellen (Hindernis).
défunt, agonissant, mourant; deceased,
banamisɛnw Nom. petites maladies; minor diseases; departed, dead person, dying person; Toter,
kleinere Krankheiten. Category: Disease. Sterbender.
banan [à-á] variante: bana. Nom. fromager, faux banbale [ã̀-à-é] variante: banbali. Nom. 1 • dalle;
kapokier; tree sp; Baumart. Category: Tree. concrete slab; Beton Deckel, Bodenplatte,
ceiba pentandra. Betonplatte. Category: Building.
2 • banquette en banco, terre-pleine, estrade,
banangolo [à-à] Nom. espèce de poisson; kind of
seuil relevé; bench seat, solid ground,
fish; Fischart. Category: Fish. papyrocranus platform, raised threshold; Sitzbank, fester
afer.
Boden, Plattform, erhöhte Schwelle.
bananjugu [à-à] Nom. fromager mauvais, espèce banbali
1
d'arbre; kind of tree; Baumart. Category: Tree. comparer: -bali.[ã́-á-í] Morphemes: ban-bal
crateva adansonii.
i. adj. sans fin, éternel, intarissable, infini;
bananku [à-ã̀-ú] variante: banaku, bandugu. unending, eternal; unendlich, endlos, ewig.
Nom. manioc, plante de manioc; manioc, banbali [à-á-í] Nom. banquette en banco,
manioc plant; Maniok, Maniok Pflanze.
2
Category: Food, Bush, shrub. Manihot
terre-pleine, seuil relevé; bench of clay,
esculenta. synonyme: gwende.
elevated platform; Lehm Bank, erhöhte
Fläche.
banatunubali Nom. endémie; endemic infection;
banban [á-á] variante: baman. Verbe. 1 • évertuer
1
Endemie. Category: Disease.
(s), persévérer, faire de son mieux, prendre au
banayɛlɛma [à-à-ɛ́-ɛ́-á] Nom. contagion; contagion, sérieux; to try one's best, persevere, do your
transmission; Ansteckung. Category: Disease. best, take seriously; sein Bestes tun / gebe,
durchhalten, Ausdauer haben.
banayiri [à-à-í-í] synonyme: bananku. Nom.
2 • enfoncer, fixer solidement; to press in, to fix
kapokier; Kapok tree; Kapok Baum.
firmly; eindrücken, fest fixieren.
Category: Tree. ceiba pentandra.
banban [ǎ-à] Verbe. refuser fermement, refuser de
banayɔrɔ [à-à] Nom. endroit malade, partie du corps 2
manière répétée; refuse firmly, refuse
douloureuse; sore spot, painful body part;
repeatedly; entschieden ablehnen, wiederholt
wunde Stelle, schmerzhafter Körperteil.
ablehnen.
Category: Disease.
banbara Nom. crêpe à base de farine de poids de terre;
banba [à-á] bambara: bama. variante: bama. Nom.
1 pancake made of flour from ground beans;
crocodile, caïman; crocodile; Krokodil.
Pfannkuchen aus Mehl von Bambara Bohnen.
Category: Reptile. crocodilus niloticus;
Category: Food.
crocodilus vulgaris. synonyme: basa .
1
banbe [à] Nom. banquette en banco, pavé, estrade;
banba vi. se débrouiller, s'efforcer de; to manage, to
2 bench in clay plaster, paving stone, raised
sort it out, try hard; zurechtkommen, sich platform; Bank in Lehm, Pflasterstein, erhöhte
durchschlagen, versuchen. Plattform.
29/01/2026 24

banbeleni bangejɔ
banbeleni n.comp. dalle surélevé (servant de lieu de banga [á-á] variante: bagan, bɛngɛ. adj. brut, sans
repos); raised platform (used as place for sauce; raw, without sauce; roh, ohne Sauce.
resting); erhöhte Plattform (zum ausruhen). To banga. Tô sans sauce. Millet poridge
banbu [ã-̀ ù] Verbe. porter au dos ; carry on the back; without sauce. Hirsebrei ohne Sauce.
auf dem Rücken tragen. bangasan Nom. plante (espèce); plant sp; Grasart.
banbunan [à-ù-ã́] n.comp. 1 • pagne servant à porter Category: Grass, herb, vine. brachiara jubata.
le bébé au dos; loincloth used for carrying bange [ã́-é] variante: bangi, bangin, bangen.
babies on the back; Stoff der verwendet wird 1 • vi. être né; be born; geboren sein. A
um die Kleinkinder auf dem Rücken zu tragen.
bangera Bobo san 2008. Il/elle est né à Bobo
2 • pagne que des femmes offrent à celle qui
en 2008. He/she was born in Bobo in 2008.
vient d'avoir un bébé (en général pièce de 3
Er/sie ist 2008 in Bobo geboren. san 200 sani
pagnes); cloth given as a gift to women who
Yesu ka bange 200 avant Jésus-Christ. 200
just got a baby; Stoff als Geschenk für junge
Mütter. BC. 200 Vor Christi Geburt.
bancɛla [à-ɛ̀] Emprunt de : ban-cɛ-la. Nom. fille qui 2 • vt. enfanter, accoucher, engendrer, procréer,
donner naissance; give birth, deliver,
refuse les hommes; girl who refuses men;
engender; gebären, zur Welt bringen,
Mädchen, das Männer ablehnt.
erzeugen. I na kɔnɔ ta ka dencɛ bange, i na
bancimana [à-à-à-á] variante: bancima. Nom. o tɔgɔ da Yesu. Tu deviendras enceinte, tu
désobéissant; disobedient; Ungehorsam. enfanteras un fils, et tu l’appelleras du nom de
denmisɛn bancimana enfant désobéissant. Jésus. You will be with child and give birth to a
disobedient child. ungehorsames Kind. son, and you are to give him the name Jesus.
synonyme: kanmɛnbali. Du wirst schwanger werden und einen Sohn
gebären und ihn Jesus nennen. Note: Bible:
bancinin [á] Nom. jeune coépouse de la mère, sœur Luka 1.31
cadette de la mère, épouse dur frère cadet du 3 • vt. révéler, apparaître, provoquer; reveal,
père; mother's younger co-wife, mother's appear, provoke; enthüllen, erscheinen,
younger sister, wife of father's younger provozieren.
brother; die jüngere Mitfrau der Mutter, die
bangeba Morphemes: bange-ba. Nom. mère, propre
jüngere Schwester der Mutter, Ehefrau des
jüngeren Bruder des Vaters. mère; mother, own / real mother; Mutter,
wahre Mutter. Category: Kinship.
bandi comparer: siratigɛla,
bangebaga [ã́-é-á-á] Morphemes: bange-baga.
benkannikɛla.[ã́-í] Emprunt de : français.
Nom. bandit; bandit; Bandit, Gangster, Räuber.
Nom. parent, géniteur, créateur, père ou mère;
parent, creator; Elternteil, Verwandter,
bandi jɔlaman Nom. bande de gaze; bandage; Schöpfer. Category: Kinship.
Verband. Category: Treat disease. bangebali [ã-́ é-á-í] Morphemes: bange-bali. adj.
bandigi 1 Nom. pointe (servant à tracer les sillons en stérile (femme ou femelle), non encore fertile;
coiffure); spike (used by hairdresser); Kamm sterile (female), not yet fertile; unfruchtbar
(beim Friseur). Category: Tool. (weiblich), noch nicht fruchtbar.
bandigi [à] Nom. épingle à cheveux; hair pin; synonyme: bɔrɔgɛ.
2
Haarnadel. bangeban Nom. ménopause; menopause;
banfan [à-á] variante: baafan, baanfan. Nom. flaque Menopause. Category: Body.
synonyme: bangejɔ.
d'eau à côté d'un puits, où viennent s’abreuver
les animaux; puddle of water next to a well, bangefa Nom. père, père géniteur; father, real father;
where animals come to drink; Wasserlache,
Vater, wahrer Vater. Category: Kinship.
Wasserpfütze neben einem Brunnen, wo Tiere
zum Trinken kommen. Category: Water. bangegwɛlɛya bambara: bangegɛlɛya. Nom.
synonyme: jilɔ, jitɔni. stérilité, accouchement difficile; sterility,
difficult childbirth; Unfruchtbarkeit,
banfula [ã̀-ú-á] Nom. chapeau, bonnet, coiffure
schwierige Geburt.
masculine en tissu; hat; Hut.
bangejoli Morphemes: bange-joli. Nom. sang des
Category: Clothing. synonyme: fugulan.
couches; diaper blood; Windelblut.
banfulanin Nom. accent circonflexe; circumflex
bangejɔ [á] Morphemes: bange-jɔ. Nom. ménopause;
accent; das Dachzeichen, Zirkumflex. ê, â, ô,
menopause; Menopause.
î, û Category: Grammar.
synonyme: bangeban.
29/01/2026 25

bangeli banki
bangeli [ã́-é-í] Morphemes: bange-li. Nom. bani [á-ì] part. donc, d'abord, avant tout, seulement
naissance, accouchement, fécondation; birth, (particule indiquant l'impatience au
fecundation; Geburt, Befruchtung. l'agacement, seulement employée avec
synonyme: denwolo. l'injonctif ou l'impératif); so, first, foremost,
only (particle indicating impatience or
bangeminanw Nom. appareils reproducteurs;
annoyance, only used with the injunctive or
reproductive tract; Fortpflanzungsorgane. imperative); also, in erster Linie, nur (Partikel,
Category: Body. der auf Ungeduld oder Verärgerung hinweist).
bangemuso [á] Morphemes: bange-muso. Nom. Aw ka baaba natɔ ye bani! Regardez donc
femme féconde, femme fertile; fertile woman; comment arrive votre Baaba ! Watch how your
fruchtbare Frau.
Baaba arrives! Beobachtet, wie euer Baaba
ankommt!
bangenugu Morphemes: bange-nugu. Nom. utérus,
banin [á-ĩ́] synonyme: salan. Nom. lac; lake; See,
matrice; uterus, womb; Gebärmutter. 1
Category: Body. synonyme: bangeso, Teich. Category: Water.
wolonugu, denso, jabɛrɛ. banin 2 [á] Nom. sud (par opposition à bába «nord») il
s'agit du Bani, affluent du fleuve Niger; south
bangesira Morphemes: bange-sira. Nom. trompes de
(as opposed to bába “north”) this is the Bani,
Fallope; fallopian tubes; Eileiter.
a tributary of the Niger River; Im Süden (im
Category: Body. synonyme: fantɛmɛsiraw. Gegensatz zu bába „Norden“) ist dies der Bani,
bangeso Morphemes: bange-so. Nom. lieu ein Nebenfluss des Niger.
d'engendrement, utérus; place of generation, baninbolo Morphemes: banin-bolo. Nom. sud; south;
uterus; Ort der Zeugung, Gebärmutter. Süden. synonyme: baɲafan.
Category: Body. synonyme: bangenugu,
baninkɔnɔ [à-í-ɔ̀-ɔ́] Morphemes: banin-kɔnɔ.
wolonugu, jabɛrɛ, denso.
variante: banikɔnɔ. Nom. cigogne d’Abdim;
bangɛyɛ synonyme: bangɔyɔ. Nom. espèce de plante;
stork; Storch. Category: Bird. Ciconia abdimii.
kind of plant; Pflanze (Art). Category: Grass, synonyme: sajumɛ.
herb, vine. momordica charantia.
baninkɔnɔkatiga
synonyme: bankɔyɔ.
Morphemes: banin-kɔnɔ-ka-tiga.
bangira variante: bagira. Nom. jaunisse, ictère,
synonyme: selu, pyelu, npyelu.
hépatite, paludisme chronique; jaundice,
variante: banintiga. Nom. casse fétide; kind of
hepatitis, chronic malaria; Gelbsucht,
Hepatitis, chronische Malaria. shrub; Pflanzenart. Category: Bush, shrub.
Category: Disease. synonyme: sayi.
cassia tora.
banisɔgɔma synonyme: ba-ni-sɔgɔma. Nom. grand
bangolo [á] Nom. espèce de grand tambour; kind of
boubou en coton; big cotton garment; langes
big drum; grosse Trommel (Art).
baumwollen Gewand. Category: Clothing.
Category: Musical instrument.
banji [ã̀-í] Morphemes: ban-ji. Nom. vin de palme;
bangu [ã-̀ ú] variante: banku. Nom. continent, sol;
palm wine; Palmwein. Category: Types of
terre; ; continent; Kontinent, Erdteil.
food. synonyme: nbanji.
Category: Land.
banguw [á] Nom. continents; continents; Erdteile, bankasa [à-à-à] Nom. espèce d'herbe; kind of grass;
Kontinente. Grasart. Category: Grass, herb, vine. vetiveria
fulvibarbis; vetiveria nigritana.
bangwɛyɛ synonyme: bangɔyɔ. Nom. espèce de plante;
bankasanin [à-à-à] Nom. espèce d'herbe; kind of
kind of plant; Pflanze (Art). Category: Grass,
herb, vine. solanum incanum. grass; Grasart. Category: Grass, herb, vine.
synonyme: bankɔyɔ.
andropogon infrasulcatus.
bankɛlɛla [à-ɛ̀-ɛ̀] Morphemes: ban-kɛlɛla. Nom.
réfractaire, déserteur, qui n'aime pas la guerre;
deserter, who does not like war; Deserteur, der
den Krieg nicht mag.
banki [ã́-í] Emprunt de : français.
synonyme: waribon. Nom. banque; bank; Bank,
Geldbank, Finanzinstitut. Category: Finance,
Building. synonyme: waribon.
29/01/2026 26

banki ka loon o loon jatiminasɛbɛ barabara
banki ka loon o loon jatiminasɛbɛ banugu Morphemes: ba-nugu. Nom. repousse; new
synonyme: banki ka tile kɔnɔ jatiminɛsɛbɛ. growth; neuer Spross. Category: Parts of a
expr. journal de banque; bank's journal; plant. synonyme: mɔɔnɔnin.
Bankbuchhaltung. Category: Finance. baɲafan [á-á-ã]́ variante: babaɲafan. Nom. sud;
bankikaradasi Nom. cahier de banque; bank book; south; der Süden. synonyme: baninbolo,
Bankbuch. Category: Finance. worodugu.
bankoma [à-ó-à] Nom. contestataire, péremptoire
baɲandi Nom. coucal du Sénégal; Senegal Coucal;
dont le refus est catégorique et sans retour;
Vogelart. Category: Bird. centropus
protester, peremptory whose refusal is
senegalensis. synonyme: kɔnɔwara, bakɛ,
categorical and without return;
ɲamatutu.
Protestierender, gebieterisch, dessen
Ablehnung kategorisch und ohne baɲɛba [á] Nom. vulve, sexe féminin (populaire);
Gegenleistung ist. Mɔgɔ bankoma don. C'est
vulva; Vulva. Category: Body.
une personne qui est catégorique. He is a
synonyme: biyɛdagolo, biyɛwo, byɛ, latu,
person who is categorical. Er ist ein
jakumasogo, musoyayɔrɔ.
kategorischer Mensch.
bankɔyɔ [ǎ-ɔ̀-ɔ́] variante: bangɔyɔ, bangɛyɛ. Nom. baɲɛbilen [á] Nom. criquet; locust (kind of);
tomate amère; bitter tomato; bittere Tomate.
Heuschrecke. Category: Insect.
Category: Food. momordica charantia, baɲɔɲɔ plante (espèce); plant sp; Pflanzenart.
solanum incanum. synonyme: bangɛyɛ, kɔyɔ, Category: Bush, shrub. solanum incanum.
bangwɛyɛ, nkɔyɔ.
baŋɛɲɛ Nom. sorgho rouge; red sorghum; rotes
banni [ã-́ í] synonyme: saya, fatuli. Nom. 1 • fin; Sorghum. Category: Food, Grass, herb, vine.
end; Ende. sorghum guineense.
2 • décès; death; Todesfall, Tod. bara [à-á] Nom. 1 • calebasse, gourde; calabash,
1
bannifɛn n.comp. éléments de négation; elements of gourd; Kalebasse, Kürbisflasche.
negation; Verneinungswort Elemente. Category: Container. lagenaria vulgaris,
Category: Grammar.
lagenaria siceraria.
2 • danse (rythme populaire chez les Minianka
bannikumasen n.comp. phrase négative; negative
et Bambara); kind of dance; Tanz (Art).
sentence; Negativer Satz.
bara [à-á] Nom. nombril; belly button, umbilicus;
bannyɛrɛye [à-ɛ̀-ɛ̀] Nom. bon à rien, paresseux,
2
Bauchnabel. Category: Body.
fainéant; good for nothing, lazy person;
synonyme: barakun.
Nichtsnutz, Faulenzer. synonyme: fuyan.
bara Nom. tube; tube; Tube. Category: Container.
bansan Verbe. lier ensemble (des épis, ou les pattes
3
bara [à-á] Nom. calebassier; calabash tree;
des volailles); bind together (cobs, or poultry 4
legs); zusammenbinden (Kolben oder Kalebassenbaum. Category: Tree. lagenaria
Geflügel). siceraria.
bansira comparer: sɔsɔlisira. Morphemes: ban-sira. bara 5 [á-á] Nom. endroit dégagé (pour danser); free
Nom. forme négative, négation; negative, place (to dance); freier Platz (oft zum Tanzen).
negation; Negativ, Negation. Category: Land.
bansirakumasen phrase négative; negative bara 6 [á-á] Nom. critique, réprimande, intimidation;
sentence; negativer Satz. criticism, reproach, intimidation; Kritik,
Vorwurf, Einschüchterung.
bantan See main entry: .[ã́-ã́] Morphemes: ba-tan.
variante: batan. Nom. orphelin (sans mère);
bara
7
[á-á] Nom. préféré; femme préférée; preferred,
preferred wife; bevorzugt, bevorzugte Frau.
orphan (without mother); Waise ohne Mutter,
verloren, fern. Category: Person. bara [á-á] postp. chez; at, to; bei, zu. O bi taga o
8
synonyme: fatan. faa bara. Ils partent chez leur père. They are
bantanfala [á] Nom. orphelin de mère; orphan going to their father. Sie gehen zu ihrem
without mother; Waise ohne Mutter.
Vater.
bantɔmɔlɔn bambara: bantɔmɔnɔn. Nom. jujubier barabara 1 variante: balabala, basabasa. vt. faire
amphibie; kind of Jujube tree; Baumart.
bouillir, cuire à l'eau; boil; in Wasser kochen,
Category: Tree. ziziphus microphylla / spina sieden. synonyme: fɔti.
christi.
29/01/2026 27

barabara baraminɛtori
barabara [á] Adverbe. très vite; very quickly; sehr barakan Nom. langue nationale; national language;
2
schnell. National Sprache. Category: Language.
baradaa [á] Nom. théière; teapot; Teekanne. synonyme: fasokan, jamana ka siyakan.
Category: Container. synonyme: miliyɔndaga, barakanten [à-à-à] variante: baraganti,
tebara, fugaridaganin. batrakanti. Nom. 1 • myrrhe du Sénégal
baraden [à-à] Nom. sorte de tambour; kind of drum;
(provenant du commiphora africana); myrrh
from Senegal (from commiphora africana);
Trommel (Art). Category: Musical
Myrrhe aus Senegal (von Commiphora
instrument.
africana). commiphora africana.
baradunun variante: baradun. Nom. gros tambour 2 • sève, gomme; tree sap, gum; Baumsaft,
frappé à la main; kind of big calabash drum ; Gummi.
grosse Trommel aus Kalebasse. barakɔnɔ variante: baarɔkɔnɔ. Nom. tissu en coton
Category: Musical instrument.
blanc; white cotton fabric; weisser
baradununfɔ [à-à-ù-ù] Nom. veuve à longue queue; Baumwollstoff. Category: Clothing.
Paradise Whydah (kind of bird); Vogelart. barakɔrɔla Nom. ventre, bas-ventre, sexe
Category: Bird. vidua orientalis.
(euphémisme); belly, abdomen, genitals
barajan Nom. tube; tube; Röhre. (euphemism); Unterleib, Geschlechtsorgan
(Euph.) Category: Body.
baraji [à-à-í] Emprunt de : arabe. 1 • Nom.
barakɔrɔsii Nom. poils pubiens; pubic hair;
récompense divine, grâce, bénédiction; divine
reward, grace, blessing; göttliche Belohnung, Schamhaar. Category: Body.
Gnade, Segen. I ni baraji ! Que tu en sois synonyme: kɛnɛsii.
récompensé ! May you be rewarded! Möge barakɔrɔwo [à-à-ɔ̀-ɔ̀] Nom. nombril; navel,
Gott es dir vergelten!
umbilicus; Buchnabel. Category: Body.
2 • Verbe. récompenser, remercier; reward,
synonyme: barakun.
thank; belohnen, bedanken.
baraji gɛrɛn kurunin expr. barrage à voûte; arch
barakun [à-à-ṹ] variante: bara. Nom. nombril; belly
button, umbilicus; Bauchnabel.
dam; Bogenstaumauer. Category: Water.
Category: Body. synonyme: barakɔrɔwo, bara .
2
barajintan Nom. ingrat; ungrateful; Undankbarer.
barakunba variante: barakunfunun,, barakunkuru,
synonyme: fitiriwale, ɲɛbatiɲɛ.
barakurunba. Nom. hernie ombilicale; hernia;
barajiɲini n.comp. recherche de récompense divine;
Leistenbruch. Category: Disease.
looking for divine reward; nach göttlicher synonyme: barakuru.
Belohnung ausschauen.
barakuru n.comp. hernie ombilicale; hernia;
barajitanya Nom. ingratitude; ungratefulness;
Eingeweidebruch, Leistenbruch.
Undankbarkeit.
Category: Disease. synonyme: barakunba.
synonyme: waleɲumandɔnbaliya,
ɲumandɔnbaliya. barama 1 [á-á-ã]́ Emprunt de : arabe.
synonyme: nigɛdaga. Nom. marmite en métal;
barajuru [à-à-ù-ù] synonyme: tonsojuru. Nom.
iron cooking pot; Kochtopf, Pfanne.
1 • cordon ombilical; umbilical cord; Category: Container.
Nabelschnur. Category: Body.
synonyme: tonsojuru.
barama
2
[á-á-á] Verbe. louer, chanter les louanges,
flatter; praise, sing praise, flatter; Lob singen,
2 • principe essentiel, fondement; essential
preisen, schmeicheln.
principle, foundation; Hauptprinzip,
Fundament. barama Nom. au nombril protubérant; with a
3
3 • siège social; head office; Hauptsitz. protruding navel; mit hervorstehendem Nabel.
barakaban synonyme: arimɔrɔtiseman. Nom. baraman Nom. marmite en fonte, marmite en métal;
amortissement; depreciation, amortization; cast-iron cooking pot; gegossener Kochtopf.
Abschreibung, Schuldentilgung, Tilgung. Category: Container.
Category: Finance. synonyme: sɔngɔben.
baraminɛtori [à-à-ì-ɛ̀] variante: baraminɛntori.
barakala [à-à-á-á] Nom. espèce de plante; kind of Nom. rainette; tree frog; Laubfrosch.
plant; Pflanzenart. Category: Grass, herb, Category: Amphibian.
vine. peristrophe bicalyculata.
29/01/2026 28

baramɔgɔ barikaman
baramɔgɔ [á] Morphemes: bara-mɔgɔ. Nom. barigon [à-ì] Emprunt de : français.
personne de la maison, de la famille; person variante: barikon. Nom. tonneau, barrique,
from the house, from the family; Person aus baril, fût; barrel; Fass. Category: Container.
dem Haus, aus der Familie. Category: Kinship.
barika [á-í-á] Emprunt de : arabe. Variant: abarika.
1
baramuso Morphemes: bara-muso. Nom. femme
Verbe. 1 • remercier, bénir; say thank you,
préférée d'un polygame, préférée, favorite; bless; danke sagen, segnen.
preferred wife; Lieblingsfrau.
2 • remerciement; thanks; Dank.
Category: Person.
barika [á-í-á] Emprunt de : arabe. variante: baraka.
baramusoden Morphemes: bara-muso-den. Nom. 2
1 • Nom. force divine, grâce divine,
enfant de la femme préférée; child of favorite
bénédiction, faveur; divine strength or power,
wife; Kind der Lieblingsfrau.
God's grace, blessing, favour; göttliche Kraft
baranda [à-à-á] Nom. 1 • banane, banane plantain; und Segen Gottes Segen.
plantain banana, banana; Kochbanane, 2 • Nom. énergie, force, vigueur, puissance;
Banane. Category: Types of food. musa energy, strength; Energie.
sapientum. synonyme: loko. 3 • Verbe. devenir puissant, renforcer,
2 • bananier; banana tree; Bananenbaum.
consolider; get strong, strengthen,
Category: Tree. musa paradisiaca.
consolidate; stark werden, stärken, festigen.
barasi [à-à-í] Emprunt de : français. barika 3 synonyme: dɔ bɔ a ra. Verbe. diminue (le prix);
synonyme: dalan. Nom. barrage; dam; Stausee. lower (the price); senke (den Preis). A sɔngɔ
Category: Water. synonyme: balan. ka gɛlɛn kojugu. Barika. C'est trop cher.
4
diminue (le prix). It is too expensive. Lower
baratu variante: baranta, barantu. Verbe. coudre,
(the price). Es ist zu teuer. Senke (den Preis).
recoudre; sew; nähen. synonyme: kala 4 , kalan 3 . barika banta comparer: barika lakurayata. Nom.
baratugunba [à-à-ù-ù] Nom. grande calebasse à énergie non renouvelable; non-renewable
couvercle des femmes (pour les vêtements); energy; nicht erneuerbare Energie.
large women's lidded gourd (for clothing); barika bɔyɔrɔ Nom. source d'énergie; energy source;
großer Deckelkürbis für Frauen (für
Energiequelle.
Kleidung). Category: Container.
barika lakurayata comparer: barika banta. Nom.
baraya [á] Nom. fait d’être préférée (pour une femme),
énergie renouvelable; renewable energy;
état de femme favorite, préférence; being
erneuerbare Energie.
preferred (for a woman), state of favorite
woman, preference; bevorzugt werden (für barika tugu [á-í-á ú-ú] expr. diminue encore; lower
eine Frau), Zustand der Lieblingsfrau, again (the price); senke nochmals (den Preis).
Präferenz. A sɔngɔ ka gɛlɛn. Barika tugu. C'est cher.
bari [á-ì] variante: bayidi, bayiri, barisigi. conj. diminue encore (le prix). It is expensive. Lower
1
again (the price). Es ist teuer, Senke (den
parce que, car, en effet, ainsi; because, than,
for; weil, denn. synonyme: ka la a kan, barisa.
Preis) nochmals.
barikada Morphemes: barika-da. Verbe. 1 • remercier;
bari Nom. arbre (espèce); tree sp; Baumart.
2
to thank; danken, sich bedanken.
Category: Tree. nauclea latifolia.
2 • remerciement, reconnaissance; thanks,
bari 3 [à-ì] vt. 1 • rapiécer, raccommoder; patch; thankfulness; Dankbarkeit, Anerkennung.
flicken. N tagara n ta kurusi di ka bari. Je barikaden [á] Morphemes: barika-den. Nom. enfant
suis allé faire raccommoder mon pantalon. I
béni, enfant aimé de ses parents; blessed child,
had my trousers patched. Ich habe meine Hose
child loved by his parents; gesegnetes Kind,
flicken lassen.
Kind, das von seinen Eltern geliebt wird.
2 • crépir, couvrir de boue ou de ciment;
plaster, cover with mud or cement; verputzen, barikadifan Nom. borne positive; positive terminal,
überdecken. positive pole; positive Klemme, Pluspol,
positiver Pol.
bari [à-ì] conj. mais; but, yet; aber.
4
barikadinan Nom. fortifiant; fortifier;
baridunun [à-ì] Morphemes: bari-dunun. Nom.
Stärkungsmittel. synonyme: fangadinan.
tambour formé d'un fût métallique et de deux
peaux; drum made of a metal drum and two barikaman [á-í-á-ã́] Morphemes: barika-man.
skins; Trommel aus einer Metalltrommel und variante: barikama. adj. 1 • fort, puissant,
zwei Fellen. Category: Musical instrument.
vigoureux, important; strong, powerful,
important; stark, machtvoll, mächtig, wichtig.
29/01/2026 29

barikatafan basa
2 • béni; blessed; gesegnet. baro [à] Nom. halo, cercle, circonférence; halo,
3
barikatafan Nom. borne négative; negative terminal, circle, circumference; Heiligenschein, Kreis,
negative pole; Minuspol, negativer Pol. Umfang. kalo ye baro koori. synonyme: koori,
synonyme: kurandifan. koorinin.
barikatan [á] Morphemes: barika-tan. baroda [à-ò] Morphemes: baro-da. Nom. lieu de
variante: barikantan. Nom. sans force, faible, causerie, groupe de causerie; chat place, chat
sans bénédiction; without strength, weak, group, place of the discussion; Gesprächsort,
without blessing; ohne Kraft, schwach, ohne Gesprächsgruppe.
Segen. baroden [à-ò] Morphemes: baro-den.
barikatanya variante: barokɛla. Nom. compagnon de
[á-í-ã́-ã́-á] Morphemes: barika-tan-ya. causerie, interlocuteur, personne participant a
1 • Nom. impuissance, affaiblissement; une causerie; interlocutor, chat companion,
powerlessness, weakening; Machtlosigkeit, person participating in a talk;
Kraftlosigkeit, Schwächung. Gesprächspartner, Person, die an einem
2 • Verbe. affaiblir; weaken; schwächen.
Gespräch teilnimmt.
barikatigi comparer: safunɛmugu.[á-í-á-í-í] n.pro. baron [á] Verbe. malaxer (une matière pâteuse pour la
1
rendre plus homogène), écraser, broyer,
savon en poudre (marque); soap powder
(brand name); Waschpulver (Marke).
sévèrement frapper; knead (a pasty material to
make it more homogeneous), crush, grind,
barikatigi 2 Morphemes: barika-tigi. Nom. costaud, severely hit; kneten (ein teigiges Material, um
personne vigoureuse, personne puissante; es homogener zu machen), zerdrücken,
strong person, vigorous person; starke Person. mahlen, kräftig schlagen. synonyme: nɔɔni,
barikawili Nom. progrès surprenant; surprising dogi.
progress; erstaunlicher Fortschritt. baronin comparer: ɲanagwɛkuma. Nom. anecdote;
barikaya Verbe. devenir puissant ou fort, renforcer, anecdote; Anekdote, Erzählung.
fortifier; become strong, strengthen; stark barosaga [á-ò-à-à] Nom. mouton châtré, mouton de
werden, stärken.
case; castrated sheep; kastriertes Schaf.
barinnako Nom. surprise; surprise; Überraschung. Category: Mammal.
barisa [á] conj. parce que, car, en effet, ainsi; because; barosigi [à-ò] Morphemes: baro-sigi. Nom.
weil, denn. synonyme: jango, bawu , bawo,
réjouissance (causerie) des femmes,
1
l'après-midi d'une noce, conférence; rejoicing
ko, katugu, sabu, ka la a kan, bari .
1 1 1 (talk) of women, the afternoon of a wedding,
barisogo [à-ì] Morphemes: bari-sogo. Nom. conference; Jubel (Gespräch) von Frauen,
Nachmittag einer Hochzeit, Konferenz.
corpulence, constitution physique; corpulence,
physical constitution; Korpulenz, barotigi [à-ò] Morphemes: baro-tigi. Nom. autour
körperliche Konstitution.
duquel on fait cercle; around which people
baro [à-ó] 1 • Nom. conversation, causerie, débat, form a circle; um den man einen Kreis bilden.
1
discussion; conversation, chat, debate, basa [á-à] Nom. 1 • lézard, margouillat, agame des
1
discussion; Gespräch, Diskussion,
colons; Agama lizard; Eidechse.
Unterhaltung, Debatte. An bɛ baro la. Nous
Category: Reptile. agama agama.
sommes en train de converser. We are having
2 • crocodile; crocodile; Krokodil.
a conversation. Wir haben eine Unterhaltung.
synonyme: banba .
An ka baro kɛ ! Parlons ensemble ! Let’s talk!
1
Laßt uns miteinander sprechen! basa 2 [á] Verbe. regarder fixement, fixer les yeux sur,
synonyme: masala. braquer, écarquiller (le yeux); to fix the eyes
on; gut anschauen, anstarren, mit grossen
2 • Verbe. causer, discuter, courtiser; talk, chat,
Augen beobachten.
converse, discuss; sprechen, diskutieren,
plaudern. basa [á] Verbe. exercer une pression; exert pressure;
3
baro [à] Nom. liane-fraise; kind of liana; Liane (Art). Druck ausüben. an ma basa a dala fewu!
2
Category: Grass, herb, vine. nauclea latifolia Nous n'avons exercé sur lui aucune pression!
/sarcocephalus esculentus. We put no pressure on him! Wir üben keinen
Druck auf ihn aus!
29/01/2026 30

basakilici basiya
basakilici [á] Morphemes: basa-kili-ci. Verbe. dires basigi [á-ì-í] Morphemes: ba-sigi. 1 • Verbe. être
sans ambages, dire ses quatre vérités à sérieux, ordonné, calme, appliqué; be serious,
quelqu'un; speak bluntly, tell someone the orderly, calm, diligent; ernst sein, ordentlich,
truth; Sprechen Sie unverblümt, sagen Sie ruhig, fleißig.
jemandem die Wahrheit. 2 • Verbe. être solide, installé, stable, régulier,
basaku Nom. espèce de plante; kind of plant; Pflanze constant; be solid, settled, stable, regular,
constant; fest sein, stabil, regelmäßig, konstant
(Art). Category: Grass, herb, vine. borreria
sein.
verticillata, stachytarpheta angustifolia.
3 • Nom. sécurité; security, safety; Sicherheit.
basalansɛrɛ Nom. 1 • espèce de plante; kind of plant;
basigibali [á] Emprunt de : ba-sigi-bali. Adverbe.
Pflanze (Art). Category: Grass, herb, vine.
cucumis melo.
irrégulier, nerveux, agité, instable; irregular,
nervous, agitated, unstable; unregelmässig,
2 • espèce de melon; kind of melon;
ungleichmässig, nervös, aufgeregt, instabil.
Wassermelone.
basigibaliya Morphemes: ba-sigi-bali-ya. Nom.
basalasɛrɛ Nom. espèce de plante; kind of plant;
1 • agitation, énervement, instabilité; agitation,
Pflanze (Art). Category: Grass, herb, vine.
irritation, instability; Aufregung, Irritation,
melothria maderaspatana.
Instabilität.
basamanjɔ [á] Morphemes: ba-saman-jɔ.
2 • vagabondage, divagation; wandering;
variante: basamajɔ. Nom. senne, grand filet de Herumwandern.
pêche collective; seine, large collective fishing 3 • insécurité; insecurity; Unsicherheit.
net; großes kollektives Fischernetz.
basigilenya [á] Morphemes: ba-sigi-len-ya. Nom.
Category: Hunt and fish.
sérieux, application, calme; serious, diligent,
basan 1 comparer: bazɛn.[à-ã́] Nom. tissu basin, tissu calm; ernst, fleißig, ruhig.
soyeux; wax tissue /cloth; Stoffart.
basiginin Morphemes: ba-sigi-nin. variante: basigi.
basan 2 [á] Verbe. accrocher, agripper, mêler, Adverbe. être stable, régulier, ordonné, sérieux,
mélanger, embrouiller, devenir difficile; to appliqué, calme; solide, installé, constant;
hang on, to grab, to mix up, to confuse, to stable, regular; stabil, standfest.
become difficult; festhalten, durcheinander
basiji Morphemes: basi-ji. Nom. sérum; serum;
bringen, verwirren, schwierig werden.
Serum. Category: Treat disease.
base comparer: lɔgɔlɔmobili.[á-é] Nom. véhicule
synonyme: pikiriji.
bâché, utilisé pour les transports en commun;
basikɛti [à-ì-ɛ́-í] Emprunt de : français. Nom.
bush taxi, popular type of public transport
vehicle; Pick-up Auto für öffentlichen basket, basket-ball; basketball; Korbball,
Verkehr, Buschtaxi. Category: Travel. Basketball.
basi [á-í] adj.pred. âpre (au goût); bitter; bitter. basikɛti bololabalonfili Nom. basket-ball;
1
Mangoro geren basinin lo. Une mangue qui basketball; Basketball.
n’est pas mûre est âpre. An unripe mango is basikili Emprunt de : français. synonyme: jaba. Nom.
bitter. Eine unreife Mango ist bitter.
bascule; rocker, weighing machine;
basi comparer: joli .[á-í] Nom. sang; blood; Blut. Schaukelbrett, Waage.
2 1
Category: Body. basiliyɔrɔ Morphemes: basili-yɔrɔ. Nom. lieu de soins,
basi [à-í] Nom. couscous; couscous; Kuskus. dispensaire; place of care, dispensary;
3
Category: Food.
Pflegeort, Apotheke. Category: Treat disease,
Building.
basi Verbe. 1 • soigner; treat; pflegen.
4 basima [á] Morphemes: basi-ma. Nom. rouge,
Category: Treat disease.
sanglant, ensanglanté; red, bloody; rot, blutig.
2 • remède, médicament, fétiche; medicine,
fetish; Medizin, Heilmittel, Fetisch. basiman [á] Morphemes: basi-man. Nom. âpre,
basi Nom. caprin; little goat; kleine Ziege. méchant; harsh, nasty; hart, böse. mɔgɔ
5
Category: Animal husbandry. basiman. une personne méchante. a nasty
person. ein böser Mensch.
basi Nom. fétiche, autel; fetish, altar; Fetisch,
6
Opferaltar. Category: Religion.
basitɛmɛ [à-ì-ɛ́-ɛ́] n.comp. tamis à large mailles;
sieve, sifter; Sieb. Category: Tool.
basibɔn Morphemes: basi-bɔn. Nom. hémorragie,
basiya [á] 1 • Verbe. être âpre, tourner (aliment), aigrir;
saignement, aménorrhée; bleeding, menstrual 1
bleeding, menorrhoea; Blutung, Menorrhagie. to be bitter, to get bad (food); bitter werden,
Category: Disease. schlecht werden (Nahrung).
29/01/2026 31

basiya batutamori
2 • Nom. âpreté, amertume, astringence; batise [á-í-é] vt. baptiser; baptise; taufen. N b'i
harshness, bitterness, astringency; Härte,
batise Fa ni Dencɛ ani Ni Hakili / Senu tɔgɔ
Bitterkeit.
la. Je te baptise au nom du Père et du Fils et du
basiya Verbe. soigner, soigner une plaie sanglante;
2 Saint Esprit. I baptise you in the name of the
heal, treat a bloody wound; heilen, eine Father, Son and Holy Spirit.
blutige Wunde behandeln. Category: Treat
disease.
batiseden [á-í-é-ẽ́] Morphemes: batise-den. Nom.
celui qui va se faire baptiser; baptismal
baso [à] Morphemes: ba-so. Nom. étable des
candidate; Täufling.
chèvres; shed for goats, barn or stable for
goats; Ziegenstall. Category: Animal
batiseli See main entry: batɛmuta.[á-í-é-í] Nom.
husbandry, Building. synonyme: basulu. baptême; baptism; Taufe.
basulu [à] Morphemes: ba-sulu. variante: basuli. batiselikɛla [á-í-é-í-ɛ́-á] variante: batizelikɛla.
Nom. étable pour les chèvres; stable for goats; Nom. celui qui baptise; person who baptises;
Stall für Ziegen. Category: Animal husbandry, der Taufende, der Täufer. Yuhana Batiselikɛla
Building. synonyme: baso. Jean Baptiste. John the Baptist. Johannes der
Täufer.
bata [à-á] Nom. grenouille; frog; Frosch.
bato See main entry: Alabato.[à-ò] 1 • vt. adorer,
Category: Amphibian. 1
vénérer Dieu; adore, worship, venerate God;
bataki [à-à-í] Emprunt de : arabe. Nom. lettre, anbeten, Gott verehren.
nouvelle, correspondance; letter, news, 2 • vt. respecter, suivre (les conseils), obéir;
correspondence ; Brief, Neuigkeiten, respect, obey; respektieren, gehorchen. sariya
Korrespondenz. Bataki ci Buba ma. Envoyer
bato respecter la loi. respect the law. das
une lettre à Bouba. Send a letter to Bouba.
Gesetz befolgen.
Einen Brief an Buba senden.
Category: Communication.
3 • Nom. vœu, souhait, vénération, adoration;
wish, veneration, adoration; Wunsch,
synonyme: lɔyɔrɔkelen, lɛtɛrɛ.
Verehrung, Anbetung.
batakikɛsu [à-à-ì-ɛ́-ú] Morphemes: bataki-kɛsu. bato [à-ó] Emprunt de : français.
2
Nom. boîte postale; post office box; Postfach.
synonyme: kurun. Nom. bateau; boat; Schiff,
synonyme: nɛgɛjurusokɛsu.
Boot. Category: Travel.
batan variante: bantan. Nom. orphelin sans mère; batofɛn [à-ò-ɛ ́] Morphemes: bato1-fɛn. Nom. dieu,
orphan without mother; Waise ohne Mutter.
Dieu; god, God; Gott. synonyme: ŋala .
synonyme: falatɔnin.
2
batokɛla [à-ò-á] Morphemes: bato1-kɛ-la. Nom.
bataraden n.comp. bâtard, vaurien; bastard, no-good,
adorateur; worshipper; Verehrer, Anbeter.
bad lot; Bastard, Nichtsnutz.
batoli [à-ò-í] Morphemes: bato1-li. Nom.
bataraya n.comp. attitude de vaurien; attitude of a
1 • adoration, louange; adoration, praise,
no-good; Einstellung eines Nichtsnutze.
worship; Anbetung, Lobpreis.
bateri Emprunt de : français. Nom. batterie; drum kit, 2 • culte; church service; Gottesdienst. Ni
percussion section, drums, drum set; batoli banna... A la fin du culte... At the end
Schlagzeug. Category: Musical instrument.
of the service... Am Ende des Gottesdienstes ...
batɛmuta [à-ɛ̀-ù-á] Variant: batiseli. n.comp. batu [á-ú] Nom. forêt, galerie, bosquets longeant les
1
baptême; baptism; Taufe.
cours d'eau; forest, trees alongside a river;
batintin [á] Morphemes: ba-tintin. Nom. berge, Wald, Baumgalerie, Bäume einem Fluss
entlang. Category: Tree, Land.
endroit exhaussé au bord d'un cours d'eau;
bank, raised place at the edge of a batu Nom. espèce de plante; plant (kind of);
2
watercourse; Ufer, erhöhte Stelle am Rande
Pflanzenart. Category: Grass, herb, vine.
eines Wasserlaufs. Category: Water, Land. jacquemontia tamnifolia.
batiri [à-ì-í] Emprunt de : français. variante: bateri. batutamori See main entry: .[à-ù-à-ó-í] n.comp.
Nom. batterie, batterie d'accumulateur; battery; marabout qui trompe les gens, charlatan;
Batterie.
marabou, holy man, con man, trickster,
charlatan; Marabu, Islamlehrer, Scharlatan.
Category: Worker, occupation.
synonyme: kooromori.
29/01/2026 32

batutu bege
batutu Nom. toutou des berges; kind of tree; Baumart. bayamɔgɔ Morphemes: baya-mɔgɔ. Nom. personne
Category: Tree. parinari congensis. agréable, qui plaît et rend service à tout le
bawalan [á] Nom. jeune femme mariée, femme d'age
monde; pleasant person, who pleases and
helps everyone; angenehme Person, die allen
intermédiaire, encore séduisante; young
gefällt und ihnen hilft. Category: Person.
married woman, middle-aged woman, still
attractive; junge verheiratete Frau, Frau bayɛlɛma [á-ɛ́-ɛ́-á] vt. 1 • changer, transformer;
mittleren Alters, immer noch attraktiv. change, transform; verändern, wechseln,
Category: Person. verwandeln. synonyme: falen.
3
bawili [á-í-í] Emprunt de : arabe. variante: bawuli. 2 • traduire; translate; übersetzen.
Nom. urine, envie d'uriner; urine; Urin. bayɛlɛmala
synonyme: ɲɛgɛnɛji, ɲɛgɛnɛ, jalaminɛ,
[á-ɛ́-ɛ́-á-á] Morphemes: bayɛlɛma-baga.
sugunɛ.
variante: bayɛlɛmabaga. Nom. traducteur;
bawo [á-ó] conj. car, parce que, puisque; because, translator; Übersetzer. Category: Worker,
for, since, given that; weil, denn. A ma se ka
occupation.
na, bawo a ma mobili sara sɔrɔ. Il n'a pas pu bayɛlɛmali [á-ɛ́-ɛ́-á-í] Morphemes: bayɛlɛma-li.
venir, parce qu'il na pas eu le frais de transport. Nom. 1 • transformation, conversion;
He could not come because he didn't get the transformation, conversion; Transformation,
transport money. Er konnte nicht komme weil Wandlung, Umwandlung, Umrechnung.
er das Fahrgeld nicht hatte. synonyme: bawu , synonyme: falenni.
1
barisa, sabu la, ka la a kan. 2 • traduction; translation; Übersetzung.
bawolo [á] Morphemes: ba-wolo. Verbe. multiplier Bibulu bayɛlɛmali traduction de la Bible.
Bible translation. Bibelübersetzung.
(terme des devins), tout dire, dévoiler; multiply
(soothsayers’ term), say everything, reveal; bayo [á] Nom. pagne à raies blanches et noires,
multiplizieren (Wahrsager Begriff), alles bande de cotonnade; cloth with white and
sagen, offenbaren. black stripes, cotton strip; Stoff mit weißen
bawɔlɔ [á-ɔ̀-ɔ̀] Nom. oie d'Égypte; Egyptian goose; und schwarzen Streifen, Baumwollstreifen.
1
Nilgans. Category: Bird. alopochen bazɛn comparer: basan 1 .[à-ɛ ́] Nom. sorte de tissu;
aegyptiacus; anas clypeata. type of material / cloth; Stoffart.
bawɔlɔ 2 Nom. jars; gander; Ganter, Gänserich. be 1 [é] bambara: bɛ. variante: bi, bɛ. pred.
Category: Animal husbandry. auxiliaire du présent, être (copule); to be; sein,
bawɔlɔden Nom. oison; gosling; Gänseküken, ist. Musa be yen wa ? Moussa est-il là ? Is
Gänschen. Category: Animal husbandry. Moussa there? Ist Moussa da? synonyme: bɛ.
bawɔlɔmuso Nom. oie; goose; Gans. be 2 [è] variante: beete. Nom. porte-monnaie;
Category: Animal husbandry. wallet; Geldbörse. Category: Finance.
bawɔlɔsɔ variante: bawɔɔsɔ. Nom. espèce de oiseau; be 3 [è] variante: bi. Nom. sillon, intervalle entre
kind of bird; Vogelart. Category: Bird. deux billons; furrow, interval between two
numenius phaeopus. ridges; Furche, Abstand zwischen zwei
Graten. Category: Agriculture.
bawu [á-ù] variante: bawo. conj. car, parce que;
1
because; weil, denn. synonyme: bawo, barisa.
be ... ye Jula: bi ... ye. synonyme: ye ... ye. expr. est
(identité); is (identity); ist (Identität). Nin bɛ
bawu [á] Adverbe. violemment, subitement et fort,
2 jɛgɛ ye. Ceci est un poisson. This is a fish. Das
avec fracas; violently, suddenly and loudly,
ist ein Fisch.
with a crash; heftig, plötzlich und laut, mit
einem Krachen. bebenin [è-è] Emprunt de : du français: bébé.
baya [à] Nom. ceinture de perles des femmes; pearl variante: denmankannin. Nom. poupée; doll;
1
waistband for women; Perlenkette für Frauen.
Puppe.
Category: Adornment. bebifuti Emprunt de : français. Nom. baby-foot; table
baya [á] Nom. état de celle qui est mère, fait d’être football, table soccer; Tischfussballspiel.
2
mère; state of one who is a mother, fact of bege [é] Nom. dard, pointe, piquant; sting, point,
being a mother; Zustand einer Mutter,
spine, pickle; Stachel, Spitz.
Tatsache, Mutter zu sein.
29/01/2026 33

begewɔɔrɔ bere
begewɔɔrɔ variante: bege-tan-ni-kelen (=onze bena aux. marque du futur affirmatif; affirmative
dards). Nom. poisson-chat; catfish; Wels. future marker, will; Futur Marker, wird,
Category: Fish. synodontis budgetti. werden, Zukunftsmarker. A bena lɔgɔ ci. Il
synonyme: mugukɔɔnkɔn. casse du bois. He cuts wood. Er bricht Holz.
bele [é-è] Nom. mouche (espèce); fly sp; Fliege. benbe variante: benbefin. Nom. raisin sauvage; wild
1
Category: Insect. synonyme: bilen . grapes; wilde Trauben. Category: Tree. lannea
4
acida. synonyme: benbefin.
bele Nom. arbre (espèce); tree sp; Baumart.
2
benbeba [è-è-á] Nom. raisinier; grape tree, kind of
Category: Tree. boscia senegalensis.
tree; Traubenbaum. Category: Tree. lannea
belebele
1
[è-è-é-é] adj. gros, massif, important, fort,
microcarpa. synonyme: pegunba, npeku.
puissant; fat, big; groß, dick. A ka muso
benbefin [è-è] Nom. raisinier sauvage; wild grape
belebele furu. Il a épousé une grosse femme.
He married a big woman. Er hat eine große
tree; wilder Traubenbaum. lannea acida.
Frau geheiratet. Mɔbili belebele lo. C'est une
synonyme: npeku, benbe.
grosse voiture. It's a big car. Es ist ein großes benbekunan [è-è] Nom. raisinier amer, raisinier
Auto. velu; bitter grape, hairy grape; bittere Traube,
belebele Nom. espèce d'arbre; kind of tree; Baumart. haarige Traube. Category: Tree. lannea
2
Category: Tree. maerua angolensis.
velutina. synonyme: benbemuso, npeku.
belebeleba [è-è-è-è-á] adj. gros, immense; fat, big, benbemuso Nom. espèce d'arbre; kind of tree;
huge, immense; gross, riesig, gewaltig, Baumart. Category: Tree. lannea velutina.
unermesslich. synonyme: benbekunan, bakɔrɔpeku.
beleke [é] Verbe. arriver à l'improviste, surprendre, benben [ẽ̌-ẽ̀] Verbe. tomber (en éparpillant); fall and
1
faire à la va-vite; arrive unexpectedly, spread out; fallen und ausbreiten.
surprise, do in haste; unerwartet ankommen,
benbenin [è-è] variante: benbe, banbe, banbali.
überraschen, in Eile tun.
Nom. planchette placée à l’arrière de la pirogue
beleke 2 [é] Verbe. faire cuire à l'eau (pour les et servant de siège, estrade; board placed at
tubercules à grosse taille: igname, manioc, the rear of the canoe and used as a seat,
patate etc.); cook in water (for large tubers: platform; Brett, das am Heck des Kanus
yam, cassava, potato, etc.); in Wasser kochen angebracht und als Sitz genutzt wird,
(für große Knollen: Yamswurzel, Maniok, Plattform. Category: Hunt and fish.
Kartoffel usw.)
Benɛn Nom. Bénin; Benin; Benin. Category: Country.
belen [ì-ẽ̀] comparer: halibele. variante: bilen.
benkanifanga comparer: ɛnperiyalisimu. Nom.
Adverbe. encore; again; wieder.
synonyme: tugun .
impérialisme; imperialism; Imperialismus.
2
benkanni [ẽ̀-à-í] Nom. annexion; annexation;
belencɛ [é-é-ɛ́] Nom. oncle maternel; uncle (mother's
Aneignung, Annexion.
brother); Onkel (Bruder der Mutter).
Category: Kinship. synonyme: bɛɛnkɛ. benkannikɛla comparer: bandi.[è-ã̀-ì-ɛ̀-á] Nom.
bandit; bandit, robber; Bandit, Gangster
ben [è] Verbe. 1 • tomber; fall; fallen. Yiri binna.
1 Räuber.
L'arbre est tombé. The tree fell. Der Baum ist
gefallen. synonyme: bin.
benlakarilan Nom. parachute; parachute; Fallschirm.
2
synonyme: binlakarilan.
2 • terrasser, chuter, faire tomber; drop, slide;
fallen, umfallen. benni [ẽ̀-í] Nom. chute, crash, élimination; downfall,
1
3 • agresser, attaquer; attack, assault, mug; crash, elimination; Fall, Sturz, Absturz,
überfallen, attackieren. Beseitigung.
ben 2 [ẽ́] variante: bin. 1 • Nom. chute, faillite, perte, benni 2 [ẽ̀-í] Morphemes: bin-ni. Nom. déclin;
agression, accusation; downfall, bankruptcy, decline; Untergang.
collapse, insolvency, aggression, accusation;
Sturz, Untergang, Bankrott, Konkurs, Pleite.
bere
1
[é-é] Nom. espèce de poisson; stick, e.g. for
beating animals, beating millet; Fischart.
2 • Verbe. faire faillite; go bankrupt; Konkurs
gehen. Category: Finance.
Category: Fish. alestes baremoze.
bere [è-é] variante: bele. Nom. arbre (espèce); tree
2
sp; Baumart. Category: Bush, shrub. boscia
senegalensis. synonyme: berefin.
29/01/2026 34

bere bɛɛcɛfɛrɛrɛ
bere [é-é] Nom. 1 • bâton, gourdin; stick, bludgeon, berelapanni Nom. saut à la perche; pole vault;
3
cudgel; Stock. Category: Tool. Stabhochsprung.
synonyme: cɔlɔnin. bereminɛna Morphemes: bere-minɛ-na.
2 • sexe masculin; penis; Penis, Glied. variante: bereminɛ. Nom. guide d'un aveugle;
Category: Body. synonyme: fɔrɔ, fɔrɔkala,
guide of a blind person; Führer eines Blinden.
wulubere, wulu 2 , wulukala. Category: Worker, occupation.
bere [è] Nom. sac en paille ou en feuilles de palmier; beretugan [è-è-ú-à] variante: birintugan. Nom.
4
straw or palm leaf bag; Stroh- oder pigeon, tourterelle; pigeon, dove, turtle dove;
Palmblattbeutel, Sack aus Stroh, Strohsack. Taube, Turteltaube. Category: Bird. columba
Category: Container. guinea. synonyme: jɛnɛtugan.
bere 5 [è] Nom. côté, flanc; side, flank; Seite, Flanke. beretugankanfin comparer: kanfin. Nom.
A ye npan don a bere la. Il mit le sabre à son tourterelle, pigeon au cou sombre; turtle dove;
côté. He put the sword by his side. Er legte den Turteltaube. Category: Bird. streptopelia.
Säbel an seine Seite. synonyme: kɛrɛda, kɛrɛ.
bese [è-é] variante: besemuru. Nom. machette,
berebere 1 [è-è] Verbe. choyer, dorloter, faire des coupe-coupe; machete, cutlass; Buschmesser,
amabilités, caresser; pamper, be kind, show Machete. Category: Agricultural tool.
kindness, caress; verhätscheln, liebevoll synonyme: besemuru.
sorgen, verwöhnen, liebevoll umgehen,
besemuru Nom. machette, coupe-coupe; machete,
streicheln. synonyme: maramara.
cutlass; Buschmesser, Machete.
berebere 2 [è-è] variante: bɛdɛbɛdɛ. Nom. brique en Category: Agricultural tool. synonyme: bese.
terre (en forme de boule); earthen brick (ball
bɛ [ɛ́] pred. auxiliaire du présent positif des
shaped); Lehmziegel (kugelförmig).
verbes; auxiliary for marking present tense,
berebila [é] Nom. 1 • maladie qui tue tous les animaux
positive; sein, ist, es gibt. Nɛnɛ bɛ. Il fait froid.
du troupeau et fait abandonner le bâton de
It is cold. Es ist kalt. Funteni bɛ. Il fait chaud.
berger; disease that kills all the animals in the
It is hot. Es ist heiß. Hɛɛrɛ bɛ. Comment ça
flock and causes the shepherd to abandon the
staff; Krankheit, die alle Tiere der Herde tötet va ? How are you? Wie geht es? synonyme: be 1 ,
und dazu führt, dass der Hirte den Stab bi 1 , ye 6 .
verlässt, Tierkrankheit (Art).
bɛdɛbɛdɛ [ɛ́] Adverbe. forte exsudation, grande
2 • catastrophe; disaster; Katastrophe.
transpiration, suintement de graisse, très gras;
3 • excès, exagération, abus; excess,
heavy exudation, heavy sweating, oozing of
exaggeration, abuse; Übermaß, Übertreibung,
fat, very greasy; starkes Ausschwitzen, starkes
Missbrauch.
Schwitzen, Fettnässen, sehr fettig.
berecɛ [è-è-ɛ́] Nom. espèce d'arbre; kind of tree; bɛɛ [ɛ́] 1 • pron. tout, tous; all, every; alle, alles.
Baumart. Category: Tree. boscia salicifolia.
Denw bɛɛ bi dumuni kɛ. Tous les enfants
berefin [è-è-í] variante: beremuso. Nom. espèce sont en train de manger. All the children are
d'arbre; kind of tree; Baumart. Category: Tree. eating. Alle Kinder sind am Essen. A ye wari
boscia senegalensis. synonyme: bere 2 . bɛɛ ta. Il a pris tout l'argent. He took all the
beregwɛ [è-è] bambara: berejɛ. Nom. espèce money. Er nahm alles Geld. Tuma bɛɛ
d'arbre; kind of tree; Baumart. Category: Tree.
toujours. at all times, always. immer, für
boscia angustifolia.
immer.
2 • adj. n'importe qui, n'importe quel, la totalité;
berejɔn [è-è] Nom. arbuste (espèce), buisson; shrub
no matter who, no matter what, the totality;
(kind of); Buschart. Category: Bush, shrub. was auch immer für ein, wer auch immer,
maerua crassifolia. irgendein.
bereke [é] Nom. bâton, gourdin; stick, club; Stock, 3 • adj. dès, dès que, sitôt que; from then on, as
Keule. Category: Tool. synonyme: berekuru. soon as, henceforth; sobald, von nun an.
4 • adj. chaque, chacun, chacune; every,
berekunan [è-è] Nom. arbuste (espèce); shrub (kind
everyone, everybody; jeder, jede, jedes.
of); Buschart. cadaba farinosa.
bɛɛcɛfɛrɛrɛ Nom. oiseau (espèce); bird sp; Vogelart.
berekuru [é-é-ú-ú] n.comp. gourdin, bâton; cudgel,
Category: Bird. estrilda troglodytes.
stick; Knüppel, Stock. Category: Tool.
synonyme: bereke.
29/01/2026 35

bɛɛdun bɛgɛnmarafɛɛrɛ
bɛɛdun [ɛ]́ variante: bɛɛdunpyan. Nom. enfant bɛgɛnbo Nom. déjection animale; animal excreta;
gourmand, goinfre, prodigue; greedy child, Tierkot, Tiermist.
glutton, prodigal; gieriges Kind, Vielfraß,
bɛgɛnbon Nom. bergerie; sheepfold; Schafhürde.
verschwenderisch. synonyme: dumuniden,
Category: Agriculture.
nugulasu.
bɛgɛnbuguyabaara [ɛ́-ɛ ́-á-á] n.comp. élevage,
bɛɛjɛfanga Morphemes: bɛɛ-jɛ-fanga. Nom.
production animale; livestock farming, animal
démocratie; democracy; Demokratie. production, livestock production, animal
bɛɛla [ɛ]̀ variante: bɛla. Nom. peuple Bella (anciens husbandry; Aufzucht, Viehzucht,
Tierproduktion, Tierhaltung. Category: Animal
captifs des touarègues); Bella people; Bella
Volk. Category: Community.
husbandry. synonyme: bɛgɛnmara.
bɛɛlɛn [ɛ-́ ɛ́] variante: bɛɛlɛ. Nom. bol, cassolette, bɛgɛndaba [ɛ́-ɛ́-á-á] Nom. charrue; ox-plough,
brûle-parfums; bowl, small dish, essential oil ox-plow; Pflug. Category: Agricultural tool.
burner; Schale, Schüssel. synonyme: sari, saridaba, misidaba,
Category: Container. mansindaba.
bɛɛn [ɛɛ̀ ́] variante: bɛn. Nom. l'entente, accord, bɛgɛndɛndɛla Nom. berger; shepherd; Schafhirte.
consensus, unité; agreement, accord, Category: Animal husbandry, Worker,
consensus, unity; Einverständnis, occupation.
Übereinkunft, Konsens, Einheit.
bɛgɛndɔgɔtɔrɔ Nom. vétérinaire; veterinary;
bɛɛna [ɛ]́ Nom. lieu d'origine de la mère; mother's
Tierarzt. Category: Animal husbandry,
place of origin; Herkunftsort der Mutter. i Worker, occupation. synonyme: misisɔgɔla,
bɛɛnna bɛ min? D'où est ta mère? Where is misidɔkɔtɔrɔ, bagandɔgɔtɔrɔ.
your mother from? Woher kommt deine
bɛgɛnfagayɔrɔ
Mutter?
[ɛ́-ɛ ́-á-á-ɔ́-ɔ́] Morphemes: bagan-faga-yɔ
bɛɛnkɛ [ɛ]́ Nom. oncle maternel, parent maternel;
rɔ. variante: batuwari. Nom. abattoir;
maternal uncle, maternal relative; Onkel
mütterlicherseits, mütterlicher Verwandter.
slaughterhouse; Schlachthaus.
Category: Kinship. synonyme: belencɛ. bɛgɛnkɔkili [ɛ́] Nom. rognon; kidney; Niere.
bɛɛnnaka [ɛ́] Nom. parent maternel; maternal relative; Category: Parts of an animal.
mütterlicher Verwandter. Category: Kinship. bɛgɛnkulu Nom. troupeau; herd, flock; Herde.
synonyme: namama. Category: Animal husbandry.
bɛɛnninden [ɛ́] Nom. neveu ou nièce; nephew or bɛgɛnlayɔrɔ [ɛ́-ɛ ́-á-ɔ́-ɔ́] Nom. litière; bedding for
niece; Neffe oder Nichte. Category: Kinship. cattle, animal's bedding; Schlafstelle für Tiere.
Category: Animal husbandry.
bɛɛnninkɛ [ɛ́] variante: bɛɛnnincɛ. Nom. neveu
bɛgɛnlɔgɔ Nom. marché à bétail; animal market;
(enfant de la sœur); nephew (sister’s child);
Neffe (Kind der Schwester). Tiermarkt. Category: Animal husbandry.
Category: Kinship. synonyme: bagansugu.
bɛgɛn [ɛ-́ ɛ̀] Nom. 1 • animal; animal; Tier. bɛgɛnmara Nom. élevage; livestock farming;
2 • bétail; cattle; Vieh. Category: Mammal, Aufzucht, Viehzucht. Category: Animal
Animal husbandry. husbandry. synonyme: bɛgɛnbuguyabaara.
bɛgɛn dɛndɛyɔrɔ Nom. pâturage; pasture; bɛgɛnmaracogo Nom. système d'élevage; breeding
Weideland. Category: Animal husbandry, system; Haltungssystem. Category: Animal
Land. husbandry.
bɛgɛn kannayiri Nom. joug; joke; Joch. bɛgɛnmaracogokɔrɔ Nom. élevage extensive;
Category: Agriculture. synonyme: zu. extensive breeding; Extensivhaltung.
Category: Animal husbandry.
bɛgɛnbaloyɔrɔ [ɛ́] Nom. ferme; farm;
Landwirtschaftsbetrieb, Bauernhof.
bɛgɛnmaracogokura Nom. élevage intensive;
Category: Agriculture. intensive breeding; intensive Viehhaltung.
bɛgɛnbinsɛnɛ Nom. culture fourragère; fodder crop; bɛgɛnmarafɛɛrɛ Nom. zootechnique; zoo-technical
Futterbau. Category: Agriculture, Animal fields; Tierzuchtbereich. Category: Animal
husbandry. husbandry.
29/01/2026 36

bɛgɛnmarala bɛlɛtoli
bɛgɛnmarala bɛlɛfara synonyme: dorobara. Nom. bourses, peau qui
[ɛ-́ ɛ ́-á-á-á] Morphemes: baganmara-la. recouvre les testicules; scrotum, skin covering
n.comp. éleveur; livestock farmer, the testicles; Skrotum, Hodensack, Haut die
stockbreeder; Viehzüchter, Viehhalter. die Hoden deckt. Category: Body.
Category: Animal husbandry, Worker, synonyme: worokɔrɔla, filabara,
occupation. bɛlɛkiliforoko.
bɛgɛnmarcogo Nom. mode d'élevage; kind / manner bɛlɛkili [ɛ̀-ɛ̀-ì-ì] Morphemes: bɛlɛ-kili.
of breeding, breeding manner; Art der synonyme: kaya, kayakili, fɔrɔkili, kili.
Aufzucht. Category: Animal husbandry.
variante: bɛlɛ. Nom. testicule; testicle, testis;
bɛgɛnnɔgɔ [ɛ́-ɛ ́-ɔ́-ɔ́] Nom. fumier; manure; Mist. Hoden. Category: Body. synonyme: kaya ,
2
Category: Agriculture. synonyme: nɔgɔ 2 . kiliden.
bɛgɛnw Nom. règne animal; fauna, animal kingdom, bɛlɛkiliforoko Nom. bourse; scrotum, ball-bag;
wildlife; Tierwelt. Hodensack. Category: Body.
bɛgɛnw damatɛmɛ dɛndɛyɔrɔ la expr. synonyme: bɛlɛfara.
surpâturage; overgrazing, over-cultivation; bɛlɛkisɛ [ɛ̀-ɛ̀-í-ɛ́] Morphemes: bɛ̀lɛ-kisɛ. Nom.
Überweidung. Category: Animal husbandry.
gravier, gravillon; gravel; Kies.
bɛgɛnw ka kunfɛyaala expr. divagation des Category: Land.
animaux; wandering of animals, straying by bɛlɛlankasa synonyme: fugarɔkasanin. Nom. espèce
animals; frei herumlaufende Tiere, streunende
d'herbe; kind of grass; Grasart.
Tiere. Category: Agriculture, Animal
Category: Grass, herb, vine. aristida
husbandry.
adscenisonis, crossopteryx febrifuga.
bɛgu [ɛ]́ Adverbe. complètement fermé; completely bɛlɛn [ɛ́-ɛ́] Verbe. guetter, épier, être à l’affût; watch
1
closed; komplett geschlossen.
out for, to spy on, be on the lookout;
bɛgubɛgu [ɛ́] Adverbe. très secrètement; secretly; beobachten, spähen, auf der Hut sein.
1
heimlich. synonyme: ɲɔgɔri 2 .
bɛgubɛgu 2 [ɛ́] variante: bekubeku, bɛkubɛku. bɛlɛn 2 [ɛ́] Verbe. accoster, mettre dans un coin, ranger;
Adverbe. complètement détruit; completely dock, put in a corner, put away; andocken, in
destroyed; völlig zerstört. eine Ecke stellen, wegräumen, anlegen (Boot).
bɛka [ɛ-́ à] Morphemes: bɛ-ka. part. ont, a (valeur
kurun bɛlɛna tuma min na.... Quand la
pirogue accosta... When the canoe docked...
affirmative et accomplie des énoncés
Als das Kanu anlegte...
processifs); has, have; hat, haben.
synonyme: ye. bɛlɛnbɛlɛn [ɛ́] Verbe. surveiller discrètement, se
2
déplacer discrètement; monitor discreetly,
bɛla comparer: bɛlacɛ, donitala.[ɛ̀-á] Nom. porteur;
1 move discreetly; diskret überwachen, diskret
bearer; Träger.
bewegen.
bɛla 2 [ɛ-̀ á] variante: bɛɛla. Nom. groupe ethnique bɛlɛnin [ɛ̀-ɛ̀] Morphemes: bɛlɛ-nin.
Bella: esclave tamacheq; ethnic group: Bella,
variante: bɛlɛkisɛnin, bɛlɛninbana,
they were slaves of the Tamasheq; Bella Volk.
bɛlɛninkisɛnin. Nom. appendicite;
bɛlacɛ comparer: bɛla 1 , donitala.[ɛ̀-à-ɛ́] Nom. appendicitis; Appendizitis, Blinddarm.
porteur; bearer; Träger. Category: Disease.
bɛlɛ See main entry: bɛrɛ .[ɛ̀-ɛ́] Nom. 1 • gravier, synonyme: kɔnɔfankelendimin, bɛrɛnin 1 .
2
caillou (de petite taille); gravel, small stone; bɛlɛnintuuru [ɛ̀-ɛ̀-ì] Nom. à tour de rôle, réciproque;
Kies, Kieselsteine. Bolokɔni kelen tɛ se ka in turn, reciprocal; wiederum wechselseitig.
bɛlɛ ta. Un doigt ne peut pas prendre un Foli ye bɛlɛnintuuru. Les salutations sont
caillou (C’est important d’aider les uns les chose réciproque. Greetings are reciprocal.
autres). One finger cannot lift a pebble (It’s Grüße erfolgen auf Gegenseitigkeit.
important to help each other). Ein einzelner
bɛlɛrɔfuralan Nom. espèce d'herbe; kind of grass;
Finger kann keine Kieselstein aufnehmen
(man muß einander helfen). Category: Land. Grasart. Category: Grass, herb, vine. aristida
stipoides.
2 • testicule; testicle; Hoden. Category: Body.
bɛlɛtoli [ɛ̀-ɛ̀] Nom. maladie du pied (myosite
plantaire); foot disease (plantar myositis);
Fußkrankheit (Plantarmyositis).
Category: Disease.
29/01/2026 37

bɛlɛwɔyɔ bɛnɛn
bɛlɛwɔyɔ [ɛ̀-ɛ́-ɔ̀-ɔ́] Nom. espèce de vipère; kind of bɛnbamuso Nom. ancêtre féminine; female ancestor;
viper; Viper (Art). Category: Snake. cerastes weibliche Vorfahrin. Category: Kinship.
vipera.
bɛnbɛ [ɛ́-ɛ̀] variante: bɛnbɛn. Nom. libellule;
bɛma [ɛ-́ á] variante: bema, bɛnba. Nom. ancêtre, dragonfly; Libelle. Category: Insect.
aïeul; ancestor, grandfather, grandmother;
bɛnbɛbɛn [ɛ̀-ɛ̀-ɛ́] variante: duu, kɔnkɔn, bɛnbɛn.
Urahn, Vorfahr, Ahn, Vorvater, Grossvater,
Grossmutter. Category: Kinship.
1 • Nom. complot, intrigue; plot, intrigue;
Komplott, Verschwörung, Intrige.
bɛmacɛ [ɛ́-á-ɛ́] Nom. ancêtre (homme), aïeul mâle;
2 • Verbe. coincer, piéger; to corner, trap; in die
ancestor (male), grandfather; Vorfahre, Falle locken, in die Enge treiben.
Grossvater. Category: Kinship.
bɛnbɛn [ɛ́] Verbe. caresser, cajoler, tapoter gentiment;
bɛmamuso [ɛ́-á-ú-ó] Nom. ancêtre (féminin);
caress, cuddle, pat gently; streicheln,
ancestor (woman); Vorfahre (Frau). kuscheln, sanft streicheln.
Category: Kinship. synonyme: maramara.
bɛn 1 [ɛ]̀ vi. 1 • se rencontrer, se réunir, affronter, bɛndɛgɛ variante: bɛnɛdɛgɛ, bɛlɛnɛgɛ. Nom. mets de
aller à la rencontre de; meet, unite; begegnen.
farine de mil et d'arachides pilées avec des
K’an bɛǹ ! Au revoir ! See you! Auf
condiments; kind of dish with millet flour and
wiedersehen! grinned ground-nuts; Gericht aus Hirsemehl
2 • recevoir, accueillir, intercepter, tomber sur, und gemahlenen Erdnüsse. Category: Food.
coïncider avec; receive, welcome, intercept;
bɛndɔgɔ [ɛ́] Nom. oncle paternel (frère cadet du père);
aufnehmen, willkommen heissen, auffangen.
paternal uncle (father's younger brother);
3 • s’entendre, être d’accord, accorder,
Onkel väterlicherseits (jüngerer Bruder des
convenir, agréer; agree; einverstanden sein,
Vaters). Category: Kinship.
sich einigen, zustimmen. An bɛnna sara la.
synonyme: fafitinin, facɛfitinin.
Nous nous sommes mis d’accord sur le salaire.
We agreed on the salary. Wir sind uns mit dem bɛnɛ [ɛ̀-ɛ́] variante: bɛnɛba. Nom. sésame; sesame;
Lohn einig. Sesam. Category: Food. sesamum indicum.
bɛn 2 [ɛ]́ variante: bɛɛn. Nom. entente, accord, bɛnɛfin Nom. 1 • plante (espèce); plant sp; Pflanzenart.
consensus, unité; agreement, accordance; Category: Grass, herb, vine. hyptis spicigera,
Abkommen, Einigung, Übereinkunft, sesanum alatum.
Verständnis. 2 • sésame sombre; dark sesame; dunkler
bɛn kan laɲinisɛbɛ Nom. pétition; petition; Antrag, Sesam. Category: Grass, herb, vine. sesamum
Bittgesuch, Petition, Eingabe.
alatum.
bɛna [ɛ-́ à] aux. marque du futur affirmatif, ferai, bɛnɛfincɛfin Nom. queue-de-rat (espèce de plante);
rattail (plant species); Pflanzenart.
serai etc; mark of the affirmative future, will,
will be etc; Zukunft Marker, wird, werden. Ji
achyranthes aspera.
bɛna don o maloforo bɛɛ la. L'eau va bɛnɛfinjɔn 1 Nom. espèce de plante; kind of plant;
pénétrer dans toutes les rizières. The water will Pflanze (Art). Category: Grass, herb, vine.
penetrate all the rice fields. Das Wasser wird hygrophila senegalensis.
alle Reisfelder durchdringen. synonyme: bina. bɛnɛfinjɔn synonyme: bɛnɛfunti. Nom. espèce de
2
bɛnba [ɛ]́ Nom. aïeul, ancêtre; grandfather, ancestor; plante; kind of plant; Pflanze (Art).
Großvater, Vorfahr. Category: Kinship. Category: Grass, herb, vine. hyptis spicigera.
bɛnbakɛ [ɛ́] variante: bɛnbacɛ. Nom. aïeul, ancêtre bɛnɛfunti Emprunt de : arabe. Nom. clou de girofle;
cloves; Nelken. Category: Bush, shrub.
mâle; grandfather, ancestor; Großvater,
Vorfahr.
sesanum indicum.
bɛnbali n.comp. incompatible; incompatible; bɛnɛgwɛ [ɛ̀-ɛ̀] bambara: bɛnɛjɛ. Nom. sésame blanc;
inkompatibel.
white sesame; weisser Sesam.
Category: Grass, herb, vine. sesamum
bɛnbaliya [ɛ ̀-à-ì-á] comparer: kɛlɛ. 1 • Nom. indicum.
contradiction, discorde, litige, désaccord,
bɛnɛjɔn [ɛ̀-ɛ̀] Nom. espèce de plante; kind of plant;
mésentente, dissension, conflit; contradiction,
discord, dissension, dispute; Widerspruch, Pflanze (Art). Category: Grass, herb, vine.
Uneinigkeit, Dissonanz, Zwist, Kontroverse.
phyllanthus amarus / niruri.
2 • Verbe. diviser, désunir, brouiller; divide, bɛnɛn Nom. étage, terrasse, toit; floor, terrace, roof;
break up, to fall out; sich spalten, verfeinden, oberes Stockwerk, Terrasse, Dach.
entzweien.
29/01/2026 38

bɛnɛsinɛ bɛteravu
bɛnɛsinɛ [ɛ̀-ɛ̀] Nom. herbe (espèce); grass (species); bɛrɛ [ɛ̀-ɛ́] Variant: bɛlɛ. Nom. caillou; stone; Stein.
2
Gras (Art). Category: Grass, herb, vine. Category: Land.
sesamum alatum.
bɛrɛ [ɛ̀-ɛ́] Nom. mesure, proportion; measure,
3
bɛnɛtulu
proportion; Mass, Verhältnis,
comparer: tigɛtulu.[ɛ̀-ɛ ̀-ú-ú] Morphemes: bɛ Grössenverhältnis, Proportion. muso bɛrɛ ye
nɛ-tulu. Nom. huile de sésame; sesame oil; naani ye... cɛ bɛrɛ ye saba ye. la mesure de la
Sesam Öl. Category: Types of food. femme, c'est quatre, la mesure de l'homme
bɛngɛbalobin [ɛ ́-ɛ́-á-ó-ĩ́] Nom. fourrage; fodder;
c'est trois. the measure of a woman is four, the
measure of a man is three. Das Maß einer Frau
Viehfutter, Heu. Category: Agriculture.
ist vier, das Maß eines Mannes ist drei.
bɛnhakɛ [ɛ ̀-á-ɛ́] synonyme: sumahakɛ. Nom. bɛrɛbɛn [ɛ̀-ɛ́-ɛ̀] Verbe. harmoniser, mettre à la bonne
proportion; proportion; Proportion.
mesure, adapter, conformer; harmonise, put to
bɛnkan [ɛ ̀-ã́] Morphemes: bɛn-kan. Nom. accord, good measure, adapt, conform; harmonisieren,
in einem guten Mass, anpassen, angleichen.
contrat (oral), consensus, unanimité, décision,
solution; agreement, oral contract, unanimity, bɛrɛbɛrɛ Adverbe. vrai, véritable, pur, beaucoup, très;
1
decision, solution; Einverständnis,
real, really, pure, much, very; wirklich, echt,
Abmachung (mündlich), Übereinkommen,
rein, viel, sehr.
Einmütigkeit, Entscheidung.
synonyme: kanbɛn. bɛrɛbɛrɛ 2 [ɛ̀-ɛ̀] Verbe. bien cuire et garder propre,
cuire longuement; cook well and keep clean,
bɛnkansɛbɛ variante: bɛnsɛbɛ. n.comp. contrat,
cook for a long time; gut kochen und sauber
accord écrit, convention, traité; written halten, lange kochen.
contract, agreement; Vertrag, Abkommen.
bɛrɛkuru [ɛ̀-ɛ̀-ú-ú] variante: kabakuru. n.comp.
bɛnkola Morphemes: bɛn-ko-la. Nom. accord,
caillou; stone; Stein.
arrangement, complot; agreement,
bɛrɛma- Nom. ce qui convient, ce qui suffit, ce qui est
arrangement, plot; Abkommen, Übereinkunft,
Komplott. en proportion; what is appropriate, what is
sufficient, what is in proportion; angemessen,
bɛnni Emprunt de : français. Nom. camion benne;
ausreichend, verhältnismäßig. Nin de ye n
dump truck; Muldenkipper, Kipper,
bɛrɛmata ye. Ceci me convient. This suits me.
Kipplastwagen. Category: Travel.
Das paßt zu mir.
bɛnnin bɛ ... ma synonyme: bɛnnin ... ma, bi bɛn
bɛrɛmakɛɲɛ synonyme: dakɛɲɛ. Nom. équivalence;
... ma. expr. équivaut à; to amount to, to be
equivalence; Gleichwertigkeit.
equal with; gleichwertig mit, gleich sein.
Category: Mathematics. synonyme: dakɛɲɛ.
Category: Mathematics.
bɛnnin lo juste; right; richtig. synonyme: ka ɲi, ten
bɛrɛnin
1
synonyme: mananbɛlɛ. Nom. fronde;
slingshot; Steinschleuder. Category: Tool.
don.
synonyme: bɛlɛnin.
bɛnŋini [ɛ ̀-í-í] Nom. conciliation; conciliation;
bɛrɛnin bambara: bɛlɛnin. Nom. appendice
Versöhnung.
2
vermiculaire; vermiform appendix;
bɛnsɛbɛn [ɛ̀] Nom. accord écrit; written agreement; Wurmfortsatz. Category: Body.
schriftliche Vereinbarung. bɛsɛ Nom. personne coquette, élégante; stylish
bɛnyɔrɔ [ɛ̀-ɔ́-ɔ́] Nom. lieu de rencontre; meeting person, well dressed; stilvolle Person, elegant
place; Versammlungsort, Treffpunkt. gekleidet.
bɛrɛ [ɛ-́ ɛ́] Adverbe. très, beaucoup, bon, bien, de bɛsɛnkoniya Nom. mesquinerie, méchanceté
1
valeur, de qualité, assez, véritable, vrai; a lot, provoquée par la jalousie; pettiness, nastiness
good, valuable, of good quality, very, real; caused by jealousy; Kleinlichkeit, Gemeinheit,
viel, viele, gut, wertvoll, wirklich. N ma se ka verursacht durch Eifersucht.
tiga bɛrɛ dan. Je n’ai pas pu semer beaucoup bɛsɛya synonyme: saniya. variante: bɛɛsɛya. Nom.
d’arachides. I was not able to plant a lot of hygiène, propreté, salubrité, coquetterie;
peanuts. Ich konnte nicht viele Erdnüsse hygiene, cleanness, salubrity; Hygiene,
pflanzen. Sanji nana dɔɔnin bi, bɛrɛ tɛ. Il a Sauberkeit, Reinheit. synonyme: lariweli.
plu un peu aujourd’hui, mais pas beaucoup.
bɛteravu Emprunt de : français. Nom. betterave; beet,
Some rain fell today, not much. Es hat heute
ein bisschen geregnet, aber nicht viel. beetroot; Bete, Rande. Category: Food.
29/01/2026 39

bɛtɛrɛ bibi
bɛtɛrɛ [ɛ]̀ Verbe. raccommoder, rapiécer; mend, patch; bi ... fɛ comparer: fɛ , bi ... fɛ.[í... ɛ̀] expr. aimer,
2 1 1
reparieren, flicken. vouloir; like, want, love; lieben, mögen,
bi [í] bambara: bɛ. variante: be, bɛ. aux. wollen. P bi X fɛ. P aime/veut X. P likes/wants
1
X. P liebt / mag X. I bi mun fɛ ? Qu’est-ce que
marqueur de l'habituel ou action progressive
(suivi de verbe+-ra /-la /-na); Marker for tu veux/aimes ? What do you want/like? Was
habitual or progressive action; Marker für möchtest du gerne? N bi kini ni sogo fɛ.
fortlaufende oder gewohnheitsmäßige J’aime/je veux le riz et la viande. I like/want
Handlung. Musa bi bɔra. Moussa est en train rice and meat. Ich will Reis und Fleisch. N b’a
de sortir. Moussa is going out. Moussa ist am fɛ ka taga lɔgɔ la. Je veux aller au marché. I
Ausgehen. Lɔgɔfiyɛ be min? Où est le want to go to the market. Ich will auf den
marché? Where is the market? Wo ist der Markt gehen. An b’a fɛ ka saki san. Nous
Markt? synonyme: bɛ. voulons acheter un sac. We want to buy a bag.
bi [ì] synonyme: kunu, sini. Adverbe. Wir wollen einen Sack kaufen. Awa t’a fɛ ka
2
taga dugu kɔnɔ. Awa ne veut pas aller en
aujourd'hui, à présent, de nos jours,
ville. Awa does not want to go into town. Awa
actuellement, maintenant; today, now,
nowadays, currently, now; heute, jetzt, will nicht in die Stadt gehen. Jeneba tun t’a
heutzutage, derzeit, jetzt. A nana bi. Il est fɛ. Jeneba ne l’aimait pas. Jeneba didn’t like it.
venu aujourd'hui. He came today. Er ist heute Jeneba hatte es nicht gerne.
gekommen. synonyme: bilama, bii bii nin na, bi ... -la expr. en train de ; be doing; am machen. A bi
bibi
3
.
tagala. Il est en train de partir. . He is in the
bi variante: be. localisation; indicates location; process of going away. Er ist am weggehen.
3
Ort Anzeiger. Banba biji ra. Le caïman est bi bɛn expr. égale; equal; gleich, gleichwertig,
dans l'eau. The crocodile is in the water. Das gleichen. synonyme: ka kan, ni ... ye kelen ye.
1
Krokodil ist im Wasser.
bi bɛn joli ma synonyme: ye joli ye. expr. égale
bi [î] Nom. dizaine (uniquement de 30 à 90); tens
4
combien; equals how much; ist wieviel.
(only from 30 to 90); Zehner (nur von 30 bis
Category: Mathematics.
90). bisaba trente. thirty. dreißig.
bi tile tariku expr. histoire contemporaine;
bi ... bolo [í ... ó-ó] expr. avoir, posséder; have,
contemporary history, modern history, current
possess, own; haben, besitzen. X bɛ P bolo. P history ; Zeitgeschichte, zeitgenössische
a / possède X. P has/owns X. P hat/besitzt X. Geschichte, gegenwärtige Geschichte,
Fanta furulen don, den saba b’a bolo. Fanta neuzeitliche Geschichte.
est mariée et elle a trois enfants. Fanta is bibabi [í-à-í] Nom. bruit produit par le
married with three children. Fanta hat
bourdonnement des insectes; noise produced
geheiratet und sie hat drei Kinder. synonyme: bi
by the buzzing of insects; Lärm, der durch das
... fɛ 1 . Summen von Insekten entsteht.
bi ... fɛ comparer: fɛ , bi ... fɛ.[í... ɛ̀] expr. avoir, Bibata [í-á-à] Emprunt de : arabe. n.pro. Prénom de
1 1 2
posséder; have, possess, own; haben, besitzen. femme; first name of a woman; Vorname für
X bi P fɛ. P a/possède X. P has/owns X. P eine Frau.
hat/besitzt X. Buuru b’i fɛ wa ? Est-ce que tu bibi [í-ì] Nom. termite ailée, éphémère; winged
1
as du pain ? Do you have any bread? Hast du termite; beflügelte Termite, Eintagsfliege.
Brot? synonyme: bi ... bolo. Category: Insect.
bibi [ì] Verbe. 1 • tâter, prendre en tâtonnant; feel an
2
touch, take fumbling; tasten, tastend nehmen.
2 • prendre, s'emparer de , attraper; take, seize,
catch; nehmen, ergreifen, fangen.
bibi [ì] Nom. au jour d'aujourd'hui; today; heute.
3
synonyme: bi .
2
bibi [í] Nom. autour, buse (terme général);
4
goshawk, buzzard; Habicht, Bussard.
Category: Bird.
29/01/2026 40

bibiliyotɛki bila
bibiliyotɛki See main entry: biin [ĩ́] variante: bin. Nom. herbe (terme général);
sɛbɛmarabon.[í-í-í-ó-ɛ́-í] Emprunt de grass in general, weed; Gras. Bin jugu.
: français. variante: sɛbɛbondo. Nom. Mauvaise herbe. Weed. Unkraut.
bibliothèque; library; Bibliothek, Bücherei. Category: Grass, herb, vine.
Category: Learn. synonyme: liburumarayɔrɔ. biiw ka soo Nom. colonne des dizaines; column of the
bibɔrɔn [í-ɔ́-ɔ ́] Emprunt de : français. tens; Zehner Kolonne.
variante: biberon. Nom. biberon; feeding
Category: Mathematics.
bottle; Schoppen, Saugflasche. Bijan [í-ã̀] Variant: Abijan. n.pro. Abidjan; Abidjan;
Category: Container. Abidjan. Category: City.
bibɔrɔnda [í] synonyme: sinda. Nom. tétine; pacifier, biki [í-í] Emprunt de : français. Nom. bic, stylo
baby's dummy; Schnuller. bille; bic, ballpoint pen; Kugelschreiber.
bibulu [í-ú-ú] Emprunt de : français. Nom. Bible; Category: Tool. synonyme: sɛbɛnnikɛlan 2 .
Bible; Bibel. biko [ì] comparer: lonko. Nom. aujourd'hui (dans
biden [ì] Nom. gens d'aujourd'hui, enfant des formes négatives avec le sens de 'il y a
longtemps que'); today (in negative forms with
irrespectueux; today's people, disrespectful
child; Leute von heute, respektloses Kind.
the meaning of 'a long time ago'); heute (in
Negativformen mit der Bedeutung „vor langer
bidonla [í-ṍ-á] variante: bidonna. Nom. buteur, Zeit“). synonyme: bilama.
attaquant; striker; Torschütze.
bikɔnɔntɔn [í-ɔ̀-ɔ ̀-ɔ ́] num. quatre-vingt dix, nonante
bidonyɔrɔ Nom. surface de but; goal area; Torraum.
(90); ninety (90); neunzig.
biduuru [í-úú-ú] num. cinquante (50); fifty (50); Category: Mathematics.
fünfzig. Category: Mathematics. bila 1 [ì-à] vt. 1 • lâcher, laisser, mettre, placer, poser,
synonyme: kɛmɛtila. déposer, abandonner, cesser; put down, let go
of, leave, release, place, abandon, cease;
bife Emprunt de : français. Nom. buffet; sideboard,
ablegen, hinstellen, abstellen, loslassen,
dresser; Geschirrschrank, Buffet.
verlassen, aufhören. O bila. I ka na ! Laisse ça
Category: Household equipment.
et viens ! Leave that and come! Laß das und
bigan [í-ã́] Nom. animal; animal; Tier. komm! U bɛ lakɔli bila ka baara kɛ. Ils
bigaramu Emprunt de : français.
quittent l’école pour aller travailler. They give
up school to go to work. Sie verlassen die
synonyme: dekagaramu. Nom. décagramme;
Schule und gehen arbeiten. X bila kɛrɛ fɛ
decagram; Dekagramm, Dezigramm.
laisser X à côté. leave X aside. X auf der Seite
Category: Mathematics.
liegen lassen.
bigi [í] Verbe. jaillir; gush forth, burst out; 2 • entraîner, provoquer, inciter à, pousser à,
herausspritzen, ausbrechen. Tasuma bigira amener à; cause, provoke, incite; verursachen,
ka wuli. Le feu a jailli. The fire burst out. Das aufstacheln. Soso bɛ sumayabana bila mɔgɔ
Feuer brach aus. la. Des moustiques donnent le paludisme aux
gens. Mosquitoes give malaria to people.
bii [í] Emprunt de : français. variante: bi. Nom.
1 Moskitos verursachen Malaria Fieber.
but; goal; Tor. A ye bi kelen don. Il a marqué Faantanya bi mɔgɔ bila yɛrɛfaga la. La
un but. He scored a goal. Er hat ein Tor
pauvreté provoque des gens à se donner la
geschossen. synonyme: kuru 3 . mort. Poverty drives people to suicide. Die
bii [ì] variante: bi. Nom. 1 • aujourd'hui; today; Armut verursacht Selbstmord.
2
heute. synonyme: bii bii nin na, bilama.
3 • accompagner; accompany; begleiten. N bi
taa i bila so. Je vais t’accompagner à la
2 • présent, de nos jours, actuellement,
maison. I will accompany you home. Ich werde
maintenant, à présent; at present, in our days,
dich heim begleiten.
nowadays; gegenwärtig, in unserer Zeit,
heutzutage. 4 • rater, manquer; miss; verfehlen.
bii 3 [í] Nom. vrombissement, bourdonnement bila 2 [ì] Nom. pagne des enfants in-circoncis,
d'insecte; humming, roar, whirr, zooming; cache-sexe; loincloth of uncircumcised
Dröhnen, Brummen. children, cover-up; Lendenschurz
unbeschnittener Kinder, traditionelle
bii bii nin na variante: bi bi nin na. expr. de nos
Unterwäsche. Category: Clothing.
jours, actuellement; nowadays; heutzutage,
gegenwärtig. synonyme: sisan , bi , bii .
1 2 2
29/01/2026 41

bilabila bilasirali
bilabila [ì-á-ì-à] Verbe. disposer (en tas), entasser, bilama [ì-à-á] Nom. au jour d'aujourd'hui,
accumuler; pile up in piles, heap up; auflegen, d'aujourd'hui, dans l'état actuel; nowadays;
aufschichten, Häufchen machen. heutzutage. Hawa kɔni bilama... Quant à
bilakasuma Nom. report, repris, ajournement, Hawa à présent.... As for Hawa now.... Was
jetzt Hawa betrifft... synonyme: biko, bi, bii .
temporisation, perdre du temps; adjournment, 2 2
transfer, ; Vertagung, Aufschub, bilan Nom. membre de la belle-famille; member of
Verschiebung.
the in-law family, in-laws; Verwandter,
bilako Nom. comportement, conduite, manière d'agir; Verwandte. Category: Kinship.
behaviour; Benehmen. bilanbara [à-à] Morphemes: bila-n-bara. Verbe.
bilakojugu Nom. personne au mauvais confier (du bétail); entrust (livestock);
comportement, vaurien; bad behaviour; anvertrauen (Vieh). A ka misiw bɛɛ
schlechtes Verhalten. Category: Language bilanbara. Toutes ses vaches m'ont été
and thought. confiées. All his cows were entrusted to me.
bilakojuguya Morphemes: bilako-jugu-ya. Verbe. Alle seine Kühe wurden mir anvertraut.
mal s'occuper de quelque chose, mal ranger, bilanin synonyme: sitɔki. Nom. stock; stock, store,
mauvais comportement; taking care of storage; Vorrat, Lagerhaltung.
something badly, tidying up badly, bad Category: Agriculture.
behaviour; sich schlecht um etwas kümmern,
schlecht aufräumen, schlechtes Benehmen.
bilankɔrɔ
1
Nom. épargner, poser à côté, mettre en
réserve (d'argent ou de mil), prévoyance;
bilakoro [ì-à-ó-ó] Nom. jeune garçon, pas encore
savings, reserves, stock; Ersparnisse,
circoncis, garçon in-circoncis; young boy, not Reserven. Bilankɔrɔ tɛ mɔgɔ ɲaa gan. Poser
yet circumcised; junger Knabe, der noch nicht
à côté ne fait souffrir personne. (Proverbe). To
beschnitten ist, unbeschnittener Knabe.
have some savings doesn't hurt anybody.
Category: Person.
(proverb). Ersparnisse zu haben tut wohl
bilakoroma adj. in-circoncis; uncircumcised; keinem weh. (Sprichwort). Category: Finance,
unbeschnitten. synonyme: bolokobali.
Agriculture.
bilankɔrɔ Morphemes: bila-n-kɔrɔ. n.comp. épargne,
bilakoromuso Nom. fille non excisée (injure); 2
précaution, réserve; savings, precaution;
uncircumcised girl (insult); unbeschnittenes
Ersparnis, Vorsorge, Vorrat.
Mädchen (Beleidigung).
Category: Finance.
bilakoronin Nom. bambin; tot, a small child;
bilansimɛ [ì-à] Nom. obligation, obligatoire,
Kleinkind. Category: Person.
évidemment; obligation, obligatory,
bilakoroya [ì-à-ò-ò-á] Morphemes: bilakoro-ya. obviously; Verpflichtung, offensichtlich
Nom. enfance (pour un garçon, avant obligatorisch.
circoncision); childhood, boyhood, age when bilaɲɔgɔn [ì-à-ɔ́-ɔ́] Morphemes: bila-ɲɔgɔn. Nom.
the boy is not yet circumcised; Kindheit, Alter,
compagnon, compagne; companion, partner,
in dem der Junge noch nicht beschnitten ist.
fellow; Begleiter, Partner, Gefährte.
synonyme: denmisɛnya.
synonyme: faraɲɔgɔnma.
bilakun [ì] Nom. raison d'être, devoir, tâche, rôle (pour
bilaɲɔnna [ì-à-ɔ̀-ɔ̀] Nom. mésentente, désaccord,
un animal); mainspring, purpose, role (for an
différend; disagreement, dispute;
animal); Daseinsberechtigung, Zweck,
Meinungsverschiedenheit, Streit.
Aufgabe, Pflicht, Rolle (für ein Tier),
Aufgabe. Misimuso bilakun ye nɔnɔbadi. Le bilasira [ì-à-í-á] Verbe. accompagner, mettre sur la
rôle d'une vache, c'est de donner beaucoup de route, aider, épauler, conseiller; accompany;
lait. The role of a cow is to give lots of milk. begleiten. N bilasira lɔgɔ ra.
Die Aufgabe einer Kuh besteht darin, viel Accompagne-moi au marché. Accompany me
Milch zu geben. to the market. Begleite mich zum Markt.
bilalan Morphemes: bila-lan. Nom. récipient, tout synonyme: madɛmɛ.
contenant; container, any container; Behälter. bilasirabaga [ì-à-ì-à] n.comp. accompagnateur,
Category: Container.
conseiller; accompanist, counsellor, advisor;
bilali [ì-à-í] Nom. natte en tige de mil, natte en Begleiter, Berater.
général; mat; Matte. synonyme: dɛbɛn. bilasirali [ì-à-ì-à-í] Nom. accompagnement;
accompaniment; Begleitung.
29/01/2026 42

bilasiralila bin
bilasiralila bilengwan variante: bilengan. Nom. fournaise,
[ì-à-ì-à-ì-á] Morphemes: bila-sira-li-la. guerre; furnace, war; Ofen, Krieg.
Nom. celui qui vous accompagne une petite bilenman adj. rouge, roux; red, reddish; rot, rötlich.
partie d’un trajet avant de dire au revoir;
person who accompanies you part of the way bilenya [ì-è] Verbe. 1 • rougir; get red, redden; rot
to send you off on a journey; Begleiter für eine werden.
kleine Wegstrecke bevor man sich 2 • rougeur, teinte rouge; redness; Röte.
verabschiedet. Category: colour.
bilayi [ì] Emprunt de : arabe. interj. au nom de Dieu! bilenyaraka Nom. branchettes du faux ébénier;
(pour prêter serment, pour prendre quelqu'un à branches of the false ebony tree; Zweige des
témoin de quelque chose qu'on affirme falschen Ebenholzbaums. Category: Parts of a
solennellement); in the name of God! (to take plant. prosopis africana.
an oath, to call someone to witness for
bili comparer: biri.[í-í] vt. 1 • couvrir; cover, roof;
something that one solemnly affirms); im 1 1
Namen Gottes! (einen Eid leisten, jemanden decken.
zum Zeugen von etwas rufen, das man 2 • toiture, terrasse, pont, charpente; roof,
feierlich bekräftigt). Bilayi ! Nin tɛ tiɲɛ ye ! terrace, bridge; Dach, Terrasse, Brücke.
Au nom de Dieu ! c'est faux ! In the name of bili Nom. éphémère, termite ailée; mayfly,
God! This is false! Im Namen Gottes! Das ist
2
ephemera, winged termite; Eintagsfliege,
falsch!
Termite mit Flügel. Category: Insect.
bilayɔrɔ See main entry: sigiyɔrɔ. n.comp. synonyme: nbili.
emplacement; site; Aufstellungsort.
bili Nom. toiture, terrasse, pont, charpente, poutre;
3
bilen [ì-é] 1 • adj. couleur rouge, brun, jaune,
1 roof, terrace, bridge, framework, beam, rafter;
couleur éclatante; red, brown, yellow color; Bedachung, Terrasse, Brücke, Gebälk, Träger,
Farben im Bereich von: rot, braun, gelb. Dachbalken.
Category: colour.
bilidozɛri Emprunt de : français. Nom. bulldozer;
2 • Verbe. rougir, être rouge, mûrir; redden,
bulldozer; Bulldozer.
ripen; rot werden reifen.
bilisi Emprunt de : arabe. Nom. démon, diable;
bilen variante: belen. part. ne plus, cependant,
2
demon, devil; Dämon, Teufel.
pourtant, contraste, (marque de
synonyme: sitanɛ.
anhypothétique négatif); not any more, no
longer, however, yet, contrast,; nicht mehr, bilisiɲama [ì-ì] Morphemes: bilisi-ɲama. Nom.
jedoch noch, Gegensatz, I man jugu bilen. Tu
dermatose; dermatosis; Dermatose.
n'es plus méchant. You are not nasty any more. Category: Disease.
Du bist nicht mehr böse.
biliso [í] Nom. maison à toit en terrasse; house with a
bilen [ì] Nom. important, grave, violent; important,
3 flat roof; Flachdachhaus. Category: Building.
serious, violent; wichtig, ernst, gewalttätig.
bilitiri Emprunt de : français. synonyme: dekalitiri.
Nege bilen o bilen, don dɔ a na suma. Si
Nom. décalitre; decilitre; Dekaliter.
violent que soit le désir, il va s'apaiser.
(proverbe). However violent the desire, it will
Category: Mathematics.
subside. (proverb). So heftig das Verlangen bimɛtɛrɛ synonyme: dekamɛtɛrɛ. Nom. décamètre;
auch sein mag, es wird nachlassen.
decametre; Dekameter. =10 m
(Sprichwort).
Category: Mathematics.
bilen [í] variante: dilen. Nom. mouche; fly; Fliege.
4 bin [í] variante: biin. Nom. herbe (terme général);
1
Category: Insect. synonyme: bele .
1 grass, weed (general term); Gras
bilenba [í] variante: dilenba. Nom. grosse mouche (allgemeiner Begriff). Category: Grass, herb,
bleue; big blue fly; große blaue Fliege.
vine.
Category: Insect. bin [ì] variante: bi, ben. 1 • Verbe. tomber, faire
2
bilenda [ì-è] Nom. rougeur, partie rouge, couleur tomber, terrasser; to fall, to bring down; fallen,
stürzen. synonyme: ben.
rouge; redness, red part, red colour; Rötung, 1
roter Anteil, rote Farbe. Category: colour. 2 • Verbe. agresser, attaquer; assault, attack;
bilendunkɔnɔnin [í] Nom. gobe-mouche;
angreifen.
3 • Verbe. enlever, supprimer, perdre, diminuer,
flycatcher; Fliegenfänger. Category: Bird.
baisser; remove, delete, lose, diminish,
muscicapa sp.. synonyme: dilendunkɔnɔnin.
decrease; entfernen, löschen, verlieren,
verringern.
29/01/2026 43

bina binkɛnɛyɔrɔ
4 • Verbe. mourir (terme respectueux); die bingwɛ Nom. foin; hay; Heu. Category: Animal
(respectful term); sterben (respektvoller
husbandry. synonyme: binjɛ, binɲaga.
Begriff).
5 • Verbe. se coucher (astre); to go down (star); binimana [ì-ì] variante: binibana. Verbe. mettre
untergehen (Stern). entre, mettre à travers, croiser; to put between,
6 • Verbe. ouvrir, défricher (un champ); open, to put through, to cross; dazwischen legen,
clear (a field); Feld räumen. quer legen, überqueren.
7 • Nom. accusation, agression, perte; binimini [ì-ì] Verbe. rouler sur soi, se contorsionner,
1
accusation, assault, loss; Anklage,
se tordre, se tortiller; roll over, contort oneself,
Körperverletzung, Verlust.
twist, squirm; sich umdrehen, verrenken,
bina [í-à] comparer: tina. variante: bena, bɛna. drehen, winden.
aux. marque du futur affirmatif; affirmative binimini [ì-ì] variante: fofota. Nom. python; python;
2
future marker, will; Futur Marker, wird,
Python. Category: Snake. python sebae.
werden, Zukunftsmarker. An bɛna bɔ. Nous
synonyme: saba , miniɲandonso.
2
sortirons. We will go out. Wir werden
rausgehen. synonyme: bɛna. binin [í] Nom. citronnelle; lemon-grass;
Zitronengras. Category: Grass, herb, vine.
binaa [í] variante: binɔgɔ. Nom. titre de respect
cymbopogon citratus. synonyme: ditebin,
donné aux hommes égaux du père, frère cadet
bindute.
du père; title of respect given to equal men of
the father, younger brother of the father; bininji [í] Nom. infusion de citronnelle; lemon tea,
Ehrentitel für gleichberechtigte Männer des
lemon-grass infusion; Zitronentee,
Vaters, jüngerer Bruder des Vaters.
Zitronengras-Aufguss. Category: Types of
synonyme: mina 2 , na 4 . food.
binaakɛ [í] variante: ninaacɛ. Nom. oncle maternel, binjalan [ĩ́-à-ã́] Nom. paille; straw; Stroh.
oncle paternel; maternal uncle, paternal uncle;
binjalandanni Nom. vannerie; basket-making;
Onkel mütterlicherseits, Onkel
väterlicherseits. Category: Kinship.
Flechtarbeit, Korbflechterei.
binaani [í-á-í] num. quarante (40); forty (40); vierzig binjalanla Nom. paillage; soil mulching; Abdeckung
(40). Category: Mathematics. der Bodenoberfläche. Category: Agriculture.
binakun [ì-à] variante: banakun. Nom. seuil (relevé) binjankongo [í-á-ó-ó] Nom. savane; Savannah;
de la porte; threshold (raised) of the door; Savanne. Category: Land.
Schwelle (erhöht) der Tür. Category: Building. binjɛ [í] Nom. foin, couleur blanc sale; hay, dirty
binbilen [í] Nom. graminées rouges; reddish herbs; white color; Heu, schmutzigweiße Farbe.
rötliche Gräser. Category: Grass, herb, vine. synonyme: binɲaga, bingwɛ.
hyparrhenia rufa, schizachyrium pulchellum, binkanni [ì-à] Nom. agression, viol, brigandage,
elyonurus elegans, andropogon africanus.
banditisme; assault, rape, banditry, banditry;
binbiri [ĩ̀-ì-í] comparer: keninge, kende, kene. Körperverletzung, Vergewaltigung,
variante: binbirin. Nom. sorgho; sorghum; Banditentum, Aggression.
Sorghum. Category: Food, Grass, herb, vine. binkannikɛla [ì-à-ì-ɛ̀] Nom. agresseur, violeur,
sorghum gambicum.
bandit, brigand; aggressor, rapist, bandit,
binbiriwulen n.comp. sorgho rouge; red sorghum; brigand; Angreifer, Vergewaltiger, Bandit,
roter Sorghum. Category: Food, Grass, herb, Räuber. synonyme: jadɔ, musoson.
vine.
binkawuli [ì-à] Nom. succès et échec, hauts et bas;
bindirima Nom. espèce d'herbacée; kind of grass; success and failure, ups and downs; Erfolg
Grasart. Category: Grass, herb, vine. und Misserfolg, Höhen und Tiefen. Mɔgɔya ye
echinochloa colona. binkawuli ye. La vie est faite des hauts et des
bindute [í] Nom. citronnelle; lemon-grass; bas. Life is full of ups and downs. Das Leben
Zitronengras. Category: Grass, herb, vine.
ist voller Höhen und Tiefen.
cymbopogon citratus. synonyme: binin. binkɛnɛman
binfagalan [ĩ̀-á-á-ã́] Morphemes: bin-faga-lan. [ĩ́-ɛ́-ɛ́-ã́] Morphemes: bin-kɛnɛ-man.
Nom. désherbant, herbicide; weed killer; variante: binkɛnɛ, binkɛnɛma, binkɛnɛlama.
Herbizid, Unkrautvernichter. n adj. vert; green; grün. Category: colour.
Category: Agriculture. binkɛnɛyɔrɔ [í] Nom. prairie; grassland;
Graslandschaft. Category: Land.
29/01/2026 44

binkɔnɔmɔgɔ biri
binkɔnɔmɔgɔ biɲɛ [ì-ɛ́] Nom. alène, poinçon; awl, punch; Ahle,
4
comparer: kongokɔnɔmɔgɔ.[ĩ́-ɔ́-ɔ́-ɔ́-ɔ́] n.co Punze. Category: Tool.
mp. villageoise; villager; Dorfbewohner. biɲɛ [í] Nom. sans sauce (pour un plat de base);
5
Category: Person.
without sauce; ohne Sauce. To biɲɛ. Tô sans
binlakarilan Nom. parachute; parachute; Fallschirm. sauce. Porridge without sauce. Hirsebrei ohne
synonyme: benlakarilan. Sauce.
binma [í] Nom. vert (couleur), qui contient de l'herbe; biɲɛjan [ì-ɛ̀-á] Nom. javelot; spear, javelin; Speer;
green (color), which contains grass; grün Speerwurf.
(Farbe), das Gras enthält. biɲɛkala [á] variante: biɲɛkalama, biɲɛkalamanin.
binmayɔrɔ Nom. endroit herbeux; place with grass; Nom. brochette de foie; liver skewer;
grasige Stelle. Leberspieß. Category: Types of food.
binnataa [í] Morphemes: bin-na-taa. Nom. biɲɛkisɛ [ĩ́-ɛ́] variante: biɲɛ. Nom. flèche; arrow;
défection, fait d'aller à la selle; defection, Pfeil. biɲɛkisɛ bon tirer un flèche. shoot an
going to the stool; Stuhlgang, auf den Stuhl arrow. eine Pfeil schießen. synonyme: biɲɛ ,
1
gehen. A bɛ binnataa ni sugunɛ kɛ ... Il kalabiɲɛ.
défèque et il urine ... He defecates and
urinates... Er hat Stuhlgang und Urin...
biɲɛkolo [í] Nom. corne, antenne; horn, antenna;
Horn, Antenne.
binnibana [ì-ì] variante: bennibana, bilibana.
Nom. épilepsie; epilepsy; Epilepsie.
biɲɛma [ì-ɛ̀] adj. pointu; pointed, with a sharp point;
Category: Disease. synonyme: kirikirimasyɛn, spitz, scharf, zugespitzt, spitzig.
takabin, warabilenɲama, ncikunbaɲama, biɲɛnɛgɛ [ì-ɛ̀] Nom. pointe, clou; nail; Nagel.
serikaja, wulikabin, banaba,
bira [í] Adverbe. bruit de chute, badaboum, vlan;
talonkabinbana, warawulenɲama.
sound of falling, wham!; Geräusch des Fallens.
binɲaga Nom. foin; hay; Heu. synonyme: binjɛ, A binna bira ! Il est tombé, vlan ! He fell,
bingwɛ. wham! Er ist gefallen, plump!
binɲimi [í] Nom. poisson herbivore; grass-eater fish; birabira [í] variante: burabura. Adverbe. en grande
Grasfresserfisch. Category: Fish. distichodus
quantité (fruits mûrs, bourgeonnement); in
rostratus.
large quantities (ripe fruits, budding); in
großen Mengen (reife Früchte, Knospen). Jiri
binɲimila Nom. herbivore; herbivorous animal;
bɛ nugu birabira. L'arbre est en pleine
Grasfresser.
bourgeonnement. The tree is in full bud. Der
binɲiminlaw Nom. herbivores; herbivore; Baum steht in voller Knospe.
Pflanzenfresser. Category: Food, Mammal. birancɛ See main entry: burancɛ.[ú-ã́-ɛ́] Nom.
binsɛgɛ Nom. espèce de plante; kind of plant; beau-père; father-in-law; Schwiegervater.
Pflanzenart. Category: Grass, herb, vine. Category: Kinship.
striga asiatica. biri comparer: bili .[í-í] vt. couvrir, tatouer, faire
1 1
binsiri [í] Nom. gerbe, botte d'herbes; bundle of grass, des marques sur le corps; cover, tattoo, make
tuft of herbs; Grasbündel, Garbe. marks on the body; decken, zudecken,
tätowieren, Spuren am Körper hinterlassen.
bintu
1
[ĩ́-ú] Nom. 1 • savane; Savannah; Savanne.
Category: Adornment.
Category: Land.
biri comparer: jan .[í-í] Verbe. 1 • se courber
2 • buisson; shrub, bush; Busch, Strauch.
2 1
Category: Bush, shrub.
(touchant la terre), avoir ou mettre la face vers
le sol, baisser, renverser; bend over, facing the
bintu 2 [í] Nom. endroit touffu, bosquet; grove, copse, ground; sich beugen, sich verbeugen, neigen,
thicket; Hain, Dickicht. synonyme: tumayɔrɔ. verneigen (den Boden berühren), umkippen,
senken.
biɲɛ [ì-ɛ́] Nom. flèche, extrémité pointue, pointe;
1 2 • s'écrouler; collapse, fall down; einstürzen.
arrow, tip, peak; Pfeil, spitziger Gegenstand,
3 • couver, couvrir, recouvrir; hatch, cover;
Spitze. synonyme: biɲɛkisɛ, kalabiɲɛ.
brüten, zudecken, überdecken.
biɲɛ [í-ɛ́] Nom. foie; liver; Leber. Category: Body,
2
Parts of an animal.
biɲɛ [ì-ɛ́] Nom. corne; horn; Horn. Category: Parts
3
of an animal.
29/01/2026 45

biri birinti
biri [í-í] variante: bisi. vt. traire, presser (pour biribɔrɔ [ì-í-ɔ̀-ɔ́] Nom. de robe bicolore ou tricolore;
3 1
extraire); milk, press; melken, pressen. Muso two-tone or three-color dress; zweifarbig oder
bi misi biri. La femme trait la vache. The dreifarbig. wulu biribɔrɔ chien de robe
woman is milking the cow. Die Frau melkt die tachetée. spotted dog. gefleckter Hund.
Kuh. biribɔrɔ [í] Adverbe. très sale, dégoûtant, répugnant;
2
biri See main entry: biribon.[í-í] Nom. maison avec very dirty, disgusting; sehr schmutzig,
4
toit en terrasse ; house with flat mud roof; ekelhaft. synonyme: kotokoto.
Flachdach Haus. Category: Building. birifani comparer: dara .[í-í-á-í] Nom. couverture;
1
biri 5 [í-ì] Nom. pigeon (espèce), tourterelle; pigeon blanket, bed cover; Decke, Deckleintuch.
sp, turtle-dove; Taube (Art) , Turteltaube. synonyme: birifinin.
Category: Bird.
birifinin [í] Nom. couverture; blanket; Decke.
biri [ì] Nom. levure, ferment de la bière de mil;
6 synonyme: birifani.
yeast, millet beer ferment; Hefe,
Hirsebierferment. synonyme: fununnan, biri-ka-dumuni-kɛ Nom. héron noir; black heron;
buurufununan. schwarzer Reiher. Category: Bird.
melanophoyx ardesiaca.
biri [ì] Nom. verrues, chéloïde, maladie chartérisée
7 birike [ì-ì-é] Emprunt de : français.
par l’irruption de gros boutons sur tout le
corps; warts, keloid, disease characterized by variante: birikɛti. Nom. briquet; (cigarette)
the outbreak of large pimples all over the lighter; Feuerzeug. Category: Tool.
body; Warzen, Krankheit, die durch das biriki [ì-ì-í] Emprunt de : français. Nom. brique;
Auftreten großer Pickel am ganzen Körper
brick; Backstein, Baustein. synonyme: tufa .
gekennzeichnet ist. Category: Disease. 1
biri [í] variante: birii. Adverbe. très noir, noir sale; birikibɔnan n.comp. moule à brique; mold to make
8
bricks; Backsteinform, Bausteinform.
very black, dirty black; sehr schwarz,
schmutzig schwarz. synonyme: si, miri, fin,
Category: Tool.
6 1
finnin. birili [í-í-í] synonyme: buguli, kilikanlali. Nom.
couvaison; breeding, breeding season; Brut,
biribara [ì-ì] variante: borobara. Adverbe. tomber
1 Brutzeit.
d'une manière flasque, molle, amortie; to fall
in a limp; schlaff und abgefedert fallen. A
birilidaba comparer: dababa. grande houe; big hoe;
cunna bɔgɔ la biribara ! Il est tombé grosse Hacke. Category: Tool.
mollement dans la boue ! He fell limply into birimisi Morphemes: biri-misi. Nom. vache laitière;
the mud! Er fiel schlaff in den Schlamm! milk cow; Milchkuh. Category: Mammal,
biribara [ì-ì] variante: birikibaraka. Verbe. 1 • être Animal husbandry.
2
couvert, gris (pour le ciel, signe d'annonciateur birin [ì-í] Nom. tourterelle (espèce); turtle dove sp;
de la pluie); to be covered, grey (for the sky, a Turteltaube (Art). Category: Bird.
harbinger of rain); bedeckt sein, grau (für den synonyme: tuganin .
1
Himmel ein Vorbote des Regens).
Category: Weather. birinbirin Verbe. boursoufler, faire des bosses; blister,
2 • éparpiller, disperser, être en désordre; to make bumps; Blasen bilden, Beulen machen.
scatter, to disperse, to be in disorder; birindi [ì-ì-ì] Verbe. irriter; irritate; irritieren.
zerstreuen, in Unordnung sein.
birinkan Morphemes: biri-n-kan. Nom. protection,
biribiri [í] Verbe. cacher, couvrir, recouvrir; hide,
1
couverture; protection, cover, blanket; Schutz,
cover; verstecken, bedecken.
Decke, Deckung. Ala kan birinkan biri a n'a
biribiri 2 [í] variante: bidbidi. Adverbe. très vite, à juguw cɛ. Que Dieu vous protège de vos
toute allure; very quickly, at full speed; sehr ennemis. May God protect you from your
schnell, mit voller Geschwindigkeit. enemies. Möge Gott Sie vor Ihren Feinden
biribiriba Nom. pigeon de rôniers; kind of dove, beschützen.
speckled pigeon; Taubenart. Category: Bird. birinti [ì-ì] Verbe. 1 • contusionner, meurtrir;
columba guinea. synonyme: birintufa. contusion, bruise; Prellung, Bluterguss. A ye n
biribon [í-í-ṍ] Variant: biri. Nom. maison avec toit en bugɔ fo ka n bolo birinti. Il m'a frappé
terrasse; house with flat mud roof; Flachdach jusqu'à contusionner le bras. He hit me until
Haus. Category: Building. my arm was bruised. Er schlug mich, bis mein
Arm verletzt war.
29/01/2026 46

birintufa biyan
2 • boursoufler; blister; Blase bilden. 2 • abstrait, pensée, avis, supposition, soupçon;
birintufa synonyme: biribiriba, birintugan. Nom.
abstract, suspicion; abstrakt, Verdacht.
Bisigi bɛ feere, a tɛ den. Le soupçon fleurit,
pigeon des rôniers; speckled pigeon; Taube
mais il ne fructifie pas. Suspicion flourishes,
(Art). Category: Bird. columba guinea.
but it does not bear fruit. Der Verdacht blüht,
synonyme: biribiriba.
aber er trägt keine Früchte.
birisa [í] variante: bilisa. Verbe. emmêler, bisigi [ì-ì-ì] vt. supposer, imaginer, penser, croire, se
2
embrouiller, être en désordre, être touffu; to
douter de; suppose, imagine, think, believe,
tangle, to be in disorder, bushy (hair);
suspect; vermuten, annehmen, sich vorstellen,
verheddern, durcheinander anrichten, in
denken, glauben dass, vermuten.
Unordnung sein, buschige sein. A ye jago
bisigiya [í] 1 • Nom. hypothèse, représentation;
birisa. Il a embrouillé le marché. He confused
the market. Er verwirrte den Markt.
hypothesis, representation; Hypothese,
Annahme, Darstellung. synonyme: miiriya.
birisaɲagami [í] variante: bilisaɲagami. Nom.
2 • Verbe. classer, représenter, formaliser,
chose très embrouillée, pagaille, personne
caractériser, imaginer, estimer; classify , rank,
louche qui fait des choses embrouillées; very
categorize, represent, characterize, describe,
confusing thing, mess, shady person who does
imagine, estimate; einordnen, ordnen,
confusing things; sehr verwirrende Sache,
repräsentieren, darstellen, charakterisieren,
Chaos, zwielichtige Person, die verwirrende
beschreiben, vorstellen, schätzen.
Dinge tut. Kuma kɛra birisaɲagami ye. La
bisikabila Morphemes: bisi-ka-bila. Nom.
discussion est devenue confuse. The
discussion became confusing. Die Diskussion relâchement; relaxation; Entspannung.
wurde verwirrend. bisiki [í-í-í] Emprunt de : français. Nom. biscuit;
birisɛli supɔnpe Nom. choux de Bruxelles; Brussels biscuit; Biskuit, Keks. Category: Types of
sprouts; Rosenkohl. Category: Food. food.
biro comparer: baarakɛyɔrɔ.[ì-ó] Emprunt de bisimila [ì-ì-ì-à] Emprunt de : arabe. 1 • interj.
: français. Nom. 1 • bureau; office; Büro.
souhaiter la bienvenue; welcome;
Willkommen heissen. I bisimila ! Saha !
2 • bureau; desk; Schreibtisch.
Bienvenue ! Merci ! Welcome! Thanks!
Category: Household equipment.
Willkommen! Danke!
biro lakurayali Nom. renouvellement du bureau;
2 • vt. accueillir, recevoir quelqu’un; to
renewal of the board; Erneuerung des welcome; willkommen heissen, empfangen.
Vorstandes.
bisimilabaga comparer: kunbɛncogo. Nom.
bisaba [í-à-à] num. trente (30); thirty (30); dreissig,
protocole; protocol; Protokoll.
30. Category: Worker, occupation.
biseegi [í-é-í] variante: biseegin. num. quatre-vingt, bisimilayi [ì] interj. au nom de Dieu ! (exprime la
huitante (80); eighty (80); achtzig, 80. stupéfaction, l'admiration, l'approbation); in
Category: Mathematics. the name of God! (expresses amazement,
bisi Emprunt de : français. Nom. bus; bus; Bus. admiration, approval); im Namen Gottes!
1
(drückt Erstaunen, Bewunderung,
Category: Travel. synonyme: kariba.
Zustimmung aus).
bisi 2 [í] Verbe. presser, serrer, essorer; press, bitile [ì] Nom. époque actuelle, jour d'aujourd'hui, le
squeeze, tighten, spin, wring out; drücken,
jour même; current time, today, the same
auspressen, straffen, zusammendrücken,
day; aktuelle Zeit, heute, am selben Tag.
schleudern, aus-winden. ka finin bisi. essorer
biwolonfila variante: biwolonwula. num.
le linge. wring out the laundry. die Wäsche
auswringen. synonyme: jɔsɔn.
soixante-dix, septante (70); seventy (70);
siebzig, 70. Category: Mathematics.
bisigi [í-í-í] Nom. 1 • image, forme, silhouette,
1 biwolonwula variante: biwolonfila. num.
ressemblance; image, form, silhouette, figure,
soixante-dix, 70; seventy, 70; siebzig, 70.
shape, resemblance, likeness; Bild, Form,
Category: Mathematics.
Schattenriss, Ähnlichkeit. Ala ye Adama da a
yɛrɛ bisigi la. Dieu a créé Adam à son image.
biwɔɔrɔ num. soixante (60); sixty (60); sechzig, 60.
God made Adam in his own image. Gott schuf Category: Mathematics.
Adam in seinem Bilde. synonyme: hakililafɛn. biyan [ì] Verbe. se moquer, se ficher (populaire); to
1
make fun of (popular); sich über etwas lustig
machen, sich lustig machen (beliebt).
29/01/2026 47

biyan bojarafin
biyan [í] variante: biyanbiyan. Nom. copine, copain Bobo [ò-ó] Variant: Bobojulaso. n.pro.
2
(populaire); girlfriend, boyfriend (popular); Bobo-Dioulasso; Bobo-Dioulasso;
Freundin, Freund (beliebt). Bobo-Dioulasso. Category: City.
biye Nom. billet; ticket; Billett, Fahrkarte, boboduman synonyme: kababana dɔ. Nom.
Fahrschein. tɛrɛn biye billet de train. train candidose; thrush; Candidiasis.
ticket. Zugfahrkarte. biye ta acheter un billet. Category: Disease.
buy a ticket. einen Fahrschein kaufen. Bobojulaso See main entry: Bɔbɔjulaso, Bobo.
Category: Travel. Morphemes: Bobo-jula-so. n.pro.
biyetayɔrɔ Morphemes: biye-ta-yɔrɔ. Nom. guichet; Bobo-Dioulasso; Bobo-Dioulasso;
ticket office; Kartenausgabestelle, Billett Bobo-Dioulasso. Category: City.
Schalter. Category: Travel. Boboka Nom. habitant de Bobo (ville), bobolais; Bobo
biyetigɛla Morphemes: biye-ta-yɔrɔ. Nom. celui qui town habitant; Einwohner von der Stadt Bobo
vend des billets, ex. à la gare; person who Dioulasso.
issues tickets, e.g. at the bus station; bobokan Nom. langue bobo; Bobo language; Bobo
Fahrkarten verkäufer, Schalterbeamte.
Sprache. Category: Language.
Category: Person.
boboya [ó] Nom. surdité, surdi-mutité; deafness,
biyetigɛyɔrɔ
deaf-and-dumb; Taubheit, Taubstummheit.
[í-é-í-ɛ́-ɔ́-ɔ́] Morphemes: biye-tigɛ-yɔrɔ.
synonyme: tulogerenya.
Nom. guichet; ticket office; Billett Schalter,
Fahrkarten Ausgabestelle. Category: Travel. boci Morphemes: bo-ci. Nom. pet; fart; Furz.
biyɛdagolo [ì-ɛ̀-á-ó-ó] Nom. vulve; vulva; Vulva. synonyme: bofiɲɛ.
Category: Body. synonyme: kere, byɛ, baɲɛba, boda [ó-á] Morphemes: bo-da. n.comp. anus; anus;
biyɛwo. Anus. Category: Body. synonyme: nɔgɔbɔyɔrɔ,
biyɛji [ì-ɛ̀-í] Nom. sécrétion vaginale; vaginal kɔfɛtɔ, kɔda 1 .
secretion; vaginale Sekretion. Category: Body. bodakuru [ò-à-ú] interj. insulte; insult; Beleidigung,
biyɛkisɛ [ì-ɛ̀-í-ɛ́] Nom. clitoris; clitoris; Klitoris, Beschimpfung, Kränkung.
Kitzler. Category: Body. synonyme: kesekele, bodawaa [ò-à] Nom. cœur (aux cartes); heart (cards);
musoku, kere, kerekisɛ. Herz (Karten). synonyme: tamatibara.
biyɛri See main entry: dɔrɔ 1 . Emprunt de : français. bodingɛ variante: bodingɛda. Nom. rectum, anus;
Nom. bière; beer; Bier. Category: Types of rectum; Rektum, Mastdarm. Category: Body,
food. synonyme: dɔlɔji. Parts of an animal. synonyme: kɔfɛtɔ, kɔda .
1
biyɛwo [ì-ɛ̀-ó] synonyme: ɲɛfɛla. Nom. vagin; bodobada Verbe. très mûr (fruit), rendre mou; very
vagina; Scheide. Category: Body. ripe (fruit), make soft; sehr reif (Frucht), weich
synonyme: baɲɛba, biyɛdagolo, ɲɛfɛla, kere. machen. synonyme: lɔbɔlɔbɔ.
bo [ò] variante: boo. Nom. excréments, bodunduga Nom. vautour huppé; kind of vulture;
excrétion, déjection, déchet, cérumen, merde; Vogelart. Category: Bird. trigonoceps
excrements, earwax, shit; Exkremente, occipitalis.
Ohrenschmalz, Scheiße. synonyme: boo.
bofiɲɛ [ò] Nom. pet, gaz intestinaux; fart, intestinal
bobara [ò-á-á] Nom. fesses, reins; backside, buttock, gas; Furz, Darmgase. Category: Body.
kidneys; Hinterbacke, Pobacke, Nieren. synonyme: boci.
Category: Body. synonyme: fɛngɛɲɛ, jukoto,
bogotigi [ò-ò-í-í] Nom. jeune fille; young girl;
jukunan.
junges Mädchen. Category: Person.
bobaraba [ò-à-à-á] n.comp. callipyge; well-formed, bogoyi [ó] variante: bɔgɔyi. Adverbe. très tôt le matin;
shapely; wohlgeformt.
very early in the morning; ganz früh morgens.
bobilenkɛ Morphemes: bo-bilen-kɛ. Nom. dysenterie, bojara [ò-á] Nom. espèce de plante; kind of plant;
recto-colite; dysentery, recto-colitis; Ruhr,
Pflanze (Art). Category: Grass, herb, vine.
Rektokolitis. Category: Disease. sida ovata.
bobo [ó-ó] Nom. muet, muette, sourd-muet; mute, bojarafin Nom. espèce de plante; kind of plant;
speech-impaired person, tongue-tied; stumm,
Pflanze (Art). Category: Grass, herb, vine.
sprachlos, Stummer, taub-stumm,
sida rhombifolia.
Taubstummer . Category: Disease.
29/01/2026 48

boji bolisɔnna
boji [ò-ì] Nom. diarrhée; diarrhoea; Durchfall. boli [ó] Nom. fétiche, image symbolique du
3
Category: Disease. synonyme: kɔnɔboli, placenta de l’être dont il est témoin; fetish,
kɔnɔkari. symbolic image of the placenta of the being
which it witnesses; Fetisch, symbolisches Bild
bojitɔ [ɔ-̀ ì] Nom. diarrhéique; from diarrhoea; Folge der Plazenta des Wesens, dessen Zeuge es ist.
von Durchfallerkrankungen. Category: Religion. synonyme: ɲana.
bokɛ [ò-ɛ́] Nom. défécation; defecation, motion; boliboli [ò-í-ò-í] Morphemes: boli-boli. vi. courir
Stuhlgang, Darmentleerung. ça et là, courir dans tous les sens; run here and
bokolo [ò] Nom. coccyx, reins; coccyx, kidneys; there; herumrennen, hin und her rennen.
1
Steissbein, Nieren. Category: Body. bolifɛn [ò-ì-ɛ ́] Morphemes: boli2-fɛn. Nom.
synonyme: kukun, ntiri 2 , tala 3 , ntala 3 . véhicule, moyen de transport; vehicle, means
bokolo [ò] Nom. plante (espèce de); black nightshade; of transport; Transportmittel. Nɛgɛso ye
2
schwarzer Nachtschatten. Category: Grass,
bolifɛn sen fila ye. Un vélo est un moyen de
herb, vine. solanum nigrum. transport à deux roues. A bicycle is a
two-wheeled means of transport. Ein Fahrrad
bokolonkolonmusa variante: bolankolonkolon,
ist ein Transportmittel auf zwei Rädern.
bolankɔbɔ, bokolonkolon. Nom. bousier (et Category: Travel. synonyme: bolimafɛn.
autres coléoptères); dung beetle (and other
bolifɛnlɔyɔrɔ Morphemes: boli-fɛn-lɔ-yɔrɔ. Nom.
beetles); Mistkäfer (und andere Käfer).
Category: Insect. synonyme: nkolonkolonba .
parking; car park, parking, parking space;
1
Parkplatz, Abstellplatz. Category: Travel.
bokonkon [ò-ó] Nom. reins, lombes, bas du dos;
bolifɛntigi Morphemes: boli-fɛn-tigi. Nom.
kidneys, lower back; Nieren, unterer Rücken.
automobiliste, cycliste, usager de la route;
Category: Body.
driver, motorist, cyclist, rider, road-user;
bokulusi [ò] Nom. pantalon qui s’arrête entre genou et Autofahrer, Verkehrsteilnehmer, Radfahrer.
tibia; pants that stop between the knee and synonyme: mobilitigi.
shin; Hosen, die zwischen Knie und
bolifɛnw lɔyɔrɔ Nom. aire de stationnement; parking
Schienbein enden. Category: Clothing.
area; Parkanlage. Category: Travel.
bokuru [ò] Nom. crotte, crottin, excrément; droppings,
bolikabin Morphemes: boli-ka-bin.
excrement; Kot, Exkremente.
variante: bolikaben. Nom. crise convulsive,
bolabana Nom. péril fécal; faecal peril, disease
épilepsie; seizure, epilepsy; Anfall, Epilepsie.
caused by contact with faeces; von Fäkalien
Category: Disease. synonyme: kirikirimasyɛn.
verursachte Krankheiten. Category: Disease.
bolikɛla [ò-ì-ɛ́-á] Morphemes: bòli-kɛ-la. Nom.
boli [ò-ì] 1 • vi. courir, fuir; run, flee, escape;
1
coureur; runner; Renner. Category: Person.
rennen, fliehen, davonlaufen, entkommen. I
kana boli ! Ne cours pas ! Don’t run! Renne
bolimafɛn Morphemes: boli-ma-fɛn. Nom. véhicule,
nicht! U bolila lakɔli la. Ils ont couru à l’école.
moyen de déplacement; vehicle, means of
transportation; Fahrzeug,
They ran to school. Sie rannten zur schule.
Fortbewegungsmittel. Category: Travel.
2 • vi. fuite; running away; Flucht.
synonyme: bolifɛn.
3 • vt. conduire (un véhicule), rouler, circuler,
couler; drive, ride, circulate, flow; führen, bolininkumala Nom. marionnette parlante; talking
fahren, zirkulieren, strömen, fliessen. I bi se puppet; sprechende Marionette.
ka moto boli wa ? Est-ce que tu sais conduire bolisira [ò-ì] Morphemes: boli-sira. Nom. voie de
une moto ? Can you ride a motorbike? Kannst circulation, ligne de circulation (aérienne,
du ein Motorrad fahren? ferroviaire etc.); traffic lane, cir, cumulation
4 • vt. être valable, concerner, être applicable, route, traffic line (air, rail, etc.); Fahrbahn,
couvrir; be valid, to concern, be applicable; Fahrspur, Verkehrslinie (Flug, Schiene usw.)
gültig sein, betreffen, anwendbar. Category: Travel.
boli [ò-í] Nom. course; running, racing, race; bolisɔnna [ó] variante: bolitigi. Nom. adepte des
2
Rennen, Wettlauf. religions traditionnelles, animiste, féticheur;
follower of traditional religions, animist;
Anhänger Naturreligionen, Animist.
Category: Religion, Think. synonyme: bolitigi.
29/01/2026 49

bolitigi bolodimin
bolitigi [ó] Morphemes: boli-tigi. Nom. féticheur, boloci [ó-ó-í] Morphemes: bolo-ci. 1 • Nom.
adepte des cultes traditionnels; fetishist, vaccination; vaccination; Impfung.
follower of traditional cults; Fetischist, Category: Treat disease. synonyme: tuguci.
Anhänger traditioneller Kulte.
2 • vt. vacciner; vaccinate; impfen.
Category: Religion. synonyme: josɔnna,
bolocibali [ó] Morphemes: bolo-ci-bali. Nom. non
bolisɔnna, jotigi.
1
vacciné; not vaccinated; nicht geimpft.
bolo 1 [ó-ó] 1 • Nom. main, bras, avant-bras, patte de Category: Treat disease.
devant; hand, arm, forearm, front leg; Hand,
bolocifura [ó-ó-í-ú-á] Morphemes: bolo-ci-fura.
Arm, Unterarm, Vorderbein. Category: Body,
Parts of an animal. synonyme: tɛgɛ.
Nom. vaccin; vaccine; Impfstoff.
Category: Treat disease.
2 • Nom. branche, pousse, repousse; branch,
shoot, sprout; Ast, Trieb, Schössling.
bolocila [ó] Morphemes: bolo-ci-la. Nom.
Category: Parts of a plant. vaccinateur; vaccinator; Impfarzt.
3 • postp. dans, chez; in, inside, at; in, zu. bolocisɛbɛ [ó-ó-í-ɛ́-ɛ́] Morphemes: bolo-ci-sɛbɛ.
bolo [ó-ò] Nom. loche (poisson); fish sp; Fisch variante: bolocisɛbɛn. Nom. carnet de
2
(Art). Category: Fish. vaccination; vaccination card; Impfbüchlein.
Category: Treat disease.
bolo [ó-ó] synonyme: sɛkisɔn, bolofara. Nom.
3
boloda [ó] Morphemes: bolo-da. variante: bolola.
1 • section, état, situation, manière, façon;
section, part, situation, manner; Abschnitt, 1 • Verbe. organiser, prévoir, mettre sur pied,
Ausschnitt, Teil, Situation, Art. mettre en œuvre, instaurer; organize, plan, set
2 • longueur; length; Länge. up, implement, establish; organisieren, planen,
einrichten, umsetzen, etablieren.
bolo Nom. manche; sleeve; Ärmel.
4 2 • Nom. organisation, cérémonie;
Category: Clothing. organization, ceremony; Organisation,
bolo [ó-ó] postp. à, pour, auprès de, chez, à cause de Zeremonie.
5
(indique la cause, dépendance, possession, le 3 • Nom. mariage civile; civil marriage;
bénéfice, déterminant); to , for, at, because of Zivileheschließung.
(indicates the reason, dependence, possession, 4 • Nom. empreinte digitale; fingerprint;
beneficial party, determinant); zu, bei, wegen Fingerabdruck.
(zeigt an: Grund, Abhängigkeit, Besitz,
bolodafa [ó] Verbe. compléter ce que l'on possède;
Nutzer, Bestimmung). Sɛbɛni ka nɔgɔn a
complete what we have; Vervollständigen, was
bolo jatekalan ye. L'écriture est plus facile
man hat. Bibata ye a cɛ bolodafa o ka
pour lui que le calcul. Writing is easier for him
lahiyasaga san. Bibata a complété l'argent de
than calculating. Schreiben ist für ihn
einfacher als rechnen.
son mari pour que celui-ci achète son mouton
de Tabaski. Bibata supplemented her
bolobali [ó] Morphemes: bolo-bali. Verbe. déborder; husband's money so that he could buy his
overflow; überlaufen. Tasuma y'u bolobali. Tabaski sheep. Bibata ergänzte das Geld ihres
Le feu les a débordés. the fire overwhelmed Mannes, damit er seine Tabaski-Schafe kaufen
them. das Feuer überwältigte sie. konnte.
boloban [ó] Morphemes: bolo-ban. 1 • Verbe. ruiner; bolodandala [ó] Morphemes: bolo-da-n-da-la.
ruin, wreck bankrupt; ruinieren. Nom. extraordinaire, stupéfiant; extraordinary,
astonishing; außergewöhnlich, erstaunlich.
2 • Nom. ruine, faillite; ruin, bankruptcy; Ruin,
Bankrott. boloden Nom. doigt; finger; Finger. Category: Body.
bolobilen [ó] Morphemes: bolo-bilen. Nom. haricot synonyme: bolonkɔni.
rouge; red bean; rote Bohne. Category: Types bolodɛsɛ [ó] Nom. manque; lack; Mangel.
of food. synonyme: malokunba.
bolodimin Morphemes: bolo-dimin.
bolobɔ [ó] Morphemes: bolo-bɔ. Verbe. 1 • remplacer
variante: bolodimi. Nom. panaris, phlegmon
dans un travail, suppléer; replace in a job,
(des doigts), enflure douloureuse du bras ou de
supplement; in einem Job ersetzen, ergänzen.
la main; Whitlow, phlegmon (of the fingers),
2 • soulager dans une tâche pénible, sortir painful swelling of the arm or hand;
d'affaire, mettre à la retraite; relieve in a
Phlegmone (der Finger), schmerzhafte
difficult task, get out of trouble, retire; bei
Schwellung des Arms oder der Hand.
einer schwierigen Aufgabe entlasten, aus Category: Disease.
Schwierigkeiten herauskommen, in den
Ruhestand gehen. synonyme: lahinɛ, lafoni.
29/01/2026 50

bolodiɲɔgɔnma bolokobali
bolodiɲɔgɔnma bologwɛlɛya Morphemes: bolo-gwɛlɛ-ya. Nom.
[ó] Morphemes: bolo-di-ɲɔgɔn-ma. Nom. avarice; avarice, greed, miserliness,
entraide, solidarité, coopération; mutual aid, stinginess; Geiz, Habsucht.
solidarity, cooperation, collaboration; synonyme: bakiluya, tɛgɛmagɛlɛnya.
gegenseitige Hilfe, Solidarität, Kooperation,
bolojɔ [ó] Nom. filet de pêche, en forme de fourche,
Zusammenarbeit.
qu'on tient d'une seule main; fishing net,
bolodon [ó] Morphemes: bolo-don. Verbe. initier, shaped like a fork, which is held with one
former (qqn au travail), débuter, commencer; hand; Fischernetz in Form einer Gabel, das mit
initiate, train (somebody for a job), begin; einer Hand gehalten wird.
anleiten, anfangen, beginnen. Category: Agricultural tool, Hunt and fish.
bolodonden [ó] Morphemes: bolo-don-den. Nom. boloju Nom. talon (de lunettes); end pieces (of
apprenti, élève; apprentice, student; Lehrling, glasses); Bügelscharnier.
Student.
bolojuru [ó] Morphemes: bolo-juru. Nom. bras,
bolodun [ó] Morphemes: bolo-dun. Verbe. ruiner, branche dynastique; arm, dynastic branch;
exploiter jusqu'à la ruine totale; ruin, exploit to Arm, dynastischer Zweig.
the point of total ruin; Ruin, Ausbeutung bis
boloka [ó-ó-ǎ] Morphemes: bolo-ka. Verbe. cesser,
zum völligen Ruin. A y'a kɔrɔkɛ bolodun ka
interrompre, terminer, achever; cease,
ban. Il a complètement ruiné son frère aîné.
interrupt, terminate, complete; aufhören,
He completely ruined his older brother. Er hat
unterbrechen, beenden, vervollständigen. ...
seinen älteren Bruder völlig ruiniert.
faso nafolodun ka boloka. ... pour que cesse
bolofa [ó] Nom. 1 • poignée; a handful; eine le pillage de la patrie. ...so that the plundering
Handvoll. of the homeland stops. ...damit die
2 • satisfaction, confiance parfaite; Ausplünderung der Heimat aufhört.
satisfaction, perfect confidence; Zufriedenheit, bolokala [ó-ó-á-á] Morphemes: bolo-kàla. Nom.
vollkommenes Vertrauen. Bolofa bɛ a kan.
bras (de l'épaule au coude); arm; Arm.
On a en elle une confiance parfaite. We have
Category: Body.
perfect confidence in her. Wir haben
vollkommenes Vertrauen zu ihr.
bolokalabu [ó] Morphemes: bolo-kala-bu. Nom.
3 • particulièrement, notamment; particularly, biceps; biceps; Bizeps. Category: Body.
notably; besonders, bemerkenswert. bolokalan [ó] Morphemes: bolo-kalan. Nom.
bolofara [ó-ó-á-á] Morphemes: bolo-fara. Nom. léopard; leopard; Leopard.
1 • agence, branche, section, service, Category: Mammal. panthera pardus.
succursale, sous-groupe; agency, branch, synonyme: waraninkalan.
section, division; Filiale, Ausleger, Agentur, bolokan [ó-ó-ã́] Morphemes: bolo-kan. Nom.
Amt, Teil, Filiale, Zweigstelle,
avant-bras, y compris le poignet; forearm,
Geschäftsstelle. Warimaraso bolofara. Kɔ
including wrist; Unterarm, mit Handgelenk.
bolofara. Agence de banque. Branche de
Category: Body, Parts of an animal.
rivière. Bank agency. River arm. Bank Filiale.
Flußarm.
bolokankolo Morphemes: bolo-kan-kolo. Nom.
radius, cubitus; radius, ulna;
2 • tronçon, affluent; section, tributary;
Abschnitt, Nebenfluss.
Unterarmknochen, Elle. Category: Body.
3 • partie, domaine, matière; part, domain, bolokelen Morphemes: bolo-kelen. Nom. manchot;
matter; Teil, Bereich, Materie. maimed, with only one arm; einarmig.
bolofɛn [ó-ó-ɛ ́] Morphemes: bolo-fɛn. synonyme: bolontan.
variante: bololafɛn. Nom. possessions, biens, boloko [ó-ó-ǒ] Morphemes: bolo-ko. 1 • vt.
chose, affaires personnelles, produit, circoncire, exciser; circumcise, excision;
production; possessions, product, personal beschneiden. synonyme: fininta.
belongings; Besitz, Eigentum, Produkt,
2 • Nom. circoncision, excision; circumcision,
persönliche Gegenstände.
excision; Beschneidung, Exzision.
bolofifanɔmini Nom. crawl; crawl ; Kraul.
bolokobali
bologwɛlɛ [ó] bambara: bologɛlɛn. [ó-ó-ó-á-í] Morphemes: bolo-ko-bali.
Morphemes: bolo-gwɛlɛ. 1 • Nom. in-circoncis, non-excisée;
variante: bolomagwɛlɛ, bolomagɛlɛn. Nom. uncircumcised person; unbeschnittene Person.
avare; miserly, stingy; geizig, knausrig.
synonyme: bilakoroma.
synonyme: tɛgɛmagɛlɛn.
29/01/2026 51

bolokoden bololabaara
2 • adj. non-excisée; non excised; bolokunnaden
unbeschnitten.
[ó] Morphemes: bolo-kun-na-den. Nom.
bolokoden [ó-ó-ó-ẽ́] Morphemes: bolo-ko-den. doigt; finger; Finger. Category: Body.
n.comp. nouveau circoncis, nouvelle excisée; synonyme: bolonkɔni.
circumcised; Beschnittener.
bolokunnadencakaw Nom. castagnettes;
bolokoli [ó-ó-ó-í] Morphemes: bolo-ko-li. Nom.
castanets; Kastagnetten. Category: Musical
circoncision, excision; circumcision, excision; instrument.
Beschneidung. musomannin ka bolokoli
bolokunnadenkolo Nom. métacarpe; metacarpus;
excision. female circumcision.
Frauenbeschneidung. synonyme: fininta,
Mittelhandknochen. Category: Body.
nɛgɛkɔrɔsigi. bolokunnadennɛgɛ Nom. jonc; plain band, plain
bangle; Reif. Category: Adornment.
bolokolo [ó-ó-ó-ó] Nom. humérus, radius ou
bolokunnadennɔ synonyme: bolo tagamasiɲɛ.
cubitus; humerus; Oberarmknochen,
Humerus. Category: Body. Nom. empreinte digitale; digital fingerprints;
digitaler Fingerabdruck.
bolokolon
comparer: kolon
2
.[ó-ó-ó-ṍ] Morphemes: bol
bolokunnanden Nom. doigt; toe; Zehe.
o-kolon. variante: bololankolon. Nom. Category: Parts of an animal.
synonyme: bolonkɔni.
pauvre; poor; Armer, arme Person. Bolokolon
sangaɲɔgɔn tɛ fɛntigi ye. Le pauvre ne se bolokunturuba Nom. pouce; thumb; Daumen.
mesure pas au riche (proverbe). The poor Category: Body. synonyme: bolonkɔnikunba.
cannot be measured against the rich
bolokuru [ó-ó-ú-ú] Nom. poing, coup de poing,
(proverb). Die Armen können nicht mit den
Reichen verglichen werden (Sprichwort). boxe; fist, boxing; Faust, Boxen.
synonyme: tɛgɛjɛ, bololankolon. Category: Body.
bolokolonya
bolokurukɛla [ó] synonyme: bɔgɔsikɛla.
[ó-ó-ó-ṍ-á] Morphemes: bolo-kolon-ya.
variante: bolokurunkɛlɛkɛla. Nom. boxeur;
Nom. pauvreté; poverty; Armut.
boxer; Boxer. Category: Person.
bolokurukɛlɛ
bolokɔ [ó] Nom. dos de la main; back of the hand;
Handrücken. Category: Body.
[ó-ó-ú-ú-ɛ́-ɛ́] Morphemes: bolokuru-kɛlɛ.
variante: bolokurutulon. Nom. boxe; boxing;
bolokɔfɛfɛn [ó] Morphemes: bolo-kɔ-fɛ-fɛn. Nom.
Boxen. synonyme: bolokurutulon.
négligeable, quelque chose qui est négligé,
méprisable, de peu d'importance, secondaire; bolokuruɲanagwɛ [ó-ó-ú-ú-á-á-ɛ́] n.comp.
something neglected, negligible, insignificant, spectacle de boxe; box-fight; Boxkampf.
unimportant, marginal, despicable; etwas
bolokurutulon Nom. boxe; boxing; Boxen.
vernachlässigtes, unerheblich, unbedeutend,
vernachlässigbar, unwesentlich, synonyme: bolokurukɛlɛ, tubabubolokuru.
verachtenswert, verächtlich.
bolola [ó-ó-á] synonyme: ɲasigi. vt. programmer;
1
bolokɔkolo Nom. cubitus; ulna; Elle, Ulna. plan, schedule; planen, programmieren.
Category: Body.
bolola [ó] Morphemes: bolo-la. Verbe. organiser,
2
bolokɔnɔmɔgɔ [ó] Morphemes: bolo-kɔnɔ-mɔgɔ. prévoir, instaurer; organize, provide for, to
Nom. personne sous l'influence d'un autre, plan, establish sth., implement (sth.);
personne dépendante, personne vassale; organisieren, vorsehen, planen, errichten,
person under the influence of another, einführen.
dependent person, vassal person; Person unter
bolola [ó] Morphemes: bolo-la. Nom. poignée (de
dem Einfluss einer anderen, abhängigen 3
Person, Vasallenperson.
nourriture), contenu de la main; a handful (e.g;
of food), what is in the hand; eine handvoll,
bolokɔrɔ [ó] Morphemes: bolo-kɔrɔ. postp. en
Inhalt einer Hand. synonyme: tɔrɔmɔjɔ.
réserve, à part, mise de côté, sous la main, à la
bololabaara Morphemes: bolo-la-baara. Nom.
disposition de, partie (de temps, d'argent);
apart, spare, beside, at the disposal of, part (of travail d’artisan, travail artisanal, travail
time, money); auf Vorrat, auf die Seite gelegt, manuel, métier, artisanat; artisan work,
zur Verfügung von, Teil (der Zeit, des Geldes). manual work, profession, craft, handicraft,
craftsmanship; Handarbeit, Beruf, Handwerk,
bolokɔrɔse [ó] Verbe. créer des difficultés; create
Kunsthandwerk. Category: Worker,
difficulties; Schwierigkeiten schaffen. occupation.
29/01/2026 52

bololabaarakɛla bololasɛbɛnni
bololabaarakɛla bololamakaɲanan Nom. télécommande; remote
[ó] Morphemes: bolo-la-baara-kɛ-la. control; Fernbedienung, Fernsteuerung.
n.comp. artisan, travailleur manuel; craftsman, bololaminɛn [ó] Morphemes: bolo-la-minɛn. Nom.
artisan; Handarbeiter, Handwerker.
bagage à main; hand luggage.
Category: Person.
bololamisɛnya
bololabaaraw [ó] Morphemes: bolo-la-baara-w.
[ó] Morphemes: bolo-la-misɛn-ya. Nom.
Nom. métiers; job, trade, profession, craft;
Berufe, Handwerk. Category: Worker,
méticulosité, importance excessive aux détails,
occupation.
celui qui touche à tout, pinaillage;
meticulousness, excessive attention to detail,
bololabalɔn [ó] Morphemes: bolo-la-balɔn. the one who touches everything, nitpicking;
variante: bololabalɔntan. Nom. handball, übermäßige Liebe zum Detail, derjenige, der
basket-ball; handball, basketball; Handball, alles anfasst, Geizhalsigkeit.
Basketball. synonyme: bololatola. bololandi [ó] Morphemes: bolo-lan-di. Nom.
bololaban [ó] Morphemes: bolo-laban. Nom. généreux, soigneux, ordonné, adroit, habile,
bonne cuisinière (pour une femme); generous,
dernière touche, dernière pognée, dernière
careful, thorough, orderly, skilful, good cook
fois; last touch, last handful, last time; letzte
(for a woman); grosszügig, sorgfältig,
Berührung, letzte Handvoll, letztes Mal.
ordnungsliebend, geschickt, gute Köchin (für
bololabila [ó] Morphemes: bolo-labila. Verbe. eine Frau).
dépenser, être généreux, faire des cadeaux;
bololanɛgɛ Morphemes: bolo-la-nɛgɛ.
spend, be generous, give gifts; Geld ausgeben,
großzügig sein, Geschenke machen.
variante: bololanigɛ. Nom. bracelet; bracelet,
bangle, wristband; Armring, Armband.
bololabilalenya
Category: Adornment.
[ó] Morphemes: bolo-labila-len-ya. Nom.
bololanfɛgɛn [ó] Morphemes: bolo-lan-fɛgɛn.
générosité, libéralité, largesse; generosity,
variante: bololafɛgɛn. Nom. qui vole
liberality, largesse; Großzügigkeit,
Liberalität. synonyme: lahɔrɔnma, facilement, qui a la main leste, qui touche à
tout, qui agit à la légère, qui taquine; who
tɛgɛlabilalenya, wakiya.
steals easily, who has a quick hand, who
bololafɛn synonyme: bolofɛn. Nom. chose, bien touches everything, who acts lightly, who
personnel, affaires personnelles, bien, produit; teases; Wer leicht stiehlt, wer eine schnelle
thing, personal belonging, belongings, goods, Hand hat, wer alles anfaßt, wer leichtfertig
product; Ding, Sache, persönliche Sachen, handelt, wer neckt. I kana walimuso
Besitz, Produkt, Eigentum. bololafɛgɛn. Ne taquine pas la femme
bololafili Nom. touche; throw-in; Einwurf. d'autrui. Don't tease other people's wives.
Necken Sie nicht die Frauen anderer Leute.
bololagosi [ó] Morphemes: bolo-la-gosi. Verbe.
bololanigɛ Morphemes: bolo-la-nigɛ. Nom. bracelet;
conseiller, inciter quelqu'un (à cesser de faire
bracelet; Armring, Armband. sanu
de mauvaises choses (priver quelqu'un de,
trouver insuffisant; advise, encourage bololanɛgɛ bracelet en or. gold bracelet.
someone (to stop doing bad things (deprive Goldarmring.
someone of, find insufficient; jemandem raten, bololankolon [ó] Morphemes: bolo-lan-kolon.
ihn ermutigen (aufhören, schlechte Dinge zu
Nom. pauvre; poor; armer Mensch.
tun), jemandem etwas vorenthalten, für
unzureichend halten. N ye Maadu bololagosi
Bololankolon ɲin tɛ. Le pauvre n'a pas d'amis
(proverbe). The poor man has no friends
dɔlɔminko la. J'ai incité Madou à cesser de
(proverb). Der arme Mann hat keine Freunde
boire. I encouraged Madou to stop drinking.
(Sprichwort). synonyme: tɛgɛlankolon,
Ich ermutigte Madou, mit dem Trinken
bolokolon.
aufzuhören. synonyme: laadi, kunnagosi.
bololakaran [ó] Morphemes: bolo-la-karan. Nom.
bololantolatanna Nom. basketteur; basketball
player; Basketballspieler.
bagarre pour plaisanter, chahut, jeux de mains,
taquinerie; fighting as a joke, heckling, hand bololasɛbɛncogo Nom. cursive; cursive;
games, teasing; Streiten als Scherz, Schreibschrift, kursiv Buchstabe.
Zwischenrufe, Handspiele, Neckereien. Category: Learn, Language and thought.
bololakolon n.comp. main vide; empty handed; leere bololasɛbɛnni Morphemes: bolo-la-sɛbɛnni. Nom.
Hände. écriture cursive; handwriting; Handschrift.
29/01/2026 53

bololasɔgɔrikɛnan bolomasigi
bololasɔgɔrikɛnan Nom. perceuse à main; hand boloma [ó] Morphemes: bolo-ma. Nom.
drill, gimlet, hand brace; Handbohrer. intermédiaire; mediator; Mittler, Vermittler.
Category: Tool. furuboloma témoin du mariage, intermédiaire
bololasɔn Verbe. être chiche envers quelqu'un, du mariage. marriage witness, marriage
intermediary. Trauzeuge, Ehevermittler.
recevoir moins que prévu, gruger; to be mean
to someone, to receive less than expected, to bolomada [ó] Morphemes: bolo-ma-da. Verbe.
cheat; gemein zu jemandem sein, weniger compter sur, soutenir, prévoir, organiser,
bekommen als erwartet, betrügen. considérer; count on, support, foresee,
bololateli [ó] Morphemes: bolo-la-teli. Nom. très organize, consider; rechnen mit, unterstützen,
vorhersehen, organisieren, überlegen.
rapide (des mains), preste, prompt, adroit, qui
touche à tout, qui frappe facilement; very quick bolomadayɔrɔ Morphemes: bolo-ma-da-yɔrɔ.
(with the hands), nimble, prompt, dexterous, Nom. gagne-pain, occupation qui rapporte, ce
who gets to everything, who strikes easily; sehr sur quoi on compte, appui, soutien; livelihood,
schnell (mit den Händen), flink, schnell, profitable occupation, what we count on,
geschickt, der alles erreicht, der leicht support, support; Lebensunterhalt,
zuschlägt. gewinnbringender Beruf, worauf wir zählen,
bololatigɛ Morphemes: bolo-la-tigɛ. 1 • Verbe. être Unterstützung, Unterstützung.
désordonné, négligent; to be disorderly, bolomadɛmɛ [ó] Morphemes: bolo-ma-dɛmɛ.
careless; unordentlich, nachlässig sein. 1 • Verbe. coopérer, aider; cooperate, help;
2 • Verbe. faire involontairement, agir contre kooperieren, helfen.
son gré; to do involuntarily, to act against 2 • Verbe. contribuer, apporter une
one's will; unfreiwillig etwas tun, gegen seinen contribution; contribute, make a contribution;
Willen handeln. beitragen, einen Beitrag leisten.
3 • Nom. contrainte, nécessité, besoin; 3 • Nom. aide, contribution, coopération,
constraint, necessity, need; Zwang, entraide; help, contribution, cooperation,
Notwendigkeit. mutual aid; Hilfe, Beitrag, Zusammenarbeit,
4 • Nom. dénuement, pauvreté; deprivation, gegenseitige Hilfe.
poverty; Entbehrung, Armut.
bolomafara [ó] Morphemes: bolo-ma-fara. Nom.
bololatola bambara: bololantolatan. 1 • contribution, cotisation; contribution;
Morphemes: bolo-la-tola. Nom. handball, Beitrag.
basket; handball, basketball; Handball, 2 • succursale, filiale, fraction; branch,
Basketball. synonyme: bololabalɔn. subsidiary, fraction; Zweig,
Tochtergesellschaft, Fraktion.
bololatugu [ó] Morphemes: bolo-la-tugu. Verbe.
1
bolomagɛn [ó] Morphemes: bolo-ma-gɛn. Verbe.
fermer à la main, mal fermer; close by hand,
close poorly; von Hand schließen, schlecht secourir, apporter un secours, contribuer; to
schließen. help, to provide assistance, to contribute;
helfen, Hilfe leisten, einen Beitrag leisten.
bololatugu
2
bolomako [ó] Morphemes: bolo-ma-ko. Nom.
[ó-ó-á-ù-ú] Morphemes: bolo-la-tugu.
responsabilité, imputabilité; responsibility,
Verbe. secourir quelqu'un avec de l'argent; help
accountability ; Verantwortung.
someone with money; jemandem mit Geld
helfen. bolomandɔgɔ [ó] Morphemes: bolo-man-dɔgɔ.
bololawari Morphemes: bolo-la-wari. Nom. pauvre, faible, qui a peu de moyens;
poor, weak, who has few means; Arme, der
variante: bolowari. Nom. argent de poche,
Schwache, der wenig Mittel hat.
argent disponible; pocket money, allowance
money; Sackgeld, Taschengeld. bolomanjugu [ó] Morphemes: bolo-man-jugu.
Category: Finance. synonyme: bolowari. variante: bololajugu. Nom. désordonné, qui
bololo [ó] variante: pororo, porototo. Adverbe.
manque de soin, qui travaille mal; disorderly,
careless, poorly working; unordentlich,
grand, long et mince, longiligne; tall, long and
nachlässig, schlecht arbeitend.
thin, lanky; groß, lang und dünn, schlaksig. A
ka jan bololo. Il est grand et mince. He is tall
bolomaɲuman [ó] Morphemes: bolo-ma-ɲuman.
and thin. Er ist groß und dünn.
Nom. habile, appliqué; skillful, diligent;
geschickt, fleißig.
bolomasigi [ó] Morphemes: bolo-ma-sigi. Nom.
provisions, réserves; provisions, reserves;
Rückstellungen, Rücklagen.
29/01/2026 54

bolomayɛlɛma boloyɛlɛma
bolomayɛlɛma [ó] Morphemes: bolo-ma-yɛlɛma. bolonɔbila Morphemes: bolo-nɔ-bila.
Verbe. transvaser, changer de récipient; variante: bolonɔ bila. n.comp. signer,
transfer, change container; umfüllen, Behälter sous-signer; to sign; unterschreiben.
wechseln. ka sumanbolomayɛlɛma. synonyme: tɛgɛnɔbila.
transvaser du grain. transfer grain. Getreide
in ein anderes Gefäß füllen.
bolonɔdala [ó] Nom. signataire; signatory;
Unterzeichner.
bolominɛla
[-ó-ó-í-ɛ́-á] Morphemes: bolo-minɛ-la.
bolontan Nom. manchot, sans bras, sans main,
variante: bolominɛ. n.comp. 1 • sunnite,
vêtement sans manche; armless, handless,
sleeveless garment; armloses, armloser
wahhabite; Sunnite; Sunnit.
Mensch, ärmelloses Kleidungsstück.
2 • prétexte; pretext; Vorwand. synonyme: bolokelen.
bolominɛn Morphemes: bolo-minɛn. Nom. affaire,
boloɲɛ [ó] synonyme: tɛgɛkɔnɔna.
1
objet usuel; belongings, usual object; Sachen,
variante: bolotɛgɛ. Nom. paume de la main,
gewöhnlicher Gegenstand. i yɛrɛ bolominɛnw
plat de la main; palm of the hand; Handfläche.
tes propres affaires. your own belongings.
Category: Body. synonyme: tɛgɛkɔnɔna, tigɛ ,
diene eignen Gegenstände / Habseligkeiten. 3
bolotigɛ, tɛgɛɲɛ.
bolominɛyɔrɔ
[ó-ó-í-ɛ́-ɔ́-ɔ́] Morphemes: bolo-minɛ-yɔrɔ
boloɲɛ
2
[ó] Morphemes: bolo-ɲɛ. variante: boloɲa.
. n.comp. opportunité, support, secours, appui, Nom. poignée; handful of; eine Handvoll. kinin
aide; opportunity, support, help, rescue; boloɲɛ kelen. une poignée de riz. a handful of
Gelegenheit, Unterstützung, Hilfe. rice. eine Handvoll Reis.
synonyme: dɛmɛ 2 . bolosabana [ó] synonyme: bolo-sa-bana. Nom.
bolonkɔni [ó] variante: bolodennkɔni. Nom. doigt; paralysie du bras; arm paralysis;
finger; Finger. Category: Body. Armlähmung. Category: Disease.
synonyme: boloden, bolokunnaden, bolose Morphemes: bolo-se. Verbe. 1 • être riche, avoir
bolokunnanden. tout ce qu'il faut; to be rich, to have everything
bolonkɔnijan [ó] synonyme: bolo-nkɔni-jan. you need; reich sein, alles haben, was man
braucht.
variante: bolonkɔnicamancɛ. Nom. majeur
2 • donner du fil à retordre, en faire voir, en
(doigt); middle finger; Mittelfinger.
faire baver; to give a hard time, to show, to
Category: Body. synonyme: camancɛrabaana.
make one drool; einem das Leben schwer
bolonkɔnikunba [ó] variante: bololankɔnikunba. machen.
Nom. pouce; thumb; Daumen. Category: Body. bolota [ó] Morphemes: bolo-ta. Nom. possession,
synonyme: bolokunturuba. biens, avoir, propriété; possession, goods,
bolonkɔnikuru Nom. articulation entre les
property; Besitz, Hab und Gut, Eigentum,
Waren. bolotatigi un riche. a rich person.
phalanges; joint between the phalanges;
Gelenk zwischen den Phalangen.
eine reiche Person.
Category: Body. bolotigɛ [ó-ó-í-ɛ́] synonyme: tigɛ, tɛgɛ.
bolonkɔninanɛgɛ variante: bolonkɔninɛgɛ. Nom. variante: bolotɛgɛ. Nom. main, paume de la
anneau, bague; ring; Ring. main; hand; Hand. Category: Body.
Category: Adornment. synonyme: boloɲɛ 1 , tɛgɛfura.
synonyme: tugutugunin. bolotugudakolo Nom. carpe; carpus;
bolonkɔnisinnaban variante: bolonkɔnisinlaban. Handwurzelknochen. Category: Body.
Nom. auriculaire, petit doigt; pinky, little bolowari [ó] Morphemes: bolo-wari. Nom. argent
finger; kleiner Finger. Category: Body.
disponible; money available; vorhandenes
synonyme: sinnaban, lagare
2
.
Geld, Geld vorhanden. Category: Finance.
bolonɔ Morphemes: bolo-nɔ. Nom. 1 • signature; synonyme: warimugu, bololawari.
signature; Unterschrift. bolowilivote variante: bolowiliwote. Nom. vote à
2 • empreinte digitale; fingerprint; main levée; voting by a show of hands;
Fingerabdruck. Abstimmung mit erhobener Hand.
boloyɛlɛma [ó] Morphemes: bolo-yɛlɛma. 1 • Verbe.
faire du commerce; to trade; handeln, Handel
treiben. Category: Finance.
29/01/2026 55

boloyɛrɛkɛnɔmini bondorita
2 • Nom. petit commerce; small business; bonbo [ò-ó] Nom. babine; chops; Lefzen.
kleines Unternehmen.
Category: Parts of an animal.
3 • Nom. changement du système, changement
d'activité; system change, activity change; bonbokun [ò-ò-ṹ] variante: boonkun,
Systemwechsel, Aktivitätswechsel. bonbonkun. Variant: bonbon. Nom. menton;
boloyɛrɛkɛnɔmini Nom. brasse; breaststroke; chin; Kinn. Category: Body.
Brustschwimmen. bonboli [õ̀-ò-í] variante: banbali, bonbonni. Nom.
boma [ò] Morphemes: bo-ma. Nom. souillé bâton pour battre la terre sur le sol ou sur le
toit, batte, dame pour le sol; angled piece of
d'excréments; soiled with excrement; mit Kot
wood with flat surface, used for beating earth
verschmutzt. kulusi boma. pantalon souillé.
on roof or floor to make flat and solid; Holz
soiled pants. verschmutzte Hose. um die Erde auf dem Fussboden
bominɛ [ò] Morphemes: bo-minɛ. variante: bomɛnɛ, einzustampfen. Category: Tool.
gominɛ. Nom. petite vipère venimeuse; little bonbon See main entry:
poisonous viper; kleine giftige Viper. bonbokun.[ɔ ̀-ɔ́] variante: bonbo, boon.
Category: Snake. atractaspis microlepidota. Nom. menton; chin; Kinn. Category: Body.
bon 1 [õ]̀ adj.pred. être grand, être gros, large, bonbonsii [õ̀-ò-í] Morphemes: bonbon-sii.
important, abondant, fort, puissant; to be big,
variante: bonbosi, boonsii. Nom. barbe;
fat, large, important, abundant, strong,
beard; Bart. Bonbosi b'a fɛ. Il porte une
mighty; groß sein, fett sein, breit, wichtig,
reichlich, stark, mächtig. Ala ka bon. Dieu est
barbe. He has a beard. Er hat ein Bart.
Category: Body.
grand. God is great. Gott ist groß.
antonyme: dɔgɔ. bonbonsiima
1
bon [ṍ] 1 • vt. viser, lancer (un sortilège), tirer sur [ò-ò-ì-á] Morphemes: bonbon-sii-ma.
2
Nom. barbu; bearded; bärtig.
qqn ou qqch, piquer; aim at, throw, shoot at,
sting, cast (a spell); zielen, werfen, schießen, bonbonsiintan
stechen, (einen Zauber) wirken. X bon ni [ò-ò-ì-á] Morphemes: bonbon-sii-ntan.
kabakuru ye lancer un caillou à X. to throw variante: bonbonsiitan. Nom. imberbe;
something at X. X etwas nachwerfen. X bon ni hairless; unbehaart.
marifa ye tirer sur X. to shoot at X. auf X bonda [ó] Morphemes: bon-da. Nom. 1 • porte de
schießen.
maison à terrasse; door; Tür.
2 • vt. tirer (loterie); draw (lottery); ziehen Category: Building.
(Lotterie).
2 • famille, maison; family, home; Familie,
3 • Nom. sort, sortilège; spell; Zauber, das Los. Hause.
bon 3 [ó] Nom. ulcère, charbon des animaux, anthrax; bonda minɛyɔrɔ expr. poignée de porte; door
ulcer, animal anthrax; Geschwür, handle; Türgriff.
Tiermilzbrand, Milzbrand. Category: Disease.
bondadimin [ó] Nom. enflure de la joue, noma, abcès
bon [ó] Nom. maison, case, maison à terrasse;
4 dentaire; cheek swelling, noma, tooth abscess;
house, hut, terrace house; Haus, Hütte. Wagenschwellung, Noma, Zahnabszeß.
Category: Building. synonyme: boon. Category: Disease.
bon [ó] Verbe. 1 • cercler un grenier de paille avec bondakun [ó] Morphemes: bon-da-kun. Nom.
5
du bambou, des lianes; gird a straw roof with seuil; threshold, doorstep; Schwelle.
bamboo, lianas; Umgürten eines Category: Building.
Strohdachboden mit Bambus und Lianen.
bondoba Nom. silos; silos; Silo, Soloanlage.
2 • attacher le chaume d'un toit avec des fibres;
Category: Agriculture, Building.
tying the thatch of a roof with fibers; das Reet
eines Daches mit Fasern binden. bondon [ò-ó] Nom. grenier; granary, storage for
bon [ó] Verbe. louanger, faire l'éloge; to praise; cereals; Getreidespeicher, Kornspeicher.
6
Category: Agriculture, Building.
loben. A y'a bon ka a bon ... Il le louangea et
synonyme: mɔɔnɔ .
le louangea encore ... He praised him and
2
praised him again... Er lobte ihn und lobte ihn bondori See main entry: bondorita. Nom. lutte
noch einmal ... africaine; fight, wrestling, strife; Kampf.
bon bon adj. gros; thick; dick. Ninnu ka bon bon. bondorita Variant: bondori. n.comp. lutte; fight,
Ceux-ci sont gros. wrestling, strife; Kampf.
29/01/2026 56

bonju boɲananba
bonju [ó] Morphemes: bon-ju. Nom. pièce du fond, bonyabaga variante: bonyɛbaga. Nom. bienfaiteur;
dans issue vers l'extérieur, case réservée benefactor; Wohltäter.
servant de dépôt; back room with no exit to the
bonyabali [ò-à-í] Morphemes: bon-ya-bali. Nom.
outside, room used as storage;
qui n'a pas augmenté, irrespectueux, qui n'est
Hinterzimmer, ohne Ausgang ins Freie,
Abstellraum. Category: Building.
pas honoré; who has not increased,
disrespectful, who is not honored; Wer nicht
bonlɔcogo Nom. architecture; architecture; zugenommen hat, ist respektlos, wer wird
Architektur. Category: Building. nicht geehrt.
synonyme: solɔcogo. bonyabaliya
bonnifɛn [ó] Morphemes: bon-ni-fɛn. Nom. cible, [õ̀-à-à-ì-á] Morphemes: bonya-bali-ya.
femme, nana; target, woman; Ziel, Frau. Nom. manque de respect, irrespect, insolence;
bonnikɛla [ó] Nom. tireur, guerrier; shooter, warrior;
lack of respect, disrespect, insolence;
fehlender Respekt, Respektlosigkeit ,
Schütze, Krieger.
Frechheit, Unverschämtheit.
bonɲa Nom. anti-chambre; anteroom, antechamber; synonyme: ɲɛdonya.
Nebenraum, Nebenzimmer. bonyakɔsegi [õ̀-à-ɔ́-é-í] n.comp. retour de
bonɲɛkɔnɔ Morphemes: bon-ɲɛ-kɔnɔ. reconnaissance; return of acknowledgement or
variante: banɲɛkɔnɔ. Nom. chambre; room, appreciation; Anerkennung zeigen.
chamber; Zimmer. Category: Building. bonyalan [ò-à-á] Morphemes: bon-ya-lan. Nom. ce
bonya [õ-̀ á] Morphemes: bon-ya. variante: bonyɛ. qui augmente, ce qui rend important, loupe,
1
microscope, augmentatif; what increases,
Variant: boɲɛ. 1 • n adj. grosseur, grandeur,
what makes important, magnifying glass,
importance, abondance, volume, ; thickness,
microscope, augmentative; was erhöht, was
size, volume, importance; Dicke, Grösse,
wichtig macht, Lupe, Mikroskop,
Volumen, Wichtigkeit.
Augmentativ. Category: Tool.
synonyme: sumandahakɛ, kunnawolo.
synonyme: boɲananba.
2 • n adj. respect, déférence, égards,
considération, cadeau; respect, deference, bonyalanba [õ̀-à-á-ã́] Morphemes: bonyalan-ba.
consideration, gift; Respekt, Ehrerbietung, Nom. télescope; telescope; Fernrohr.
Rücksichtnahme, Geschenk. Category: Machine.
3 • vi. grossir, grandir, augmenter, croître, être bonyamasegin
gros ou grand, forcir; get big /fat, grow, get
[ò-à-à] Morphemes: bonya-ma-segin.
bigger; wachsen, grösser / dicker werden. A
Nom. remerciement, marque de
den bonyana. Son enfant a grossi (grandi).
reconnaissance; thanks, mark of recognition;
His child grew. Sein Kind ist gewachsen. Danke, Zeichen der Anerkennung.
4 • vi. respecter, honorer; respect, honour;
bonyanan [õ̀-à-ã́ã̀] Morphemes: bonya-lan. Nom.
respektieren, ehren.
loupe, microscope; magnifying glass,
bonya 2 [õ-̀ á] Nom. respect, égards, considération, microscope; Vergrösserungsglas, Mikroskop .
déférence; respect, consideration, deference; synonyme: boɲananba, fɛnnabonyalan.
Respekt, Achtung, Ansehen, Ehrerbietung.
bonyasira [õ̀-à-í-á] comparer: ɲamɔgɔkunda.
bonya [õ-̀ á] variante: boɲɛ. vt. honorer, respecter,
3 Nom. 1 • hiérarchie; hierarchy; Hierarchie,
accueillir, offrir des cadeaux à, rendre service; Rangordnung.
honor, respect, welcome, give gifts to; ehren,
2 • l'honneur de (ex. dans une lettre); the
achten, respektieren, aufnehmen, Geschenke
honour of (e.g. start of a letter); die Ehre zu
geben. A bi mɔgɔ bonya. Il respecte les gens.
(z.B. Briefanfang). Bonyasira fɛ, ... J'ai
Il est poli. He respects people. He is polite. Er
l'honneur de... I have the honor of... Ich habe
ehrt die Leute. Er ist freundlich. Bonya t’a la.
die Ehre zu...
Il n’y a pas de respect. There is no respect. Da
ist kein Respekt festzustellen. I k’i fa n’i ba
bonzonin synonyme: koroto. Nom. arbre (espèce); tree
bonya. Honore ton père et ta mère. Honour
sp; Baumart. Category: Tree. acacia
macrostachya.
your father and your mother. Ehre deinen
Vater und deine Mutter. An b'i tɔgɔ bonya. boɲananba variante: bonyananba. Nom.
Nous glorifions ton nom. (prière). We glorify microscope; microscope; Mikroskop.
your name. (prayer). Wir ehren deine Namen. Category: Tool. synonyme: labonyalan,
(Gebet). synonyme: kunnawolo. bonyanan, fɛnnabonyalan, bonyalan.
29/01/2026 57

boɲɛ botobata
boɲɛ See main entry: boroderi Emprunt de : français. Nom. broderie;
bonya .[õ̀-ɛ́] Morphemes: bòn-ya. embroidery; Stickarbeit, Stickerei.
1
variante: bonyɛ. vi. grossir, augmenter, élargir; Category: Adornment, Clothing.
enlarge, increase; zunehmen, vergrössern, borokobaraka [ò-ò-ò] Verbe. 1 • honorer quelqu'un
verbreiten. de beaucoup de cadeaux; honor someone with
boɲɛbaga [ò-ɛ̀-á-á] Morphemes: boɲɛ-baga. many gifts; Jemanden mit vielen Geschenken
variante: bonyɛbaga. Nom. bienfaiteur;
ehren. synonyme: kunnawolo.
benefactor; Wohltäter. 2 • s’asperger de boue, être sale; to splash
oneself with mud, to be dirty; sich mit
boɲugun [ò] Morphemes: bo-ɲugun. Nom. allergie
Schlamm bespritzen, schmutzig sein.
cutanée provoquant des plaies entre les orteils,
borongo [ó] Nom. pois de terre cuits; cooked ground
eczéma du pied, dermatose; skin allergy
causing sores between the toes, foot eczema, peas, cooked Bambara beans; gekochte
dermatosis; Hautallergien, die zu Wunden Erderbsen, Kichererbsen. Category: Food.
zwischen den Zehen führen, Fußekzeme, synonyme: tigɛninkuru.
Dermatosen. Category: Disease. bororo [ó] variante: bɔrɔrɔ. Adverbe. très rouge; very
boo [òó] bambara: bo. synonyme: banakɔtaga, red; sehr rot. Category: colour.
sokɔtaga. Nom. selles, excrément, caca, crotte, boso [ó-ó] vt. 1 • dépecer un animal, écorcher, peler;
1
excrétas; excrement; Exkrement, Kot. bo kɛ
dismember an animal, to skin, flay, peel, flake;
déféquer. ’go to toilet’. Auf die Toilette gehen. ein Tier zerstückeln, häuten, enthäuten,
bo ci péter. fart. furzen. synonyme: bo, schälen. A ka saga boso. Il a dépecé un
banakɔtaga. mouton. He dismembered a sheep. Er hat ein
boo kɛ [òó ɛ́] variante: bo kɛ. Nom. déféquer; empty
Schaf zerstückelt.
2 • circoncire; circumcise; beschneiden.
one's bowels; seine Notdurft verrichten, den
Darm entleeren. boso [ó] Verbe. ouvrir largement, écarquiller les
2
booboya Nom. surdi-mutité, surdité; deafness; yeux, fixer les yeux sur; open wide, widen the
eyes, fix the eyes on; weit öffnen, die Augen
Taub-Stummheit, Taubheit, Gehörlosigkeit .
weiten, die Augen fixieren.
boolo [ò-ó] Nom. espèce de poisson, loche; kind of
1 bosobasa Verbe. 1 • bâcler (un travail), mal disposer
fish, loach; Fischart, Schmerle. Category: Fish.
(du chaume); botch (a job), mishandle
clarotes laticeps.
(thatch); Pfusch (eine Arbeit), falsch
boolo 2 [ó-ó] Verbe. héler, appeler qqn (en faisant behandeln (Stroh).
hou-hou), crier, beugler, mugir; to hail, call 2 • travail bâclé; shoddy work; schlechte
out, cry, bellow; herbeirufen, schreien, brüllen. Arbeit.
boon [ó] comparer: soo, sɛɛrɛ. variante: bon. Nom. bosobo [ò-ò-ó] Nom. plante épineuse (espèce), pavot
1 • case, maison; hut, house; Hütte, Haus. épineux; thorny plant (species), prickly
Category: Building. synonyme: bon. poppy; dornige Pflanze (Art), stacheliger
4
2 • catégorie; category; Kategorie, Klasse, Mohn. Category: Grass, herb, vine.
Sparte, Ordnung, Stufe, Begriffsfeld. bosokolo [ò-ò] comparer: botontonkolo. Nom.
boon ɲɛgɛn Nom. dessin d'une maison; drawing of a coccyx, ensemble des os du bassin; coccyx, set
house; Zeichnung eines Hauses.
of pelvic bones; Steißbein, Beckenknochen.
Category: Body. synonyme: ntala , kukun,
borobara [ò-ò] Verbe. blettir (fruits), surir, fermenter, 3
tala , ntiri .
3 2
être avancé, ramollir, très mûr; ripen (fruits),
sour, ferment, be advanced, soften, very ripe, bosonkunangwɛ Nom. grande aigrette; egret ;
soggy; reifen (Früchte), sauer, gären, Reiher, Seidenreiher. Category: Bird. egretta
fortgeschritten sein, weich werden, sehr reif, garzetta. synonyme: bosonkunanjɛ.
matschig. Malokinin tobira fo ka a
bosonkunanjɛ [ò-ò] Nom. grande aigrette; great
borobara. Le plat de riz est trop cuit, il s'est
egret; Silberreiher. Category: Bird. egretta
ramolli. The rice dish is overcooked, it has
become soggy. Das Reisgericht ist verkocht, es
garzetta. synonyme: kɔnɔninjɛ,
ist matschig geworden. synonyme: lɔbɔlɔbɔ. bosonkunangwɛ, gunangwɛ, kunanjɛ,
sakununjɛman.
boroboro [ò-ò] Verbe. très bien cuire, trop cuire
(jusqu'à ramollissement); cook very well, botobata [ó] Adverbe. complètement trempé;
overcook (until softened); sehr gut kochen, completely soaked; völlig durchnässt.
überkochen (bis es weich ist).
29/01/2026 58

botulunin bɔbɔ ɲɔgɔnkɔrɔ
botulunin [ò-ù-ù] Nom. croupion (poulet, oiseau); bɔ [ɔ́] Verbe. 1 • distinguer, différencier;
2
rump (chicken, bird); Rumpf (Huhn, Vogel). distinguish, differentiate; unterscheiden,
Category: Parts of an animal. differenzieren, .
Bozo [ò-ó] n.pro. nom d'une ethnie au Mali; name of 2 • annuler, abandonner; cancel, abandon
sb./sth. , give up; absagen, aufgeben.
an ethnic group in Mali; Name einer Ethnie in
Mali. Category: Community. 3 • dépendre, concerner; depend, concern;
abhängen von, betreffen.
bɔ [ɔ]́ 1 • vi. sortir, venir de, être originaire de,
1 bɔ [ɔ̀] variante: bɔɔ. Nom. bambou, perche;
descendre de; go out, come from; hinausgehen, 3
herkommen. I bɛ bɔ min ? / I bɔra min ? / Ka
bamboo, pole; Bambus, Stange.
Category: Bush, shrub. oxytenanthera
bɔ min ? Tu viens d’où ? Where do you come
abyssinica.
from? Woher kommst du? N bɛ bɔ Bobo. Je
bɔ [ɔ́] Verbe. 1 • fournir, offrir, produire, fabriquer,
viens de Bobo. I come from Bobo. Ich komme 4
von Bobo. A bɔra. Il est sorti. He has gone faire, pratiquer; provide, supply, furnish,
produce, make, practice; liefern, anbieten,
out. Er ist weggegangen.
produzieren, anfertigen, machen, praktizieren.
2 • vt. faire sortir, se lever (la lune), apparaître,
2 • ressembler, imiter, prendre modèle sur;
se dresser; bring out, appear; herausbringen,
resemble, imitate; gleichen, nachahmen.
aufgehen (Mond) erscheinen. Dumuni bɔ !
Faites sortir le repas ! Bring out the food! bɔ 5 [ɔ̀] Nom. gorge, cou; throat, neck; Hals,
Bringt das Essen heraus! Muso ye ji bɔ kɔlɔn Genick. Waraba ye minan bɔ ci. Le lion a
na. La femme a puisé de l’eau du puits. The brisé le cou de l'antilope. The lion broke the
woman drew water from the well. Die Frau hat antelope's neck. Der Löwe brach der Antilope
Wasser aus dem Brunnen gezogen. Kunu, n ye das Genick. Category: Parts of an animal.
wari caman bɔ. Hier, j’ai dépensé beaucoup
synonyme: ngɔɔnɔ.
d’argent. Yesterday, I spent a lot of money. bɔ ... fɛ expr. ressembler; resemble, look like; gleich
Gestern habe ich viel Geld ausgegeben. U ye sein, ähnlich sein. Den bi bɔ a ba fɛ. L’enfant
dɔnkili CD bɔ. Ils ont fait sortir un CD de ressemble à sa mère. The child looks like her
chants. They published a CD of songs. Sie mother. Das Kind gleicht seiner Mutter. U
haben eine Lieder CD publiziert. bɔnin bi ɲɔgɔn fɛ. Ils se ressemblent. They
3 • vt. enlever, ôter, baisser, soustraire, déduire, look like each other. Sie gleichen einander.
extraire, puiser; remove, take off, take away,
subtract; wegnehmen, herausnehmen. A ye
bɔ fɛnkura kan vi. découvrir; discover; entdecken.
fani bɔ. Il a enlevé son habit. He took off his synonyme: kɔrɔdɔn 2 .
garment. Er hat sein Kleid ausgezogen. Bɛɛ bɛ bɔ ɲɔgɔn kɔrɔ expr. alterner; alternate;
sanbara bɔ misirida la. Tous se déchaussent abwechselnd, wechselnd folgen,
à l’entrée de la mosquée. Everyone takes off wechselweise.
their shoes at the entrance to the mosque. Alle bɔ ɲɔgɔn na comparer: danfaran. expr. départager;
ziehen die Schuhe aus um in die Moschee zu
split up, decide between, share between;
gehen. 2 bɔnin 5 la, o ye 3 ye. 2 ôté de 5 font
aufteilen.
3. 5 minus 2 equals 3. 5 weniger 2 gibt 3.
bɔbɔ [ɔ̀-ɔ́] Nom. ethnie jula / dioula, bobo (ethnie),
4 • vt. suffire à, égaler, environ, valoir, égaliser, 1
être équivalent à, convenir; suffice, equal, Bobo, Bwa (population de la région de San);
about (be); genügen, gleich sein. A ka jan ka Bobo (ethnic group); Bobo Volksgruppe.
Ali bɔ. Il est aussi grand qu’Ali. He is as tall as
Category: Community.
Ali. Er ist so groß wie Ali. Kɔgɔ ye nan bɔ. Il bɔbɔ 2 Nom. musulman ou commerçant; Muslim or
y a assez de sel dans la sauce. There is enough trader; Muslim oder Handelsmann, Händler.
salt in the sauce. Es hat genug Salz in der bɔbɔ [ɔ̀] Verbe. arracher l'herbe, sarcler; pull the
3
Sauce. I barika bɛ ne taa bɔ. Ta force égale la
grass, weed; Gras ausreißen, Unkraut jäten.
mienne. Your strength equals mine. Du bist so
Category: Agriculture.
stark wie ich. O b’a bɔ. Ça suffit. That’s
bɔbɔ [ɔ́] Verbe. varier, succéder; vary, succeed,
enough. Das ist genug. Kɛmɛ naani bɛ ne 4
follow each other; variieren,
bɔ. 2000F CFA me suffisent. 2000F CFA is
aufeinanderfolgen.
enough for me. 2000 F CFA genügen/reichen
mir. bɔbɔ ɲɔgɔnkɔrɔ See main entry: .
5 • vt. jouer à; play at; spielen. marasi bɔ jouer Morphemes: bɔ-bɔ-ɲɔgɔn-kɔrɔ. n.comp.
aux cartes. play cards. Karten spielen. alterner; alternate; wechselweise, alternativ,
abwechselnd.
29/01/2026 59

Bɔbɔjulaso bɔgɔmugu
Bɔbɔjulaso [ɔ̀-ɔ́-ù-à-ó] Variant: Bobojulaso. Nom. bɔgɔdaga [ɔ̀-ɔ̀-á-á] Morphemes: bɔgɔ-daga.
Bobo-Dioulasso; Bobo-Dioulasso; synonyme: daga. Nom. pot en argile; clay pot;
Bobo-Dioulasso. Category: City. Tontopf. Category: Container.
bɔbɔkan Nom. langue des Bobo; language of the Bobo bɔgɔden Morphemes: bɔgɔ-den. Nom. boule de
1
people; Sprache der Bobo Leute. banco (pour la construction); ball of clay (for
Category: Language. construction, building); Ball aus Erde (für's
bɔbɔya See main entry: Bauen), Baustein (rund). Category: Building.
.[ɔ-́ ɔ́-á] Morphemes: bobo-ya. Nom. bɔgɔden 2 [ɔ̀-ɔ̀] beaucoup, en pagaille, à foison; a lot,
mutisme; inability to speak; Stummheit. in abundance; viel, im Überfluss. Wari
Category: Disease. bɔgɔden b'a fɛ. Il a beaucoup d'argent. He has
bɔ-cogo [ɔ́] Nom. allure, prestance; appearance, a lot of money. Er hat viel Geld.
presence; Aussehen, Präsenz. bɔgɔdingɛ [ɔ̀-ɔ̀] Morphemes: bɔgɔ-dingɛ. Nom.
bɔda [ɔ-́ á] Morphemes: bɔ-da. Nom. 1 • sortie, carrière à banco; hole in de ground from where
issue; exit, issue, way out; Ausgang, Ergebnis, you get the clay for building; Baugrube von
Ausweg. Bɔda t'i la. Tu ne t'en sortiras pas. der man Mörtel nimmt. Category: Building.
You won't get out of this. Da kommst du nicht bɔgɔdoro [ɔ̀-ɔ̀] Morphemes: bɔgɔ-doro. Nom. boue
raus. liquide pour le crépissage des murs; liquid mud
2 • solution; solution; Lösung, Auflösung. for plastering walls; flüssiger Schlamm zum
bɔfan [ɔ]́ Morphemes: bɔ-fan. Nom. moyen, Verputzen von Wänden. Category: Building.
stratagème, tour; means, stratagem, trick; bɔgɔgwa nafaman Nom. foyer amélioré en banco;
Mittel, List, Trick. hearth mad of clay; Ton Herd, Ton
bɔgɔ [ɔ-̀ ɔ́] Nom. 1 • terre, boue, banco, terre battue, Feuerstelle. Category: Household equipment.
1
argile, mortier; soil, mud; Erde, Schlamm, bɔgɔji [ɔ̀-ɔ̀] Morphemes: bɔgɔ-ji. Nom. boue liquide;
Dreck, gestampfte Erde. Category: Land. liquid mud; flüssiger Schlamm.
2 • poids, influence, envergure; weight, bɔgɔkuru [ɔ̀-ɔ̀-ú-ú] Morphemes: bɔgɔ-kuru. Nom.
influence, scope; Gewicht, Einfluss, Umfang.
motte de terre; clod, clump, lump of earth;
bɔgɔ 2 [ɔ]́ variante: bɔgɔn. Nom. argile salée pour le Erdklumpen. Category: Land.
bétail, terre consommée par les femmes bɔgɔladɔn [ɔ̀-ɔ̀-à] Verbe. insister; insist; pochen,
enceintes; salty clay for livestock, earth
insistieren, beharren.
consumed by pregnant women; salziger Ton
für Vieh, Erde, die von schwangeren Frauen bɔgɔlaman [ɔ̀-ɔ̀-à-ã́] adj. en terre; made with earth;
verzehrt wird. aus Erde gemacht.
bɔgɔbaara [ɔ̀-ɔ̀] Nom. occupation de tous; occupation bɔgɔlan [ɔ̀-ɔ̀-ã]́ Morphemes: bɔgɔ-lan. Nom. pagne
of all; Beruf aller. Jago kɛra bɔgɔbaara ye bi. traditionnel teint à la terre, bogolan; Bogolan,
Tout le monde aujourd'hui fait du commerce. traditional fabric dyed with earth; Bogolan
Everyone trades today. Jeder handelt heute. Stoff, traditioneller Stoff mit Erde gefärbt.
Category: 6.1 Work. Category: Clothing.
bɔgɔbari [ɔ̀-ɔ̀] Nom. fondations, soubassement, bɔgɔlantɛbɛn [ɔ̀-ɔ̀-à] synonyme: gurun. Nom.
soutènement; foundations, base, retaining; espèce de carpe / tilapia; kind of fish; Fischart.
Fundamente, Sockel, Stützen. So tɛ se ka Category: Fish. tilapia dageti / zillii.
bonya a bɔgɔbari ye. Une maison ne peut être bɔgɔman [ɔ̀-ɔ̀-á] Morphemes: bɔgɔ-man.
plus grande que ses fondations (proverbe). A variante: bɔgɔma. adj. boueux, terreux,
house cannot be bigger than its foundations
fangeux; muddy; schlammig.
(proverb). Ein Haus kann nicht größer sein
als sein Fundament (Sprichwort). bɔgɔmanfɛndilan Nom. poterie; pottery; Töpferei.
Category: Building. synonyme: jubila. Category: Worker, occupation.
bɔgɔbɔgɔ [ɔ̀-ɔ̀] Nom. vase, boue, enduit de terre bɔgɔmugu [ɔ̀-ɔ̀] Morphemes: bɔgɔ-mugu. Nom.
1
liquide pour crépir; silt, mud, liquid earth terre friable, terre finement broyée à laquelle
coating for plastering; Schlamm, flüssige on ajoute de l'eau pour faire le mortier; friable
Erdbeschichtung zum Verputzen. earth, finely ground earth to which water is
Category: Land, Building. added to make mortar; bröckelige Erde, fein
gemahlene Erde, der Wasser zugesetzt wird,
bɔgɔbɔgɔ
2
[ɔ́] Adverbe. complètement détruit;
um Mörtel herzustellen. Category: Land,
completely destroyed; völlig zerstört. Building.
29/01/2026 60

bɔgɔn bɔli
bɔgɔn [ɔ-́ ɔ ́] variante: bɔgɔngwɛ, bɔgɔ. Nom. argile; bɔkɛlɛ [ɔ́] Morphemes: bɔ-kɛlɛ.
clay; Ton. synonyme: kunmabɔkɛlɛ. Nom. guerre
bɔgɔndorondoro d’indépendance, lutte anti-coloniale, guerre de
libération nationale; war of independence,
[ɔ-̀ ɔ̀] variante: bɔgɔndorodoro,
anti-colonial struggle, war of national
bɔgɔnoronoro. Nom. marécage, marais;
liberation; Unabhängigkeitskrieg,
swamp; Sumpf. Category: Water, Land. anti-kolonialer Kampf, nationaler
bɔgɔnɛgɛ [ɔ̀-ɔ̀] Nom. métal cassant, porcelaine; Befreiungskrieg.
brittle metal, porcelain; sprödes Metall, bɔko [ɔ́] Morphemes: bɔ-ko. Nom. physique, beauté
Porzellan. physique, esthétique (d'une personne, animal,
bɔgɔngwɛ variante: bɔgɔn. Nom. argile claire; clay; chose); physical beauty, aesthetic (of a person,
animal, thing); körperliche Schönheit,
Ton. synonyme: bɔgɔnjɛ.
Ästhetik (einer Person, eines Tieres, einer
bɔgɔnin [ɔ̀-ɔ́-í] variante: bɔgɔgwɛ. Nom. calcaire, Sache). A bɔko ka ɲi. Il est bien fait. He is
kaolin, argile blanche qui sert à enduire les well made. Es ist gut gemacht.
maisons; limestone, white clay used to coat bɔkolo [ɔ́] Nom. 1 • origine; origin; Herkunft.
houses; Kalkgestein, weißer Ton, der zum
Beschichten von Häusern verwendet wird. 2 • fondement, ascendance, lignée; foundation,
Category: Land. synonyme: bɔgɔnjɛ.
ancestry, lineage; Gründung, Abstammung.
Category: Kinship.
bɔgɔnjɛ [ɔ́] Nom. kaolin, calcaire, terre que les femmes 3 • ancêtres géniteurs, ascendants,
consomment; kaolin, limestone, earth that descendants; genitor ancestors, ascendants,
women consume; Kaolin, Kalkstein, Erde, die descendants; Vorfahren, Nachkommen.
Frauen konsumieren. synonyme: bɔgɔngwɛ, bɔkolotigi Nom. qui a de la noblesse; to have nobility;
bɔgɔnin.
Adel habende.
bɔgɔnyɔrɔ [ɔ́] Nom. sol argileux; clay ground; bɔlen [ɔ̀] variante: bolen. Nom. gourde pour l'eau ou
1
Lehmboden. Category: Land. le lait, à goulot étroit; bottle for water or milk,
bɔgɔti synonyme: bɔn. Verbe. déraciner, arracher, with narrow neck; Flasche für Wasser oder
Milch, mit schmalem Hals.
retirer de force; uproot sb./sth., root sth. out,
Category: Container. synonyme: bɔlenbara.
pull, tear sth. off, forcibly remove, remove by
force; entwurzeln, ausreissen, reissen, bɔlen [ɔ́] 1 • qui se montre, aime se faire voir; who
2
gewaltsames Entfernen. synonyme: bɔn .
4 shows himself, likes to be seen; wird gerne
bɔgɔtoli Morphemes: bɔgɔ-toli. Nom. terre pourrie; gesehen.
spoiled earth; verdorbene Erde. 2 • impoli, qui dépasse les limites, rétif; rude,
overstepping boundaries, stubborn; unhöflich,
bɔkabin Morphemes: bɔ-ka-bin. variante: bɔkaben.
grenzüberschreitend, stur.
Nom. chute, lutte, crise convulsive, épilepsie; 3 • ôté de, moins; removed from, less, minus;
fall, struggle, seizure, epilepsy; Sturz, Kampf,
weniger. Saba bɔlen seegin na ... 3 ôté de 8
Anfall, Epilepsie. Category: Disease.
... 3 removed from 8... 3 von 8 entfernt... (8
synonyme: ncikunbaɲama, kirikirimasyɛn.
weniger 3 ...)
bɔkala [ɔ]̀ Morphemes: bɔ-kala. Nom. perche de bɔlenbara variante: bɔlen. n.comp. gourde; gourd,
bambou, gaule; bamboo pole; Bambusstange.
flask, water-bottle; Kürbisflasche,
bɔkaturu [ɔ̀-à] Morphemes: bɔ-ka-turu. Wasserflasche. Category: Container.
variante: bɔnkaturu. 1 • Nom. repiquage, plante
synonyme: bɔlen
1
.
repiqué; transplanting, transplanted plant; bɔli [ɔ́-í] Emprunt de : français. synonyme: bɛɛlɛn.
1
verpflanzte Pflanze.
Nom. bol; bowl; Schüssel, Schale.
2 • Verbe. repiquer, replanter; transplant, Category: Container.
replant; transplantieren, neu pflanzen.
bɔli [ɔ́-í] synonyme: labɔli, wogili.
2
3 • Verbe. boiteux (populaire); lame (popular);
lahm (Volksmund).
variante: bɔsen. Nom. 1 • évacuation, sortie,
parution, livraison, numéro; evacuation,
delivery, supply, release; Evakuierung,
Entsorgung, Abfliessen, Lieferung,
Zustellung, Herausgabe, Publikation.
2 • extraction; extraction, retrieval;
Entfernung, Abbau, Extraktion.
Category: Mathematics.
29/01/2026 61

bɔlɔ bɔnfɛ
3 • naissance; birth; Geburt. 2 • sorte de danse acrobatique; kind of
bɔlɔ [ɔ-̀ ɔ́] Nom. 1 • piquet, pieu; stake, picket, pole,
acrobatic dance; Art akrobatischer Tanz.
post; Pfahl, Pfosten. Category: Tool. bɔn 4 [ɔ̀] variante: bɔ. Verbe. arracher, déraciner;
2 • axe; axis; Achse. Category: Mathematics. uproot; entwurzeln. ka jirisun bɔn arracher
3 • sexe masculin (populaire); penis; un arbre. uproot a tree. einen Baum
männliches Glied (Volksmund). entwurzeln. synonyme: bɔgɔti.
bɔlɔn [ɔ-́ ɔ ́] Nom. rue, chemin, ruelle; road, street, bɔn [ɔ̀] Verbe. être abondant, être nombreux; to be
1 5
alley; Strasse, Weg, Gasse. Category: Travel. abundant, to be numerous; reichlich sein,
bɔlɔn [ɔ-̀ ɔ ́] Nom. Bolon, groupe ethnique au Burkina zahlreich sein. Jagokɛlaw bɔnnen bɛ sira
2
kan. Les commerçants sont nombreux sur la
Faso (Nord de la province du Kénédougou) et
au Mali ; Bolon people group; Bolon Ethnie. route. There are many traders on the road. Es
Category: Community. sind viele Händler unterwegs.
bɔlɔnbɔlɔn [ɔ́] Nom. ruelle (plus étroite que bɔlon); bɔnbɔn 1 [ɔ ̀-ɔ ́] Emprunt de : français. Nom. bonbon;
alley (narrower than bɔlon); Gasse (schmaler sweet, candy; Bonbon, Süssigkeit.
als Bɔlon). synonyme: takalagomi.
bɔlɔndugu n.comp. pays Bolon; Bolon country; Bolon bɔnbɔn [ɔ̌-ɔ̌] comparer: bɔn. Verbe. verser peu à
2
Gebiet. Category: Region. peu; pour little by little; in kleinen mengen
bɔlɔnfin [ɔ̀-ɔ̀-ĩ́] n.comp. sous-groupe Bolon sud;
langsam ausleeren.
sub-group of the Bolon people; Untergruppe bɔnbɔn kalaman [ɔ ̀-ɔ ́ à-à-ã́] sucette; lollipop;
des Bolon Volkes. Leckstengel.
bɔlɔngwɛ n.pro. sous-groupe Bolon nord; sub-group bɔnɛ [ɔ̀-ɛ́] 1 • vi. perdre, faire perdre, gâcher,
1
of the Bolon people; Untergruppe des Bolon gaspiller; lose, waste, ruin, spoil, squander ;
Volkes. verlieren, verderben, ruinieren, vergeuden. A
bɔlɔnkɔnɔsɛnɛ Nom. culture en couloir; farming in bi mun ɲɛ mɔgɔ ye ka diɲɛ bɛɛ sɔrɔ ni a bi
lines; in Linien anbauen. bɔnɛ a yɛrɛ nin la. Que sert-il à quelqu’un de
Category: Agriculture. gagner le monde entier, s’il perd son âme?
What good is it if someone gains the whole
bɔlɔnnaden [ɔ́] Morphemes: bɔlɔn-na-den. Nom.
world but loses their own soul. Was nützt es
enfant illégitime; illegitimate child;
einem Menschen die ganze Welt zu gewinnen,
uneheliches Kind. synonyme: jakalimɛ, wenn er seine Seele verliert?
sisankɔfɛden, ɲamɔgɔden, tulonkɛden. 2 • Nom. perte, malheur, calamité, mal, fléau,
bɔlɔti [ɔ-̀ ɔ̀] Emprunt de : français: pelote. Nom. épreuve; loss, misfortune, calamity, plague;
Verlust, Unheil, Katastrophenfall, Übel.
écheveau, pelote de coton, fil de coton
3 • Nom. bastonnade; flogging; Tracht Prügel. n
industriel; skein, ball of cotton, industrial
cotton thread; Knäuel, Baumwollknäuel, bi bɔnɛ jigi i kan
industrieller Baumwollfaden.
bɔnɛ [ɔ̀-ɛ́] Verbe. 1 • renoncer, regretter; give up,
2
bɔn 1 [ɔ] ̀ vt. 1 • verser, renverser, répandre, déborder; renounce, regret; verzichten, preisgeben,
pour out, spill, spread (sth.), scatter, overflow; bedauern, bereuen.
leeren, ausleeren, verbreiten, verschütten, 2 • endurer, supporter, priver; endure, put up
überlaufen. A ka ji bɔn du kɔnɔ. Il a versé de with sb./sth., bear sb./sth; ertragen, aushalten,
l'eau dans la concession. He poured out water erdulden, ertragen.
in the compound. Er hat Wasser im Haus
bɔnɛma [ɔ̀-ɛ̀] Nom. dangereux, funeste; dangerous,
ausgeleert.
disastrous; gefährlich, katastrophal. sira
2 • tomber (fruits, feuilles); fall (fruits,
leaves); fallen (Früchte, Blätter). bɔnɛma. un chemin dangereux. a dangerous
3 • jeter, lancer; throw; werfen. path. ein gefährlicher Weg.
4 • déteindre; rub off; abreiben. bɔnfɛ [ɔ́] Nom. ressemblant à, analogue, voisin;
bɔn [ɔ]́ variante: bɔɔn. Nom. aigle des steppes; resembling, analogous, neighbor; ähnlich,
2
eagle; Steppen Adler. Category: Bird. aquila
analog, Nachbar. Aw ye a bonfɛ ye jamana in
rapax. kan habada? Avez-vous jamais vu dans ce
pays quelqu'un qui lui ressemblait? Have you
bɔn [ɔ]́ variante: bɔɔn. Nom. 1 • grand tambour;
3 ever seen anyone in this country who looked
big drum; grosse Trommel. Category: Musical like him? Haben Sie jemals jemanden in
instrument.
diesem Land gesehen, der wie er aussah?
29/01/2026 62

bɔnfɛya bɔɔn
bɔnfɛya [ɔ́] Nom. ressemblance; resemblance, likeness, bɔnnɔ [ɔ́] Nom. dépenses; expenses, spending;
similarity; Ähnlichkeit. Kosten, Ausgaben. Category: Finance.
bɔnin [ɔ-́ ĩ́] variante: bɔnfɛ. Verbe. ressembler; synonyme: bɔta.
resemble; gleichen, sein wie. Sonsannin bɔnɔgɔla [ɔ́] Morphemes: bɔ-nɔgɔla. Nom.
bɔnin lo fali ma nka a den tɛ. Le lièvre développement, progrès (lit. sortir de la
ressemble à l’âne mais ce n’est pas son enfant. saleté); development, progress (lit. getting out
The hare resembles the donkey, but hi is not of the dirt); Entwicklung, Fortschritt (wörtl.
the donkey's child. Der Hase gleicht dem Esel, aus dem Dreck herauskommen).
aber deswegen ist er noch lange nicht sein bɔnɔgɔlasira. la voie du développement. the
Kind. path of development. der Weg der
bɔnjalan [ɔ́] Nom. 1 • espèce de tambour, un des quatre
Entwicklung.
tambours du koteba; type of drum, one of the bɔnsen [ɔ́] Morphemes: bɔn-sen. Nom. rythme, air,
four drums of the koteba; Trommeltyp, eine danse; rhythm, tune, dance; Rhythmus,
der vier Trommeln der Koteba. Melodie, Tanz.
Category: Musical instrument. bɔnsɔn [ɔ ́-ɔ ́] Morphemes: bɔ-n-sɔn. Nom.
1
2 • danse acrobatique bambara; Bambara
descendant, descendance, postérité,
acrobatic dance; Akrobatischer
génération; descendant, progeny, posterity,
Bambara-Tanz.
offspring, generation; Nachkomme,
bɔnkaju [ɔ̀-à-ú] Nom. mousquet, grand fusil de Abkömmling, Nachkommenschaft, Nachwelt,
chasse; musket, large hunting rifle; Generation. Isirayɛli bɔnsɔn israélites.
Jagdgewehr. Category: Hunt and fish. Israelites, children of Israel. Israelit.
bɔnkaturu [ɔ ̀-à-ú-ú] variante: bɔkaturu. 1 • Nom. bɔnsɔn [ɔ̀-ɔ́] synonyme: fɔlɔn, cɔki.
2
repiquage, transplantation; planting out, variante: bonsɔn. Nom. 1 • jabot; crop; Kropf.
transplanting; Versetzen von Pflanzen,
Category: Parts of an animal. synonyme: ncɔki.
Verpflanzen. Category: Agriculture.
2 • double menton; double chin; Doppelkinn.
2 • Verbe. repiquer; prick out; auspflanzen.
Category: Agriculture. bɔnsɔnin [ɔ́] Nom. acacias avec épines; various acacia
bɔnkɔnɔ [ɔ́] Morphemes: bɔ-n-kɔnɔ. Nom. oubli;
trees with thorns; verschiedenen Akazienarten
mit stacheln. Category: Tree. acacia
oversight, oblivion, forgetting; Versehen,
microstachya.
vergessen. Ne ma a dabɔ a kama, bɔnkɔnɔ
don. Je ne l'ai pas fait exprès, c'est un oubli. I
bɔɲɔgɔman Nom. identique, pareil, semblable,
didn't do it on purpose, it was an oversight. Ich
même, équivalent; identical, equivalent, the
same; gleichwertig, gleich, identisch.
habe es nicht mit Absicht gemacht, es war ein
Versehen. synonyme: siya kelen, sugu kelen,
bɔɲɔgɔnko.
bɔnna [ɔ]́ Morphemes: bɔ-n-na. variante: bɔnan.
Nom. 1 • dérivé; derived; Ableitung, Derivativ. bɔɲɔgɔnko [ɔ́] Nom. 1 • même, pareil, semblable,
Category: Grammar, Language and thought. équivalent; same, similar, equivalent; gleich,
2 • descendance, progéniture, descendant; ähnlich, gleichwertig. synonyme: ɲɔgɔnna,
progeny, descendants, offspring; bɔɲɔgɔman.
Nachkommenschaft, Abkömmlinge,
2 • exemplaire, copie; a copy; eine Kopie.
Nachwuchs. Category: Kinship.
3 • environ; approximately, about; etwa.
bɔnnali synonyme: kɔmafilɛliɲini. Nom. déduction;
bɔɔ [ɔ̀] variante: bɔ. Nom. bambou; bamboo;
deduction; Abzug, Ableitung.
Category: Mathematics. Bambus. Category: Bush, shrub.
oxytenanthera abyssinica.
bɔnnin [ɔ-́ ì] Nom. faucon; hawk; Falke. Category: Bird.
bɔɔn [ɔ ́ɔ ̀] variante: bɔn. Nom. aigle des steppes;
1
bɔnningɛlɛn Nom. faucon des chauve-souris; bat eagle; Steppen Adler. Category: Bird. aquila
hawk; Vogelart, Falke. Category: Bird. rapax.
macheiramphus alcinus.
bɔɔn variante: bɔn. Nom. charbon (maladie);
2
bɔnnkan [ɔ̀] Morphemes: bɔn-n-kan. Nom. anthrax, carbuncle; Milzbrand.
éruptions cutanées, lèpre des postules; skin Category: Disease.
rashes, postules leprosy; Hautausschläge,
postuläre Lepra. Category: Disease.
29/01/2026 63

bɔɔrɔ bu
bɔɔrɔ [ɔ]̀ Verbe. retirer (en gâchant), ôter en grande bɔrɔntɔ [ɔ̀-ɔ̀] Verbe. faire un bruit avec les lèvres en
2
quantité en perdant beaucoup; remove signe de mépris, de désaccord, insulter
(wasting), remove in large quantities while copieusement; make a noise with the lips as a
losing a lot; entfernen (verschwenden), in sign of contempt, disagreement, insult
großen Mengen entfernen und dabei viel copiously; ein Geräusch mit den Lippen als
verlieren. Zeichen von Verachtung,
bɔɔrɔnin [ɔ́] Nom. tout petit, très jeune; very small,
Meinungsverschiedenheit oder reichlicher
Beleidigung.
very young; sehr klein, sehr jung.
bɔrɔsi Emprunt de : français. Nom. brosse; brush;
bɔrɔ [ɔ-̀ ɔ́] variante: bɔrɛ, bɔɔrɛ, bɔɔrɔ. Nom. sac;
Bürste, Pinsel. Category: Tool.
sack; Sack. A bi malokala don bɔrɔ kɔnɔ. Il
met les tiges de riz dans le sac. He is putting
bɔrɔtɔ [ɔ́] Verbe. 1 • divulguer, révéler; disclose,
the rice stalks into the sack. Er legt den Reis in reveal; offenbaren, enthüllen.
den Sack. Category: Container. 2 • ôter une partie, découdre; remove a part,
bɔrɔbɔrɔ [ɔ̀-ɔ̀] Verbe. 1 • couler continuellement (nez,
unsew; ein Teil entfernen, abnähen.
1
3 • annuler un contrat; cancel a contract; einen
pus ...); flowing continuously (nose, pus...);
Vertrag kündigen.
ständig fließend (Nase, Eiter...)
2 • avoir une consistance pâteuse; have a bɔsen [ɔ́] Morphemes: bɔ-sen. Nom. parution,
pasty consistency; dickflüssige Konsistenz numéro, livraison; publication, number,
haben. delivery; Veröffentlichung, Anzahl,
bɔrɔbɔrɔ [ɔ̀-ɔ́-ɔ̀-ɔ́] Verbe. donner beaucoup de fruits
Lieferung.
2
(arbre); give lots of fruit (tree); viel Obst bɔsi 1 [ɔ̀] vt. enlever, saisir; take away, seize;
(Baum) geben. wegnehmen. U ye a bolofɛnw bɛɛ bɔsi a la.
bɔrɔbɔrɔ [ɔ̀-ɔ́-ɔ̀-ɔ́] Nom. ganga de Gambie; Gambian Ils ont pris tous ses biens. They took away all
3
his possessions. Sie haben all seinen Besitz
sandgrouse; Gambisches Sandhuhn.
weggenommen.
Category: Bird. pterocles quadricinctus.
bɔsi [ɔ̀-ì] variante: bɔɔsi. vt. 1 • retirer, extorquer,
bɔrɔgɛ [ɔ-̀ ɔ̀] variante: bɔrɔkɛ. Verbe. être stérile 2
ôter avec force, arracher à; withdraw, take off,
(femelle); to be sterile (female); steril sein
draw out, extort; zurückziehen, erpressen,
(weiblich). bɔrɔgɛmuso femme stérile.
erzwingen.
barren woman. unfruchtbare Frau.
2 • écorcher, égratigner, décortiquer, peler; to
synonyme: denwolobali, bangebali.
skin, flay sb./sth., scratch, husk, shell, peel;
bɔrɔgɛya [ɔ̀-ɔ̀-ɛ̀] Nom. stérilité, être stérile; sterility, häuten, zerkratzen, schälen, enthülsen.
to be sterile; Sterilität, steril sein. bɔsibɔsi Verbe. écorcher; skinned; gehäutet.
bɔrɔkɔ [ɔ-̀ ɔ̀] 1 • Verbe. être boueux, être sale, salir, bɔsili synonyme: diyagoyali, bennkanni. Nom.
souiller; to be muddy, to be dirty, to soil, to extorsion; extortion; Erpressung.
defile; schlammig sein, schmutzig sein,
beschmutzen, verunreinigen.
bɔta [ɔ́] Nom. dépenses; expenses, spending;
2 • Nom. boue, saleté, fumier; mud, dirt, Kosten, Ausgaben. Category: Finance.
manure; Schlamm, Dreck, Mist. synonyme: bɔnnɔ.
bɔrɔn [ɔ]́ variante: bɔrɔ. Verbe. masser; massage, Bɔtisuwana Nom. Botswana; Botswana; Botswana.
knead; massieren. A y'a kɔnɔ bɔrɔn. Il lui a Category: Country.
massé le ventre. He massaged her stomach. Er bɔyɔrɔ Morphemes: bɔ-yɔrɔ. Nom. 1 • lieu d’où on
massierte ihren Bauch.
vient, provenance, nationalité; place you have
bɔrɔntɔ [ɔ̀-ɔ̀] Verbe. 1 • effeuiller, faire tomber en come from, state of origin, nationality; Ort aus
1
grande quantité; to remove leaves, to drop in dem man herkommt, Herkunftsort.
large quantities; Blätter entfernen, in großen 2 • sortie; exit; Ausgang.
Mengen fallen lassen. bɔyɔrɔjan n.comp. étranger (insultant); foreigner;
2 • tuer en grand nombre, décimer; kill in large
Fremder.
numbers, decimate; in großer Zahl töten,
dezimieren. bu 1 [ù] variante: buu. 1 • Nom. son, balle; bran,
chaff, husk; Spreu. synonyme: buu .
1
2 • Verbe. piler pour réduire en poudre; crush to
reduce to powder; zerstossen, zu Pulver
zerstampfen, zu Pulver zerkleinern.
29/01/2026 64

bu bugɛ
bu [ù] variante: buu. Nom. 1 • chair, viande, budubada [ù-ù] variante: bodobada,
2
muscle; meat, flesh, muscle; Fleisch, Muskel. budubɛbudubɛ budubɛdɛ. Verbe. 1 • avoir
synonyme: buu 2 . une démarche chaloupée (de coquetterie,
2 • pulpe, chair de fruits; pulp; Fruchtfleisch. fierté, de fatigue); have a swaying gait (of
coquetry, pride, fatigue); einen schwankenden
bu [ú] variante: buu. Nom. tisserin; weaver bird;
3 Gang haben (aus Koketterie, Stolz,
Weber Vogel. Category: Bird. ploceus Müdigkeit).
melanocephalus. synonyme: buu
3
.
2 • se pavaner; to strut; stolzieren.
bu [ù] Verbe. 1 • être difficile, disputé, rendre 3 • être bien potelée (pour une femme); be very
4
chubby (for a woman); sehr pummelig sein
difficile le règlement d'une affaire; to be
(für eine Frau), mollig.
difficult, to argue, to make it difficult to settle a
matter; schwierig sein, argumentieren, es budubɛdɛlen Adverbe. moelleux, pulpeux, souple,
schwierig machen, eine Angelegenheit zu
doux; soft, pulpy, supple; weich, breiig,
regeln.
geschmeidig. muso budubɛdɛlen femme
2 • chauffer, bouillir, barder (populaire); heat,
pulpeuse. curvy woman. kurvige Frau.
boil (popular); erhitzen, kochen (Volksmund).
A bura dɛ! Ça a bardé ! It got hot! Es hat bufɛɛlɛ [ù] Nom. 1 • tranche fine de viande, chair en
gekocht! Es wurde heiß! feuille; thin slice of meat, flesh in sheets;
dünne Fleischscheibe, Fleisch in Blättern.
bu Verbe. castrer; castrate; kastrieren. Nin tura
5 2 • petite femme maigre (populaire); skinny
bura. Ce taureau a été castré. This bull has little woman (popular); dünne kleine Frau
been castrated. Dieser Bulle wurde kastriert. (Volksmund).
synonyme: kɔgosi.
buga [ù] Nom. propre, coquet, élégant; clean, stylish,
bubaga 1 Nom. termite; termite; Termite. elegant; sauber, stilvoll, elegant.
Category: Insect. synonyme: bagabaga 2 . bugabuga [ú] Nom. écoulement important de larmes;
bubaga [ù] Nom. fétiche protecteur auquel est confié heavy flow of tears; starker Tränenfluss. A ɲɛji
2
un enfant, esprit tutélaire d'un enfant; bɛ bɔ bugabuga ! Ses larmes coulent
protective fetish to which a child is entrusted, abondamment. Her tears flow freely. Ihre
tutelary spirit of a child; Schutzfetisch, dem Tränen fließen reichlich.
ein Kind anvertraut ist, Schutzgeist eines
bugaya [ù-à] 1 • Nom. coquetterie, élégance; coquetry,
Kindes. Category: Religion.
elegance; Koketterie, Eleganz.
bubagajɛ [ú] variante: bubagagwɛ. Nom. 1 • graine
2 • Verbe. être coquet, être élégant; to be
de céréale non arrivée à maturité; unripe
flirtatious, to be elegant; kokett sein, elegant
cereal seed; unreifer Getreidesamen.
sein. A bugayara. Il est coquet. He is
2 • ankylose, fourmillement, engourdissement; flirtatious. Er ist kokett.
ankylosis, tingling, numbness; Ankylose,
Kribbeln, Taubheitsgefühl. bugayi [ú] Adverbe. 1 • d'un seul coup; all at once; auf
bubaganingwɛ [ú] bambara: bubaganinjɛ. Nom. einmal. A sara bugayi. Il est mort d'un seul
coup. He died suddenly. Er starb plötzlich.
termite blanc; white termite; weisse Termite.
Category: Insect. 2 • en grande quantité; in large quantities; in
großen Mengen. A nana ɲɔ ton bugayi. Il est
bubagaso [ú] Morphemes: bubaga-so. Nom.
venu mettre en tas une grande quantité de mil.
termitière; termite-hill; Termitenhügel. He came to pile up a large quantity of millet.
synonyme: nton 1 , toon 1 , ntonkun, Er kam, um eine große Menge Hirse
bagabagaso. anzuhäufen.
bubu [ú] variante: bubutiga. Nom. singe rouge, bugɛ 1 [ú] variante: bukɛ. Adverbe. d'un seul coup,
patas; red monkey; roter Affe. instantanément, raide; all at once, instantly,
Category: Mammal. erythrocebus patas. stiff; auf einmal, sofort, steif. A y'a faga bugɛ.
synonyme: bubunin, sola, warawulen. Il l'a tué d'un seul coup. He killed him with a
single blow. Er tötete ihn mit einem einzigen
bubunin [ú-ú-í] variante: bubu, bubutiga,
Schlag.
warabilen. Nom. singe rouge, patas; red
bugɛ [ú] interj. bien sûr, bien entendu, à coup sûr; of
monkey, Patas Monkey; roter Affe. 2
Category: Mammal. erythrocebus patas. course, for sure; natürlich, sicher. Bugɛ, o bɛ
synonyme: warawulen, bubu. kɛ dɛ! Bien sûr que ça se fera ! Of course it
will happen! Natürlich wird es passieren!
29/01/2026 65

bugɔ bugurida
bugɔ [ù-ɔ́] vt. frapper, battre, se lancer, se jeter; bugubuguli [ú] Nom. binage; second hoeing; zweites
beat, hit; schlagen, hauen. I ye den bugɔ wa ? Hacken. Category: Agriculture.
Est-ce que tu as frappé l’enfant ? Did you hit buguda [ù-ù-á] Nom. hameau, petit groupe isolé de
the child? Hast du das Kind geschlagen?
maisons rurales; hamlet, small group of
bugɔbugɔ [ù-ɔ́-ù-ɔ́] Verbe. tapoter, frapper plusieurs isolated houses in a rural area; Dörfchen,
fois, marteler; rap, strike smartly, to hammer, Siedlung, Weiler. synonyme: togoda.
pound; leicht schlagen, hämmern.
buguli synonyme: birili, kilikanlali. Nom. couvaison;
bugɔli [ù-ɔ̀-í] Nom. la bastonnade; flogging; Tracht breeding; Brut. Category: Animal husbandry.
Prügel.
bugun [ú-ṹ] 1 • Nom. moisissure; mold, mould,
1
bugu 1 [ù-ú] Nom. 1 • paillote, case avec toit de mildew; Schimmel, Moder. Buru bugunna.
chaume, case au toit en paille; house with a Le pain a moisi. The bread is moldy. Das Brot
thatched grass roof; Haus mit Strohdach. ist schimmelig.
Category: Building.
2 • Verbe. moisir; get moldy, moulder, rot;
2 • petit village, hameau, tente; small village, schimmeln. synonyme: fun.
hamlet, tent; kleines Dorf, Weiler, Zelt.
bugun [ú-ú] Nom. brume, brouillard; fog, mist, haze;
bugu [ù-ú] variante: bu, buu. Nom. 1 • chaire, 2
2
Nebel, Dunst. Category: Weather.
viande; flesh, meat; Fleisch.
2 • pulpe; pulp; Fruchtfleisch. Category: Parts
bugun
3
[ú] adj. gris clair; light gray / grey; hellgrau. A
of a plant. ka bugun. C'est gris. It's gray. Es ist grau.
bugu [ú-ú] variante: bugun. vt. augmenter de Category: colour. synonyme: sisijɛ.
3
volume, se multiplier, croître, accroître, bugun [ú] Verbe. augmenter, multiplier croître,
4
grossir, gonfler; grow, multiply; wachsen, sich accroître, grossir, gonfler; increase, multiply
vermehren. N bi malo buguta fɛ. Je veux du grow, increase, swell, swell; zunehmen, sich
riz qui augmente de volume. I want rice that vermehren, wachsen, anschwellen, .
grows in volume. Ich will Reis, der aufgeht. synonyme: bugu .
3
synonyme: bugun.
4 bugunfinbana Nom. oïdium; powdery mildew;
bugu
4
[ù-ú] variante: bu, buu. Nom. son; bran;
Echten Mehltau. Category: Agriculture.
Kleie. Category: Parts of a plant.
buguninka [ù-ù-ì] Nom. fouet, cravache; whip,
bugu
5
[ù-ú] variante: bugun. Verbe. couver, cacher,
riding crop; Peitsche, Reitgerte.
couvrir, blottir; brood, incubate, hide, cover,
bugunnatigɛ [ú] 1 • Verbe. identifier, bien éclairer;
snuggle; brüten, verstecken, zudecken,
kuscheln. Category: Agriculture.
identify, illuminate; identifizieren, beleuchten.
2 • Nom. identité; identity; Identität.
bugubagabugu [ú-ú-à-à-ú-ú] Verbe. être à l'aise,
bugunnatigɛfoto Nom. photo d'identité; identity
avoir à sa disposition, bien profiter d'une
situation agréable, se vautrer dans; to be photo; Identitätsfoto.
comfortable, to have at one's disposal, to take bugunnatigɛsɛbɛn Nom. carte d'identité; identity
full advantage of a pleasant situation, wallow
card; Personalausweis.
in; sich wohl fühlen, zur Verfügung haben,
eine angenehme Situation voll ausnutzen buguri comparer: gwangwan.[ù-ù-í] Nom.
1
schwelgen. 1 • poussière (par terre); dust (on the ground);
bugubɛgɛ [ù-ù] variante: bugubaga. Verbe. tomber Staub (am Boden). Ala ye Adama dilan
d'une manière molle, amortie; fall in a soft, dugukolo buguri la. Dieu a créé Adam de la
cushioned manner; fallen weich und poussière de la terre. God made Adam from the
gedämpft. A y'i bugubɛgɛ ka bin. Il s'est dust of the earth. Gott hat Adam aus dem
laissé tomber. He let himself fall down. Er ließ Staub der Erde gemacht. Category: Land.
sich fallen. 2 • limaille, cendre, sciure; filings, ashes,
sawdust; Späne, Asche, Sägemehl.
bugubon variante: buguso. Nom. case, paillote,
synonyme: jiribuguri.
maison à toit de chaume; hut; Hütte.
Category: Building. buguri 2 [ù-ù-í] variante: bugurigwɛ. Nom. cendre;
bugubugu [ù-ù] Verbe. lancer en tournoyant, lancer ash; Asche.
avec force; throw while spinning, throw with bugurida Nom. géomancie, divination par la
force; beim Drehen werfen, mit Kraft werfen. poussière; geomancy, dust divination;
... ka bere bugubugu ... lancer le bâton. Staub-Wahrsagerei. Category: Religion.
throw the stick. den Stock werfen.
29/01/2026 66

buguridala bulubulu
buguridala [ù-ù-ì-à] Morphemes: buguri-da-la. bulencɛ variante: bulancɛ, burencɛ, burancɛ. Nom.
Nom. géomancien; geomancer; Geomant. gardénia mâle; kind of shrub; Baumart.
synonyme: laturutigi, laturudala, cɛndala. Category: Bush, shrub. gardenia ternifolia.
synonyme: nburencɛ.
bugurigwɛ [ù-ù-ì-ɛ́] bambara: bugurinjɛ. cendre;
ashes; Asche. synonyme: bugurinjɛ. bulenmuso variante: bulanmuso, burenmuso. Nom.
gardénia femelle; kind of shrub; Baumart.
bugurima [ù-ù-ì-á] Nom. poussiéreux; dusty;
Category: Bush, shrub. gardenia erubescens.
staubig. synonyme: nburenmuso.
bugurinjɛ Nom. cendre; ash; Asche. bugurinjɛ bulɛ [ú] Verbe. 1 • préparer du mil (le piler, le
kalanman cendre chaude. hot ash. heiße moudre); prepare millet (pound it, grind it);
Asche. synonyme: bugurigwɛ. Hirse zubereiten (stampfen, mahlen).
buguso [ù-ù] Morphemes: bugu-so. Nom. paillote,
Category: Food.
2 • bien pilé, bien moulu, bien lisse; well
maison à toit de chaume; straw hut, thatched
pounded, well ground, very smooth; Gut
roof house; Strohhütte, Reetdachhaus.
gestampft, gut gemahlen, sehr glatt.
Category: Building.
bulon [ù-ó] Nom. 1 • case, vestibule, pièce d'entrée à
bugutufa [ù-ù] Morphemes: bugu-tufa. Nom. case
deux portes qui donne accès à la concession;
ronde en briques de banco; round hut made of
hut, vestibule, hallway; Hütte, Vorraum.
mud bricks; runde Hütte aus Erd-Backsteinen.
Category: Building.
buguturubugubɔ
2 • lieu de rencontre familiale, où se traitent les
[ù-ù-ú-ú-ù-ù-ɔ́] Morphemes: bugu-turu- affaires importantes de la maisonnée; family
bugu-bɔ. variante: buguturubugujɛnsɛn. meeting place, where important household
affairs are discussed; Familientreffpunkt, an
Nom. nomade, Peul; nomad, Fulani; Nomade,
dem wichtige Haushaltsangelegenheiten
Fulani. Fulaw ye buguturubugubɔ ye. Les
besprochen werde.
Peuls sont des nomades.
bulonba [ù] Nom. case à palabres; palaver house,
buguya See main entry: buguyali. Nom. croissance,
meeting place for discussions; Treffpunkt für
multiplication; growth, multiplication;
Diskussionen.
Wachstum, Vermehrung.
bulonda [ù-ò] Morphemes: bulon-da. Nom.
buguyali Variant: buguya. Nom. croissance; growth;
1 • entrée du vestibule, porte de vestibule, porte
Wachstum.
sacrée; vestibule entrance, vestibule door,
bula [ù] Nom. 1 • un des cinq clans mandingues sacred door; Vorraumeingang, Vorraumtür,
1
(Cissoko, Doumbia, Kamissoko, Saganogo); heilige Tür.
one of the five Mandinka clans; einer der fünf 2 • lignée, ancêtres; lineage, ancestors;
Mandinka-Clans. Category: Community. Abstammung, Vorfahren. synonyme: juruya.
2 • certains lignées mandingues; certain bulondasu [ù-ò-ù] Morphemes: bulon-da-su.
Mandingo lineages; bestimmte
Mandingo-Linien.
Nom. ancêtre enterré sous le seuil du vestibule;
ancestor buried under the threshold of the
bula 2 [ú] Nom. boule de bleu, indigo en bleu, bleu; vestibule; Vorfahr unter der Schwelle des
ball of blue, indigo in blue, blue; Kugel aus Vestibüls begraben. Category: Religion.
Blau, Indigo in Blau, Blau. Category: colour. bulontigi [ù-ò] Morphemes: bulon-tigi. Nom. grand
bula 3 [ú] Nom. compresse hygiénique des femmes; chef de famille; great head of the family;
women's hygienic compress; großes Familienoberhaupt.
Hygienekompresse für Damen.
bulu Nom. balle: petite comme on l’utilise pour
1
bulakɔnɔnin Nom. cordon-bleu; red-cheeked jouer au baby-foot; ball: small sized like those
Cordon-blue; Vogelart. Category: Bird. used with table football; Ball: klein, wie für
estrilda bengala. Tischfussball.
bulama [ú-á-á] variante: bulaman. adj. bleu, de bulu [ú-ú] comparer: furaburu. Nom. feuille,
2
couleur bleue; blue; blau. Category: colour. foliole; leaf, leaflets; Blatt, Fiederblatt.
bulanbulan [ú] variante: bɔlan, bulan. Nom.
Category: Parts of a plant.
néophyte, débutant, jeunot; neophyte, bulubulu 1 [ú] Verbe. marcher avec un vertement
beginner, young person; Neuling, Anfänger, traînant par terre; walk with dragging garment
junger Mensch. bulanbulandonso chasseur on the ground; gehen mit am Boden
néophyte. beginner as a hunter. Neuling in schleifendem Gewand.
Sachen Jagd.
29/01/2026 67

bulubulu bunbun
bulubulu [ú] Adverbe. 1 • en ébullition, très chaud; buma [ù] Morphemes: bu-ma. Nom. pourvu de
2
boiling, very hot; kochend, sehr heiß. chair, charnu, avec de la viande; provided with
2 • en grande nombre; in large numbers; in flesh, fleshy, with meat; mit Fleisch versehen,
großer Zahl. fleischig. kolokuru buma. un os avec de la
3 • de grande longueur; of great length; von viande. a bone with meat. ein Knochen mit
großer Länge. Fleisch.
bulukankɔnɔ synonyme: kɔkukankɔnɔ. bumayɔrɔ [ù-à] Morphemes: bu-ma-yɔrɔ. Nom.
variante: bulukukɔnɔnin. Nom. jacana africain; partie charnue, chair; fleshy part, flesh;
Lilly-trotter; Wasservogel (Art).
fleischiger Teil, Fleisch.
Category: Bird. actophilornis africana. bumun [ú-ú] synonyme: bunbu, bunbun. Nom.
synonyme: bulukukɔnɔnin, kɔnɔfili. kapokier rouge; red kapok tree; roter Kapok
buluki [ú] faire de façon précipitée, faire mal quelque Baum. Category: Tree. bombax costatum.
synonyme: bunbun.
chose, faire subrepticement; to do something 1
hastily, to do something badly, to do bumunan variante: bumunna. Nom. sauce préparée
surreptitiously; etwas überstürzt tun, etwas
avec les fleurs du kapokier rouge; kind of
schlecht machen, heimlich tun.
kapok sauce; Kapok Sauce. Category: Food.
buluku 1 [ù-ù-ú] variante: buruku. vt. 1 • labourer, bumunso [ù-ú-ó] Morphemes: bumu-so.
retourner le sol; plough, turn over the soil;
variante: bumuso, bununso. Nom. balançoire;
pflügen, um-stechen, hacken. Foro
swing; Schaukel. synonyme: bununso.
bulukulen, u ye danni kɛ. Quand ils avaient
labouré le champ, ils ont semé. When the field bunahadamaden [ú] Emprunt de : arabe. Nom.
was ploughed, they sowed. Als sie fertig être humain, homme; human being, man;
gepflügt hatten, haben sie gesät. Mensch. synonyme: adamaden, mɔgɔ,
Category: Agriculture. mɔgɔninfin.
2 • retourner (sur le gril); flip (on grill);
umdrehen (auf dem Grill).
bunahadamadenya [ú] Emprunt de : arabe. Nom.
humanité, condition humaine; humanity,
buluku variante: buruku. Nom. espèce d'herbe; kind of
2 human condition; Menschlichkeit,
grass; Grasart. Category: Grass, herb, vine. menschlicher Zustand.
echinochloa stagnina. synonyme: hadamadenya.
buluku 3 [ù-ù] Verbe. 1 • détruire, anéantir; destroy, bunaki [ù-à] 1 • Verbe. érafler, mettre la chair à nu,
annihilate; zerstören, vernichten.
meurtrir, écorcher; to scratch, to bare the flesh,
2 • vendre à perte, brader; sell at a loss, sell off; to bruise, to flay; kratzen, das Fleisch
mit Verlust verkaufen, ausverkaufen. entblößen, verletzen, häuten.
bulukubɛlɛkɛ [ù-ù-ù] Verbe. cuire à demi, griller à 2 • Verbe. faire partir en frottant, égrainer;
remove by rubbing, flake; durch Reiben
demi; half cook, half grill; halb kochen, halb
grillen.
entfernen, abblättern.
3 • Nom. écorchure, ulcère de peau; abrasion,
bulukukɔnɔnin Nom. jacana, oiseau aquatique
skin ulcer; Abschürfungen, Hautgeschwüre.
(espèce); water bird (species); Wasservogel Category: Disease.
(Art). Category: Bird. actophilornis africana.
bunbayɔrɔ Nom. piscine; pool, swimming pool;
synonyme: bulukankɔnɔ, kɔnɔfili,
ngɔkukankɔnɔ, kɔkukankɔnɔ.
Schwimmbad, Schwimmbecken.
synonyme: pisini.
bulukuli [ù-ù-ù-í] Nom. labour; farm labor ;
bunbun Nom. arbre (espèce); tree sp; Baumart.
Landarbeit. Category: Agriculture. 1
synonyme: walanbiri. Category: Tree. bombax costatum.
synonyme: bumun.
bulukusu [ù-ù-ù] Verbe. abîmer, détruire, bousiller;
1 bunbun [ú] Verbe. couvrir, envelopper, emmitoufler;
damage, destroy, ruin; beschädigen, zerstören, 2
ruinieren.
cover, wrap, muffle; bedecken, einwickeln,
dämpfen. I tɛ finin dɔ bunbun i la? Tu ne te
bulukusu [ú] Adverbe. furtivement, subrepticement;
2 couvres pas d'un pagne? Don't you cover
furtively, surreptitiously; heimlich. A bɔra yourself with a cloth? Bedeckst du dich nicht
bulukusu. Il est sorti furtivement. He came mit einem Stofftuch?
out stealthily. Er kam heimlich heraus. bunbun [ú] Verbe. 1 • se répandre (maladie); spread
3
(disease); sich ausbreiten (Krankheit).
Category: Disease.
29/01/2026 68

bunge burancɛ
2 • enfler, gonfler, prendre du volume; swell, bunun Nom. source d'eau; spring of water;
1
gain volume; anschwellen, an Volumen
Wasserquelle. Category: Water.
gewinnen.
bunun [ú-ú] synonyme: bunukoro, tɔnkɔnɔ.
bunge [ú] variante: bonge. Nom. poisson (espèce); 2
variante: bunu, bunun, bunuba. Nom. canard
Barbel fish, fish (species); Fisch (Art).
Category: Fish. mormyrops oudote et
armé, oie de Gambie, sarcelle (terme
mormyrops delicious.
générale); Gambian goose, duck; Gans (Art),
Ente. Category: Bird. plectropterus gambensis.
bunsan [ù] Nom. 1 • frange, houppe, gland; fringe,
1 bununbunun [ù-ù] variante: bunumunu. Verbe.
puff, tassel; Fransen, Puff, Quaste.
1 • réduire en cendres les braises; reduce the
2 • être en touffe, en bouquet, en épi, être
embers to ashes; die Glut zu Asche reduzieren.
chevelu; to be in a tuft, in a bouquet, in a spike,
2 • cuire sous la cendre (des tubercules); cook
to be hairy; in einem Büschel, in einer Ähre
sein, behaart sein. Kaba bunsanna. Le maïs a
in ashes (tubers); in Asche (Knollen) kochen.
formé épi. The corn has formed an ear. Der bununda [ú-ú-á] Nom. source de fleuve ou de rivière;
Mais hat eine Ähre gebildet. source of river; Wasserquelle, Quelle.
bunsan [ù] Verbe. s'ébattre; frolic; herumtollen. k'i Category: Water.
2
bunsan ji la. s'ébattre dans l'eau. frolic in the bununkoro [ú] variante: bununkorocɛ,
water. im Wasser herumtollen. bununkurucɛ. Nom. canard casqué, canard
bunten [ù-è] variante: bunte. vt. piler pour réduire armé; Comb duck; Glanzente. Category: Bird.
sarkidiornis melenota ou Plectropterus
en farine; pound into flour; zerstoßen,
gambensis. synonyme: bununsama.
zerstampfen, stampfen, mahlen, zermahlen.
buntenin [ú-é-í] variante: bunteni. Nom. scorpion, bununsama synonyme: bunuba.
scorpion vert ou jaunâtre; scorpion, green or variante: bunusama. Nom. gros canard; duck
yellowish scorpion; Skorpion, grüner oder sp; Ente (Art). Category: Bird.
gelblicher Skorpion. Category: Spider. synonyme: bununkoro.
synonyme: kuruwɔɔrɔ.
bununso [ú] Nom. balançoire; swing; Schaukel.
bunteninku Morphemes: buntenin-ku. synonyme: bumunso.
variante: bunteninkun. Nom. gâchette du fusil;
bura [ù-á] Verbe. 1 • cuire; to cook; kochen. A
gun trigger; Pistolenabzug, Gewehrabzug.
burala wa? C'est cuit ? Is it cooked? Ist es
bunteninso Morphemes: bunteni-so. gekocht?
variante: buntenin-ka-so, bunteniso. Nom. 2 • éprouver, faire souffrir; to make suffer;
perce-oreille, forficule; horse scorpion, leiden lassen.
earwig; Skorpion (Art), Ohrwurm. 3 • très mou, très tendre, bien moelleux; very
Category: Spider, Insect. Forficula soft, very tender; sehr weich, sehr zart.
auricularia.
buraburaba synonyme: pɔrɔn ŋɔnintan. Nom. espèce
buntenintulu [ú] Nom. huile de scorpion; scorpion
de plante; kind of plant; Pflanze (Art).
oil; Skorpionöl. Category: Grass, herb, vine. amaranthus
bunuba [ú-ú-á] synonyme: bunusama, bunukoro. hybridus, ou amaranthus viridis.
Nom. gros canard, oie de Gambie; big duck, buraburabanin Nom. espèce de plante; kind of plant;
Gambian goose; grosse Ente, gambische Pflanze (Art). Category: Grass, herb, vine.
Gans. Category: Bird. plectropterus amaranthus graecizans.
gambensis.
buran See main entry: .[ú-á] variante: bilan, biran.
bunukoro synonyme: bunu, bunuba. Nom. canard
Nom. membre de belle-famille, beaux-frères,
armé, oie de Gambie; Gambian goose; Gans belles-sœurs, bru, gendre; in-law,
(Art). Category: Bird. plectroperus gambensis. daughter-in-law, son-in-law; Schwager,
bunukorokwagwɛ Nom. souchet; Shoveller; Ente Schwägerin, Schwiegertochter,
(Art). Category: Bird. anas clypeata.
Schwiegersohn. Category: Kinship.
bunukɔrɔnin Nom. Dendrocygne, canard casqué; burancɛ variante: birancɛ. Variant: birancɛ. n.comp.
Whistling duck; Ente (Art). Category: Bird.
beau-père, frère du père ou de la mère de
l'épouse, frère plus âgé de l'époux ou de
synonyme: myɛmyɛnin.
l’épouse, gendre, beau-fils; father-in-law;
bunukurucɛ synonyme: bunukɔrɔnin. Nom. canard Schwiegervater. Category: Kinship.
casqué; knob-billed goose; Gans (Art). synonyme: burankɛ.
Category: Bird. sarkidiornis melanota.
29/01/2026 69

burankɛ buruja
burankɛ [ú] Nom. beau-père, frère du père ou de la buruburu [ù-ù-ú-ú] Nom. braises, cendres encore
2
mère de l'épouse, frère plus âgé de l'époux ou chaudes; embers; glühende Kohle, Glut.
de l’épouse, gendre, beau-fils; father-in-law,
buruburu [ù-ù] Verbe. 1 • troubler, agiter dans un
brother of the wife's father or mother, older 3
liquide; to disturb, to stir in a liquid; stören,
brother of the husband or wife, son-in-law,
eine Flüssigkeit einrühren.
son-in-law; Schwiegervater, Bruder des Vaters
oder der Mutter der Ehefrau, älterer Bruder des 2 • troublé, brouillé; troubled, confused;
Ehemanns oder der Ehefrau, Schwiegersohn. beunruhigt, verwirrt. Baji buruburula. Ils ont
Category: Kinship. synonyme: burancɛ. troublé l'eau du fleuve. They disturbed the
water of the river. Sie störten das Wasser des
buranmuso variante: buramuso. Nom. belle-mère,
Flusses.
belle-sœur, belle-fille, bru; mother-in-law,
buruburu [ú] Verbe. écoulement régulier et
sister-in-law, daughter-in-law; 4
Schwiegermutter, Schwägerin, important; regular and significant flow;
Schwiegertochter. Category: Kinship. regelmäßiger und signifikanter Fluss. Ɲɔ
buranna Nom. lieu d'habitation de la belle-famille, des bɔnna bɔrɛ fɛ buruburu. Le mil s'est écoulé
du sac. The millet leaked out of the bag. Die
beaux-parents; place where the in-laws live;
Wohnort der Schwiegereltern.
Hirse lief aus dem Sack.
burannaka [ú] Nom. belle-famille; in-laws; buruburuba Nom. grenouille ou crapaud; frog or
Schwiegereltern.
toad; Frosch oder Kröte.
Category: Amphibian.
buranya [ú] Nom. relation entre bau-parents, lien de
burudamɛ [ù-ù-à-ɛ́] variante: burudaamɛ. Nom.
mariage entre deux familles; relationship
Touareg / Tamacheq (ethnie); Tamasheq /
between in-laws, marriage bond between two
Tuareg (ethnic group); Tamascheq / Tuareg
families; Beziehung zwischen
Volksgruppe. burudamɛkan langue touareg,
Schwiegereltern, Eheband zwischen zwei
Familien. Category: Kinship. tamacheq. Tuareg language, Tamasheq.
Tuareg-Sprache, Tamascheq.
bureke Nom. arbre (espèce); tree sp; Baumart.
Category: Community. synonyme: taamasɛki.
Category: Tree. gardenia ternifolia.
burudilanyɔrɔ Morphemes: buru-dilan-yɔrɔ. Nom.
Burkina kanw Nom. les langues du Burkina ;
boulangerie; bakery; Bäckerei.
languages of Burkina; Sprachen von Burkina.
Category: Building. synonyme: burulanjeni,
Category: Language.
burugosiyɔrɔ, burujeniyɔrɔ.
buru [ú-ú] Nom. 1 • trompette, klaxon; trumpet, car
1
burufiyɛ n.comp. 1 • la sonnerie de la trompette;
horn; Trompete, Hupe. Category: Musical
instrument. synonyme: sɔneri, pipi. sounding of a trumpet, warning sound;
1
Trompetengebläse.
2 • canon de fusil; gun barrel; Gewehrlauf.
2 • fin du monde; end of the world; Ende der
3 • trompe, corne; horn; Rüssel, Horn.
Welt. a tɛ kɛ fo burufiyɛ
buru [ù-ù] Nom. pain; bread; Brot. Category: Food.
2 burufyɛla [ú] Nom. trompettiste, joueur de trompe ou
synonyme: buuru.
1 de corne; trumpeter, trumpet or horn player;
buru [ú-ú] synonyme: furaburu. Nom. feuille; leaf; Trompeter, Trompeter oder Hornist.
3
Blatt. Category: Parts of a plant. burufyɛlaw fanfare. brass band. Fanfare.
synonyme: furabulu, jiribulu. burugosiyɔrɔ Morphemes: buru-gosi-yɔrɔ. Nom.
buru [ú-ú] Nom. limbe; limb, blade; Blattspreite. boulangerie; bakery; Bäckerei.
4
Category: Parts of a plant. synonyme: burudilanyɔrɔ, burulanjeni,
buru [ú-ú] Nom. cylindre; cylinder; Zylinder.
burujeniyɔrɔ.
5
Category: Mathematics. synonyme: silɛndiri. buruja [ú] Verbe. 1 • gâter la réputation de quelqu'un,
dénigrer, critiquer, dire du mal, bafouer,
buruburu Nom. débris; fragments, bits, morsels of;
1 humilier; spoil someone's reputation,
Stücke, Teile, Kleinteile. suman buruburu denigrate, criticize, speak ill of, flout,
débris d’aliments. bits of food. Nahrungsteile. humiliate; Den Ruf einer Person verderben,
si buruburu débris de cheveux (ex. par terre verunglimpfen, kritisieren, schlecht über
après s’être fait coiffé). bits of hair (e.g. on jemanden reden, missachten, erniedrigen.
floor after having a haircut). Haarreste. 2 • gaspiller; to waste, squander;
safunɛ buruburu débris de savon. fragments verschwenden.
of soap. Seifenstücke.
29/01/2026 70

burujeniyɔrɔ busanbusan
burujeniyɔrɔ [ú] Morphemes: buru-jeni-yɔrɔ. 2 • jeter, faire tomber; throw, drop; werfen,
fallen lassen.
Nom. boulangerie; bakery; Bäckerei.
3 • faire une fausse couche; have a
synonyme: burulanjeni, burudilanyɔrɔ,
miscarriage; eine Fehlgeburt haben.
burugosiyɔrɔ.
4 • tomber amoureux; fall in love; sich
buruju [ú-ú-ú] Nom. origine, généalogie; origin, verlieben.
genealogy, lineage; Ursprung, Genealogie. burunburun Verbe. tomber (à répétition); fall several
Jeli bi mɔgɔw buruju fɔ. Le griot raconte la
times; mehrmals /wiederholt fallen.
généalogie des gens. The griot recounts
Fulaburujalan bi burunburun. Les feuilles
people’s genealogy. Der Griot erzählt die
sèches tombent à répétition. The dry leaves are
Genealogie der Leute. synonyme: masajigin.
falling in a repeated manner. Die trockene
burukan Morphemes: buru-kan. n.comp. son de la Blätter sind am Fallen.
trompette; trumpet call; Blasen der Trompete. Burundi Nom. Burundi; Burundi; Burundi.
Burukina Faso comparer: faso.[ú-ú-í-á à-ó] n.pro. Category: Country.
Burkina Faso; Burkina Faso; Burkina Faso. burunin [ú-ú-í] variante: buru. Nom. trompette;
Category: Country. trumpet; Trompete. Category: Musical
buruku variante: buluku. vt. labourer, retourner; instrument.
1
plow, plough; pflügen. Category: Agriculture. buruntu [ù-ù] variante: buruntun. Verbe.
buruku variante: buluku. Nom. espèce de plante, 1 • déborder d'un panier, répandre en désordre;
2
bourgou; kind of plant; Pflanzenart.
overflow from a basket, spill in disorder; Aus
Category: Grass, herb, vine. echinochloa
einem Korb überlaufen, in Unordnung
stagnina.
verschütten. Segi buruntura. La corbeille a
débordé. The basket is overflowing. Der Korb
burukuburuku [ù-ù-ù] Verbe. agiter un liquide,
quillt über.
remuer dans un liquide; stir a liquid, stir in a
2 • effeuiller (une branche); strip the leaves (a
liquid; eine Flüssigkeit umrühren. A bɛ kala
branch); die Blätter (einen Zweig) abstreifen.
burukuburuku ji la. Il agite le bâton dans
burusi [ù-ù-í] Emprunt de : français. Nom. brousse,
l'eau. He waves the stick in the water. Er
schwenkt den Stock im Wasser.
région inhabitée; bush, countryside; Busch,
auf dem Land, ländliche Gegend, unbewohnte
burukukɛ [ù-ù-ù] variante: burukucɛ. Nom. espèce Gegend. burusi kɔnɔ en brousse. in the
de plante; kind of plant; Pflanzenart. ’bush’. im Busch. synonyme: kongo .
1
Category: Grass, herb, vine. echinochloa
pyramidalis. burututu [ú] Nom. écoulement incessant; incessant
burukuli [ú-ú-ú-í] synonyme: cayali, yɛrɛkɛli. Nom. flow; unaufhörlicher Fluss. A kumana
burututu. Il a parlé longuement. He spoke at
prolifération; increase, augmentation;
Vermehrung. length. Er sprach für eine sehr lange Zeit.
burukutu [ú] variante: bulukutu. 1 • Verbe. partir buruwɛti [ù-ù-ɛ́-í] Emprunt de : français. Nom.
précipitamment; leave in a hurry; eilig brouette; wheelbarrow; Schubkarre.
weggehen. Category: Agricultural tool.
2 • Nom. brusquement; suddenly, abruptly; busan [ú] variante: bisan. Nom. badine, verge,
1
plötzlich. branche flexible; stick, rod, flexible branch;
burulanjeni [ú] Emprunt de : français. Nom. Stock, Stab, flexibler Ast, Rute.
boulangerie; bakery, bakehouse; Bäckerei. busan [ú] Verbe. être difficile, barder, faire du vilain;
2
synonyme: burudilanyɔrɔ, burugosiyɔrɔ, be difficult, act naughty; schwierig sein. A ko
burujeniyɔrɔ. bɛna busan. L'affaire va barder. The case is
buruman adj. cylindrique; cylindrical; going to get messy. Der Fall wird chaotisch
zylinderförmig. Category: Mathematics.
werden.
burun [ù-ú] variante: bunun. vi. 1 • tomber (pour busanbusan [ú] Adverbe. gravement, rudement,
violemment; seriously, roughly, violently,
une chose de petite taille), perdre, égarer; fall,
get lost; fallen, verlieren, verlegen.
harshly; ernsthaft, grob, heftig. A y'u kɔrɔfɔ
Fulaburujalan bi burun. Les feuilles sèches busanbusan. Il les a rudement critiqués. He
tombent. The dry leaves fall to the ground. Die harshly criticized them. Er kritisierte sie
trockenen Blätter fallen. scharf.
29/01/2026 71

busɛɛ byɛdawolo
busɛɛ [ú] Adverbe. très finement moulu, très lisse; buu [ú] variante: buwaan. Adverbe. très rouge,
4
very finely ground, very smooth; sehr fein rouge vif; very red, bright red; sehr rot,
gemahlen, sehr glatt. leuchtend rot. synonyme: coyi .
2
busɛlɛ [ú-ɛ̀-ɛ̀] interj. tout va bien !; everything is fine buuru [ú-ú] variante: buru. Nom. pain; loaf of
1
!; Alles ist in Ordnung! Marahaba ! Busɛlɛ ! bread; Brot. Category: Food. synonyme: buru.
2
busi comparer: buzi. Emprunt de : français. Nom. buuru [ù] 1 • Verbe. troubler; trouble, disturb;
2
bougie; candle; Kerze. stören, trüben.
buteli [ú-é-í] Emprunt de : français. Nom. bouteille; 2 • Nom. boue, dépôt dans un liquide; mud,
bottle; Flasche. Category: Container. deposit in a liquid; Schlamm, Ablagerung in
synonyme: dunden.
einer Flüssigkeit, Trester.
3 • Nom. remous; swirl; Strudel.
buteli kankɔrɔla Nom. col de la bouteille; neck of
buurufununan Morphemes: buru-fununan. Nom.
the bottle, bottle neck; Flaschenhals, Hals der
Flasche. levure; yeast; Hefe, Sauerteig. synonyme: biri 6 .
butelidayɛlɛnan Nom. décapsuleur; bottle-opener; Buwa [ù-á] Nom. Papa; Dad; Papa.
Flaschenöffner. Category: Tool. Category: Kinship. synonyme: baba 1 .
butelifɛɛrɛn variante: butelifɛrɛn. n.comp. tesson de buwasɔn comparer: minnifɛn.[ú-á-ɔ ́] Emprunt de
bouteille; shard; Scherbe. : français. Nom. boisson; drink; Getränk.
butigi [ù-í-í] Emprunt de : français. Nom. boutique; buwati Emprunt de : français. Nom. boîte; box, tin, can;
boutique, small shop; Laden, Einkaufsladen.
Dose, Büchse, Schachtel. Category: Container.
Category: Building.
buwatidayɛlɛnan Nom. ouvre-boites; tin-opener,
butii [ú] Adverbe. en grande quantité et dense; in
can-opener; Büchsenöffner, Dosenöffner.
large quantities and dense; in großen Mengen
Category: Agricultural tool.
und dicht. Cɛncɛn bɛ sojɔyɔrɔ butii. Il y a une
buyabuya [ú] Adverbe. en ébullition; boiling;
grande quantité de sable sur le chantier. There
is a large amount of sand on the construction kochend. Degere 100 funteni hakɛ de bɛ ji
site. Auf der Baustelle liegt viel Sand. wuli buyabuya. L'eau bout à 100 degrés.
butɔn [ù-ɔ́] Emprunt de : français. Nom. bouton; Water boils at 100 degrees. Wasser kocht bei
100 Grad.
button; Knopf.
buyaki [ù-à-í] Nom. goyave; guava; Guave.
buturu [ù-ú-ú] Nom. grand corbeille (en bambou), 1
Category: Types of food. Psidium guajava.
panier; big basket; grosser Korb.
buyaki [ù-à-í] Nom. goyavier; guava tree;
buturunin [ú] Nom. jeune être, poussin de un à quatre 2
Goyavenbaum. Category: Tree. psidium
jours, personne jeune; young being, chick from
guajava.
one to four days old, young person; Jungtier,
ein bis vier Tage altes Küken, junger Mensch. buyubɛyɛ [ù-ù] 1 • Verbe. marcher lourdement (pour
kamalen buturunin. un tout jeune homme. a une personne petite et corpulente); walk
very young man. ein sehr junger Mann. heavily (for a short, heavy person); schwer
buturuninkunkolo Nom. espèce de plante; kind of
gehen (für eine kleine, schwere Person).
2 • Nom. hippopotame (nom de louange pour
plant; Pflanze (Art). Category: Grass, herb,
l'hippopotame); hippopotamus (praise name
vine. acanthospermum hispidum.
for hippopotamus); Nilpferd (Lobname für
buu 1 [ùú] Jula: bu. Nom. son (de céréale); chaff; Nilpferd).
Spreu. ɲɔbu son de mil. millet chaff. Hirse buzi comparer: busi. Emprunt de : français. bougie;
Spreu. synonyme: bu 1 . candle; Kerze.
buu 2 [ùú] Jula: bu. synonyme: bugu. Nom. 1 • chair byɛ [ɛ̀] variante: byɛda. Nom. sexe de la femme,
(sans os); flesh, meat; Fleisch. synonyme: bu . vulve; female sex, vulva; weibliches
2
2 • muscle; muscle; Muskel. Geschlechtsorgan, Vulva. Category: Body.
synonyme: baɲɛba, kere, biyɛdagolo.
buu Jula: bu. Nom. tisserin à tête noire;
3
black-headed Weaver; Vogelart.
byɛdawolo [ɛ̀-à] Nom. grandes lèvres; large female
Category: Bird. ploceus melaonocephalus. lips; große weibliche Lippen. Category: Body.
synonyme: bu .
3
29/01/2026 72

byɛkisɛ cancan
byɛkisɛ [ɛ]̀ Nom. clitoris; clitoris; Klitoris. byɛwolofitinin Nom. petites lèvres; small lips; kleine
Category: Body. synonyme: kesekele, musoku, Lippen. Category: Body.
kere, kerekisɛ.
C - c
ca comparer: caman.[á] variante: can. adj.pred. caku [á] variante: cako. Nom. fibres de sisal; sisal
être beaucoup, nombreux, plusieurs, en fibers; Sisalfasern.
quantité, abondant, fréquent; to be much,
calacala [á] Adverbe. très amer; very bitter; sehr bitter.
many, a lot, abundant, plentiful, frequent; viel
sein, zahlreich sein, reichlich, häufig. Kɔrɔsiri calawu [á] variante: yalawu. Adverbe. d'un
kɛ ! Mobili ka ca ! Fais attention ! Il y a mouvement brusque vers le haut; with a
beaucoup de voitures ! Watch out! There are sudden upward movement; mit einer
lots of cars! Paß auf, es hat viele Autos. A ka plötzlichen Aufwärtsbewegung.
ca ni tan ye. Il y a plus que dix. There are caloncalon [á] Verbe. flâner, vagabonder, traîner;
more than ten. Es hat mehr als zehn. stroll, wander, hang out; bummeln, wandern,
caaman [á-ã́] variante: caman. adj. beaucoup, flanieren. A bɛ caloncalon mɔgɔw dala. Il
flâne chez les gens. He wanders around
nombreux, plusieurs, très grande quantité,
people's homes.
abondant, en quantité, fréquent; many, a lot of,
several, abundant, frequent; viele, mehrere. A caman comparer: ca.[á-á] variante: caaman. adj.
ma nɔnɔ caman min. Il n'a pas bu beaucoup 1 • beaucoup, nombreux; much, many; viel,
de lait. He did not drink a lot of milk. Er hat zahlreich, häufig. Mɔgɔ caman. Beaucoup de
nicht viel Milch getrunken. monde. Many people. viele Leute.
caani [à] variante: caana. Verbe. torsader, tresser; 2 • fréquent; frequent; häufig.
twist, braid; drehen, flechten. camancɛ [á-á-ɛ́] variante: cɛmancɛ. Nom. milieu,
caba [á] Adverbe. 1 • avec force, avec détermination; centre; middle, centre; Mitte, Zentrum.
with strength, with determination; mit Kraft, Camancɛ Ameriki Nom. Amérique centrale; central
mit Entschlossenheit. A y'i sigi caba. Il s'assit America; Zentral Amerika. Category: Region.
avec détermination. He sat down with
camancɛci variante: cɛmancɛci. n.comp. ligne
determination. Er setzte sich mit
Entschlossenheit. médiane; center line; Mittellinie.
synonyme: gɛrɛntilannan.
2 • carrément, en provoquant; frankly, by
provoking; Ehrlich gesagt, indem ich camancɛkalan Nom. enseignement secondaire;
provoziere.
secondary education, secondary level;
Cadi Nom. Tchad; Chad; Tschad. Sekundarstufe, Mittelstufe. Category: Learn.
Category: Country. camancɛrabaana [á] Nom. doigt du milieu, majeur;
cajo [á] variante: caco. Nom. 1 • animal à front et middle finger; Mittelfinger. Category: Body.
pattes blanches; animal with white front and synonyme: cɛmabana, bolonkɔnijan.
legs; Tier mit weißer Stirn und weißen Beinen.
can [à] Adverbe. 1 • avec décision, inflexible, net
2 • personne (le plus souvent une femme) qui
(refuser), être décidé; be determined, with
se fait éclairer la peau; person (most often a
determination, inflexible; entschlossen,
woman) who has their skin lightened; Person
unflexibel, unnachgiebig. A y'i jɔ can. Il a
(meistens eine Frau), deren Haut aufgehellt
wird.
refusé net. He flatly refused. Er lehnte
rundweg ab.
caka [á] Nom. prostituée, putain; whore, prostitute;
2 • se buter, être inflexible; to be stubborn, to
Hure, Prostituierte. synonyme: jan 7 , surɔtɛmɛ. be inflexible; stur sein, unflexibel sein.
cakalen [á-à-é] Nom. hanche (surtout pour une cancan [á] Verbe. fouetter, battre à petits coups; whisk;
femme); hip (especially for a woman); Hüfte peitschen, verquirlen. A y'a den cancan. Elle
(besonders für eine Frau). Category: Body. a fouetté son enfant. She whipped her child.
cakaw [à-á] Nom. castagnettes; castanets; Sie hat ihr Kind ausgepeitscht.
Kastagnetten. Category: Musical instrument.
29/01/2026 73

cangara cayalen
cangara [ǎ-à-á] variante: ncangara. Nom. arbre caron [á] variante: cerun. Verbe. 1 • trancher,
(espèce); tree sp; Baumart. Category: Tree. donner un coup sec, frotter (une allumette),
combretum glutinosum. tirer (fusil); cut, strike, strike (a match), shoot
cangɛrɛbilen variante: cangarabilen. Nom. kinkéliba
(gun); schneiden, schlagen, anzünden (ein
Streichholz) schießen (Waffe).
coriace; kind of shrub; Strauch (Art).
2 • se disputer; quarrel; streiten.
Category: Bush, shrub. combretum
glutinosum. 3 • mentir; lie; lügen.
4 • être pressé; to be in a hurry; in Eile sein.
cankalan [á] Nom. affronter, s'imposer physiquement,
caroncaron [á] variante: cerenceren, ceruncerun.
montrer sa détermination; confront, impose
oneself physically, show one's determination; Verbe. découper en morceaux, couper en petits
konfrontieren, sich körperlich durchsetzen, morceaux; cut into small pieces; in Stücke
seine Entschlossenheit zeigen. Tile fila, tile schneiden, in kleine Stücke schneiden. ka gan
saba, n k'a y'i cankalan ... Pendant deux caroncaron. couper des gombos en petits
jours, pendant trois jours, il montra sa morceaux. cut okra into small pieces. Okra
détermination ... For two days, for three days, in kleine Stücke schneiden.
he showed his determination... Zwei Tage cawu [á] Verbe. brusquement, d'un coup (prendre ou
lang, drei Tage lang zeigte er seine
poser); suddenly (take or put down); plötzlich
Entschlossenheit ...
(nehmen oder niederlegen). ...ka sin ka den
canparo [à] Verbe. diminuer d'intensité, ne pas aller à
ta cawu. ... et prit d'un coup l'enfant. ...and
terme, se calmer; reduce intensity, do not go to
suddenly took the child. ...und nahm plötzlich
term, calm down; Intensität reduzieren, nicht
das Kind. synonyme: yali.
2
zu Ende gehen, beruhigen. Sanji canparola
fobɔnda fɛ. La pluie a diminué à l'approche de
cawucawu [á] [á] 1 • Verbe. aller dans tous les sens; go
la saison froide. The rain has lessened as the in all directions; in alle Richtungen gehen.
cold season approaches. Der Regen hat mit 2 • Verbe. troubler (l'esprit), affoler; disturb
dem Herannahen der kalten Jahreszeit (the mind), panic; stören (den Geist), Panik.
nachgelassen. 3 • Nom. agitation mentale, folie; mental
canwu [à] Verbe. couper grossièrement, tondre; agitation, madness; geistige Erregung,
Wahnsinn.
roughly cut, mow; grob schneiden, mähen.
Sagaw bɛ bin canwucanwu wula kɔnɔ fɛ ka caya [á-á] Morphemes: ca-ya. variante: caaya. vt.
taa. Les moutons tondent l'herbe à travers la 1 • augmenter, multiplier, intensifier, être
brousse. Sheep mow grass through the bush.
nombreux, exagérer; increase, intensify,
Schafe mähen Gras durch den Busch.
multiply; erhöhen, vermehren, intensivieren,
vervielfachen. Nin cɛ ka sara ka kan ka caya.
cap [á] variante: capu. Nom. bière de mil; millet
Le salaire de cet homme devrait être augmenté.
beer. synonyme: ɲɔdɔrɔ, dɔlɔ, capalo. This man’s salary should be increased. Der
capalo comparer: ɲɔdɔrɔ,
Lohn dieses Mannes muß erhöht werden.
2 • augmentation, croissance; augmentation,
dɔrɔ .[á-á-ó] variante: capu. Nom. bière de
1 increase, growth; Erhöhung, Wachstum.
mil traditionnelle; traditional millet beer;
Hirsebier. Category: Types of food. cayahakɛ [á] n.comp. quantité, densité; quantity,
synonyme: cap. density; Menge, Dichtheit.
cari [á] Adverbe. qui fait la sourde oreille; who turns cayalan [á] Nom. marque du pluriel; plural mark;
a deaf ear; der ein taubes Ohr hat. U y'a neni, Plural Zeichen. -w min bɛ tɔgɔ laban na... o
a y'i kɛ cari. Ils l’insultèrent, il fit las sourde ye cayalan ye. Le -w qui est placé derrière le
oreille. They insulted him, he turned a deaf nom, c'est la marque du pluriel. The -w which
ear. Sie beleidigten ihn, er stellte sich taub. is placed behind the noun is the plural mark.
Das -w, das hinter dem Substantiv steht, ist das
carin [à] Verbe. disperser, disséminer, répandre,
Pluralzeichen. Category: Grammar.
propager; disperse, disseminate, spread, synonyme: cayanan.
propagate; zerstreuen, verbreiten. Jama
cayalen [á] part. maximum; maximum, utmost;
carinna... Les gens se dispersent ... People are
dispersing... Die Leute zerstreuen sich...
maximal. ...a cayalen ye misi saba ye. c'est
au maximum trois bœufs. it's a maximum of
three oxen. es sind maximal drei Ochsen.
synonyme: cayaninba.
29/01/2026 74

cayali cɛ
cayali Nom. augmentation, croissance, prolifération, ceguyafɛn variante: cegunyafɛn. Nom. intelligent,
développement; augmentation, increase, malin; intelligent, clever; intelligent, schlau.
growth; Wachstum, Zunahme. synonyme: hakɛ Naloman ceguyafɛn ye sɛgɛn ye. C’est la
farali. souffrance qui rend l’idiot intelligent.
(proverbe). It is the suffering of the idiot that
cayanan variante: cayasira. Nom. marque de pluriel;
makes him intelligent. (proverb). Die Leiden
plural marker; Plural Markierung. des Dummkopfes machen ihn
synonyme: cayalan. intelligent.(Sprichwort).
cayaninba n.comp. maximum; maximum; Maximum. celi Nom. but (poteaux et filet); goal (posts and
Category: Mathematics. synonyme: cayalen. net); Tor (aus Pfosten und Netz).
synonyme: goli, celu.
cayasira [á] Nom. pluriel; plural; Plural. ... u ka
kumasenw bila cayasira kan. ... qu'ils
celiya variante: keliya. Nom. jalousie; jealousy;
mettent les phrases au pluriel. ...that they make Eifersucht.
the sentences plural. ....daß sie die Sätze im celu Nom. 1 • filet, filet pour recouvrir les bagages;
Plural bilden. Category: Grammar.
net, net to cover luggage; Netz, Netz zum
ce [é] Nom. salut, merci (dans des salutations de Abdecken des Gepäcks.
type "A ni ce"); greeting, thank you (in 2 • filets (au football), but; nets (in football),
greetings like "A ni ce"); Gruss, Danke ( in goal; Netze (im Fußball), Tor. synonyme: celi.
Grussformeln wie "A ni ce"). I ni ce! Merci !
cencege [é] Adverbe. très court, petit; very short,
Thank you! Danke!
1
small; sehr kurz, klein.
cege Adverbe. être beau, belle, parfait, superbe, sans
cencege [é] Adverbe. très beau; very beautiful; sehr
2
aucun défaut; beautiful, superb, perfect,
schön. A cɛ ka ɲi cencege. Il est très beau. He
without blemish; schön, prächtig,
hervorragend, perfekt, fehlerlos, wunderschön. is very handsome. Er ist sehr hübsch.
Dennin nin bɛ ncege ! La jeune fille est cerecere [è-è] variante: cerenceren. Verbe.
1
superbe ! The young girl is beautiful. Das hébéter, traumatiser; to stupefy, to traumatize;
junge Mädchen ist wunderschön. betäuben, traumatisieren.
synonyme: ncege .
2 cerecere Adverbe. écoulement lent, goutte à goutte;
2
cegu 1 variante: cegun. adj.pred. être malin; be evil, be slow flow, drip; langsamer Fluß, tropfenweise.
cunning; böse sein, schlau sein. Denmisɛn Joli bɛ jigin cerecere. Le sang s'écoule goutte
cegu nana cɛkɔrɔba nalonma sɔrɔ... Un à goutte. The blood flows out drop by drop.
enfant malin vint trouver un vieil homme Das Blut fließt Tropfen für Tropfen heraus.
stupide... A clever child came to find an old cewu [é] Adverbe. complètement, net; completely,
man stupid... Ein kluges Kind kam zu einem
clean; komplett, sofort, auf der Stelle. A
alten, dummen Mann... synonyme: kegun.
tununnen don cewu. Il a complètement
cegu 2 adj.pred. malin, rusé, intelligent; clever, disparu. It has completely disappeared. Es ist
cunning, crafty, intelligent; schlau, gescheit, vollständig verschwunden.
geschickt, arglistig, listig, intelligent, gerissen,
cɛ comparer: cɛma.[ɛ́] postp. entre, au milieu,
durchtrieben. A ka cegu i n’a fɔ
1
parmi, par; between, in the middle; zwischen,
sonsan/wɔlɔ. Il est malin comme un
in der Mitte. Mobili bi yirisun ni kogo cɛ. La
lièvre/perdrix. He is as crafty as a
voiture est entre l’arbre et le mur. The car is
hare/partridge. Er ist listig wie ein Hase /
between the tree and the wall. Das Auto ist
Rebhuhn.
zwischen dem Baum und der Mauer. Yan ni
ceguman [è-ù-á] adj. malin, rusé; cunning, mean; Bobo cɛ ye wagati joli ye ? Pour aller d’ici à
listig, schlau. synonyme: kegunman. Bobo, ça prend combien de temps? From here
ceguya Nom. ruse, malice; cunning, trick, trickery,
to Bobo, how long does it take? Wie lange
dauert es von hier nach/bis Bobo? 6 tilalen 3
mischief, maliciousness; List, Trick,
Schlauheit, Bosheit.
cɛ. six divisé par trois. six divided by three.
sechs geteilt durch drei.
29/01/2026 75

cɛ cɛbon
cɛ [ɛ]̀ vt. 1 • ramasser, recueillir, rafler, piller, cɛba [ɛ̀] Morphemes: cɛ-ba. Nom. 1 • homme,
2
s'emparer de, ; collect, gather; auflesen, homme adulte; man, adult man; Mann,
zusammenlesen, sammeln. Cɛ tɛ cɛ ka ban. erwachsener Mann.
On ne finit pas de ramasser l’homme. Sens : 2 • homme courageux; brave man; tapferer
On n’a jamais fini de découvrir l’homme. Mann.
(proverbe). One doesn't finish collecting man.
cɛbakɔrɔ [ɛ̀-à] Morphemes: cɛ-ba-kɔrɔ. Nom.
Sense: One never get s to understand man
completely. (proverb). Man kann nie aufhören
1 • homme adulte, personne courageuse; adult
man, courageous person; erwachsener Mann,
den Mann aufzulesen. Sinn: Man hat nie den
Mann ganz verstehen. (Sprichwort).
mutige Person.
2 • gaillard; fellow; Gefährte.
2 • retirer, annuler, nier, renier, reprendre,
rétracter, se dédier; withdraw, cancel, deny, cɛbakɔrɔya [ɛ̀-à-ɔ̀-ɔ̀] Verbe. 1 • devenir adulte;
renounce, take back, retract, dedicate; become an adult; erwachsen werden.
zurückziehen, annullieren, leugnen,
2 • circoncire; circumcise; beschneiden.
verzichten, zurücknehmen, widmen.
cɛbalen [ɛ̀-à] Nom. jeune homme, adolescent, homme
3 • essuyer, moucher, torcher; wipe, blow;
wischen, blasen. jeune; young man, teenager; junger Mann,
Teenager.
4 • relever, retrousser, dresser; raise, roll up;
heben, aufrollen, aufstellen. cɛbalenya [ɛ̀-à-è] 1 • Nom. adolescence (des
cɛ [ɛ]̀ Nom. aspect (beau ou laid, avec ɲi ou jugu) ; garçons); adolescence (boys); Jugend (Jungen.
3
aspect, appearance (beautiful or ugly), sight; 2 • Verbe. circoncire; circumcise; beschneiden.
Erscheinung, Aspekt, Aussehen (schön oder cɛbaya [ɛ̀-à] 1 • Verbe. circoncire; circumcise;
häßlich). Awa cɛ ka ɲi. Awa est belle/jolie.
beschneiden.
Awa is beautiful/pretty. Awa ist schön
2 • Nom. circoncision; circumcision;
/hübsch. A cɛ ka jugu. Il/elle est laid(e).
Beschneidung.
He/she is ugly. Er ist häßlich. Musokɔrɔba
cɛbereke [ɛ́] Nom. 1 • tronc; trunk, torso; Rumpf. A
tun cɛ ka ɲi. La vielle femme était belle. The
old woman was beautiful. Die alte Frau war
cɛbereke ka jan n'a sen ye. Il a le tronc plus
schön. long que les jambes. Its torso is longer than its
legs. Sein Rumpf ist länger als seine Beine.
cɛ
4
[ɛ]̀ Jula: cɛɛ. Nom. 1 • un homme; a man;
Category: Body. synonyme: cɛmabacɛ.
Mann. synonyme: cɛɛ.
2 • sexe masculin (populaire); penis (popular);
2 • mari, époux; husband; Ehemann. männlich (Volksmund).
3 • mâle; male; männlich. I ka so san, socɛ lo cɛbɛn [ɛ̀] Nom. rencontre très importante : concours,
waa somuso? Tu as acheté un cheval, c'est un
bataille, compétition; very important
mâle ou une femelle ? You bought a horse, is it encounter: contest, battle, competition; sehr
a male or a female? Du hast ein Pferd gekauft, wichtige Begegnung: Wettbewerb, Kampf.
ist es ein männliches oder ein weibliches
Pferd?
cɛbɛncɛbɛn Nom. filet d'eau; trickle of water; Rinnsal
4 • gars, type; guy; Kerl. von Wasser. Ji cɛbɛncɛbɛn, a da bɛ jiba la.
Les petits filets d'eau se déversent dans les
cɛ [ɛ]́ bambara: kɛ. variante: cɛɛ. Nom. 1 • taille,
5 grandes rivières (proverbe). Small trickles of
ceinture; waist, belt, girdle; Taille, Gurt, water flow into big rivers (proverb). Kleine
Gürtel. Wassertropfen fließen in große Flüsse
2 • différence, distance, relation; difference, (Sprichwort). Category: Water.
distance, spacing, relation, relationship;
cɛbilen-ka-ku-jan Nom. veuve à collier d'or et
Unterschied, Differenz, Entfernung, Distanz,
Beziehung, Zusammenhang.
autres Vidua; Sahel Paradise Whydah;
Sahel-Paradieswida. Category: Bird. vidua
cɛ 6 [ɛ]̀ Verbe. 1 • se presser, affluer; to hurry, to orientalis.
flock; sich beeilen.
cɛbon [ɛ̀] Nom. chambre privée d'un homme, pièce où
2 • être nombreux; to be numerous; zahlreich
un homme resserre ses affaires personnelles; a
sein.
man's private bedroom, room where a man
3 • faire quelque chose en groupe; do keeps his personal belongings; das private
something as a group.
Schlafzimmer eines Mannes, ein Raum, in
-cɛ variante: -kɛ. suf. mâle, masculin; male, dem ein Mann seine persönlichen Gegenstände
masculine; männlich. aufbewahrt. Category: Building.
29/01/2026 76

cɛbɔ cɛfɔ
cɛbɔ [ɛ]̀ Nom. 1 • conscription, réquisition, cɛɛlɛ [ɛ́] Verbe. marcher à pas de loup, s'approcher
1
recrutement; conscription, requisition, subrepticement de quelqu’un; walk quietly,
recruitment; Einberufung, Anforderung, approach someone surreptitiously; leise
Rekrutierung. gehen, heimlich auf jemanden zugehen.
2 • candidat; candidate; Kandidat. cɛɛn Nom. héritage; inheritance, heritage, legacy;
3 • représentant; delegate, agent; Vertreter. Erbe.
cɛbɔ 2 [ɛ]́ Verbe. pratiquer une ouverture au milieu, cɛɛnɛ [ɛ̀-ɛ́] variante: cɛrɛntɛ, tɛɛnɛ. Verbe. glisser,
transpercer; make an opening in the middle,
traîner, déraper, patiner; slip, drag, pull, skid,
pierce; In der Mitte eine Öffnung machen,
skate; ausgleiten, schleppen, ziehen, rutschen,
durchstechen. ka kinin cɛbɔ faire une skaten. A cɛɛnɛna ka bin. Il a glissé et est
ouverture au milieu du riz (pour mettre la tombé. He slipped and fell. Er rutschte aus und
sauce). make an opening in the middle of the
fiel. synonyme: tɛnɛnku.
rice (to add the sauce). Machen Sie eine
Öffnung in der Mitte des Reises (um die Soße cɛɛnku [ɛ̀] variante: cɛɛnkɛ, cɛɛnkun. Verbe.
hineinzugeben). aiguiser; sharpen; schärfen. ka murunin
cɛcɛ [ɛ]̀ Nom. doyen d'âge, homme le plus âgé du cɛɛnku aiguiser le petit couteau. sharpen the
village; oldest man, oldest man in the village; small knife. Schärfe das kleine Messer.
ältester Mann, ältester Mann im Dorf, Dorf cɛɛrɛ [ɛ̀-ɛ́] variante: cɛrɛ, tɛrɛ. Nom. van (en rônier
ältester.
pour séparer la balle du grain), panier à fond
cɛci [ɛ-́ í] vt. 1 • couper en deux, fendre en deux, carré; flat basket; flacher Korb.
éclater; cut into two halves, split, burst; in zwei Category: Container. synonyme: cɛrɛ.
Hälften schneiden, spalten, platzen.
cɛfara [ɛ́] Verbe. fendre en deux, traverser; split in
2 • traverser de part en part; cross from side to
side; von einer Seite zur anderen kreuzen.
two, pass through; in zwei Teile teilen,
überqueren. A ye jama cɛfara ka tɛmɛ. Il est
cɛdancɛ [ɛ̀-à-ɛ́] Nom. héros, homme exceptionnel par
passé en traversant la foule. He passed through
la bravoure; hero, extraordinary man, the crowd. Er ging durch die Menge.
exceptional man for bravery; Held,
cɛfarinya [ɛ̀-à-ì] Nom. bravoure, vaillance, courage;
aussergewöhnlicher Mann, außergewöhnlicher
Mann für Tapferkeit. bravery, valor, courage; Tapferkeit, Mut.
synonyme: cɛkisɛya.
cɛden [ɛ-̀ ẽ́] Nom. garçon, cousin, acolyte, homme de
main, gars; boy, henchman, guy, chap, lad; cɛfɛ [ɛ́-ɛ́] postp. parmi, dans, au milieu de, à travers;
Knabe, Bube, Kumpel, Handlanger, Bursche, between, among, in, in the middle of,
Kerl. A dalen b'a ka cɛdenw na. Il a through; zwischen, unter, in, in der Mitte,
confiance en ses hommes. He has confidence durch. A donna jama cɛfɛ. Il s'est faufilé dans
in his men. Er hat Vertrauen in seine Männer. la foule. He slipped through the crowd. Er
Category: Person. schlüpfte durch die Menge.
cɛderekew Nom. vêtements d'homme; men's clothes, cɛfɛn [ɛ̀] Nom. 1 • acte difficile à accomplir; difficult
clothes for men; Männerkleidung. act to accomplish; schwierig zu vollbringende
Category: Clothing. Tat.
cɛdisi [ɛ]̀ Nom. meneur, boute-en-train, fer de lance; 2 • sexe masculin (euphémisme); penis
(euphemism); Penis (Euphemismus). I tɛ se ka
leader, entertainer, spearhead; Anführer,
Entertainer, Speerspitze. nin kɛ sa! Cɛfɛn de don. Tu ne peux pas faire
ça, c'est quelque chose de très difficile ! You
cɛɛ [ɛɛ̀ ́] bambara: kɛ. Nom. 1 • l'homme; the man;
can't do that, it's something very difficult! Das
der Mann. Category: Person. synonyme: cɛ 4 . geht nicht, das ist etwas sehr Schwieriges!
2 • mâle; male; männlich. cɛfɔ [ɛ́] Verbe. mettre d'accord, faire dialoguer; to
3 • mari, époux; husband; Ehemann.
agree, to bring about dialogue; zustimmen,
Category: Kinship.
einen Dialog herbeiführen. Numucɛ nana u
cɛɛ kɔji [ɛɛ̀ ́ ɔ́-í] synonyme: lawaji, fɔrɔji. cɛfɔ ka kɛlɛ ban. Le forgeron est venu les
variante: cɛkɔji. Nom. sperme; sperm; Sperma, faire dialoguer et clore la querelle. The
Samenflüssigkeit. Category: Body. blacksmith came to make them talk and put an
synonyme: maniyu, jarabiji, lawaji. end to the quarrel. Der Schmied kam, um sie
zum Reden zu bringen und den Streit zu
beenden.
29/01/2026 77

cɛganakunsigi cɛko
cɛganakunsigi Jula: cɛgwanakunsigi. cɛkabɔnkɔrɔ Morphemes: cɛ-ka-bɔ-n-kɔrɔ. Nom.
variante: cɛgananfinsigi. Nom. espèce de trahison, manque à une promesse; betrayal,
plante; kind of plant; Pflanze (Art). breaking a promise; Verrat, ein Versprechen
Category: Grass, herb, vine. desmodium brechen. ka cɛkabɔnkɔrɔ kɛ manquer à sa
gangeticum. promesse. break his promise. sein
cɛgananya [ɛ̀-à-à] Nom. célibat (pour un homme);
Versprechen brechen.
celibacy (for a man); Zölibat (für einen Mann). cɛkala 1 [ɛ̀-á-á] n.comp. roseau; reed; Ried, Schilfrohr.
cɛgwana [ɛ̀-á-á] comparer: musogwana. Category: Grass, herb, vine.
variante: cɛgana. Nom. célibataire (homme); cɛkala 2 [ɛ̀-á-á] Nom. 1 • plante (espèce), grande herbe,
single (man); alleinstehend, unverheiratet paille de cette graminée; plant sp; Pflanzenart.
(Mann). Category: Person. Category: Grass, herb, vine. cymbopogon
giganteus.
cɛgwanafuralan Nom. espèce de plante; kind of
2 • sécots, nattes grossières; coarse mats;
plant; Pflanze (Art). Category: Grass, herb, grobe Matten.
vine. sida acuta.
cɛkan [ɛ̀] Nom. parole d'homme (dont il faut tenir
cɛgwanaya [ɛ̀-à-à-á] Nom. célibat (pour un homme); 1
compte); words of a man (which must be taken
celibacy (for a man), bachelorhood,
into account); Worte eines Mannes (die
single-hood; Zölibat (für ein Mann),
berücksichtigt werden müssen).
Ehelosigkeit.
cɛkan [ɛ́-ǎ] Morphemes: cɛ-kan. postp. entre;
cɛgwɛ Nom. homme au teint claire; man with bright 2
between; zwischen.
skin; hellhäutiger Mann.
cɛkankan synonyme: toolen, kɔngɔngɔki. Nom. petit
cɛjanya [ɛ]́ Verbe. 1 • éloigner, écarter; move away,
calao à bec rouge; red-beaked Horn-bill;
push aside; weggehen, beiseite schieben.
Hornvogel. Category: Bird. tockus
2 • espacer, allonger l'intervalle; space out, erythrorhynchus. synonyme: ntolen.
lengthen the interval; Platz ausmachen, das
Intervall verlängern. cɛkɛ [ɛ̀-ɛ́] Nom. attiéké (mets à base de manioc);
cɛjugu [ɛ-̀ ú-ú] adj. 1 • vilain, laid, affreux, horrible, ;
dish (made of manioc), atieke dish; Gericht aus
Maniok, Atieke Gericht. Category: Food.
ugly, unsightly, nasty, horrible; häßlich,
unschön, schrecklich, entsetzlich, furchtbar, cɛkɛɲɛbali synonyme: sɔkɛɲɛbali. Nom. anti-symétrie;
grausam, abscheulich. ɲɛ cɛjugu ka fisa ɲɛ antisymmetric; Antisymmetrisch.
cinin ye Bana cɛjuguba don.... C'est une Category: Mathematics.
affreuse maladie ... It's a terrible disease... Es cɛkisɛ [ɛ́-í-ɛ́] Nom. taille, torse, milieu du corps;
ist eine schreckliche Krankheit... waist; Taille. Category: Body.
2 • désagréable; unpleasant; unangenehm. Ban
cɛkisɛbana Morphemes: cɛ-kisɛ-bana. Nom. faim
cɛjugu ka fisa janfa ye. Mieux vaut un refus
(populaire); hunger (popular); Hunger
désagréable qu'une trahison (proverbe.) Better
(Volksmund). synonyme: dumuninege.
an unpleasant refusal than a betrayal
(proverb.) Besser eine unangenehme cɛkisɛkolo [ɛ́] Nom. colonne vertébrale; spinal
Weigerung als ein Verrat (Sprichwort.) column, spine, backbone; Wirbelsäule.
3 • mauvais, malhonnête; bad, dishonest; Category: Body. synonyme: jɔkolo ,
2
schlecht, unehrlich, unredlich. kɔkolojuru, cɛmakolo, kɔkolo.
1
cɛjuguya [ɛ̀-ù-ù-á] 1 • Nom. laideur; ugliness; cɛkisɛya Morphemes: cɛ-kisɛ-ya. Nom. bravoure,
Hässlichkeit. cɛjuguya ti basi ye
courage, vaillance (d'un homme); bravery,
2 • Verbe. être ou devenir laid, affreux, horrible; courage, valor (of a man); Tapferkeit (eines
to be or become ugly, awful, horrible; hässlich, Mannes). synonyme: cɛfarinya, ŋanaya.
schrecklich, schrecklich sein oder werden.
cɛko [ɛ̀] Morphemes: cɛ-ko. Nom. 1 • désir sexuel
3 • Verbe. aggraver; aggravate, get worse;
verschlimmern.
(d'un homme pour une femme), problème
sexuel, relation sexuelle; sexual desire (of a
cɛjuguyakuru [ɛ̀-ù-ù-à] Nom. grain de beauté; man for a woman), sexual problem, sexual
mole; Muttermal. relationship; sexuelles Verlangen (eines
Mannes nach einer Frau), sexuelles Problem,
sexuelle Beziehung.
29/01/2026 78

cɛkolo cɛlatigɛ
2 • coutume qui ne concerne que les hommes, cɛkurulen [ɛ̀-ú-ú-ẽ́] Jula: cɛkurunin.
affaire d'homme; custom that only concerns
Morphemes: cɛ-kuru-nin. Nom. silure fumé;
men, a man's business; Brauch, der nur
Männer betrifft, eine Männersache.
smoked cat-fish; geräucherter Fisch.
Category: Food.
cɛkolo [ɛ-́ ó-ó] Morphemes: cɛ-kolo. Nom. os
cɛla [ɛ̀] Nom. domicile conjugal; marital home,
iliaque; hip bone; Hüftbein. Category: Body. 1
conjugal home; ehelichen Wohnsitz. Ne cɛla
cɛkolonba Morphemes: cɛ-kolon-ba. Nom.
ye Kuna ye. J'habite à Kouna, le village de
épouvantail contre les oiseaux; scarecrow
mon époux. I live in Kouna, my husband's
against birds; Vogelscheuche gegen Vögel.
village. Ich lebe in Kouna, dem Dorf meines
synonyme: kɔnɔgɛnnan.
Mannes. synonyme: furuso.
cɛkotɔ [ɛ-̀ ò] Nom. en désire d'homme, en chaleur; in
cɛla [ɛ́-á] variante: cɛra, cɛrɔ. postp. au milieu de,
2
desire for a man, in heat; in Verlangen nach
parmi; between, in the middle of; zwischen, in
einem Mann, in Hitze, läufig sein. wulumuso
der Mitte von. ... a ɲɔgɔnnaw cɛla ... ... parmi
cɛkotɔ. une chienne en chaleur. a dog in heat.
ses semblables ... ...among his peers...
ein läufiger Hund. ...unter seinesgleichen...
cɛkɔrɔba [ɛ̀-ɔ̀-ɔ̀-á] Morphemes: cɛ-kɔ̀rɔ-ba. Nom. cɛlajala [ɛ́] Nom. ceinture du pantalon (et par
ancien, vieux homme, homme mûr, homme euphémisme tout ce qui relève de la sexualité
adulte; elder, old man; Senior, alter Mann. masculine); waistband of the pants (and
Cɛkɔrɔba siginin ɲɛ bi fɛn min na, kanbele euphemistically everything related to male
lɔnin ɲɛ t’a la. Ce qu’un homme âgé peut voir sexuality); Hosenbund (und beschönigend
assis, un jeune homme ne peut pas voir débout. alles, was mit männlicher Sexualität zu tun
What an old man can see sitting down, a young hat). synonyme: cɛsirijala.
man standing up cannot see. Was ein alter
cɛlaka [ɛ̀-à-ã́] Jula: cɛlakan. Nom. les membres de
Mann im sitzen sehen kann, kann ein junger
Mann im Stehen nicht sehen.
la famille du mari; family members from the
husband's family; Familienmitglieder von der
cɛkɔrɔbanin [ɛ̀-ɔ̀-ɔ-à] Nom. 1 • homme âgé de petite Familie des Ehemannes. Jɛnɛba cɛlakaw. Les
taille, petit vieux; short elderly man, little old parents de l'époux de Diènèba. The family
man; kleiner älterer Mann, kleiner alter Mann. members of Diènèba's husband. Die
Category: Person. Familienmitglieder von Diènèbas Ehemann.
2 • sexe masculin; penis; männliches Glied. Category: Kinship.
cɛkɔrɔbaya [ɛ̀-ɔ̀-ɔ̀-à-á] Morphemes: cɛkɔrɔba-ya. cɛlandi [ɛ̀-à] variante: cɛlanfɛrɛ, cɛlanpɛrɛn. Nom.
1 • Nom. vieillesse (pour un homme), âge mûr, femme ou fille qui se plaît en compagnie des
âge adulte; old age; das Alter. hommes (ou garçons); woman or girl who
2 • Verbe. devenir vieux; become old, get old; enjoys the company of men (or boys); Frau
alt werden. oder Mädchen, die die Gesellschaft von
3 • Verbe. circoncire; circumcise; beschneiden.
Männern (oder Jungen) genießt.
cɛkɔrɔnin Nom. petit vieux, vieillard; old man, elder; cɛlasigi [ɛ̀-à-í-í] Nom. mariage, domicile conjugale,
alter Mann, Greis. Category: Person. vie conjugale (de l'épouse); marriage,
conjugal home, conjugal life (of the wife);
cɛkɔrɔninkolon Nom. espèce d'arbre; kind of tree;
Heirat, ehelichen Wohnsitz, Eheleben (der
Baumart. Category: Tree. boscia salicifolia, Frau). synonyme: furuso.
boscia senegalensis, boscia augustifolia.
cɛlatigɛ [ɛ́-á-ì-ɛ́] variante: cɛratigɛ. Verbe. 1 • rayer,
cɛkun [ɛ]̀ Morphemes: cɛ-kun. Nom. homme de
contraster, rythmer; scratch, to contrast, pace,
caractère, homme dynamique, meneur; man of rhythm; verkratzen, im Kontrast stehen,
character, dynamic man, leader; Mann mit Rhythmus verleihen.
Charakter, dynamischer Mann, Anführer.
2 • refrain, rayure, ligne (qui se distingue des
cɛkunda Nom. milieu d'hommes, société des hommes, autres par la couleur ou le sens); refrain, stripe,
domaine des hommes; men’s environment, line (distinguished from others by color or
society of men, domain of men; Männerwelt, meaning); Refrain, Streifen, Linie
Männergesellschaft, Männerdomäne. (unterscheidet sich von anderen durch Farbe
antonyme: musokunda. oder Bedeutung). Mɔgɔ min bɛ dɔnkili
cɛlatigɛ ... Les personnes qui chantent le
cɛkuru [ɛ]̀ Morphemes: cɛ-kuru. Nom. pomme
refrain de la chanson ... The people who sing
d'Adam; Adam's apple; Adamsapfel.
the chorus of the song... Die Leute, die den
synonyme: jakumancɔlɔ, ncɔlɔ 1 . Refrain des Liedes singen ...
29/01/2026 79

cɛma cɛmɔgɔba
cɛma comparer: cɛ .[ɛ́-à] postp. parmi, au centre de, cɛmancɛci variante: camancɛci. Nom. bissectrice;
1
au milieu de, dans; among, in the middle of, bisector; Halbierungslinie,
inside; zwischen, in der Mitte von, mittendrin. Winkelhalbierende. Category: Mathematics.
A donna mɔgɔw cɛma. Il s'est mêlé à la foule. cɛmancɛnɛgɛ synonyme: kala. Nom. barre (de
He mixed with the crowd. Er mischte sich
lunette); top bar (of glasses); Nasensteg.
unter die Volksmenge.
cɛmancɛso Nom. lobe moyen; middle lobe;
cɛmabacɛ [ɛ́-á-á-ɛ́] Nom. tronc; trunk, torso; Rumpf,
Mittellappen. Category: Body.
Oberkörper. Category: Body.
synonyme: cɛbereke. cɛmanneni Verbe. insulter (un homme) en faisant
référence à son sexe, insulter sexuellement;
cɛmabana Nom. majeur; middle finger; Mittelfinger.
insult (a man) by referring to his gender,
Category: Body. synonyme: camancɛrabaana, sexually insult; Beleidigung (eines Mannes)
jan. unter Bezugnahme auf sein Geschlecht,
3
sexuelle Beleidigung. synonyme: neni.
cɛmabɔ [ɛ́-á-ɔ́] Verbe. écarter, élargir; part, remove,
expand, broaden, widen, enlarge (sth.); cɛmannin Jula: cɛmanin. variante: cɛmisɛn, cɛnin.
entfernen, spreizen, erweitern, ausweiten. A ye Nom. garçon, jeune garçon; boy; Knabe, Bube,
jama cɛmabɔ. Il écarta les gens. He pushed Bub. Category: Person.
people aside. Er schob die Leute beiseite. cɛmanyɔrɔ [ɛ̀-à] Nom. sexe masculin, organes sexuels
cɛmakolo [ɛ́] Nom. 1 • poutre maîtresse, nervure mâles; male sex; männliche Geschlecht.
Category: Body.
principale; main beam, main rib, main vein;
Hauptträger, Hauptrippe, Hauptader. cɛmata Nom. médiane; middle line; Mittellinie.
2 • colonne vertébrale; spine, spinal column; synonyme: gɛrɛntilannan.
Wirbelsäule. synonyme: kɔkolojuru,
cɛmatigɛ [ɛ́-á-ì-ɛ́] Morphemes: cɛ-ma-tigɛ. Verbe.
cɛkisɛkolo, jɔkolo , kɔkolo .
2 1
transpercer, percer de part en part; pierce,
cɛman [ɛ-̀ ã́] variante: cɛma. adj. mâle, masculin, de pierce through; durchbohren.
sexe masculin; male, manly, masculine; cɛminɛ Morphemes: cɛ-minɛ. Verbe. récolter
männlich, maskulin. Den cɛman tɛ n bolo...
précocement (en période de soudure); harvest
Je n'ai pas d'enfant mâle... I don't have any
early (during the lean season); früh ernten
male children... Ich habe keine männlichen
(während der mageren Jahreszeit). A ye ɲɔ
Kinder...
cɛminɛ. Il a récolté précocement le mil. He
cɛmancɛ
1
variante: camancɛ. Nom. milieu; middle;
harvested millet early. Er erntete früh Hirse.
Mitte. dugu cɛmancɛ la au centre-ville. in the
cɛminɛn [ɛ̀] Nom. 1 • arme; weapon; Waffe.
centre of town. in der Mitte der Stadt, in der
Innenstadt. Yiri min bi nakɔtu cɛmancɛ la,
synonyme: kɛlɛminɛn.
Ala ko an kana o den dun. Dieu dit que nous 2 • sexe masculin; penis; Penis.
synonyme: fɔrɔkala, fɔrɔ, wulu .
ne devons pas manger le fruit de l’arbre qui est 2
au milieu du jardin. God says, we should not cɛmisɛn [ɛ̀-ì-ɛ ́] Morphemes: cɛ-misɛn.
eat fruit from the tree in the middle of the
variante: cɛmanin, cɛnin. Nom. garçon, jeune
garden. Gott hat gesagt, wir sollen nicht von
homme, homme jeune; boy, young man,
der Frucht in der Mitte des Gartens esse. Note:
youngster; Knabe, Bub, junger Mann,
Bible: Jenɛse 3.3 cɛmancɛ kalanso/lakɔli école
Jüngling. Category: Person.
secondaire. secondary school.
Sekundarschule. cɛmisɛnya [ɛ̀-ɩ̀-ɛ̀] Nom. jeunesse, adolescence, état
cɛmancɛ Nom. le centre (joueur), attaquant central;
d'homme jeune; youth, young people,
2
adolescence, youthfulness; Jugend,
centre player; Mittelstürmer.
Jugendlichkeit, .
cɛmancɛ kooritilancɛ Nom. cercle central; centre cɛmɔgɔ [ɛ̀] Nom. 1 • monsieur (terme de respect);
circle; Mittelkreis.
mister, sir, Mr; Herr.
cɛmancɛbɔlɔ Morphemes: cɛmancɛ-bɔlɔ. Nom. axe; 2 • vieil homme; old man; alter Mann.
axis; Achse. Dugukolo bɛ munumunu a yɛrɛ 3 • prénom masculin; male first name;
da la a cɛmancɛbɔlɔ fɛ. La terre tourne sur männlicher Vorname.
elle-même autour de son axe. The earth rotates cɛmɔgɔba [ɛ̀-ɔ̀-ɔ̀] Nom. 1 • homme d'un certain âge;
around its axis. Die Erde dreht sich um ihre
man of a certain age; Mann eines bestimmten
Achse.
Alters.
2 • Dieu; God, Lord; Gott.
29/01/2026 80

cɛmusonin cɛɲɛ
cɛmusonin [ɛ̀-ú-ó-ǐ] Nom. homme (ou garçon) cɛndala Nom. géomancien, devin (qui travaille avec le
efféminé; effeminate man (or boy); sable); geomancer, soothsayer (who works
verweichlichter Mann (oder Junge). with sand); Geomant, Wahrsager (der mit
cɛn [ɛ]̀ Nom. sable (terme surtout utilisé pour le Sand arbeitet). Category: Religion.
1
synonyme: turaabudala, laturutigi,
sable de la divination); sand (term mostly used
laturudala, buguridala.
for divination sand); Sand (Bezeichnung, die
meist für Weissagungssand verwendet wird). cɛnden [ɛ̀] variante: cɛnso. Nom. figure
cɛn [ɛ]̀ Verbe. 1 • bien délayer une pâte, bien géo-mantique, signe dans le sable de la
2
moudre; dilute a paste well, grind well; eine divination; geo-mantic figure, sign in the sand
Paste gut verdünnen, gut mahlen.
of divination; geomantische Figur, Zeichen im
Sand der Weissagung. Category: Religion.
2 • être bien lisse, sans grumeaux; be very
synonyme: laturuso.
smooth, without lumps; sehr glatt sein, ohne
Klumpen. cɛnicɛya Morphemes: cɛ-ni-cɛ-ya. Nom.
cɛn [ɛ]́ Nom. allure (par exemple: pressé, homosexualité (masculine); male
3
énergique, dynamique, pondéré, nonchalant); homosexuality; Homosexualität (Männer).
pace (for example: hurried, energetic, cɛnimusoya Morphemes: cɛ-ni-muso-ya. Nom.
dynamic, level-headed, nonchalant); Tempo
rapports sexuels, relations sexuelles, rapports
(zum Beispiel: eilig, energisch, dynamisch,
conjugaux, sexualité; sex, sexual intercourse,
besonnen, lässig). A cɛn ka goni. Il est agité,
sexuality; Geschlechtsverkehr, Sexualität. ka
rapide dans son travail. He is restless, quick in
cɛnimusoya kɛ avoir des rapports sexuels. to
his work. Er ist unruhig und schnell in seiner
Arbeit. synonyme: cɛnma.
have sex. Geschlechtsverkehr haben.
cɛnimusoya damakɛɲɛni expr. égalité des sexes;
cɛnaga [ɛ]́ Nom. buste, tronc, taille; bust, torso, trunk,
gender equality; Geschlechter Gleichstellung,
waist; Brust, Rumpf, Taille. A cɛnaga ka jan.
Gleichbehandlung.
Elle a la taille élancée. She has a slender waist.
Sie hat eine schlanke Taille.
cɛnimusoya danfarali expr. distinction de sexe;
distinction as to sex; Unterscheidung nach
cɛncɛn comparer: cɛncɛnmugu.[ɛ ̀-ɛ ́] Nom. sable;
dem Geschlecht, Unterschied des Geschlechts.
sand; Sand. Category: Land.
cɛnimusoyabana Nom. maladie liée à la sexualité;
cɛncɛnbara [ɛ̀-ɛ̀-á-á] Nom. sablier; hourglass;
disease related to sexuality; Sexual Krankheit,
Sanduhr, Eieruhr, Sandglas. Geschlechtskrankheit. Category: Disease.
cɛncɛnkisɛ [ɛ ̀-ɛ ̀-í-ɛ́] Morphemes: cɛncɛn-kisɛ. cɛnin [ɛ̀-ĩ́] Nom. garçon, bonhomme, jeune homme,
Nom. grain de sable; grain of sand; Sandkorn. petit homme; boy, fellow, chap, little man;
cɛncɛnkongo Morphemes: cɛncɛn-kungo. Nom. Knabe, Bub, junger Mann, kleiner Mann.
désert, désert de sable; desert; Wüste.
Category: Person.
Category: Land. cɛnma variante: cɛman. Nom. allure (par exemple:
cɛncɛnkuru [ɛ ̀-ɛ ̀-ú-ú] Morphemes: cɛncɛn-kulu. pressé, énergique, dynamique, pondéré,
Nom. dune de sable; sand dune; Sanddüne.
nonchalant); pace (for example: hurried,
Category: Land.
energetic, dynamic, level-headed,
nonchalant); Tempo (zum Beispiel: eilig,
cɛncɛnma [ɛ̀-ɛ] Nom. sableux, sablonneux; sandy; energisch, dynamisch, besonnen, lässig).
sandig. synonyme: cɛn.
3
cɛncɛnmugu comparer: cɛncɛn. Nom. sable; sand; cɛnɔrɔ n.comp. infixe; infix; Einfügung.
Sand. Category: Land.
cɛntala Nom. ayant droit; beneficiary, right holder,
cɛncɛnyɔrɔ [ɛ -ɛ -ɔ́-ɔ́] Nom. sol sableux; sandy
rightful claimant ; Leistungsberechtigte,
ground; sandiger Boden. Category: Land. Anspruchsberechtigter.
cɛnda Nom. divination par le sable, géomancie; sand cɛɲɛ [ɛ̀] variante: cɛnya, cɛɲiya. 1 • Verbe. être ou
divination, geomancy; Sand-Wahrsagerei, rendre beau; to be or make beautiful; schön
Geomantie. Category: Religion. sein oder machen. synonyme: cɛɲi.
2 • Nom. beauté; beauty; Schönheit.
synonyme: cɛɲiya.
29/01/2026 81

cɛɲi cɛtagamabaga
cɛɲi [ɛ]̀ Variant: cɛɲumanin. adj. beau, belle, joli, cɛsintaki [ɛ̀] Nom. orchite; orchitis;
être ou rendre beau; beautiful, pretty, nice; Hodenentzündung. Category: Disease.
schön, hübsch, nett. Kumanin cɛɲi ni tiɲɛ tɛ cɛsiri comparer: jija , jijali.[ɛ́-í-í] v.ref. se concentrer,
1 1
kelen ye. Une belle petite parole n'est pas la
se mettre avec ardeur au travail; concentrate,
vérité (proverbe). A nice little word is not the make an effort, endeavour; sich konzentrieren,
truth (proverb). Ein nettes kleines Wort ist sich bemühen, sein Bestes geben.
nicht die Wahrheit (Sprichwort).
synonyme: cɛɲɛ.
cɛsiri
2
1 • Verbe. se ceindre, sangler, attacher; girding,
put on a belt, strap sb./sth., fasten (sth.), attach
cɛɲiya [ɛ-̀ í-á] Nom. beauté; beauty; Schönheit. (sth.), tie sb./sth; sich umgürten, anschnallen,
synonyme: cɛɲɛ. festmachen, befestigen, umbinden.
cɛɲɔgɔn [ɛ̀] Nom. camarade; comrade, companion, 2 • Verbe. être courageux; be courageous, be
bravě; mutig sein, tapfer sein.
fellow; Kamerad, Geselle, Gefährte, Genosse.
3 • Nom. courage, détermination, volonté;
synonyme: tɔɲɔgɔn.
courage, determination, will; Mut,
cɛɲuman [ɛ̀] Nom. beau, superbe, joli; beautiful, Entschlossenheit, Wille.
superb, wonderful; schön, wunderschön, cɛsiribaliya Morphemes: cɛsiri-bali-ya. Nom. manque
herrlich, umwerfend. An bɛɛ ye mɔgɔ de volonté, manque de détermination, manque
cɛɲuman ye cogo dɔ la. Nous sommes tous de courage; lack of determination, lack of
beaux d'une certaine façon. We are all courage; fehlender Wille, fehlende
beautiful in some way. Wir sind alle Entschlossenheit, fehlender Mut.
irgendwie schön. cɛsiridabilabaliya
cɛɲumanin See main entry: cɛɲi. n.comp. la belle; the [ɛ́] Morphemes: cɛsiri-dabila-bali-ya. Nom.
beautiful one; die Schöne. persévérance, obstination, opiniâtreté;
cɛŋa [ɛ]́ Verbe. entrouvrir, frayer un passage; open, perseverance, obstinacy, stubbornness;
Ausdauer, Hartnäckigkeit, Sturheit.
make a way; öffnen, sich einen Weg machen.
cɛsirijala comparer: cɛsirilan.[ɛ́-í-í-á-á] n.comp.
cɛra variante: cɛla. postp. parmi; between, among;
1 • ceinture, cordon servant à attacher le pagne;
unter, zwischen. A siginin lo a denw cɛra. Il
belt, girdle; Gurt. synonyme: cɛlajala,
est aussi parmi ses enfants. He is also among
kurusijala, sɛntiri, cɛsirilan.
his children. Er ist auch unter seinen Kindern.
2 • chancre mou; cancer; Krebsgeschwür.
cɛrɛ [ɛ]̀ variante: tɛrɛ. Nom. van (en rônier pour
cɛsirilan comparer: cɛsirijala,
séparer la balle du grain), panier à fond carré;
rattan van (to separate the chaff from the sɛntiri.[ɛ́-í-í-ã́] Morphemes: cɛ-siri-lan.
grain), flat basket, square bottom basket; Nom. ceinture, corde que les femmes utilisent
Korb (um die Spreu vom Korn zu trennen), pour attacher leur pagne; belt, cord worn by
flacher Korb, Korb mit quadratischem Boden. older women around their waist to support
Category: Agricultural tool. synonyme: cɛɛrɛ. their ’pagne’; gürtel, band zum festbinden der
wickelröcke. Category: Clothing.
cɛrɛcɛrɛ [ɛ̀-ɛ̀] variante: cɛɛrɛcɛɛrɛ. Verbe. traîner,
synonyme: cɛsirijala.
tourner autour, baguenauder, se promener
(péjoratif); hang around, wander around cɛso [ɛ̀-ó] Morphemes: cɛ-so. Nom. chambre
(derogatory); herumhängen, herumwandern privée d'un homme, pièce où un homme
(abfällig). resserre ses affaires personnelles; private room
cɛrɔ [ɛ]́ Verbe. 1 • remplir à moitié; fill halfway; zur of a man, room where a man keeps his
personal belongings; Privatzimmer eines
Hälfte füllen. Filen cɛrɔla. La calebasse est à
Mannes, Raum, in dem ein Mann seine
moitié pleine. The calabash is half full. Die persönlichen Gegenstände aufbewahrt.
Kalebasse ist halb voll. Category: Building.
2 • traverser; to cross, pass through;
cɛsɔgɔ [ɛ́-ɔ̀-ɔ́] Verbe. percer en son milieu; pierce in
überqueren.
the middle; in der Mitte durchstechen. Tufa
cɛsamuso [ɛ̀-à] Nom. 1 • veuve; widow; Witwe.
cɛsɔgɔlen Brique trouée au milieu. Brick with
2 • femme plusieurs fois veuve (soupçonnée a hole in the middle. Ziegelstein mit einem
d'avoir causé la mort de ses maris); woman Loch in der Mitte.
several times widowed (suspected of having
cɛtagamabaga Nom. intermédiaire; go-between,
caused the death of her husbands); mehrfach
verwitwete Frau (verdächtigt, den Tod ihres middleman; Mittelsmann, Vermittler,
Mannes verursacht zu haben). Unterhändler. synonyme: furancɛta.
29/01/2026 82

cɛtɛmusotɛ ci
cɛtɛmusotɛ [ɛ̀-ɛ̀-ù-ò] Nom. hermaphrodite, 3 • sexe masculin, parties sexuelles
masculines; male sex, male sexual parts;
homosexuel; hermaphrodite, homosexual;
männliches Geschlechtsorgan, männliche
Zwitter, Homosexuelle Person.
Geschlechtsteile. Category: Body.
cɛtɛmusotɛya Nom. hermaphrodisme,
cɛyaminɛn Morphemes: cɛ-ya-minɛn. Nom.
homosexualité; dualism, hermaphroditism,
1 • affaires d'homme, talisman ou amulette de
homosexuality; Hermaphroditismus,
protection masculine; men's affairs, talisman
Homosexualität.
or amulet of male protection;
cɛtigɛ 1 [ɛ-́ í-ɛ́] Nom. poutre principale pour supporter Männerangelegenheiten, Talisman oder
le toit, poutre maîtresse; main support beam Amulett des männlichen Schutzes.
for roof; Hauptbalken um das Dach zu stützen. 2 • parties sexuelles masculines; male sexual
synonyme: kɔkolo . parts; männliche Geschlechtsteile.
1
cɛtigɛ [ɛ-́ í-ɛ́] Verbe. traverser, croiser, couper en cɛyasa [ɛ̀-à] Nom. impuissance sexuelle; sexual
2
deux; to cross (sth.), to go through, intersect, impotence; sexuelle Impotenz.
come across, cut in half, cut in two parts; cɛyasira walima musoyasira synonyme: suguya.
überqueren, durchqueren, kreuzen, in zwei
expr. genre; gender, genre; Genre, Gender,
Hälfte schneiden, zerschneiden, entzweien.
Gattung.
Sira fila bɛ ɲɔgɔn cɛtigɛ yen. Deux routes se
croisent à cet endroit. Two roads cross at this cɛyayɔrɔ [ɛ̀-à] Nom. 1 • lieu des hommes, lieu viril
point. An dieser Stelle kreuzen sich zwei (par exemple champs de bataille); place of
Straßen. men, virile place (for example battlefields);
Ort der Männer, männlicher Ort (zum Beispiel
cɛtigɛden [ɛ̀-ɩ̀-ɛ̀-é] Nom. bâtard, enfant né hors
Schlachtfelder). Segu tun ye cɛyayɔrɔ ye.
mariage; bastard, child born outside a
Ségou était une ville d'hommes. Ségou was a
marriage relation; Bastard, aussereheliches
city of men. Ségou war eine Stadt der Männer.
Kind.
2 • organes sexuels mâles; male sexual organs;
cɛtigi [ɛ]̀ Nom. 1 • mariée (pourvue d'un mari); männliche Geschlechtsorgane.
married (with a husband); verheiratet (mit
ci [í] 1 • vt. envoyer, adresser, annoncer; send, to
einem Ehemann). 1
address; senden, schicken, adressieren, richten
2 • qui a des hommes (armée troupe...); who
an. Kunun, ne ye bataki dɔ ci ne somɔgɔw
has men (army troop...); Männer haben
(Armeetruppe...) ma. Hier, j’ai envoyé une lettre à ma famille.
Yesterday, I sent a letter to my family. Gestern
cɛtila [ɛ-́ í-á] Verbe. partager en deux, diviser; share
habe ich meiner Familie einen Brief gesandt.
in two equal parts, divide; in zwei Teile teilen,
telefɔni ci Y ma téléphoner à Y. phone Y. Y
teilen, entzweien, halbieren. ka finin cɛtila
anrufen.
partager un tissu en deux. divide a fabric in
2 • Nom. message, commission, mission,
two. Einen Stoff in zwei Teilen.
course; message, errand, mission, task,
cɛtulon [ɛ]̀ Nom. guerre, combat; war, combat; Krieg, mandate; Botschaft, Auftrag, Mission,
Kampf. synonyme: kɛlɛ. Aufgabe.
3 • Nom. utilité, besoin; usefulness, need;
cɛw ka ɲɛgɛnw Nom. toilettes pour homme; gents
Nützlichkeit, Bedürfnis. Ci tɛ nin na. Ça n'a
toilets; Männer WC, Herrentoiletten.
pas d'utilité. It's of no use. Das ist für nichts
cɛwɔlɔnin Nom. 1 • caille arlequin et caille des blés; nützlich. O ci bɛ ne ye. J'en ai besoin. I need
1
harlequin quail; Wachtel. Category: Bird. it. Ich brauche es.
coturnix delegorguei. ci [ì] vt. 1 • fendre, couper, écraser, briser, casser,
2
2 • garçon chétif et rusé, petit malin; puny and
détruire, tracer, barrer; chop, break up, block,
cunning boy, smart little; schwächlicher und
cross out, destroy; brechen, schneiden,
schlauer Junge, kluger kleiner Junge.
zerkleinern, zerstören, absperren, versperren,
cɛwɔlɔnin variante: cɛɛwɔlɔnin. Nom. caille; quail; durchstreichen. lɔgɔ ci. Dagaw bɛɛ cila.
2
Wachtel. Category: Bird. Fendre du bois à brûler. Tous les canaris sont
cassées. Chop firewood. All the jars are
cɛya [ɛ-̀ á] Morphemes: cɛ-ya. Nom.
broken. Feuerholz zerkleinern. Alle Töpfe sind
1 • masculinité, qualité d’homme, virilité; zerbrochen.
manhood, masculinity, virility; Männlichkeit,
2 • frapper, battre, donner une correction; hit,
Virilität, Manneskraft.
strike, knock, beat, whip; schlagen,
2 • bravoure, courage; courage, bravery; verprügeln.
Bravour, Mut.
3 • souffler (vent); blow (wind); blasen (Wind).
29/01/2026 83

ci cicandugutigi
4 • fendre, éclater, tirer (fusil), crever, trancher; ci jɛngɛnin Nom. barre oblique; forward slash,
split, burst, shoot (gun), to puncture, to cut;
diagonal slash; Schrägstrich.
spalten, platzen, schießen (Waffe),
Category: Grammar.
durchstechen, schneiden.
cibaga [í-á-á] Nom. 1 • envoyée, commissionnaire;
ci 1 • Verbe. tracer, rayer, avoir des traits; trace,
3
person who has been sent, commissioner,
draw, delineate, scratch; zeichnen,
messenger; der Gesandte, der Sendende,
anzeichnen, trassieren, verkratzen, kratzen.
Spediteur.
2 • Nom. trait, ligne, tatouage; line, stroke,
2 • celui qui envoie quelqu'un en commission;
tattoo; Linie, Tätowierung.
the one who sends someone on commission;
ci Verbe. pousser, faire des rejets, taller; grow; derjenige, der jemanden im Auftrag schickt.
4
wachsen. Malo cira kosɛbɛ. Le riz a poussé 3 • prophète; prophet; Prophet.
beaucoup. The rice grew a lot. Der Reis ist 4 • expéditeur; sender; Absender.
sehr gewachsen.
cibaranin Nom. 1 • tambour de culture (calebasse
ci 5 [ì] Verbe. 1 • apparaître, percer; appear, break recouvert d'une peau, qu'on frappe des deux
through; erscheinen, durchbrechen. mains); culture drum (calabash covered with a
Dugujɛdolonin nana ci. L'étoile du matin skin, which is struck with both hands);
apparut. The morning star appeared. Der Trommelart (mit einer Schale bedeckte
Morgenstern erschien. Kalebasse, die mit beiden Händen
angeschlagen wird). Category: Musical
2 • avoir lieu, se produit, faire; take place,
happen, do; stattfinden, passieren, tun.
instrument. synonyme: cun
2
.
3 • crier, faire un bruit sonore; shout, make a 2 • musique qui accompagne les travaux
loud noise; schreien, einen lauten Lärm agricoles (chants, tambour, clochettes); music
machen. A y'a ci kule kan... Il s'est mis à that accompanies agricultural work (songs,
drums, bells); Musik, die die
hurler ... He started screaming... Er fing an zu
landwirtschaftliche Arbeit begleitet (Lieder,
schreien...
Trommeln, Glocken).
4 • sentir fort; smell strong; stark riechen. Dɔlɔ
kasa cira dɛrɛ. On sent une forte odeur
cibilennin synonyme: jɛbilennin. Nom. ignicolore,
d'alcool. We smell a strong smell of alcohol.
Euplecte; red bishop; Oryxweber.
Wir riechen einen starken Alkoholgeruch.
Category: Bird. euplectes orix / hordeaceus.
5 • s'accoupler, avoir des relations sexuelles ciboloma [í] Morphemes: ci-boloma. Nom.
(pour un mâle); to mate, to have sexual 1 • responsable du travail fait en commun; the
relations (for a male); sich paaren, sexuelle person responsible for the work done together;
Beziehungen haben (für einen Mann). ka die Person, die für die gemeinsam geleistete
muso disi ci. coucher avec une femme. sleep Arbeit verantwortlich ist.
with a woman. mit einer Frau schlafen. 2 • animateur; leader; Leiter.
ci [í] Nom. 1 • chaume, paille; thatch, straw; cibɔ [í] Morphemes: ci-bɔ. Nom. travail en
6
Stroh. synonyme: cii . commun dans les champs; working together in
3
the fields; gemeinsame Feldarbeit. U tun bɛ
2 • herbes (de grande taille); herbs (large);
Kräuter (groß), großes Gras. Category: Grass, cibɔ la bi Musa fɛ. Aujourd'hui ils travaillent
herb, vine. en commun dans le champ de Moussa. Today
3 • fagot (de tiges), botte, gerbe; bundle (of they work together in the Moussa field. Heute
stems), bunch, sheaf; Bündel (von Stängeln), arbeiten sie gemeinsam in Moussas Feld.
Garbe. Category: Agriculture.
ci [í] Nom. 1 • travail agricole; agricultural work; cibɔla [í] Morphemes: ci-bɔ-la. Nom. ouvrier
7
landwirtschaftliche Arbeit. agricole, journalier; agricultural worker, day
laborer; Landarbeiter, Tagelöhner.
2 • travail, occupation; work, occupation;
Arbeit, Beruf. Musa ka ci ye mun ye? Que
Category: Worker, occupation.
fait Moussa comme travail? What does cibɔnan synonyme: tiiricilan. variante: cilan. Nom.
Moussa do for work? Was macht Moussa règle; ruler; Massstab. Category: Learn.
beruflich? synonyme: cilan.
3 • habitude; habit; Gewohnheit. Dugumɛnɛ cicandugutigi synonyme: kuleɲinɛ. Nom.
ci kɔrɔ ye cinni ye. Piquer est une vieille
musaraigne; shrew; Spitzmaus.
habitude pour la fourmi (proverbe). Stinging is Category: Mammal. crocidura occidentalis.
an old habit for the ant (proverb). Das Stechen
synonyme: ncicandugutigi.
ist eine alte Angewohnheit der Ameise
(Sprichwort).
29/01/2026 84

cici cikan
cici [ì-ì] vt. concasser, briser en petites morceaux, cii [í] variante: ci. Nom. espèce d'herbe, chaume,
3
frapper à coups redoublés; bruise, pound, paille, herbes (de grande taille); kind of grass,
shred; zerstampfen, zerkleinern. straw, thatch, high grass; Grasart, Stroh,
ciden [í] Morphemes: ci-den. Nom. envoyé, hohes Gras. Category: Grass, herb, vine.
diheteropogon grandifolius. synonyme: ci .
6
messager, apôtre, missionnaire, délégué,
représentant; one who is sent, messenger, cii [í] variante: ci. Nom. travail agricole, travail,
4
apostle, missionary, surrogate, steward, occupation; agricultural work,, farm work;
representative; Gesandter, Bote, Apostel, landwirtschaftliche Arbeit. Category: Worker,
Missionar, Delegierter, Abgeordneter, occupation. synonyme: ciya.
Vertreter. Category: Worker, occupation.
cii bɛnbaliw Nom. droites parallèles; parallel straight
cidenkulu [í-ẽ́-ú-ú] synonyme: delegasɔn. Nom.
lines; parallele Linien.
délégation; delegation; Delegation,
Category: Mathematics.
Abgeordnete.
cii bɛntaw Nom. droites concurrentes; concurrent
cidenya [í] Nom. mission, ambassade, délégation,
lines; kreuzende Linien.
qualité de celui qui est chargé d'une mission
/message; mission, embassy, delegation; cii cunin synonyme: selekemankanci. Nom. droites
Mission, Botschaft, Gesandtschaft, perpendiculaires; perpendicular lines;
Delegation. senkrechte Linie, lotrechte Linie.
ciduman [ì] Morphemes: ci-duman. Nom. fragile; Category: Mathematics.
1
fragile; zerbrechlich. fɛn ciduman une chose cii datugunin Nom. ligne fermée; closed line;
fragile. a fragile thing. eine zerbrechliche geschlossenen Linie. Category: Mathematics.
Sache. cii jɛngɛnnin synonyme: cii banabirinin. Nom. droite
ciduman [í] Nom. obéissant, qui accepte facilement oblique; oblique line; schiefe Linie, schräge
2
d’être commissionné; obedient, who easily Linie. Category: Mathematics.
accepts to be commissioned; gehorsam, der cii karinin Nom. ligne brisée; broken line ;
Aufträge leicht annimmt. antonyme: cigoman.
unterbrochene Linie, gestrichelte Linie.
cifɔli [í] Nom. quatre tambours appelés pour exciter Category: Mathematics.
au travail les cultivateurs : baraba, manton, cii kurunin Nom. ligne courbée; curved line;
baraden, cun; four drums called to excite the
gekrümmte Linie, gebogene Linie.
farmers to work: baraba, manton, baraden,
Category: Mathematics.
cun; Vier Trommeln, um die Bauern zur
Arbeit anzuregen: Baraba, Manton, Baraden, cii lanin Nom. droite horizontale; horizontal straight
Cun. Category: Musical instrument. line; horizontale Linie, waagrechte Linie.
cifɔnin expr. commandement; commandment; Gebot.
Category: Mathematics.
cii lɔnin Nom. ligne verticale; vertical line; vertikale
cigoman [í] Morphemes: ci-goman. Nom. indocile,
Linie.
désobéissant, rétif, qui n'accepte pas
cii min bi guliyahakɛcogo yira expr. courbe de
facilement d’être commissionné; indocile,
disobedient, rebellious, who does not easily poids; curve of weight; Gewichtstabelle,
accept being commissioned; unfügsam, Kurve von Gewicht.
ungehorsam, rebellisch, der Aufträge nicht cii min bi lamɔcogo yira expr. courbe de
ohne Weiteres akzeptiert.
croissance; growth curve; Wachstumskurve.
antonyme: ciduman; synonyme: kanmɛnbali.
2
cii tilennin See main entry: . variante: citilennin. Nom.
cii [ìí] synonyme: nɛgɛbere. variante: ci. Nom.
1
ligne droite; straight line; gerade Linie.
ligne, raie, barre, droite; line, stripe, bar, rod;
Category: Mathematics.
Linie, Streifen, Stange.
Category: Mathematics. ciiw cɛ variante: ciiw cɛma. expr. interligne;
cii comparer: baara . variante: ci. Nom.
interlining, line space; Zeilenabstand.
2 1
Category: Communication.
commission, mission, message; commission,
mission, message; Auftrag, Botschaft. N bi ci cikan [í] Morphemes: ci-kan. Nom. message,
la. Je suis occupé. I am busy. Ich bin commission; message, commission; Nachricht,
beschäftigt.
Auftrag, Botschaft. Dunankɛ nana ni cikan
jumɛn ye? Quel message a apporté l’étranger ?
What message did the stranger bring? Welche
Botschaft brachte der Fremde?
29/01/2026 85

cikɛ ciɲɛ
cikɛ Morphemes: ci-kɛ. 1 • Verbe. cultiver; to farm; cilasela [í] Nom. messager, envoyé; messenger,
bewirtschaften, bebauen. sent-one; Bote, der Gesendete. Cilasela bɛ
2 • Nom. culture; cultivation; Ackerbau, mɔgɔ ye. Le messager agit au nom de
Landbau, Anbau. Category: Agriculture. quelqu'un d'autre. The messenger acts on
cikɛbugu [í] Morphemes: ci-kɛ-bugu. Nom. hameau behalf of someone else. Der Bote handelt im
Namen einer anderen Person.
de culture; hamlet of agriculture; Weiler für
Landwirtschaft. Category: Agriculture, cin [í] variante: kin. vt. mordre, piquer (insecte,
1
Building. serpent); bite, sting; beissen, stechen. Wulu le
cikɛda [í] Morphemes: ci-kɛ-da. Nom. exploitation ka Bakari cin a sen na. C'est un chien qui a
agricole; agricultural holding; mordu Bakari à la jambe. A dog bite Bakari in
landwirtschaftlicher Betrieb. his leg. Ein Hund hat Bakari ins Bein gebissen.
cikɛda baarada comparer: baarada . Nom. lieu de cin [í] Verbe. allumer (le feu); light (a fire), kindle
1 2
travail, bureau, service; office, workplace; (fire); anzünden (ein Feuer).
Arbeitsplatz, Büro, Dienstort.
cincɔkicɔ Nom. le moindre mot, le moindre bruit, la
synonyme: baarakɛyɔrɔ.
moindre chose; the slightest word, the slightest
cikɛdugu synonyme: dugu, kongodugu. Nom. village; noise, the slightest thing; das kleinste Wort,
village; Dorf. das kleinste Geräusch, die kleinste Sache. Hali
cikɛfɛn Morphemes: ci-kɛ-fɛn. Nom. produit agricole, cincɔkicɔ! Pas même le moindre mot ! Not
even the slightest word! Nicht einmal das
production agricole; agricultural product,
leiseste Wort!
crop, farm product; Agrarprodukt,
Agrarerzeugnis, landwirtschaftliche cinda [í-á] Morphemes: cin-da. Nom. morsure,
Produktion. Category: Food, Agriculture. piqûre; bite, sting; Biß, Stich, Insektenstich. A
cikɛla comparer: sɛnɛkɛla.[í-ɛ́-á] Nom. cultivateur, cinda ka farin. Sa morsure est douloureuse.
agriculteur, villageois, paysan; farmer, Its bite is painful. Sein Biß ist schmerzhaft.
villager, peasant; Bauer, Landwirt, cinin synonyme: cii. Nom. 1 • tiret; dash;
Dorfbewohner, Landmann.
Category: Agriculture, Worker, occupation.
Gedankenstrich, Querstrich. —
Category: Grammar. synonyme: ncinin.
cikɛlan Morphemes: ci-kɛ-lan. variante: cikɛminɛn.
2 • petit, jeune; small, little, young; klein, jung.
Nom. outil agricole; agricultural tool, farming
wonin cinin. Un tout petit trou. A very small
tool; landwirtschaftliches Gerät,
landwirtschaftliches Arbeitsgerät. hole. Ein ganz kleines Loch.
Category: Agricultural tool. cinnida [í] Nom. morsure (la plaie); bite (wound); Biß
cikɛwangolali synonyme: baara dili wangolali; lɔgɔ (Wunde). ... k'o mugu da cinnida la. ... et
dili wangolali. Nom. appel d'offre; invitation to mettre cette poudre sur la morsure. ...and put
tender; Offerten einholen. Category: Finance. this powder on the bite. ...und geben Sie
dieses Pulver auf den Biß / auf die Bißwunde.
cikɔsegisɛbɛ See main entry: . n.comp. rapport; report;
cinnifɛn [í] Morphemes: cin-ni-fɛn. Nom. tout animal
Bericht.
qui pique; animal or insect that stings; Tier,
cikunkurunnin n.comp. segment; segment;
das sticht.
Abschnitt, Segment.
cintan [í] Nom. 1 • oisif, inutile; idle, useless; untätig,
cilan Nom. règle; ruler; Maßstab. synonyme: tiricilan,
nutzlos.
cibɔnan. 2 • paresseux, qui refuse le travail; lazy, who
cilanin See main entry: . ligne horizontale; horizontal refuses work; faul, der die Arbeit verweigert.
line; horizontale Linie. ciɲɛ [í-ɛ́] variante: cɛn. Nom. héritage, succession;
cilasegin [í] Morphemes: ci-la-segin.
inheritance, legacy, succession; Erbe,
Erbschaft, Nachfolge. bɔlɔnaden ka
variante: cikɔmasegin. Nom. message de
ciɲɛtaliko. problème de l'héritage pour
réponse, retour de commission; reply message,
return of commission; Antwortnachricht.
l'enfant hors mariage. problem of inheritance
for the child outside marriage. Problem der
Erbschaft für das außereheliche Kind.
29/01/2026 86

ciɲɛdunden cogili
ciɲɛdunden [í] Nom. dépensier, prodigue, ciyakɛda [í] Morphemes: ciya-kɛ-da.
dilapidateur; spendthrift, prodigal, variante: cakɛda. Nom. service administratif,
squanderer; Verschwender. Ciɲɛdunden administration, organisme, entreprise; service,
mago tɛ sini na. Le dépensier ne se préoccupe administration, organization, business;
pas de l'avenir. The spendthrift does not care Verwaltungsdienst, Verwaltung, Organisation,
about the future. Dem Verschwender ist die Geschäft. Faso ka ciyakɛdaw. les
Zukunft egal. entreprises d'état (et les services publics). state
ciɲɛnama [í] Nom. héréditaire, congénital; hereditary,
enterprises (and public services). staatliche
Unternehmen (und öffentliche Dienste).
inherited, congenital, innate; erblich,
vererblich, vererbbar, angeboren. Bana ciyakɛla [í] Morphemes: ciya-kɛ-la. variante: cakɛla.
ciɲɛnama don. C'est une maladie héréditaire. Nom. travailleur, ouvrier; worker, laborer;
Arbeiter, Angestellter, Arbeitnehmer.
It is a hereditary disease. Es handelt sich um
eine Erbkrankheit.
synonyme: baarakɛla.
ciɲɛtala [í] Morphemes: ciyɛn-ta-la. Nom. héritier; -cni n. agent d'une action excessive; agent of
heir, heiress; Erbe, Erbin. ... o bɛ di a excessive action; Auslöser übermäßigen
ciɲɛtalaw ma. ... on le donne à ses héritiers.
Handelns. yɛrɛjiranci vantard. bragger,
boastful person. Angeber, Aufschneider.
...we give it to his heirs. ...wir geben es seinen
Erben.
janfanci traître. traitor. Verräter. kaarinci
généreux. generous. großzügig. Kumanci ka
cirasamabaga ka ladɛrɛsi expr. adresse de
ca, walenci de ka dɔgɔ. Les beaux parleurs
l'expéditeur; sender's address; Adresse des
sont nombreux, ce sont les gens efficaces qui
Absenders. Category: Communication.
manquent. (proverbe). There are many smooth
cirasɔrɔbaga ka ladɛrɛsi expr. adresse du talkers, but there is a lack of effective people.
destinataire; recipient address, receiver (proverb). Es gibt viele Schönredner, aber es
address; Empfängeradresse, mangelt an schlagkräftigen Leuten.
Empfängeranschrift. (Sprichwort).
Category: Communication. co [ó] Nom. catégoriquement (refuser, échouer);
1
cisama [í] Nom. rapport, compte-rendu; report, categorically (refuse, fail); kategorisch
account, record; Rapport, Bericht. (ablehnen, scheitern). A y'i ban co! Il a refusé
citilennan ɲɛgɛnin Nom. règle graduée; ruler; catégoriquement ! He categorically refused!
Er lehnte kategorisch ab!
Lineal, Massstab. Category: Mathematics,
Tool. co 2 [ó] Verbe. crier avec indignation sur quelqu'un;
ciwara [í] Nom. 1 • champion (agriculture), cultivateur to shout indignantly at someone; jemanden
empört anschreien. U ye co wuli nson na, a
exceptionnel; champion (agriculture),
exceptional cultivator; Champion bolila. Ils ont crié avec indignation sur le
(Landwirtschaft), außergewöhnlicher voleur et il a fuit. They shouted indignantly at
Landwirt. Category: Agriculture, Worker, the thief and he fled. Sie schrien den Dieb
occupation. empört an und er floh.
2 • fétiche agraire, masque d'antilope cogi variante: sogi. Verbe. picorer; peck at; picken.
«Tyiwara»; agrarian fetish, “Tyiwara”
antelope mask; landwirtschaftlicher Fetisch, cogili Nom. action de picorer; pecking; Picken.
„Tyiwara“-Antilopenmaske.
Category: Religion.
ciya [í] variante: ca. Nom. travail, occupation,
tâche, fonction, mission; work, occupation,
task , job, duty, function; Arbeit,
Beschäftigung, Auftrag, Funktion.
Category: Worker, occupation. synonyme: cii.
4
29/01/2026 87

cogo cogoyayirata
cogo [ó-ó] variante: cogoya. Nom. 1 • manière, cogocaga [ò-ò] Verbe. être dans une situation
1
comment, façon, procédé, moyen, méthode; difficile, être dans le flou, être dans une
way, manner, method, process, procedure, impasse, être douteux; to be in a difficult
mechanism; Art und Weise, Art, Weise, situation, to be in the dark, to be at an impasse,
Verfahren, Methode, Prozeß, Vorgehensweise. to be doubtful; sich in einer schwierigen
cogo o cogo n’importe comment. however, Situation befinden, im Dunkeln tappen, in
whatever manner. kommt nicht darauf an wie. einer Sackgasse stecken, zweifeln. U ka ko
A ye cogo sɔrɔ. Il a trouvé une solution. He bɛɛ cogocagalen don. Leur affaire est
found a way/solution. Er hat eine Lösung vraiment floue. Their affair is really unclear.
gefunden. cogo bɛɛ la dans toutes les façons Ihre Sache ist wirklich unklar.
possibles. in every possible way. In jeder cogocogo [ó] Verbe. remuer dans l'eau (pour rincer);
möglichen Weise. o cogo la de cette façon,
stir in water (to rinse); in Wasser einrühren
comme ça. in that way. In dieser Art und (zum Spülen). ka finin cogocogo jo la. rincer
Weise. cogo wɛrɛ la d’une autre façon. in
un tissu. rinse a fabric. einen Stoff ausspülen.
another way. Auf eine andere Art /Weise.
Mɔgɔ bɛɛ ni a cogo. Chacun a sa propre
cogoda [ó] Nom. habitude; habit, custom;
manière. Everyone has his own way of doing Gewohnheit. A ka cogoda don. C'est son
things. Jeder auf seine Art und Weise. habitude. It's his habit. Es ist seine
2 • conduite, comportement, habitude; Gewohnheit. synonyme: delina.
conduct, behaviour, habit, custom, routine; cogofɔ [ó-ó ɔ́] variante: cogo fɔ. Verbe. décrire;
Verhalten, Verhaltensweise, Handlungsweise,
describe; beschreiben.
Benehmen, Gewohnheit, Brauch,
Gepflogenheit. cogofɔli n.comp. description; description;
3 • ressource; resource; Ressource. Beschreibung.
cogo [ó-ó] variante: cogoya. Nom. 1 • état, aspect, cogontan [ó] Morphemes: cogo-ntan. Nom. pauvre,
2
forme, solution; state, condition, shape, démuni, sans moyens; poor, destitute, without
dimension, form, solution; Zustand, Stand, means; arm, mittellos. synonyme: tɛgɛjɛ.
Lage, Aspekt, Aussehen, Wesenszug, Lösung.
Ale b'a cogo kɔrɔ la halisa. Elle est restée
cogori [ó] Verbe. avoir peur, s'effrayer; to be afraid, to
jusqu'à maintenant dans le même état be frightened; Angst haben. Marifa ci o ci, a
qu'auparavant. Until now, it has remained in bɛ cogori. A chaque coup de fusil il a peur.
the same state as before. Bis jetzt ist es im With each gunshot he is afraid. Bei jedem
gleichen Zustand wie zuvor. Schuß fürchtet er sich.
2 • adjectif; adjective; Adjektiv. cogoya [ó-ó-á] Nom. 1 • gabarit, forme, aspect,
Category: Grammar.
1
solution; mould, mold, shape, appearance,
cogo di comment, de quelle manière; how; wie, auf solution, form; Schablone, Modell, Form,
welche Art und Weise. "Banane" bɛ fɔ cogo Aussehen.
di bamanankan na ? Comment dit-on « 2 • façon, manière, procédé, moyen, méthode;
banane » en bambara ? How do you say
way, manner, process, means, method; Weg,
"banana" in Bambara? Wie sagt man
Weise, Prozeß, Mittel, Methode.
«Banane» auf Bambara? 3 • conduite, comportement, habitude;
conduct, behavior, habit; Verhalten,
cogo juman comment; how; wie.
Gewohnheit.
cogoba [ò-ò] Verbe. 1 • brasser, remuer (un liquide, ou 4 • état; state, shape; Zustand.
dans un liquide); to stir (a liquid, or in a cogoya [ó-ó-á] Nom. morphologie; morphology;
2
liquid); rühren (eine Flüssigkeit oder in einer
Morphologie, Formlehre, Körperform.
Flüssigkeit).
Category: Parts of an animal.
2 • mélanger, brouiller, troubler, fouiller; mix,
cogoya sɛmɛntiyanan bambara: cogoya
confuse, disturb, search; vermischen,
verwirren, stören, suchen. An ye kungo sɛmɛntiyalan. n.comp. adverbe de manière;
cogoba, an ma fɛn sɔrɔ. Nous avons fouillé adverb of manner; Adverb der Art und Weise.
la brousse, nous n'avons rien trouvé. We
Category: Grammar.
searched the bush, we found nothing. Wir cogoyayirata Nom. genre descriptif; descriptive
haben den Busch abgesucht, wir haben nichts gender; Beschreibender Text.
gefunden. Category: Grammar, Language and thought.
29/01/2026 88

cokugwɛ cɔgɔri
cokugwɛ variante: coo. Nom. mangouste à queue coron [ó] Verbe. 1 • enfoncer, mettre dans, emboîter,
1
blanche; white-tailed mongoose; Mungo mit fermer (en forçant); push in, put in, fit in, close
weißem Schwanz. Category: Mammal. (by forcing); hineinschieben, hineinstecken,
ichneumia albicauda. synonyme: nco, ntala . hineinpassen, schließen (durch Gewalt).
1
coloki [ó] variante: coloyi. Adverbe. 1 • très
2 • regarder fixement, écarquiller (les yeux);
stare, widen (eyes); starren, weiten (Augen).
agilement (pour une fuite); very agilely (for an
3 • accuser, «enfoncer quelqu’un»; accuse,
escape); wendig, geschickt (für eine Flucht).
“push someone”; beschuldigen, „jemanden
2 • s’enfuir prestement avec agilité; flee nimbly drängen“.
with agility; fliehe flink und wendig.
coron [ó] Nom. bottes, chaussures montantes; boots,
comu [ó] Verbe. bien prendre, bien attraper; take well, 2
high shoes; Stiefel, hohe Schuhe.
catch well, hold on well; gut nehmen, gut
Category: Clothing.
fangen, gut festhalten.
coyi [ó] Adverbe. 1 • rapidement, brusquement;
conbogocanbaga [ò-ò-ò] Verbe. mettre (ou être) 1
quickly, abruptly; schnell, abrupt.
en désordre, mélanger, embrouiller; to put (or
synonyme: yali .
2
be) in disorder, to mix, to confuse; in
Unordnung bringen (oder sein), vermischen, 2 • fuir rapidement; flee quickly; schnell
verwirren. N tɛ wale conbogocanbagalenw fliehen. A coyira ka bɔ. / A y'i coyi. Il s'est
fɛ. Je n'aime pas les actions embrouillées. I
enfui. He ran away. Er ist geflohen.
don't like confusing actions. Ich mag keine coyi 2 [ó] Adverbe. rouge vif, très rouge; bright red,
verwirrenden Handlungen. very red; leuchtend rot, sehr rot.
coo synonyme: cokugwɛ. Nom. mangouste à queue synonyme: cori, buu 4 .
blanche; white tailed mongoose; Mungo mit coyi [ó] Adverbe. exactement, pile, juste; exactly,
3
weissem Schwanz. Category: Mammal.
right; genau, richtig. U ka kan coyi! Ils sont
ichneumia albicauda. synonyme: nco.
exactement égaux ! They are exactly equal!
cooko [ó] Verbe. donner une assise stable, caler Sie sind genau gleich! synonyme: cɔ.
solidement, s'installer confortablement; cɔ [ɔ́] interj. exactement, justement, parfaitement;
provide a stable base, securely support, sit
exactly; genau. Cɔ a kɛla ten. Exactement ça
comfortably; Einen stabilen Stand bieten,
sicher stützen, bequem sitzen. ... a nana ka na s'est produit comme cela. Exactly it happened
like that. Genau so ist es geschehen.
i cooko. ... il vint s'asseoir confortablement.
synonyme: coyi .
...he came and sat down comfortably. ...er
3
kam und setzte sich bequem. cɔcɔ [ɔ̌-ɔ̌] Nom. petite pluie fine et persistante; light
1
coolo [ò-ó] 1 • Verbe. errer, vagabonder, fuguer; and persistent rain; leichter andauernder
Regen. Category: Weather.
wander, roam, stray, ramble, run away;
umherirren, umherwandern, umherziehen, cɔcɔ [ɔ́] Verbe. écraser, piler, broyer (doucement,
2
streunen, streifen, weglaufen, davonlaufen. pour quelque chose de résistant, mais non
synonyme: nancoolo. rigide: sel, riz...); crush, pound, grind (gently,
2 • Nom. fugueur, errant, vagabond, de nulle for something resistant, but not rigid: salt,
part; runaway, wanderer, out of nowhere; rice...); zerdrücken, zerstoßen, mahlen (sanft,
Ausreißer, Wanderer, aus dem Nichts. dunan für etwas Widerstandsfähiges, aber nicht
coolo. étranger vagabond. wandering
Starres: Salz, Reis ...) la malo cɔcɔ. écraser du
stranger. wandernder Fremder.
riz. grind rice. Reis zerstoßen.
coolocooloya [ò-ò-ò-ò] Verbe. vagabonder, traîner, cɔcɔkalo Nom. août; August (month); August (Monat).
devenir vagabond; wander, become a cɔgɔri [ɔ́-ɔ́-í] comparer: folon. vt. piler, pour
1
wanderer; wandern, ein Wanderer werden,
enlever le son; pound, to remove husks;
herumzustrolchen, umherirren. N'án t'a fɛ den stampfen, zerstampfen um die Schale zu
ka coolocooloya... Si nous ne voulons pas entfernen. ka tiga cɔgɔri. décortiquer
que l'enfant aille vagabonder ... If we don't l'arachide en pilant. shell the peanut by
want the child to wander... Wenn wir nicht pounding. Schälen Sie die Erdnuß, indem Sie
wollen, daß das Kind umherirrt... sie zerstoßen.
cori [ó] Adverbe. rouge vif, très rouge; bright red,
very red; leuchtend rot, sehr rot.
Category: colour. synonyme: coyi.
2
29/01/2026 89

cɔgɔri cɔrɔkɔ
cɔgɔri [ɔ-̀ ɔ̀] Nom. marches d'escalier, entailles 2 • propriété personnelle; personal property;
2
persönliches Eigentum.
creusées dans un puits ou sur un tronc d'arbre
(pour descendre ou grimper); stair steps, cɔɔcɔɔkalo [ɔ̀-ɔ̀-á-ó] synonyme: utikalo.
notches dug in a well or on a tree trunk (for variante: cɔcɔkalo. Nom. mois des pluies
going down or climbing); Treppenstufen, in
fréquentes, août; month of frequent rains,
einen Brunnen oder in einen Baumstamm
August; Monat der häufigen Regen, August.
gegrabene Kerben (zum Hinabsteigen oder
Klettern). cɔɔlɔ 1 [ɔ́] Verbe. affaiblir, épuiser, exténuer, dépérir,
cɔki [ɔ]̀ Verbe. picorer, becqueter, piquer, mordre;
maigrir; weaken, exhaust, wear out, waste
away, lose weight; schwächen, erschöpfen,
peck, sting, bite; picken, stechen, beißen.
abnutzen, verkümmern, Gewicht verlieren.
Syɛba n'a denw bɛ ka ɲɔ cɔki. La poule
Bana y'a minɛ fo ka a cɔɔlɔ. La maladie l'a
picore le mil avec ses poussins. The hen pecks
beaucoup affaibli. The illness weakened him
at the millet with her chicks. Die Henne pickt
greatly. Die Krankheit hat ihn sehr
mit ihren Küken an der Hirse.
geschwächt.
cɔkɔn Nom. espèce de plante, souchet comestible; cɔɔlɔ [ɔ́] Verbe. émonder, éplucher; prune, peel;
2
kind of plant; Pflanze (Art). Category: Grass,
beschneiden, schälen. ka namasa cɔɔlɔ.
herb, vine. cyperus esculentus.
éplucher une banane. peel a banana. eine
cɔlɛcɔlɛnin [ɔ̀-ɛ̀-ɔ̀-ɛ̀] Nom. policier, «flic» Banane schälen.
(populaire); policeman, “cop” (popular);
cɔɔnɔ [ɔ̀] variante: ncɔɔnɔ. Verbe. suinter, s'infiltrer,
Polizist. Category: Government, Worker,
occupation.
sourdre, fuir; ooze, infiltrate, seep, leak;
sickern, infiltrieren, auslaufen. So bɛ cɔɔnɔ.
cɔlɔnin [ɔ]́ Nom. sexe masculin (populaire); penis
L'eau pénètre dans la maison. Water enters the
(popular); Penis (Volksmund). house. Wasser dringt ins Haus ein.
Category: Body. synonyme: fɔrɔkala, wulu ,
2 cɔri [ɔ́] variante: cori, cɔrɔti. Adverbe.
fɔrɔ, bere .
1
3 complètement déçu, fâché; completely
cɔmi [ɔ]́ Nom. pincée (mesure pour une poudre); disappointed, angry; völlig enttäuscht,
1
pinch (measurement for a powder); Prise (Maß wütend. N tigɛra i la cɔri ! Je n'ai plus
für ein Pulver). confiance en toi de tout ! I no longer trust you
at all! Ich vertraue dir überhaupt nicht mehr!
cɔmi [ɔ]́ 1 • Adverbe. d'un coup, par surprise;
2
suddenly, by surprise; plötzlich, überraschend.
cɔri
2
[ɔ́] variante: cɔrinin, cɔrni, cɔti. Nom. trèfle
2 • Verbe. attraper d'un coup, prendre par (au jeu de cartes); clover in card game; Klee
surprise; to catch suddenly, to take by surprise; im Kartenspiel. synonyme: tigɛnin, syɛsen.
plötzlich fangen, überraschen. N ye nson cɔrin [ɔ̀] Verbe. 1 • serrer fortement, éteindre, se
minɛ cɔmi ! J'ai attrapé le voleur ! I caught the
contracter; squeeze tightly, extinguish,
thief! Ich habe den Dieb erwischt! contract; fest zusammendrücken, löschen,
cɔn [ɔ]̀ Verbe. transpercer; pierce, penetrate; zusammenziehen.
durchbohren. A ye kalakisɛ kɛ ka a bolo cɔn. 2 • bourrer; stuff, fill, cram; stopfen, füllen.
Il s'est transpercé la main avec la flèche. He
Bɔrɔ cɔrinna finin na. Le sac est bourré
pierced his hand with the arrow. Er d’habits. The bag is stuffed with clothes. Die
durchbohrte seine Hand mit dem Pfeil. Tasche ist mit Kleidung gefüllt.
cɔnkɔ [ɔ]́ Verbe. 1 • broyer, écraser, pétrir, fouler, cɔrɔbalenganya Nom. espèce de oiseau; kind of
brasser; grind, crush, knead, tread, stir; bird; Vogelart. Category: Bird. turdoides
mahlen, zerstoßen, kneten, stampfen, rühren.
plebejus.
... ka na ni fura ye ka na a cɔnkɔ ... ... cɔrɔbalensuruku Nom. bulbul commun; Common
apporter les feuilles et les broyer ... .... bring Bulbul; Graubülbül. Category: Bird.
the leaves and grind them... ... bringt die pycnonotus barbatus.
Blätter und zermahlt sie ...
cɔrɔdabilennin Nom. Estrilda; red-billed wax-bill;
2 • frotter en écrasant, frotter, presser; rub by
Wellen-Astrild. Category: Bird. estrilda
crushing, rub, squeeze; reiben durch
zerdrücken, reiben, quetschen.
senegali.
cɔnkɔn [ɔ́] variante: cɔnkɔ. Nom. 1 • plat savoureux cɔrɔkɔ 1 synonyme: sɔrɔkɔ. Nom. mangouste d’Égypte;
mongoose; Mungo. Category: Mammal.
pris en privé à l'intérieur de la grande famille;
herpestes ichneumon. synonyme: sɔrɔkɔ.
tasty dish taken privately inside the big family;
leckeres Gericht, privat in der großen Familie
eingenommen.
29/01/2026 90

cɔrɔkɔ curancuran
cɔrɔkɔ [ɔ]́ variante: coroko. Verbe. embrouiller, mal 5 • vendre à vil prix, liquider (une
2
marchandise); sell at a low price, liquidate (a
parler; confuse, speak badly; verwirren,
commodity); zu einem niedrigen Preis
schlecht reden. A bɛ ka tubabukan cɔrɔkɔ. Il
verkaufen, liquidieren (eine Ware). N b'a cun i
parle mal le français. He speaks French
poorly. Er spricht schlecht Französisch.
ma. Je te le vends à bas prix. I'll sell it to you at
a low price. Ich verkaufe es Ihnen zu einem
cɔrɔntɔ [ɔ-̀ ɔ̀] variante: corondo, jɔrɔntɔ, ncɔrɔntɔ,
günstigen Preis.
sorondo. 1 • Verbe. serrer (le nœud coulant
cun variante: kunanfa. Nom. tambour frappé à deux
2
d'une corde, l'ouverture d'un sac); tighten (the
mains; drum struck with two hands; Trommel
noose of a rope, the opening of a bag);
mit zwei Händen angeschlagen.
festziehen (die Schlinge eines Seils, das
synonyme: cibaranin.
Öffnung vom Sack). synonyme: nton.
2
2 • Nom. nœud coulant; noose, slipknot; cun 3 [ú] Nom. nasse en bois; wooden fish trap; Holz
Schlinge. Fischfalle. Category: Hunt and fish.
cu [ú] Adverbe. net; instantly; sofort. A y'i jɔ cu ! Il synonyme: nsɔɔlɔ.
s'est arrêté net. He stopped dead in his tracks. cuncun [ú] variante: junjun. Verbe. sautiller,
1
Er blieb wie angewurzelt stehen. secouer (pour faire descendre); hop, shake (to
cucucu [ù-ù] Verbe. 1 • harceler; harass, pester; bring down); hüpfen, schütteln (um zu Fall zu
belästigen. I bɛ cucucu la a nɔfɛ. Tu le
kommen). synonyme: ɲɛnkɛɲɛnkɛ.
harcèles. You are harassing him. Du belästigst cuncun Verbe. 1 • être dispersé, être épars, être
2
ihn. irrégulier; to be scattered, to be irregular;
2 • de gauche à droite, ça et là; from left to verstreut sein, unregelmäßig sein. Musow
right, here and there; von links nach rechts, cuncunnen bɛ. Il y a très peu de femmes.
hier und da. Suruku bɛ taama cucucu.
There are very few women. Es gibt sehr
L'hyène marche de gauche à droite. The hyena wenige Frauen.
walks from left to right. Die Hyäne läuft von
2 • être rare, être aléatoire; to be rare, to be
links nach rechts.
random; selten sein, zufällig sein.
3 • être derrière le dos de quelqu'un; go behind
cunɛ [ú] Nom. 1 • perdant (au jeu), vaincu; loser (at
someone's back; hinter jemandes Rücken
gehen. the game), defeated; Verlierer (im Spiel),
Besiegter.
cukula Nom. plante (espèce); plant sp; Pflanzenart.
2 • malchanceux, malhabile; unlucky,
Category: Grass, herb, vine. ocimum
unskilled; unglücklich, ungeschickt. E ye cunɛ
basilicum.
ye, e tɛ se foyi la. Tu ne vaux rien au jeu, tu
cun
1
[ú] Verbe. 1 • sauter de haut en bas, tomber
n'y connais rien. You're worthless in the game,
brusquement; jump down, fall suddenly; you don't know anything about it. Du bist in
herunterspringen, hinunter jucken, plötzlich dem Spiel wertlos, du weißt nichts darüber.
fallen.
cunkunan [ú-ù-á] Nom. gros tambour en bois; large
2 • surprendre, tomber à l'improviste; surprise,
wooden drum; große Holztrommel.
come across unexpectedly; überraschen,
unerwartet rüberkommen.
Category: Musical instrument.
3 • boiter; limp; lahm sein, hinken. N bɛ n cun cunnkan [ú] Nom. imprévu, impromptu, chose
n sen kelen na... Je boite d'une jambe... I limp soudaine; unforeseen, impromptu, sudden
on one leg... Ich hinke auf einem Bein...
thing; unvorhergesehene, spontane, plötzliche
Sache. ... a kɛra cunnkanko ye, a balala
4 • rythmer, donner un coup de haut en bas,
cadencer; to rhythm, to kick up and down, to mɔgɔw la. ... c'est survenu soudainement, ça a
pace; zum Rhythmus, zum Auf- und Abtreten, surpris les gens. ...it happened suddenly, it
zum Tempo. surprised people. ...es geschah plötzlich, es
überraschte die Leute.
curancuran [ú] variante: cɔrɔcɔrɔ. Verbe. trotter,
faire trotter (un cheval); trot, make trot (a
horse); traben (ein Pferd).
D - d
29/01/2026 91

da da
da 1 [á] Jula: daa. Nom. 1 • bouche, gueule, da 4 [á] variante: daa. Nom. plaie, marque, trace
ouverture, porte, portière, orifice, issue; ou endroit d'une morsure (d'une brûlure, d'une
mouth, opening, hole, door, car door; Mund, piqûre); wound, sore, mark, trace or location
Maul, Öffnung, Loch, Tür, Autotür. Se i da la of a bite (burn, sting); Wunde, Markierung,
dɛ! Retiens ta bouche, tais-toi ! Hold your
Spur oder Ort eines Bisses (Brennen, Stich). ...
mouth, shut up! Halt deinen Mund! donda,
a fan bɛɛ da. ... elle avait des plaies partout.
bɔda. porte d’entrée, porte de sortie. entry
...she had sores everywhere. ...sie hatte überall
Wunden.
door, exit door. Eingangstür, Ausgangstür.
Category: Body. da 5 [á] Nom. 1 • jour (surtout dans certaines
2 • lame; en composition : bord, lieu, endroit, expressions figées); day (especially in certain
surface, commencement; blade; in compound fixed expressions); Tag (besonders in
words: edge, place, surface, beginning; bestimmten festen Ausdrücken). N bɛ nin da
Klinge; in zusammengesetzten Ausdrücken: dama in kɛ yan... Je vais passer ici quelques
Rand, Ort, Oberfläche, Anfang. Muru da man jours... I'm going to spend a few days here...
di. La lame du couteau n'est pas tranchante. Ich werde hier ein paar Tage verbringen... i ni
The knife blade is not sharp. Die da fila ! (salutation à une personne que l'on n'a
Messerklinge ist nicht scharf. A da yennin ye. pas vue depuis quelques jours). (greeting
C'est ainsi que ça commence. This is how it someone you haven't seen for a few days).
begins. So beginnt es. bada la au bord du (Begrüßung von jemandem, den Sie einige
fleuve. by the riverside. am Ufer des Flusses. Tage lang nicht gesehen haben).
3 • paroles; words; Worte. Ale da sera boloci 2 • temps; time; Zeit.
nafa ma. Il est venu parler de l'utilité de la da [á] Jula: la. Verbe. 1 • coucher, étendre,
6
vaccination. He came to talk about the allonger, étaler; lie down, extend, spread out;
usefulness of vaccination. Er kam, um über hinlegen, ausstrecken, ausbreiten. A y'i da
den Nutzen der Impfung zu sprechen.
dalan kan. Elle s'est couchée sur le lit. She lay
4 • nourriture; food; Nahrung, das Essen. ka da
down on the bed. Sie legte sich auf das Bett.
ɲini. chercher de la nourriture. search for synonyme: la .
6
food. Suche nach Nahrung.
2 • apaiser, combler, satisfaire (un désir); calm
5 • tour, fois; round, times; Runde, mal. A da down, soothe, fill, satisfy (a desire); beruhigen,
bɛ se ale ma. Son tour va arriver. His turn is erfüllen, befriedigen (einen Wunsch). U ye
coming. Er ist bald an der Reihe. da kelen en kɛlɛ dalen lawuli. Ils ont ravivé cette querelle
une seule fois. in one go. auf einmal. qui était apaisée. They revived this quarrel
6 • cause, faute; cause, fault; Ursache, Fehler. which had calmed down. Sie ließen diesen
A da bɛ cɛw de la. C'est la faute des hommes. Streit, der sich beruhigt hatte, wieder aufleben.
It's men's fault. Es ist die Schuld der Männer.
Muso y'a nege da. La femme a comblé son
désir. The woman fulfilled her desire. Die Frau
7 • réussite, considération, promotion; success,
consideration, promotion; Erfolg, Förderung.
erfüllte ihren Wunsch.
... ánw ka kanw bɛna don da la... ... nos 3 • mettre, poser, déposer, décharger, attribuer,
langues connaîtront une promotion... ... our
toucher; put, place, deposit, unload, assign,
languages will be promoted... ... unsere
touch; stellen, plazieren, deponieren, entladen,
Sprachen werden gefördert...
zuweisen, berühren. Samiya fɛ, ngomi bɛ da
bin na. Pendant l'hivernage, de la rosée se
da [à] Jula: daa. variante: dawulu, dabilen.
2 dépose sur l'herbe. During the rainy season,
Nom. oseille de Guinée, hibiscus; red sorrel;
dew settles on the grass. In der Regenzeit setzt
Hibiskus. Hibiscus sabdariffa; hibiscus
sich Tau auf dem Gras ab. synonyme: la .
cannabinus. synonyme: dankɔnɔ, daba .
3
5
4 • croire, avoir confiance en quelqu' un;
da 3 [á] variante: daa. Nom. prix, nombre, believe, have confidence in someone;
montant; price, number, amount; Preis, glauben, Vertrauen zu jemandem haben. N ma
Anzahl, Zahl. A da ka di. Ce n'est pas cher. da a la tiɲɛ don. Je ne crois pas que cela soit
It's not expensive. Es ist nicht teuer. Ne yɛrɛ vrai. I don't believe this to be true. Ich glaube
t'o da dɔn dɛ! Je ne connais pas du tout le nicht, daß das wahr ist. synonyme: la 4 .
nombre. I don't know the number at all. Ich
kenne die Anzahl überhaupt nicht.
29/01/2026 92

da daanɛjugu
5 • mettre ensemble, comparer, nouer; put daa comparer: dawulennin.[á] bambara: da.
3
together, compare, tie; zusammensetzen,
variante: daba. Nom. oseille de Guinée, oseille;
vergleichen, binden. ... mɔgɔ tɛ se ka a ni
red sorrel; Hibiskus. Category: Grass, herb,
tɔw da ɲɔgɔn na. ... personne ne peut
vine. Hibiscus sabdariffa.
comparer (cette maladie) aux autres. ...no one
synonyme: dakumun.
can compare (this disease) to others.
...niemand kann (diese Krankheit) mit anderen daa di bambara: da di. comparer: kandi.
vergleichen. synonyme: kaan di. Verbe. promettre; promise;
6 • mettre à la suite, suivre; put in sequence, verspreche. synonyme: layiduɲɔgɔnya.
follow; in die richtige Reihenfolge bringen,
folgen. U ye bɔrɛw da y'u da ɲɔgɔn kan. Ils daa mumɛ [á ù-ɛ́] synonyme: daa dafinin. Nom.
se sont suivis. They followed each other. Sie cardinal; cardinal; Kardinal.
folgten einander. synonyme: la . Category: Mathematics.
2
da [á] Verbe. 1 • créer, produire, faire, pondre;
daaba
1
[á] Nom. termite à grosse tête; big-headed
7
termite; großköpfige Termite. Category: Small
create, produce, make, lay; erschaffen,
produzieren, machen, legen. Kabini Ala ka n
animals.
da, n dusukun ma keleku. Depuis que Dieu daaba 2 [á] Emprunt de : arabe. Nom. animal
m'a crée, jamais mon courage n'a chancelé. domestique, bétail; domestic animal, livestock;
Since God created me, my courage has never Haustier, Vieh. Category: Animal husbandry.
wavered. Seit Gott mich erschaffen hat, hat daaduru [à] variante: duru. Nom. 1 • gargoulette;
mein Mut nie nachgelassen.
earthenware water jug; Wasserspeier,
2 • ouvrir (un champ); open up (a field); Wasserkrug aus Steingut.
eröffnen (ein Feld). ka foro da. Ouvrir un Category: Container.
champ. Open a field. ein Feld öffnen /
2 • stupide, idiot; stupid, idiot; Dummkopf,
beginnen.
Idiot. Daaduru yɛrɛ don. Il est vraiment
3 • parler, dire, chanter, lancer (un appel); stupide. He's really stupid. Er ist wirklich
speak, say, sing, make (a call); sprechen,
dumm.
sagen, singen, (einen Anruf tätigen). ka ntalen
daamɛ [à-ɛ́] Nom. ratel, lynx; badger, lynx; Dachs,
da dire un conte. tell a story. eine Geschichte
Luchs. Category: Mammal. mellivora capensis.
erzählen.
4 • mettre enceinte, engrosser; to get pregnant, daamu [à-ú] Emprunt de : arabe. Nom. 1 • bonheur,
to impregnate; schwanger werden, félicité, jouissance; happiness, bliss, felicity,
schwängern. A ye kɔnɔ da a la. Il l'a mis enjoyment, pleasure; Glück, Zufriedenheit,
enceinte. He got her pregnant. Er hat sie Glückseligkeit. Da tɛ daamu kɔrɔ dɔn. La
geschwängert. bouche ne se souvienne pas des bonnes
da variante: dan. Verbe. tisser, tresser, coiffer;
choses passées (proverbe). The mouth does not
8 remember good things past (proverb). Der
weave, braid, style; weben, flechten, stylen.
Mund erinnert sich nicht an vergangene gute
daa comparer: dagolo.[á] bambara: da. Nom. Dinge (Sprichwort).
1
1 • bouche, gueule; mouth; Mund, Maul. A daa 2 • rendre heureux, combler de bonheur, jouir
ka di. Il est bavard. He is talkative. Er redet
longtemps de; make happy, fill with happiness,
enjoy for a long time; glücklich machen,
viel. I daa tugu ! / I daa minɛ ! Tais-toi ! Shut
beglücken, lange Freude daran haben. A
up! Sei still! Category: Body.
daamu ! Puisses-tu en jouir longtemps ! May
2 • porte, entrée; door, entrance, car door; Tür,
you enjoy it for a long time! Mögen Sie lange
Tor, Pforte, Eingang, Autotür. Daa sɔgɔnin
Freude daran haben!
don. La porte est fermée à clé. The door is
daan [ã̀ã́] Nom. 1 • limite, fin, terme, bout; limit, end;
locked. Die Tür ist verschlossen.
Limit, Grenze, Ende. Daan be ko bɛɛ ra. Il y a
3 • lame, bord, limite, commencement; side,
limit, beginning; Klinge, Kante, Grenze, une fin à toute chose. (proverbe: Tout fini tôt
Anfang. Muru daa ka di. La lame du couteau ou tard.) Everything has an end. (proverb).
est tranchante. The knife is sharp. Das Messer
Alles hat sein Ende /Grenze (Sprichwort).
ist scharf. 2 • bosse (sur le dos); hump (on the back);
Buckel.
daa comparer: sɔngɔ.[á] bambara: da. Nom. prix,
2 1
daanɛjugu variante: dananjugu. Nom. 1 • dur,
nombre, montant; price number, amount;
Preis, Anzahl, Zahl. A daa ka di. C’est bon
méchant, mauvais; hard, nasty, bad; hart,
böse, schlecht.
marché. It’s a good price. Der Preis ist gut.
synonyme: sɔngɔ.
1
29/01/2026 93

daanɛjuguya dabalijugunci
2 • égoïste; self-centered, selfish; dabadawulen synonyme: tuasingɛ. Nom. plante
egozentrisch.
(espèce); plant sp; Pflanzenart.
3 • de mauvaise foi; dishonest, insincere; in Category: Grass, herb, vine. euphorbia hirta.
böser Absicht.
dabaden [à-à-é] Morphemes: daba-den.
daanɛjuguya [à-ɛ̀-ù-ù] Nom. 1 • méchanceté, dureté
variante: dabada, dabakisɛ. n.comp. soc de la
(d'une personne); nastiness, harshness (of a
houe, pièce en fer (de la daba); iron part of
person); Gemeinheit, Härte (einer Person).
hoe; Eisen von der Hacke.
2 • égoïsme; selfishness, egoism; Selbstsucht.
Category: Agricultural tool.
daani [à] Verbe. 1 • renoncer à se venger; refrain from dabagamasa [á] Nom. le Créateur, Dieu; the
revenge; verzichten auf Rache.
Creator, God; der Schöpfer, Gott. ... o tun ye
synonyme: dɛnkɛrɛnya.
án dabagamasa yɛrɛ ka baara ye. ... c'était
2 • s'en remettre a Dieu ou aux ancêtres pour
l’œuvre de notre Créateur lui-même. ...it was
obtenir quelque chose; relying on God or
the work of our Creator himself. ...es war das
ancestors to obtain something; Sich auf Gott
Werk unseres Schöpfers selbst.
oder die Vorfahren verlassen, um etwas zu
erlangen. N ye i la nenili daani i la. Je dabagatɔ [á] Nom. infirme, handicapé; crippled,
renonce à me venger de tes injures. I renounce disabled; verkrüppelt, behindert.
revenge for your insults. Ich verzichte auf dabaji variante: daba. Nom. encre; ink ; Tinte,
Rache für deine Beleidigungen.
Druckerschwärze, Tusche. synonyme: daba ,
1
daankun [à] Nom. carrefour, intersection de routes, lankiri.
croisement; crossroads, intersection of roads,
crossing; Kreuzung, Straßenkreuzung.
dabakala [à-à-á-á] variante: dabakalajiri. n.comp.
manche de la houe; handle of the hoe; Stiel der
daasi Variant: darasi. Nom. unité monétaire en
Hacke. Category: Agricultural tool.
dioula; money unit in Dioula; Geldeinheit in
Dioula.
dabakalasunsun synonyme: sunsun. Nom. kaki de
brousse; kind of tree; Baumart. Category: Tree.
daba
1
[á-á] Emprunt de : arabe. variante: laba. Nom.
diospyros mespiliformis.
encre; ink; Tinte. synonyme: dabaji, lankiri.
dabakisɛ [à-à] Morphemes: daba-kisɛ. Nom. soc de
daba 2 [à-á] comparer: falo, dabamuso. Nom. houe, la houe, fer de la houe; hoe share, hoe iron;
daba; hoe; Hacke. Category: Agricultural tool. Hackschar, Hackeisen. Category: Agricultural
daba Nom. avant-bras; forearm; Unterarm.
tool, Agriculture.
3
Category: Body, Parts of an animal. dabali [à-á-í] Emprunt de : arabe. variante: dabari,
daba [á-á] Nom. braillard, grand bouche, dɛbɛli. Variant: dabari. 1 • Verbe. ensorceler,
4
pratiquer un maléfice; bewitch; verzaubern.
beau-parleur; loud-mouthed; Grossmaul.
2 • Nom. objet d'ensorcellement, sortilège, ruse,
daba [à] Nom. oseille, chanvre du Soudan,
5 moyen, stratagème, complot, procédé,
gombo-chanvre; sorrel, Kenaf Hibiscus, maléfice; thing for bewitchment, spell,
okra-hemp; Hanf aus dem Sudan, Hibiskus, enchantment, charm, scheme, trick,
Okra-Hanf. Category: Grass, herb, vine. conspiracy; Zaubergegenstand, Fluch, Zauber,
hibiskus cannabinus. synonyme: dajan, da 2 . Zauberspruch, List, Verschwörung, Komplott.
dababa comparer: birilidaba.[à-à-á] Nom. grande dabaliban [à-à-í-ǎ] Morphemes: dabali-ban.
houe pour faire les grandes buttes; big hoe; Verbe. 1 • stupéfier, abasourdir, interloquer;
grosse Hacke. Category: Agricultural tool. amaze, astound, astonish, stupefy, stun;
verblüffen, erstaunen. synonyme: manwu.
dabada [à-à-á] variante: dabadaba. Nom. espèce de
plante; kind of plant; Pflanze (Art).
2 • incroyable, stupéfiant, extraordinaire;
Category: Grass, herb, vine. waltheria
incredible, astonishing, extraordinary;
americana, waltheria indica.
unglaublich, erstaunlich, außergewöhnlich.
dabadaba [à-à-á-á] Nom. plante (espèce); plant sp; dabalijugunci Nom. personne malfaisante (usant de
Pflanzenart. Category: Grass, herb, vine.
précédés occultes); evil person (using occult
waltheria americana, waltheria indica.
precedents); böse Person (unter Verwendung
okkulter Praktiken).
dabadabilen variante: dabadaninbilen,
dabadabilennin. Nom. espèce de plante; kind
of plant; Pflanze (Art). Category: Grass, herb,
vine. euphorbia hirta.
29/01/2026 94

dabamasa dabolo
dabamasa [à-à] Morphemes: daba-masa. dabi [à-í] Nom. puce; flea; Floh. Category: Insect.
3
variante: dabaŋana. Nom. champion de dabila [à-à-í] synonyme: lasa. vt. arrêter, annuler,
culture, homme qui cultive très bien, paysan
cesser, abandonner, laisser; stop, cease,
pilote; champion of agriculture, man who
abolish, rescind, end; anhalten, aufhören,
cultivates very well, pilot farmer;
aufheben. A dabila ! Arrêtes ! Stop it!
Landwirtschaftsexperte, Mann, der sich sehr
gut kultiviert, Pilotlandwirt.
Aufhören! Kasi in dabila. Arrête de pleurer !
Category: Agriculture, Worker, occupation. Stop crying! Hör auf zu weinen!
synonyme: siɲɛnikɛlan.
dabamisi Nom. bœuf de trait; ox; Ochse.
Category: Agriculture. dabila fɔlɔ vt. suspendre; suspend; aufschieben,
dabamuso [à-à-ú-ó] Nom. espèce de houe, pioche einstellen.
recourbée; kind of hoe; eine Art Hacke. dabilatali fɔlɔ synonyme: denni fɔlɔ. Nom.
Category: Agricultural tool. suspension; suspension; Suspension,
dabaninkurun [à-à-ì] Nom. petite houe; little hoe; Ausschluss.
kleine Hacke. Category: Agricultural tool. dabilen variante: dabilennin. Nom. 1 • hibiscus rouge,
dabapɛlu [à-à] Nom. bêche; spade; Spaten.
oseille de Guinée; red hibiscus; roter Hibiskus.
Category: Grass, herb, vine. hibiscus
Category: Agricultural tool.
sabdariffa. synonyme: dankɔnɔ.
dabara [á] Nom. bouche; mouth; Mund. Mɔgɔ se b'i
2 • bissap; red beverage made of this plant;
dabara la. On a pouvoir sur sa propre bouche. rotes Getränk aus den Blüten dieser Pflanze.
We have power over our own mouth. Wir Category: Food.
haben Macht über unseren eigenen Mund. dabin [á-ǐ] Verbe. gagner, vaincre (jeu, querelle...);
Category: Body.
win, conquer (game, quarrel...), defeat;
dabarajɛ [á] Morphemes: dabara-jɛ. Nom. gewinnen, erobern (Spiel, Streit...), besiegen.
1 • personne pauvre; poor person; armer N ye a dabin a kan. Je l'ai vaincu. I defeated
Mensch. him. Ich habe ihn besiegt.
2 • surnom de l'âne; donkey nickname; Esel dabiɲama [à-ì] Nom. accès pernicieux de paludisme,
Spitzname.
tétanos néo-natal; pernicious attacks of
dabari See main entry: dabali.[à-à-í] vt. ensorceler; malaria, neonatal tetanus; schädliche Anfälle
bewitch; verhexen, verzaubern. von Malaria, Tetanus bei Neugeborenen.
dabaya [á] Nom. défaut consistant à faire le braillard,
Category: Disease.
vantardise, forfanterie ; fault consisting of dabiri [á-í-í] vt. fermer, boucler, couvrir, recouvrir,
bragging, boasting; Fehler bestehend aus mettre face contre terre, retourner, renverser;
Prahlen. Dabaya dabila! Arrête tes close, cover, put upside down, reverse;
forfanteries ! Stop your boasting! Hören Sie zudecken, schliessen, bedecken, verdecken,
auf zu prahlen!
umkehren, auf den Kopf stellen, umdrehen.
synonyme: datugu.
dabɛrɛbɛrɛma
[á-ɛ̀-ɛ̀-ɛ̀-ɛ̀-á] variante: bɛrɛbɛrɛma. Verbe. dabisi [á] Morphemes: da-bisi. Verbe. fermer (en
1 • boucher les issues, couper toute retraite; contractant); close (by contracting); schließen
block the exits, cut off all retreat; Blockieren (durch zusammenpressen).
der Ausgänge, Abschneiden von jeden dabo [á] Morphemes: da-bo. variante: dalabo.
Rückzug.
Verbe. parler mal de quelqu'un; talk bad about
2 • acculer, coincer; to corner; in die Ecke / someone; schlecht über jemanden reden. A
Enge treiben. U ye nson dabɛrɛbɛrɛma
dabo tolilen don. Il parle mal aux gens. He
kɛnɛba kan. Ils ont coincé le voleur sur la
speaks badly to people. Er redet schlecht mit
grande place. They cornered the thief in the Menschen.
main square. Sie trieben den Dieb auf dem
Hauptplatz in die Enge.
dabolo [á] Nom. 1 • situation, posture; situation,
posture; Situation, Haltung. A segindon, a
dabi [à-í] variante: dɛbi, dabikɔnɔ,
1
sera a ma dabolo jugu kan. Il est revenu
dabikamannaani. Nom. engoulevent;
auprès de vous dans une situation peu brillante.
night-jar; Nachtschwalbe. Category: Bird.
He came back to you in a less than stellar
macrodipteryx longipennis / vexillarius.
situation. Er kam in einer alles andere als
dabi [à-í] Nom. punaise; bug, mite; Wanze. herausragenden Situation zu Ihnen zurück.
2
Category: Insect.
29/01/2026 95

dabɔ dacogo
2 • solution; solution; Lösung. U ma dabolo 2 • suçoir des insectes; sucker of insects;
tilennen si sɔrɔ a ko la. Ils n'ont trouvé Saugrüssel von Insekten. Category: Parts of an
aucune solution correcte à la chose. They
animal.
haven't found any correct solution to the thing. dabɔlɔbilennin [á] variante: dabilennin. Nom.
Sie haben keine richtige Lösung für die Sache pique-bœufs à bic jaune; Yellow-billed
gefunden. Ox-pecker; Gelbschnabel Madenhacker.
dabɔ [á-ɔ́] Verbe. 1 • débuter, entamer, commencer; Category: Bird. buphagus africanus.
1
to begin, start; anfangen, beginnen. U ye dabɔlɔjan [á] Nom. espèce d'oiseau, bec-en-ciseau;
dɔlɔmin dabɔ. Ils commencèrent à boire la kind of bird, African Skimmer; Vogelart,
bière de mil. They began to drink millet beer. Afrika Scherenschnabel. Category: Bird.
Sie begannen, Hirsebier zu trinken. rynchops flavirostris.
2 • apparaître; appear; erscheinen. Kabini dabɔlɔpɛnpɛrɛlen [á] Nom. spatule blanche, spatule
dabaŋanako dabɔra ... Depuis l'apparition du d'Afrique; African Spoonbill;
multiculteur ... Since the appearance of the Rotgesichtlöffler. Category: Bird. platalea
multi-cultivator... Seit dem Erscheinen des alba.
Multikultivators... dabɔlɔwɔlɔsɔ [á] Nom. Ibis falcinelle, Ibis luisant;
3 • sevrer; to wean; abstillen. Ni den ma dabɔ
glossy ibis, African sacred ibis; Ibis, Heiliger
nin cogo in na ... Si l'enfant n'est pas sevré de Ibis, Braunsichler oder Brauner Sichler.
cette façon ... If the child is not weaned this Category: Bird. plegadis falcinellus /
way... Wenn das Kind nicht auf diese Weise threskiornis aethiopica.
entwöhnt wird...
dabɔlɔwɔlɔsɔjɛman [á] Jula: dabɔlɔwɔlɔsɔ
4 • préparer intentionnellement, destiner,
gwɛman. Nom. ibis sacré; sacred ibis, African
prévoir, permettre; intentionally prepare,
sacred ibis; Vogelart, Heiliger Ibis.
intend, foresee, allow; absichtlich vorbereiten,
beabsichtigen, vorhersehen, zulassen. Wari in
Category: Bird. threskiornis aethiopica.
dabɔra komini ka bɔtaw kama... Cet argent daburu [á] Morphemes: da-buru. variante: dabulu.
est destiné aux dépenses des communes ... This Nom. 1 • bout, extrémité; end, extreme; Ende.
money is intended for municipal expenses... 2 • bec (de la bouilloire); spout (of the kettle);
Dieses Geld ist für kommunale Ausgaben Ausguß (des Wasserkochers). tasalen daburu
bestimmt... bec de la bouilloire. kettle spout.
5 • aiguiser; sharpen, hone; schärfen. ka muru Wasserkocherauslauf.
dabɔ aiguiser un couteau. sharpen a knife. ein 3 • trompe (d'éléphant, d'insecte); trunk
Messer schärfen. (elephant, insect); Rüssel (Elefant, Insekt).
dabɔ [á-ɔ́] Verbe. destiner, prévoir, permettre; 4 • canon de fusil; gun barrel; Gewehrlauf.
2
5 • prépuce; foreskin; Vorhaut.
destine, intend, schedule, allow; bestimmen
für, beabsichtigen, vorsehen, planen; gestatten. dacɛ [á-ɛ̌] Morphemes: da-cɛ. Verbe. 1 • achever,
Kɔmɔn dabɔra sugunɛkɛ kulusi la kama. La terminer, mourir; finish, die; beenden, sterben.
pêche commune permet de pisser dans son ka kuma dacɛ. terminer un discours. finish a
pantalon (proverbe). Common fishing allows speech. eine Rede beenden.
you to piss your pants (proverb). Beim
2 • changer de direction; change direction;
gemeinsamen Angeln kann man sich in die
Richtung ändern.
Hose machen (Sprichwort).
dacɛn [á-ɛ̌] Verbe. aiguiser un instrument (en la
dabɔbonbonkɔrɔ [á-ɔ́-ò-ò] Nom. couleuvre; kind
frottant sur une pierre); sharpen an instrument
of snake, grass-snake; Natter, Otter,
(by rubbing it on a stone); ein Instrument
Schlangenart. Category: Snake. rhamphiophis
schärfen (indem man es an einem Stein reibt).
oxyrhynchus.
dacogo [á] Nom. 1 • façon de se coucher; way of lying
dabɔlan [á] Morphemes: dabɔ-lan. Nom. bouton ou
down; Art, sich hinzulegen.
interrupteur pour la mise en marche d'un
2 • position couchée; lying position;
appareil; button or switch for turning on a
Liegeposition. ... ni den dacogo ka ɲi. ... si la
device; Taste oder Schalter zum Einschalten
eines Geräts. position de l'enfant (dans le ventre de sa mère)
est bonne. ...if the position of the child (in the
dabɔli siin na variante: dabɔli sin na. Nom. sevrage;
mother's womb) is good. ...wenn die Lage
weaning; Abstillen. des Kindes (im Mutterleib) gut ist.
dabɔlɔ [á] Nom. 1 • bec; beak; Schnabel.
29/01/2026 96

dada dadunfɛn
dada [á] Verbe. aligner; align, line up; ausrichten. dadiyalan [á] Nom. 1 • assaisonnement; seasoning,
An k'án dadada ɲɔgɔn dafɛ. Alignons-nous flavoring; Würze, Gewürz.
parallèlement les uns aux autres. Let's line up 2 • affûtoir; sharpener; Spitzer.
parallel to each other. Stellen wir uns parallel 3 • sel, sucre; salt, sugar; Salz, Zucker.
zueinander auf.
dado [á] Verbe. rendre (ou être) trop pâteux, trop
dade [á-ě] Morphemes: da-de. variante: daden.
tendre; make (or be) too mushy, too tender; zu
1 • Verbe. se taire; to be silent, keep quiet; matschig, zu zart machen (oder sein). Ɲɔ
schweigen. ... i b'i dade kuma dɔw ma. ... tu
dadolen bɛ. Il y a trop d'eau dans le mil à
dois te taire au sujet de certaines choses. ...you
piler. There is too much water in the millet to
need to keep quiet about certain things.
be pounded. Die Hirse enthält zu viel Wasser,
...man muß über bestimmte Dinge
um zerstoßen zu werden.
Stillschweigen bewahren.
dadon [á-ǒ] Verbe. 1 • attiser le feu; fan the fire; das
2 • Nom. silence; silence; das Schweigen, Ruhe,
Stille. Feuer anfachen. Taa n ka tasuma dadon
dadi See main entry: kandi. Nom. promesse; promise; joona, yanni a ka sa. Va vite activer mon feu,
avant qu'il ne meure. Quickly activate my fire,
Versprechen. synonyme: kali, dalakan.
1 before he dies. Aktiviere schnell mein Feuer,
dadigi [á] 1 • Verbe. faire du mal, pénaliser; to harm, bevor er stirbt.
to penalize; schaden, bestrafen. U ka kɛlɛ 2 • concentrer, recentrer; focus, concentrate,
dadigira u fila bɛɛ la. Leur querelle leur a fait
refocus; konzentrieren, neu fokussieren.
du mal à tous deux. Their quarrel hurt them
3 • entamer, démarrer, commencer; start,
both. Ihr Streit schmerzte sie beide. begin; beginnen, starten, anlassen. I ka mobili
2 • Verbe. tuer; kill; töten. U ye saga dadigi. Ils dadon, án ka taa! Démarre la voiture, et
ont tué le mouton. They killed the sheep. Sie
allons-y ! Start the car, and let's go! Starten
töteten das Schaf.
Sie das Auto und los geht’s!
3 • Verbe. vendre; sell; verkaufen. dadɔgɔmannin Nom. minorité; minority;
4 • Nom. dépense; expense; Ausgegeben. Minderheit. synonyme: fandennin.
Dadigi kɛra n ka jufa la. J'ai eu une dépense
dadɔn [á] Jula: dalɔn. Verbe. avoir connaissance de,
importante. I had a major expense. Ich hatte
eine große Ausgabe.
être au courant, connaître; to have knowledge
of, to be aware of, to know; Wissen haben, sich
dadimibana synonyme: datiɲɛbana. Nom. stomatite; dessen bewußt sein, kennen. A sara ka mɛɛn
stomatitis; Mundhöhlenentzündung, ka a sɔrɔ a somɔgɔw ma o dadɔn. Il était
Entzündung der Mundschleimhaut.
mort depuis longtemps que ses parents
Category: Disease.
n'étaient pas au courant. He had been dead for
dadiya 1 • Verbe. aiguiser; sharpen, hone; schärfen. a long time that his parents didn't know. Er
1
war schon lange tot, was seine Eltern nicht
Murunin dadiyara cogo o cogo, a tɛ se k'a
yɛrɛ kala dɛsɛ. Si aiguisé que soit le couteau,
wußten. Category: Think. synonyme: dalɔn.
il ne peut sculpter son propre manche dadɔnbali [á] Nom. 1 • inintelligent, stupide;
(proverbe). However sharp the knife, it cannot unintelligent, stupid; nicht intelligent, dumm.
carve its own handle (proverb). So scharf das
2 • incompréhensible, inexplicable,
Messer auch sein mag, es kann sich seinen
mystérieux; incomprehensible, inexplicable,
Griff nicht selbst schnitzen (Sprichwort).
mysterious; unverständlich, unerklärlich,
2 • Verbe. parler beaucoup; talk a lot; viel geheimnisvoll. O de ye dadɔnbali ye. Cela
reden.
reste un mystère. It remains a mystery. Das
3 • Nom. loquacité, faconde; loquaciousness, bleibt ein Rätsel.
eloquence; Geschwätzigkeit, Beredsamkeit.
dadugɛrɛ [á] variante: dadugura, dadugula. Nom.
dadiya [á] 1 • Verbe. vendre bon marché; sell cheap;
2 mâchoire inférieure; lower jaw; Unterkiefer.
günstig verkaufen. N ye saga dadiya a la. Je Category: Body, Parts of an animal.
lui ai vendu le mouton bon marché. I sold him synonyme: dagɛlɛkɛ.
the sheep cheap. Ich habe ihm das Schaf
günstig verkauft. Category: Finance.
daduman [á] Morphemes: da-duman. Nom.
antonyme: dagoya. tranchant, affûté; sharp; scharf. murunin
2 • Nom. bon marché, bon prix; cheap, good dadumannin couteau bien affûté. sharp knife.
price; günstig, guter Preis. scharfes Messer.
dadunfɛn [á] Nom. produit alimentaire; food product;
Lebensmittelprodukt. Category: Food.
29/01/2026 97

dafa dafatakulu
dafa [á-á] Morphemes: da1-fa. vt. 1 • réaliser, dafanin comparer: dafata.[á-á-ĩ́] bambara: dafalen.
1
compléter, combler, achever, accomplir, être Nom. voyelle; vowel; Vokal. dafanin
complet; fulfil, complete, finish, accomplish, samanen voyelle longue. long vowel. langer
achieve; schaffen, beenden, erfüllen,
Vokal. synonyme: dafalen.
vollenden. Ala b'a ka layidu bɛɛ dafa. Dieu
1
tient toutes ses promesses. God keeps all his dafanin 2 [á-á-ĩ́] Morphemes: dafa-nin.
promises. Gott hält alle seine Versprechen. Ala variante: dafalen. adj. parfait, complet; perfect,
ye min fɔ, a y'o dafa. Ce que Dieu a dit, il l’a complete; perfekt, vollkommen. kɛnɛya
réalisé. What God said he fulfilled. Gott hat dafanin parfaite santé, guérison complète.
erfüllt, was er versprochen hat. perfect health, complete healing.
2 • complément; grammatical complement; vollkommene Heilung.
grammatikalische Ergänzung. ...
dafanin [á-à-í] variante: dafalen, dafale. 1 • Nom.
kumasenkun ni dafa cɛ. ... entre le sujet et le
3
vœu, serment, promesse; vow, promise;
complément d'objet. ... between the subject
Gelübde, Schwur, Versprechen.
and the object. ... zwischen Subjekt und
synonyme: dalakan, kali.
Objekt. Category: Grammar.
1
2 • v.ref. faire un vœu, prêter serment, jurer;
dafabali Morphemes: dafa-bali. Nom. 1 • incomplet; make a vow, to swear ; geloben, schwören, ein
incomplete; unvollständig. A t'a fɛ ka a Gelübde ablegen, einen Eid schwören,
dafabali di. Il ne veut pas le donner schwören.
incomplet. He doesn't want to give it dafaninba Nom. intégrale; integral; das Integral.
incomplete. Er möchte es nicht unvollständig Category: Mathematics.
geben.
dafaninkulu n.comp. groupe de voyelles; vowel
2 • décimal; decimal; Dezimalwert,
Dezimalzahl. da dafabali nombre décimal. group; Vokalgruppe. Category: Grammar,
decimal number. Dezimalzahl.
Language.
Category: Mathematics. dafaninkunfila variante: dafanin kuun fila. n.comp.
dafaji [á] Morphemes: da-fa-ji. variante: dafanɛn, diphtongue; diphthong; Doppellaut.
Category: Grammar, Language.
dajibɔn. Nom. imbécile, niais, simple d'esprit;
imbecile, simpleton, simple-minded; dumm, dafanɔna [á-á-ɔ́-á] n.comp. pronom objectif;
einfältig. Category: Think. objective pronoun; Objektiv Pronomen.
synonyme: susunjula. Category: Grammar.
dafalan [á] Nom. complément, ce qui complète; dafara [á] Verbe. 1 • ouvrir en déchirant; open by
complement, which completes; Ergänzung, die tearing; durch Aufreißen öffnen.
vervollständigt. ... muso ye cɛ dafalan ye. ... 2 • balafré; scar; Narbe. Mosi dafara un Mossi
la femme est le complément de l'homme. balafré (avec des scarifications ethniques). a
...woman is the complement of man. ...die scarred Mossi (with ethnic scars). ein
Frau ist die Ergänzung des Mannes. vernarbter Mossi (mit ethnischen
Erkennungsnarben).
dafalen [á] Jula: dafanin. Nom. voyelle; vowel;
1
Vokal. dafalen surun, dafalen samalen dafarakasi [á] Verbe. pleurer à chaude larmes; cry
voyelle brève, voyelle longue. short vowel, bitterly; weine bitterlich. A dafarakasira
long vowel. kurzer Vokal, langer Vokal. surɔ. Elle n'a cessée de pleurer la nuit
Category: Grammar. synonyme: dafanin 1 . dernière. She didn't stop crying last night. Sie
hat letzte Nacht nicht aufgehört zu weinen.
dafalen [á-à-é] Morphemes: da-falen.
2
variante: dafale. Verbe. 1 • jurer, prêter dafata comparer: dafanin 1 .[á-á-á] Nom. consonne;
serment; swear, take an oath; schwören, einen consonant; Konsonant. dafalen ni dafata
Eid leisten. synonyme: kali , dalakan, siɲɛ , voyelles et consonnes. vowels and consonants.
1 3
kalen. Vokale und Konsonanten.
Category: Grammar, Language.
2 • serment, vœu, promesse; oath, vow,
promise; Eid, Gelübde, Versprechen, Gelübde. dafata filanin Nom. géminées; double; doppelt,
ka dafalen bɔ accomplir un vœu. fulfil a vow. gepaart. pp, dd, kk Category: Language and
einen Gelübde erfüllen. Category: Religion. thought.
synonyme: kali 1 . dafatakulu n.comp. groupe consonantique; consonant
group; Konsonanten Gruppe.
Category: Grammar, Language.
29/01/2026 98

dafe dafuruku
dafe [à-é] Nom. cheval blanc, cheval pommelé dafili [á-ì-í] Verbe. tromper en parlant, lapsus; make
(avec quelques poils blancs); white horse, a mistake while speaking, slip; sich beim
dappled horse (with some white hairs); Reden irren, Versprecher. A ma dafili hali
weisses Pferd, gesprenkeltes Pferd (mit siɲɛ kelen. Il ne s'est pas même trompé une
einigen weißen Haaren). Category: Mammal.
seule fois. He didn't even make a mistake once.
dafefin [á-é-ĩ́] variante: cule. Nom. cheval Er hat kein einziges Mal einen Fehler gemacht.
pommelé; dapple grey /grey horse; dafiɲɛ
Apfelschimmel. Category: Mammal.
comparer: dakasa.[á-í-ɛ́] Morphemes: da-fi
dafewulen Nom. cheval rouge avec des taches ɲɛ. Nom. 1 • haleine, souffle; breath; Atem,
blanches; red horse with white spots; Hauch, Odem. Category: Body.
fuchsfarbenes Pferd mit weissen Flecken.
2 • parole; speech, talk; Rede. A dafiɲɛ ka go.
Category: Mammal.
Il a mauvaise haleine. He has bad breath. Er
dafɛ [á-ɛ́] bambara: dala. postp. devant, à côté de, hat Mundgeruch.
près de, autour de, pour, dans; before, in front dafiri [á] Verbe. 1 • se retourner, se renverser; turn
of, besides, around; vor, bei, nahe von. A' y'a
around, turn over; umdrehen.
jɔgɔ ɲɔgɔn dafɛ. Mettez-vous en rang l'un
2 • tomber en avant, chavirer, s'écrouler; fall
devant l'autre. Line up in front of each other.
forward, capsize, collapse; nach vorne fallen,
Stellt euch voreinander auf. ... dugukolo bɛ kentern, zusammenbrechen. A dafirila dugu
munumunu tile dafɛ. ... la terre tourne autour ma. Il est tombé par terre sur la face. He fell to
du soleil. ...the earth revolves around the sun.
the ground on his face. Er fiel mit dem Gesicht
...die Erde dreht sich um die Sonne.
zu Boden.
synonyme: ɲɛfɛ, dala .
2 dafoni [á] Verbe. ouvrir en déliant (un sac), délier;
dafɛdugu komini synonyme: dafɛdugu kafo. expr.
open by untying (a bag), untie; durch
commune rurale; rural community, rural town, Aufbinden (eines Beutels) öffnen, aufbinden.
rural district; Landgemeinde, ländliches ... ka bɔrɛba dafoni ... ... ouvrir le grand sac...
Gebiet. Category: Government, Region. ...open the big bag... ...den großen Sack
dafɛdugumɔgɔ synonyme: kongomɔgɔ, cikɛla. öffnen...
Nom. villageois; villager; Dorfbewohner. daforon [á-ò-ó] variante: dafere. 1 • Verbe. pincer
dafɛjamana Nom. pays limitrophe; neighboring les lèvres vers l'intérieur (signe de
country; Nachbarland, Anrainerstaat.
détermination); pursing your lips inward (sign
Category: Region.
of determination); die Lippen nach innen
spitzen (Zeichen der Entschlossenheit).
dafɛla [á] Nom. alentours, environs; surrounding
2 • Verbe. retrousser (les manches), ourler; roll
area, vicinities, outskirts; Umgebung, Nähe, up (sleeves), hem; Krempeln (Ärmel), Saum
Gegend, umliegende Region. Donso ye dugu machen.
dafɛlaw bɛɛ kolonkolon. Le chasseur a 3 • Nom. repli, ourlet, retroussis; tuck, hem,
exploré tous les alentours du village. The rolled up; Biegung, Saum, hochgerollt. kulusi
hunter explored all around the village. Der daforon l'ourlet du pantalon. the hem of the
Jäger erkundete die Umgebung des ganze
pants. der Saum der Hose.
Dorfes.
dafɔ [á] Morphemes: da-fɔ. Verbe. dénombrer;
dafɛlɛ [á] variante: dafɛlɛn, dafalɛn. Verbe.
count, enumerate; zählen. ... n'a tɛ se ka
détacher; detach, loosen, untie; ablösen,
losbinden. I kana a dafɛlɛ fo án ma yɔrɔ
dafɔ... ... qu'on ne peut dénombrer ... ...that
we cannot count... ...das wir nicht zählen
janya yan na. Ne le détache pas avant que
können...
nous soyons loin d'ici. Don't untie him until
we're far from here. Binde ihn nicht los, bis dafu [à] Nom. fibre végétale, fibre de chanvre;
wir weit von hier entfernt sind. vegetable fibre; pflanzliche Faser.
dafɛta Nom. annulaire; ring finger; Ringfinger. Category: Parts of a plant.
Category: Body. dafuraburu [à-ú-á-ú-ú] Nom. feuilles d'oseille;
dafila [á-ì-á] Nom. fusil à deux coups, deux-coups;
sorrel leaves; Hibiskus Blätter.
double-shot rifle, two-shot; dafuruku See main entry: .[á-ú-ú-ú] Nom. joue;
Doppelladergewehr, zweischüssig. cheek; Backe. Category: Body.
Category: Hunt and fish.
29/01/2026 99

dafurukubanin dagayɔrɔ
dafurukubanin [ò-à-à-à-í] n.comp. médicament à dagabɔndala [á] Morphemes: daga-bɔ-n-dala.
base d'hormone de croissance; hormone Nom. fait de se débarrasser d'une contrainte;
growth based medicament; getting rid of a constraint; eine Einschränkung
Hormonwachstums Medikament. loswerden. Bolomafarako tɔ kɛlen bɛ
daga [à-á] Nom. 1 • jarre, canari, cruche, poterie, dagabɔndala ye. Il ne reste de la solidarité
1
pot, marmite en terre cuite, récipient; pot, que le fait de se débarrasser d'une contrainte.
pottery, jug, vase, jar, cooking pot, container, All that remains of solidarity is getting rid of a
bowl; Topf, Krug, Vase, Behälter, Gefäß. constraint. Von der Solidarität bleibt nur die
Category: Container. Beseitigung eines Zwanges.
2 • médicament, canari magique; medicine, dagadala Nom. potière; potter; Töpferin.
magic jar; Medikament, magische Vase. Category: Worker, occupation.
3 • sauce, cuisine, nourriture; sauce, cooking,
dagafinfin [à-à] Nom. noir de fumée, suie qui
food; Soße, Kochen, Essen, Nahrung.
recouvre les instruments de cuisine; carbon
daga 2 [á-á] Emprunt de : arabe. 1 • Nom. siège black, soot which covers kitchen instruments;
(action d'assiéger), campement, camp, Ruß, der Küchengeräte bedeckt, schwarz vom
bivouac; siege, encampment, bivouac; Lager, Rauch.
Belagerung, Biwak, Zeltlager, Feldlager. An
dagakɔnɔfɛnfalennin Nom. plant en pot; pot plant;
ka daga wuli, án ka taa daga bila kungo.
Topfpflanze.
Levons le camp, allons nous installer en
brousse. Let's break camp, go and settle in the dagamu [à-à-ú] variante: daamu. Nom. bonheur,
bushland. Laßt uns das Lager abbrechen, uns plaisir; happiness, pleasure; Fröhlichkeit,
im Buschland niederlassen. Glück.
2 • vi. assiéger, camper, être installé; besiege; dagan [à] variante: dagwan. Nom. gombo; okra;
belagern. Nebukadnozor ni a ka kɛlɛbolow
Okra. Category: Food. hibiscus esculentus.
bɛɛ nana daga Zerusalɛmu da la. synonyme: gan, gaan, gwan, gwaan.
6 1 3
Nabuchodonosor est venu avec toute son
armée assiéger la ville de Jérusalem.
daganin See main entry: .[à-à-ẽ́] vt. légal, autorisé,
Nebuchadnezzar and all his army came permis, licite; legal, authorized, permitted;
against Jerusalem and besieged it. legal, erlaubt. A daganin tɛ. Ce n’est pas
Nebukadnezar belagerte Jerusalem mit seiner légal. It’s not legal/authorised. Das ist nicht
Armee. Note: Bible: Jeremi 39.1 erlaubt.
3 • Nom. emprise, mainmise, pression; hold, daganinsira Nom. légalité; legality, lawfulness;
grip, sway, control, stranglehold, pressure;
Gesetzlichkeit, Gesetzmässigkeit,
Einfluss, Macht, Würgegriff, Druck, Zwang.
Rechtmässigkeit.
daga [à-à] vt. 1 • autoriser, permettre; authorize,
3 dagannan [á] [á] variante: dagwana. Nom. tout
allow, permit, ; erlauben, zulassen, gestatten.
condiment très fort, poivre, ce qui chauffe la
Fɛlɛba yɛrɛ dagalen tɛ. La chasse collective
bouche; any very strong condiment, pepper,
est interdite. Collective hunting is prohibited.
which heats the mouth; jedes sehr starke
Die gemeinsame Jagd ist verboten.
Gewürz, Pfeffer, das den Mund erhitzt.
2 • oser; dare (sth.), venture; wagen. I y'i daga Category: Food. synonyme: foronto, kɛlɛkɛlɛ.
1
nin kuma in de la. Tu as osé dire cette chose.
Dagari n.pro. groupe ethnique au Sud Ouest du
You dared to say this thing. Du hast es gewagt,
das zu sagen.
Burkina Faso; people group in the south-west
of Burkina Faso; Volksgruppe im Südwesten
3 • ordonner, obliger; order (sth.), instruct,
von Burkina Faso. Category: Community.
command, impose sth., compel , oblige, force;
anordnen, veranlassen, befehlen, verpflichten, dagarikan n.comp. langue des Dagara; Dagara
zwingen, nötigen, vorschreiben. language; Dagara Sprache.
dagabali [à-à-á-í] Nom. anormal, illégal; abnormal, dagasigidagadala
unnatural, illegal; abnormal, abartig, Morphemes: daga-sigi-daga-dala. Nom.
gesetzwidrig, illegal. espèce de plante; kind of plant; Pflanzenart.
dagabaliya comparer: sariyabilaliya. Nom. illégalité; Category: Grass, herb, vine. leucas
illegality; Gesetzwidrigkeit, Illegalität.
martinicensis.
dagayɔrɔ [á] Nom. lieu, implantation, siège, local;
seat, headquarters, main office; Sitz,
Hauptsitz, Hauptquartier.
29/01/2026 100

dageren dahirimɛ
dageren [á] Verbe. combler, boucher; fill, plug; dagolowulennan Nom. rouge à lèvres; lipstick;
befüllen, verstopfen. ... ka dingɛ dageren a Lippenstift.
nɔna ... ... et reboucher le trou comme il était dagosi [á-ò-í] variante: dalagosi. Verbe. 1 • retirer la
auparavant. ...and fill the hole as it was parole à quelqu'un, suborner; to take away
before. ...und füllen Sie das Loch wie zuvor. someone's speech, to bribe; jemandem die
dagɛlɛkɛ [á] Nom. mâchoire inférieure; lower jaw; Rede nehmen, bestechen.
Unterkiefer. synonyme: dadugɛrɛ. 2 • conseiller vivement à se taire; strongly
advise to keep quiet; raten dringend, ruhig zu
dagɛlɛn 1 [á] Jula: dagwɛlɛn. Nom. entêté, obstiné, bleiben. I den ye kuma jugu fɔ, a dagosi.
personne qui nie contre toute évidence; Ton enfant a dit des choses désagréables,
stubborn, obstinate, person who denies fais-le taire. Your child said nasty things, shut
against all evidence; sturer, hartnäckiger him up. Ihr Kind hat böse Dinge gesagt, raten
Mensch, der allen Beweisen zum Trotz Sie ihm den Mund zu halten.
leugnet. synonyme: dagwɛlɛn.
dagoya [á] 1 • Verbe. vendre cher; sell expensive; teuer
dagɛlɛn 2 [á] Morphemes: da-gɛlɛn. Nom. cher, de verkaufen. A ye saga dagoya n na. Il m'a
prix élevé; expensive, high price; teuer, hoher vendu le mouton cher. He sold me the sheep
Preis. munnan dagɛlɛn une pommade chère. for an expensive price. Er hat mir das Schaf
expensive ointment. teure Salbe. teuer verkauft. antonyme: dadiya .
2
Category: Finance. synonyme: jɔnsɔngɔ. 2 • Nom. prix élevé; high price; hoher Preis.
dagɛlɛya [á-ɛ̀-ɛ̀-á] Jula: dagwɛlɛya. Category: Finance. synonyme: jɔnsɔngɔ.
variante: dalagɛlɛya. Verbe. 1 • s'entêter (pour dagɔbɛ [á] Nom. bouche édentée, personne édentée;
une chose mauvaise), nier ses torts; to persist toothless mouth, toothless person; zahnloser
(for a bad thing), to deny one's wrongs; Mund, zahnloser Mensch. synonyme: mɔgɔbɛ.
hartnäckig bleiben (für eine schlechte Sache),
das eigene Unrecht leugnen. dagun [á] Morphemes: da-gun. Verbe. achever,
synonyme: dagwɛlɛya. mettre fin, conclure, aller jusqu'au bout; finish,
bring to an end, conclude, go to the end;
2 • entêtement dans le mal, dénégation;
beenden, zu Ende bringen, abschließen, zu
stubbornness in evil, denial; Sturheit im
Bösen, Verleugnung. A y'i dagɛlɛya nkalon
Ende gehen. Seku y'a ka baara kɛ fo ka a
kan. Il n'a pas voulu démordre de son
dagun. Sekou a fait son travail jusqu'au bout.
Sekou did his job until the end. Sekou hat
mensonge. He didn't want to break his lie. Er
seinen Job bis zum Schluß gemacht.
wollte seine Lüge nicht brechen.
dagɛn [á] Verbe. affûter, aiguiser dans une forge,
dagwɛ [á-ɛ́] Nom. antilope chevaline, hippotrague,
koba; roan antelope; Pferdeantilope.
fabrique (quelqu chose de pointu); sharpen,
Category: Mammal. synonyme: dajɛ , sɛnsɛn.
sharpen in a forge, make (something sharp); 1 2
schärfen, in einer Schmiede schärfen, (etwas dagwɛlɛn comparer: sɔsɔlikɛla. bambara: dagɛlɛn.
Scharfes) machen. ka muru dagɛn aiguiser
n.comp. contestataire, personne qui nie contre
(au feu) un couteau. sharpen (fire) a knife. ein toute évidence, entêté, obstiné; protester,
Messer schärfen (feuern). Category: Tool. stubborn, headstrong, obstinate;
dagolo Beschwerdeführer, starrköpfig, stur,
eigensinnig, dickköpfig, verbissen.
comparer: daa .[á-ó-ó] Morphemes: da-golo
1 synonyme: dagɛlɛn.
. variante: dawolo. Nom. lèvre; lip; Lippe.
1
Category: Body. synonyme: dawolo. dagwɛlɛya n.comp. mensonge, nier ses torts,
entêtement dans le mal, dénégation; lie,
dagoloba n.comp. grande lèvre; big lip; grosse Lippe.
untruth, falsehood, denial of fault, denial,
Category: Body. disclaimer; Unwahrheit, Lüge, seine Fehler
dagoloficinin n.comp. petite lèvre; small lip; kleine abstreiten, Verleugnung. synonyme: faniya,
Lippe. Category: Body. dagɛlɛya.
dagolofilafɔ variante: dagolofilalafɔ. n.comp. dahirimɛ [á-ì-ì-ɛ́] Emprunt de : arabe. Nom. pain
bilabiale; bilabial; bilabial. quotidien, subsistance, nourriture, vivres; daily
Category: Grammar. bread, livelihood, subsistence, supplies,
foodstuff; tägliches Brot, Lebensunterhalt,
dagolowɔrɔsɔ [á] Nom. ibis sacré; ibis; Ibis.
Auskommen, Eigenbedarf, Lebensmittel,
Category: Bird. Nahrungsmittel. Ala k'a dahirimɛ nɔgɔya
Category: Food.
29/01/2026 101

daja dajugu
daja [á-ǎ] Morphemes: da-ja. Verbe. fatiguer 6 • secret, moyen magique; secret, magic
means; Geheimnis, magische Mittel.
quelqu'un par des discussions; to tire someone
Category: Religion.
out with discussions; jemanden mit
Diskussionen ermüden. Bɔ n dala sa, i ye n daji kunu [á-í ú-ú] synonyme: daji bunun. vi.
daja ! Fiche-moi la paix, tu me fatigues ! saliver; salivate, secrete water as saliva;
Leave me alone, you're tiring me! Laß mich in Speichel absondern.
Ruhe, du ermüdest mich! synonyme: lasɛgɛn. dajibara [á] Nom. glande salivaire; salivary gland;
dajan [à] Nom. chanvre du Soudan, gombo-chanvre; Speicheldrüse. Category: Body.
Sudanese hemp, okra-hemp; Sudanesischer dajigin [á-ì-í] Verbe. baisser de niveau; drop in level;
Hanf, Okra-Hanf. Category: Grass, herb, vine. Pegelabfall. Kɔ fara cogo o cogo, tuma dɔ
Hibiscus cannabinus. synonyme: daba
5
.
la, a bɛ dajigin. Si forte soit la crue du fleuve,
dajɛ [á] Jula: dagwɛ. Morphemes: da-jɛ. vient un temps où elle baisse (proverbe).
1
variante: dagɛ. Nom. koba, antilope-cheval,
However strong the flood of the river, there
comes a time when it subsides (proverb). So
antilope rouanne; Roan antelope;
stark die Flut des Flusses auch sein mag, es
Pferdeantilope. Category: Mammal.
kommt eine Zeit, in der sie nachläßt
hippotragus equinus. synonyme: dagwɛ.
(Sprichwort).
dajɛ 2 [á-ɛ̌] Verbe. manquer, ne pas atteindre un dajikanga [á] Nom. bave, écume; drool, foam;
chiffre donné; to miss, not to reach a given
Sabbern, Schaum. ... fo dajikanga b'e bɔ ka
figure; fehlen, verfehlen, eine bestimmte Zahl
nicht erreichen. Hali kelen t'a dajɛ. Il n'en
toni. ... à tel point que la bave dégouttait. ...so
much so that drool was dripping. ...so sehr,
manque même pas un. Not even one is missing.
daß der Sabber tropfte.
Nicht einmal einer fehlt.
dajɛngɛ [á-ɛ̀-ɛ́] Verbe. pencher, incliner (quelque
dajinɛ [á] Morphemes: da-jinɛ. Nom. ange gardien,
esprit attaché à une personne; guardian angel,
chose qui a une ouverture); lean, incline
spirit attached to a person; Schutzengel, Geist,
(something that has an opening); neigen
der mit einer Person verbunden ist.
(etwas, das eine Öffnung hat), kippen. I bɛ
Category: Religion.
minɛn dajɛngɛ k'i tɛgɛ ko ... Tu inclines le
récipient et tu te laves les mains ... You tilt the
dajira [á-ì-á] variante: dayira. Verbe. exposer,
container and wash your hands... Sie kippen expliquer clairement et publiquement,
den Behälter und waschen Ihre Hände ... présenter; expose, explain clearly and publicly,
present; enthüllen, entlarven, klar und
daji [á-í] Morphemes: da-ji. Nom. 1 • salive;
öffentlich erklären, präsentieren. ... ka a ka
saliva; Speichel. ... mɔgɔw b'i daji tu i kan.
kumakan dajira u la... ... et leur exposer ses
... les gens crachent sur toi. ...people spit on
paroles ... ...and expose his words to them...
you. ...die Leute spucken dich an.
...und enthülle ihnen seine Worte...
Category: Body. synonyme: nɔgɔji.
synonyme: kɛnɛkisɛjɛ.
2 • tremper, diluer, mouiller, étendre d'eau;
dajisoro comparer: nalonma.[á-í-ó-ó] Nom. idiot
soak sb./sth., dip, dunk, dilute (sth.) , wet (sth.),
spread water; eintauchen, einweichen, sympathique; sympathetic idiot;
verdünnen, verwässern, benetzen. ka basi sympathischer Idiot.
daji. mouiller le couscous. wet the couscous. dajɔ [á-ɔ̌] Verbe. 1 • viser, présenter, braquer,
den Couscous anfeuchten. pointer; to aim, present, point; zielen,
3 • exterminer, réduire à néant; exterminate, präsentieren, zeigen. A ye bara dajɔ a la. Il a
reduce to nothing; ausrotten, auf Nichts pointé le flingue sur lui. He pointed the gun at
reduzieren. Kɔngɔba min kɛra, a ye mɔgɔw him. Er richtete die Waffe auf ihn.
ni baganw daji. La grande famine a exterminé 2 • arrêter; stop; aufhören. U ye baara dajɔ
gens et bêtes. The great famine exterminated yan. Ils ont arrêté le travail ici. They stopped
people and animals. Die große Hungersnot work here. Sie haben hier die Arbeit
vernichtete Menschen und Tiere.
eingestellt. synonyme: lajɔ.
4 • dilapider; squander; verschwenden. ka
dajugu [á] Morphemes: da-jugu. Nom. hyène
wari daji dilapider l'argent. squander money.
(surnom de l'); hyena (nickname); Hyäne
Geld verschwenden.
(Spitzname). synonyme: jaturu, namakɔrɔ,
5 • mettre fin à, cesser (une discussion); to put
lagabure, konjo, walowalo .
an end to, to cease (a discussion); (einer 2
Diskussion) ein Ende setzen, beenden.
29/01/2026 102

dajugukɔrɔkuma dakɛɲɛ
dajugukɔrɔkuma dakan [á-á] Nom. destin, destiné, sort, fatalité;
Morphemes: da-jugu-kɔrɔ-kuma. Nom. destiny, fate, lot, fatality; Schicksal,
grommellement, murmure, parole de Bestimmung, Los, Zwangsläufigkeit,
mécontentement dite à mi-voix; grumble, Unabwendbarkeit. Dakan tɛ falen. Le destin
murmur, word of discontent spoken in a low est irréversible. Destiny is irreversible. Das
voice; das Murren, das Gemurmel, Wort der Schicksal ist unumkehrbar. Bɛɛ ni i dakan
Unzufriedenheit, mit leiser Stimme don. A chacun son destin. Everyone has their
gesprochen.
own destiny. Jeder hat sein eigenes Schicksal.
dajuguya [á] Nom. injure, insulte; insult, slander, dakanma [á] Morphemes: da-kan-ma. Nom. être
offence, affront, verbal abuse; Kränkung,
prédestiné, créature exceptionnelle; to be
Beleidigung, Schimpfwort. I kana dajuguya
predestined, exceptional creature;
kɛ mɔgɔw la. Ne sois pas insultant envers les vorherbestimmtes, außergewöhnliches
gens. Don't be insulting to people. Beleidigen Geschöpf sein. ... o ye Ala kadakanma
Sie die Menschen nicht. jɔnkunnandi kelen kelenw ye. ... ce sont
dajuru [á] Nom. bride, rêne; bridle, reins; Zaum, les rares créatures prédestinées et bénies de
Zügel. synonyme: nunjuru. Dieu. ...these are the rare predestined and
blessed creatures of God. ...das sind die
dakabana variante: dakabanan. Adverbe. fortement, seltenen vorherbestimmten und gesegneten
sévèrement, extraordinaire; strongly, severely, Geschöpfe Gottes. synonyme: wolonkama,
extraordinary; stark, streng, ausserordentlich, nakanma.
ungewöhnlich. O ye suruku minɛ k'a
dakantigi [á] Morphemes: da-kan-tigi. Nom.
dakabana. Il attrapa l'hyène et la corrigea
prédestiné; predestined; prädestiniert,
sévèrement. He caught the hyena and
punished it severely. Er fing die Hyäne und
vorherbestimmt. Yali i ka dakantigi den
bestrafte sie streng. koniya, k'i ka a i teri ye. Au lieu de jalouser
dakabananworo n.comp. cola (très petite ou très
l'enfant prédestiné, fais-en ton ami. (proverbe).
Instead of being jealous of the predestined
grande); cola nut (very big or very small);
child, make him your friend. (proverb). Anstatt
Kola Nuß (sehr klein oder sehr groß).
eifersüchtig auf das Schicksalskind zu sein,
Category: Food.
machen Sie es zu Ihrem Freund. (Sprichwort).
dakala [á-á-á] Morphemes: da-kàla. synonyme: wolonkama, nakanma.
1
variante: dakalama. Nom. museau, gueule; jaw, dakaɲanan Nom. touche de tabulateur; tab key;
muffle, mouth; Kiefer, Schnauze.
Tabulator-Taste.
Category: Parts of an animal.
Dakari n.pro. Dakar; Dakar; Dakar.
dakala [á-á-á] Nom. bec; beak; Schnabel.
2
Category: Parts of an animal. dakasa comparer: dafiɲɛ.[á-á-á] n.comp. haleine;
dakala variante: dagala, dakalan. Verbe. 1 • museler;
respiration, breath; Atmung, Atem.
3
muzzle sb./sth; Maulkorb anbringen, knebeln. dakɛnɛ [á] Nom. endroit dégagé devant une concession
2 • achever, parfaire, bien accomplir; complete, ou un village, esplanade; open place in front of
finish well, improve, refine sth; vollenden, a concession or a village, esplanade; offener
fertigstellen, verbessern, vervollkommnen. An Platz vor einer Konzession oder einem Dorf,
ka baara in dakala. Achevons ce travail. Let's
großer Vorplatz. ... muso de bɛ bɔ dakɛnɛ la
finish this work. Laßt uns diese Arbeit
... ... ils sortent l'épouse devant la maison ...
beenden. ...they take the wife out in front of the house...
...sie bringen die Frau vor das Haus...
3 • arranger, réparer; arrange, repair, fix;
arrangieren, reparieren. Ni i tilala, i ka n ta in dakɛɲɛ 1 • Verbe. parfaire, compléter, ajuster; perfect,
dakala dɛ ! Quand tu auras fine, répare donc la complete, adjust; vervollständigen, anpassen.
mienne ! When you're done, fix mine! Wenn Mɔgɔw bɛɛ mana dakɛɲɛ ... Quand les gens
Sie fertig sind, reparieren Sie meine! seront au complet ... When the people are
4 • croquer (un os); to bite (a bone); beißen complete... Wenn die Leute vollständig sind...
(einen Knochen). ka kolo dakala, croquer un
os. bite a bone. einen Knochen beißen.
5 • dévorer, manger (une personne en
sorcellerie); devour, eat (a person in
witchcraft); verschlingen, essen (eine Person
in Hexerei).
29/01/2026 103

dakɛɲɛli dakɔrɔrta
2 • Verbe. adapter, ajuster, mettre à niveau, dakɔnɔbilafɛn [á] Nom. nourriture (euphémisme);
équilibrer, aplanir, égaliser; adapt, adjust,
food (euphemism); Essen (Euphemismus). An
level, to balance, flatten; anpassen,
ausgleichen, ebnen, nivellieren. Nakɔkɛnɛ ka taara Maadu ka so, án ma dakɔnɔbilafɛn
kan ka dakɛɲɛ. La surface du jardin doit être
sɔrɔ. Nous sommes allés chez Madou, nous
bien aplanie. The surface of the garden must
n'avons rien eu à nous mettre sous la dent. We
be well levelled. Die Oberfläche des Gartens
went to Madou's, we didn't have anything to
muß gut geebnet sein.
eat. Wir gingen zu Madou, wir hatten nichts zu
essen. Category: Food.
3 • Nom. équivalence; equivalence;
Gleichwertigkeit. synonyme: bɛrɛmakɛɲɛ. dakɔnɔna [á] Morphemes: da-kɔnɔ-na. Nom.
intérieur de la bouche, cavité buccale; inside of
dakɛɲɛli Nom. adaptation; adaptation; Anpassung.
the mouth, oral cavity; in dem Mund,
dakɛɲɛnan Nom. niveleuse; grader; Grader, Mundhöhle. Category: Body. synonyme: dawo.
Planiergerät, Erdhobel, Nivelliergerät. dakɔnɔɲinw [á] synonyme: kolobɔ. Nom. dentition;
dakɛɲɛnin adj. équilibré; balanced; ausgeglichen. dentition; Gebiss. Category: Body.
Baarakɛnafolo dakɛɲɛnin Budget équilibré. dakɔrɔbɔ See main entry: . variante: daraɲini, dalabɔ,
Balanced budget. ausgeglichen Budget.
dalakɔrɔbɔ. Verbe. 1 • provoquer verbalement,
dakisɛ Nom. oseille, grain d'oseille; sorrel, sorrel taquiner, agresser verbalement, tester, mettre à
grain; Sauerampfer, Sauerampfer Kernen. l'épreuve, agresser verbalement; provoke,
tease, test, verbally attack; provozieren,
dako [á-ó] Morphemes: da-ko. variante: danko.
herausfordern, reizen, verbaler Angriff. ... ka
Nom. physique, beauté physique, esthétique;
dakɔrɔbɔli dabila ... ... cesser leur agression
physical beauty, physical attractiveness,
... ...stop their aggression... ... ihre Aggression
aesthetic; physische Schönheit, äusseren
stoppen ...
Schönheit, Ästhetik. Kamalen in dako cɛ ka
ɲi. Ce jeune homme est très beau. This young
2 • taquiner; tease; necken.
man is very handsome. Dieser junge Mann ist dakɔrɔbɔli Nom. provocation; provocation;
sehr hübsch. Provokation, Herausforderung.
dakobɔrɔsi [á] Morphemes: da-ko-bɔrɔsi. Nom. dakɔrɔdon [á-ɔ́-ɔ́-ǒ] Verbe. 1 • amener quelqu'un à
brosse à dents; toothbrush; Zahnbürste. parler (à accepter, à refuser...); get someone to
Category: Tool. synonyme: gwɛsɛ , talk (to accept, to refuse...); jemanden zum
2
ɲinterekenan, ɲinkobɔrɔsi. Reden bringen (annehmen, ablehnen...)
2 • inciter quelqu'un à; encourage someone to;
dakojugu [á] Morphemes: da-ko-jugu. Nom. mal
jemanden dazu ermutigen. A kɔrɔw y'a
bâti, difforme, taré; poorly built, deformed,
dakɔrɔdon ko a k'i ban. Ses aînés l'ont incité
defective; schlecht gebaut, deformiert, defekt.
à refuser. His elders urged him to refuse. Seine
dakojuguya [á] Morphemes: da-ko-jugu-ya. Nom. Ältesten drängten ihn, sich zu weigern.
difformité physique, malformation; physical 3 • suggérer quelque chose à quelqu'un;
deformity, malformation; körperliche suggest something to someone; jemandem
Deformität, Fehlbildung. Category: Disease. etwas vorschlagen.
dakolo [á] Morphemes: da-kolo. Nom. mâchoire; dakɔrɔla [á-ɔ́-ɔ́-á] comparer: dakun.
jaw; Kiefer. Category: Body. synonyme: gɛrɛn, lamini. Nom. contour,
dakoron [á] Verbe. coincer, attraper en coinçant; to périphérie, bord, la partie à côté de; edge,
contour, periphery; Umriss, Kante, Peripherie,
corner, to catch by cornering; in die Ecke
drängen, in die Enge treiben und fangen. Sanji
Rand. synonyme: gɛrɛn
1
.
ye n dakoron. La pluie m'a coincé. The rain dakɔrɔrta Verbe. 1 • soulever, soulever en partie,
trapped me. Der Regen hat mich verhindert. soulever par par un bout, peser; raise (sth.), to
dakɔlɔsibaga lift, hoist sb./sth., weigh (sb./sth.), lift at one
end; heben, hochheben, wiegen, an einem
[á-ɔ́-ɔ́-í-á] Morphemes: da-kɔlɔ-si-baga.
Ende anheben.
variante: dakunnasigila. Nom. gardien;
2 • découvrir; discover; entdecken.
gatekeeper; Wache, Wächter, Torhüter.
3 • soupeser, peser; weigh; wiegen. N ye ɲɔ
Category: Worker, occupation.
synonyme: dakunnasigila.
dakɔrɔta, a bɛnna kilo tan ma. J'ai pesé le
mil, ça fait dix kilos. I weighed the millet, it
was ten kilos. Ich habe die Hirse gewogen, sie
wog zehn Kilo.
29/01/2026 104

dakumun dalabila
dakumun [à-ú-ú] Morphemes: da-kumu. dakun Nom. pointe; tip, top, peak, apex; Spitze,
4
variante: dakumu. Nom. oseille de Guinée, Zipfel.
oseille du Soudan; sorrel; Hibiskus. Murafura dakunnasigila variante: dakunnasigi. Nom. gardien;
ye dakumun ni jɛgɛ ye. L'oseille avec du guardian; Wächter, Torhüter, Wache.
poisson constitue un remède contre le rhume. dakunnasigilaw ye da yɛlɛn ... Les gardiens
Sorrel with fish is a remedy for colds. ouvrirent la porte ... The guards opened the
Sauerampfer mit Fisch ist ein Heilmittel gegen door... Die Wachen öffneten die Tür...
Erkältungen. Category: Grass, herb, vine. Category: Worker, occupation.
Hibiscus sabdariffa. synonyme: daa 3 . synonyme: sokɔlɔsila, dakɔlɔsibaga.
dakun 1 [á-ṹ] comparer: dakɔrɔla. Nom. 1 • chapitre, dakuru [á-ú-ú] Nom. espèce de poisson; kind of fish;
thème, étape, stade, partie, phase; chapter, Fischart. Category: Fish. petrocephalus.
theme, stage, step, part, phase; Kapitel,
Thema, Etappe, Teilstrecke, Teil, Phase.
dakurunkan [á] Morphemes: da-kurun-kan. Nom.
Hadamadenka diɲɛlatigɛ ye dakun naani 1 • ferme propos exprimé de ne plus faire
ye. La vie humaine comprend quatre stades.
quelque chose, avertissement; firm word of
warning to no longer do something; feste
Human life consists of four stages. Das
Warnung etwas nicht mehr zu tun.
menschliche Leben besteht aus vier Phasen.
2 • parole ultime, dernier mot; final word, last
2 • litige, différend; dispute, controversy;
word; letztes Wort.
Streitfall, Rechtsstreit,
Meinungsverschiedenheit, 3 • décision; decision; Entscheidung. A
Auseinandersetzung. Dakun wɛrɛ t'án cɛ. Il dakurunkan ye k'a tɛ fɛn fɔ. Sa décision est
n'y a point d'autre litige entre nous. There is no de ne pas parler. His decision is not to speak.
other dispute between us. Es gibt keinen Seine Entscheidung ist, nicht zu sprechen.
weiteren Streit zwischen uns. dakuruɲɛ [á] Morphemes: da-kuruɲɛ. Nom. 1 • mot,
3 • situation; situation, position; Situation. phrase, propos; word, sentence, statement;
Muso naani na, saba bɛ bugɔliba dakun na
Wort, Satz, Aussage. kuma dakuruɲɛ kelen
hali bi. Actuellement encore, trois femmes sur un seul mot. just one word. nur ein Wort.
quatre sont en situation d’être battues. Category: Grammar, Think.
Currently, three out of four women are still in
2 • fois, coup, bouchée; times, blow, mouthful;
a situation of being beaten. Derzeit sind drei
mal, Bissen, Schlag. ... a nana a ta dakuruɲɛ
von vier Frauen immer noch in der Situation,
kelen. ... il est venu prendre cela d'un seul
geschlagen zu werden.
coup. ...he came to take this in one fell swoop.
4 • limite, bord, extrémité; limit, edge, tip, end,
...er kam, um dies auf einen Schlag zu nehmen.
terminal; Limit, Kante, Endpunkt, Extremität.
5 • échange, transaction; exchange, dala 1 [à-á] comparer: dalannin. Jula: dalan. Nom.
transaction; Austausch, Transaktion. dakun mare, barrage, étang, lac; pool, dam, pond,
b'an cɛ
lake; Teich, Stausee, Weiher, See.
Category: Water.
6 • moyen, biais; medium, bias, through;
mittels, durch. An y'a cɛ dɔn baara dakun dala 2 [à] Jula: dafɛ. postp. devant, sur, à, chez, près
sababu de la. C'est par le biais du travail que de, à côté de, avec; in front of, on, at, near, next
nous avons connu l'homme en question. It was
to, with; vor, auf, bei, in der Nähe, neben, mit.
synonyme: dafɛ.
through work that we came to know the man in
question. Durch die Arbeit lernten wir den dala [á] comparer: dalagɛlɛ, dalagirin, dalajugu,
3
betreffenden Mann kennen.
dalakunan, dalamisɛn, dalandi, dalango,
dakun
2
[á-ú] Nom. seuil de porte; doorstep; Türstufe.
dalateli. Nom. bouche (dans quelques
Category: Building. expressions); mouth (in some expressions);
dakun [á-ú] Nom. 1 • niveau, rang; level, grade, Mund (in manchen Ausdrücken). I dala ka ca.
3
degree, rank, position, status; Niveau, Ebene, Tu parles trop. You talk too much. Du redest zu
Stufe, Rang, Stellung, Rangstufe. dakun viel.
kelen même niveau. same level. gleiches dalabila [á-á-ì-á] Emprunt de : dala-bila. Verbe.
Niveau. dévoiler, dénoncer; reveal, denounce;
2 • raison, motif, condition; reason, motive, enthüllen, anprangern. N ma se ka a to dogo
condition; Grund, Motiv, Bedingung. E nana la, n y'a dalabila. Je n'ai pas pu le laisser
dakun jumɛn de la? Pour quel motif es-tu caché, je l'ai dévoilé. I couldn't leave it hidden,
venu ? Why did you come? Warum bist du I revealed it. Ich konnte es nicht verborgen
gekommen? lassen, ich habe es enthüllt.
29/01/2026 105

dalacaman dalaka
dalacaman [á] Nom. bavard; talkative; gesprächig, dalagɛlɛn [á] variante: damagɛlɛn. Nom. 1 • forte
Schwätzer. Cɛ dalacaman don. C'est un tête, personne têtue, personne qui ne reconnaît
homme bavard. He is a talkative man. Er ist pas ses torts, contestataire; strong head,
ein gesprächiger Mann. synonyme: dalamisɛn. stubborn person, person who does not
recognize their wrongs, protester; starker
dalacɛ [á-á-ɛ̌] Verbe. 1 • s'essuyer la bouche; wipe Kopf, sturer Mensch, Mensch, der sein
one's mouth; sich den Mund abwischen. Unrecht nicht erkennt, Demonstrant.
2 • se rétracter, se dédier, renier ses paroles, 2 • obstiné, buté, entêté, effronté; obstinate,
nier; to retract, to dedicate oneself, to deny stubborn, headstrong, impudent; stur,
one's words, to deny, recant; sich eigensinnig, unverschämt.
zurückziehen, sich widmen, seine Worte
dalagɛsɛ [á] Nom. frotte-dents, leitmotiv; toothbrush,
leugnen, leugnen, widerrufen. A y'i dalacɛ a
leitmotif; Zahnbürste, Leitmotiv. O kuma in
ka surɔ kuma fɔlen ma. Il s'est rétracté pour
kɛra a dalagɛsɛ ye a ka jamankuntigiyaɲini
ce qu'il a dit hier soir. He recanted what he
said last night. Er widerrief, was er gestern
wagatiw la. Ces paroles ont été le leitmotiv de
Abend gesagt hatte. sa période de campagne présidentielle. These
words were the leitmotif of his presidential
daladegilibaara synonyme: dalasefilɛli. Nom.
campaign period. Diese Worte waren das
exercice oral; oral exercise; mündliche Leitmotiv seiner Präsidentschaftskampagne.
Übung. Category: Mathematics. synonyme: ɲinjɔsilan.
daladiya [á] Nom. plaisanterie; joke, jest; Witz. dalagirin [á] Nom. discret dans ses paroles; discreet in
synonyme: sadiya, yaabu 2 , wɛncɛ. his words; diskret in seinen Worten.
daladon [á-á-ǒ] Verbe. 1 • conseiller quelqu'un sur la Denmisɛn don, nka a dala ka girin. C'est un
jeune, mais il parle peu (il sait être discret).
conduite à avoir; advise someone on what to
do; jemandem raten, was zu tun ist.
He's young, but he doesn't talk much (he knows
synonyme: laadi.
how to be discreet). Er ist jung, redet aber
nicht viel (er weiß, wie man diskret ist).
2 • impliquer quelqu'un, introduire quelqu'un,
inciter à; involve someone, introduce dalajate Jula: dalajati. Nom. calcule oral, calcul
someone, encourage; jemanden einbeziehen, mental; oral calculation, mental arithmetic;
jemanden vorstellen, ermutigen. Kopfrechnen. Category: Mathematics.
3 • bien entretenir quelque chose; take good synonyme: kunfɛjate.
care of something; sich gut um etwas
dalajɛ See main entry: .[á-á-ɛ̌] Jula: dalajɛn.
kümmern.
variante: ɲɔgɔnlajɛn, dalajɛrɛ. vt. rassembler,
dalafasaya [á] Morphemes: dala-fasa-ya. Nom.
réunir, collecter, mettre ensemble; bring
défense; defend; Verteidigung. ... together, unite, collect, gather;
sanunbɔcakɛda ninnu bɛ dalafasaya la, ko zusammenbringen, vereinen, sammeln,
bin bɛ ka kɛ olu kan. ... ces compagnies zusammenpacken. A ye minanw bɛɛ dalajɛ...
aurifères se défendent en disant qu'on les Elle rassembla toutes ses affaires ... She
accuse injustement. ...these gold companies gathered all her things... Sie packte alle ihre
defend themselves by saying that they are Sachen zusammen... synonyme: kamari, lajɛrɛ.
being accused unfairly. ...diese
dalajɛnni Nom. collection; collection; Sammlung,
Goldunternehmen verteidigen sich damit, daß
sie zu Unrecht beschuldigt werden.
Kollektion. Category: Mathematics.
dalafɔ [á] Emprunt de : dala-fɔ. Verbe. dire, dalajugu [á] Nom. personne grossière, insultante;
insulting person; Obszöne Person,
présenter oralement; say, present orally;
sagen, mündlich vortragen. Karamɔgɔ bɛ
beleidigende Person.
kumasen ninnu dalafɔ : ... Le maître dit dalaka 1 [á-á-ǎ] Verbe. ouvrir; open, unlock; öffnen. N
oralement les phrases suivante : ... The teacher ka jɛgɛgongon dalaka. Ouvre-moi la boite de
orally says the following sentences: ... Der sardines. Open the can of sardines for me.
Lehrer sagt mündlich folgende Sätze: ...
dalaka [á-á-ǎ] Verbe. nier, ne pas reconnaître, renier;
2
dalafɔli n.comp. expression verbale, expression orale;
deny, not recognize; leugnen, nicht
verbal expression, oral expression, oral anerkennen. A y'a dalaka den fatigiya la. Il
communication; verbaler Ausdruck,
n'a pas reconnu la paternité de l'enfant. He did
mündlicher Ausdruck. Category: Language. not recognize the paternity of the child. Er
erkannte die Vaterschaft des Kindes nicht an.
29/01/2026 106

dalakan dalaminɛ
dalakan [á] Nom. 1 • avis; opinion, view; Meinung, 2 • s'arrêter de travailler; stop working;
aufhören zu arbeiten. U y'u baara dalakuru.
Ansicht. Hali bi a ma a dalakan fɔ án ye.
Ils ont suspendu leur travail. They suspended
Jusqu'à présent, il ne nous a pas donné son
their work. Sie stellten ihre Arbeit ein.
avis. So far he hasn't given us his opinion.
Bisher hat er uns seine Meinung nicht 3 • ranger, replier, mettre de l'ordre; put away,
mitgeteilt. fold, put in order; weglegen, falten, ordnen. ...
2 • engagement, vœu, promesse; commitment, bɛɛ b'a bolofɛnw dalakuru ... ... chacun
vow, promise; Verpflichtung, Gelübde, range ses affaires ... ... everyone puts his things
Versprechen. Sini n bɛ n dalakan bɔ. Demain away... ... jeder räumt seine Sachen weg...
je vais remplir mon engagement. Tomorrow I dalamaga [á-á-à-á] Verbe. 1 • répéter quelque chose;
will fulfil my commitment. Morgen werde ich
repeat something; etwas wiederholen. E k'i
meine Verpflichtung erfüllen.
dalamaga nin kɔ ! Répète un peu pour voir !
synonyme: dafalen, kalenkan, layidu, dadi,
2
Repeat a bit to see! Wiederholen Sie es ein
dafanin , dugawu.
3 wenig, um es zu sehen!
dalakango [á] Nom. qui parle mal; who speaks badly; 2 • rappeler d'une chose convenue; to
der schlecht redet. Saratu dalakango, Saratu remember something agreed upon; sich an
kɛlɛjeli. Saratou qui parle mal, Saratou qui
etwas Verabredetes erinnern.
cherche la bagarre. Saratou who speaks badly,
3 • s'occuper la bouche en attendant le repas,
Saratou who looks for a fight. Saratou, die
remuer la bouche, causer, manger,
amuse-bouche; occupy the mouth while
schlecht redet, Saratou, der die den Streit
sucht.
waiting for the meal, move the mouth, chat,
eat, appetizer; Betätigen Sie den Mund,
dalakɛɲɛ [á] Verbe. 1 • mettre à niveau, égaliser, während Sie auf das Essen warten, bewegen
niveler, ajuster; equalize, level, adjust; Sie den Mund, plaudern Sie, essen Sie,
ausgleichen, nivellieren, anpassen. Vorspeise. Hali dalamaga tɛ yan ! Pas même
2 • avoir des belles proportions; have beautiful d’amuse-gueules ! Not even appetizers! Nicht
proportions; schöne Proportionen haben. einmal eine Vorspeise! Category: Food.
Muso in a dalakɛɲɛlen don. Cette femme est
dalamagafɛn [á] Nom. friandise, amuse-gueule,
bien faite. This woman is well made. Diese
gâterie; delicacy, appetizer, treat; Delikatesse,
Frau ist gut /schön gemacht / gebaut.
Vorspeise, Leckerbissen. Category: Food.
dalako [á] Nom. bavardage, histoires, ragot, propos
dalamatɔ [á] Nom. blessé; hurt, injured, wounded;
mesquins; chatter, silly stories, gossip, petty
verletzt. ... án ma taa e dalamatɔ sɔrɔ ... ...
talk; Geschwätz, Geschichten, Klatsch,
Kleinigkeiten. A dalako ka ca. Il aime à
que nous ne t'avons pas trouvé blessé... ...that
we didn't find you injured... ...daß wir dich
bavarder. He likes to chat. Er macht gerne
nicht verletzt aufgefunden haben...
dummes Geschwätz.
dalamɛlɛku [á] variante: dalameleku. Nom. petit
dalakolon [á-á-ó-ṍ] menteur; liar; Lügner.
poisson (espèce); small fish sp; kleiner Fisch
Category: Person. synonyme: faniɲatigɛla,
(Art). Category: Fish. barilius senegalensis.
nkalontigɛla.
dalaminɛ [á-á-ì-ɛ̀] Morphemes: da1-laminɛ.
1
dalakolonya [á-á-ó-ṍ-á] synonyme: galon,
1 • Verbe. interpréter, traduire; interpret,
faniɲa. n.comp. mensonge; lie; Lüge. translate; interpretieren, übersetzen.
synonyme: faniya, nporo. 2 • Nom. traducteur, interprète; translator,
interpreter; Übersetzer, Interpret,
dalakuma [á] Nom. parole, propos; words, statement;
Dolmetscher.
Worte, Aussage. A ye n ladiya n'a dalakuma
3 • Nom. répondre irrévérencieusement,
ye. Ce qu'il a dit me fait très plaisir. What he répliquer, rétorquer; respond irreverently,
said made me very happy. Was er sagte, hat retort; respektlos antworten, erwidern. Kana i
mich sehr gefreut. ba dalaminɛ ! Ne réponds pas à ta mère !
dalakunan [á] Nom. fielleux, qui parle Don't talk back to your mother! Sprich nicht
unanständig mit deiner Mutter!
désagréablement; spiteful, who speaks
unpleasantly; boshaft, der unangenehm dalaminɛ [á-á-í-ɛ́] Verbe. répondre
2
spricht.
irrévérencieusement, répliquer, rétorquer;
dalakuru [á-á-ù-ú] Verbe. 1 • faire taire, se taire; to answer disrespectful, counter, argue;
silence, to be silent; zum Schweigen bringen, respektlos antworten, erwidern.
schweigen. synonyme: lamantɔ, lamakun.
29/01/2026 107

dalaminɛjeli dalasɔn
dalaminɛjeli [á] Emprunt de : dala-minɛ-jeli. Nom. 2 • maladie sexuellement transmissible;
sexually transmitted disease; sexuell
personne qui répond au chanteur, qui reprend
übertragbare Krankheit. Category: Disease.
le refrain; person who responds to the singer,
who takes up the chorus; Person, die auf den dalaɲini Morphemes: dala-ɲini. Verbe. provoquer,
Sänger antwortet, der den Refrain übernimmt. taquiner; provoke, tease; provozieren, necken.
dalamisɛn [á] Nom. personne qui ne peut pas retenir Ni i ye fatɔ dalaɲini ... Si tu provoques le fou
... If you provoke the madman... Wenn du den
sa bouche, bavard; person who can't hold his
mouth, talkative; Person, die den Mund nicht Verrückten provozierst... synonyme: kolaɲini.
halten kann, gesprächig. dalasa [á-á-ǎ] Emprunt de : dala-sa. Verbe.
synonyme: dalacaman.
étouffer, empêcher de se développer, contraire
dalamisɛnya [á] 1 • Verbe. parler trop, critiquer pour (une action), annuler, mettre un terme à
des riens; talk too much, criticize for nothing; quelque chose; stifle, prevent development,
zu viel reden, kritisieren um nichts. opposite (an action), cancel, put an end to
something; ersticken, die Entwicklung
2 • Nom. mesquinerie, gourmandise, bavardise;
verhindern, (einer Handlung) entgegenwirken,
chatter, pettiness, gluttony; dummes
Geschwätz, Kleinlichkeit, Völlerei.
etwas aufheben, ein Ende setzen. Mankan
dala ma sa. Le bruit n'a pas pu être étouffé.
dalan [ã-́ ã́] variante: dilan. Nom. 1 • lit, couche;
The noise could not be silenced. Der Lärm
bed; Bett, Liege. Category: Household
konnte nicht zum Schweigen gebracht werden.
equipment.
O gɛlɛya ninnu dalasa man di... Il n'est pas
2 • relation sexuelle; sexual relationship;
facile de mettre un terme à ces difficultés... It
sexuelle Beziehung, Geschlechtsverkehr.
is not easy to put an end to these difficulties...
dalanba Nom. lac; lake; See. Category: Water. Es ist nicht einfach, diesen Schwierigkeiten
ein Ende zu setzen...
dalandi [á] Nom. 1 • bavard; talkative, chatty;
dalasaɲɔ Nom. espèce d'herbe; kind of grass; Grasart.
gesprächig.
Category: Grass, herb, vine. elytrophorus
2 • importun, indiscret; unwelcome, indiscreet,
spicatus.
importunate; Aufdringlicher Mensch,
unwillkommen, indiskret. Dalandi tɛ malo, a dalasi [á-á-í] Nom. unité monétaire, cinq francs;
tɛ siran foyi ɲɛ. L'importun ne respecte rien, money unit, five francs; Geldeinheit, fünf
n'a peur de rien. The importunate respects Franken. Category: Finance.
nothing, is afraid of nothing. Der synonyme: dɔrɔmɛ, darasi.
Aufdringliche respektiert nichts, hat vor nichts
dalasii [á] Morphemes: da-la-sii. Nom. moustache,
Angst. synonyme: manimanci.
poils autour de la bouche en général;
dalaninkuma Nom. plante (espèce); plant sp; moustache, hair around the mouth in
Pflanzenart. Category: Grass, herb, vine. general; Schnauz, Oberlippenbart,
cassia nigricans. Schnurrbart, Haare um den Mund im
Allgemeinen. synonyme: nunkɔrɔsii, nunsii.
dalankanfinin [á] Nom. drap de lit; bed sheet, cover;
Bettanzug, Leintuch. Category: Household dalasɔn [á-á-ɔ̌] Verbe. 1 • tenir sa langue, être discret,
equipment. garder pour soi; hold your tongue, be discreet,
dalankolon [á] Nom. qui n'a rien à dire, sans rien dire;
keep to yourself; den Mund halten, seien Sie
diskret, etwas für sich behalten. Ni
who has nothing to say, without saying
sɛgɛsɛgɛlikɛlaw nana, áw k'áw dalasɔn. Si
anything; der nichts zu sagen hat, ohne etwas
zu sagen, stillschweigend. ... mɔgɔ si tɛ sɔn
des enquêteurs viennent, tenez votre langue ! If
investigators come, hold your tongue! Wenn
ka bagan san i dalankolon tuguni. ...
Ermittler kommen, halten Sie den Mund!
personne n'accepte plus d'acheter du bétail
2 • conseiller discrètement, mettre en garde,
sans rien dire (: sans marchander). ... no one
prévenir; advise discreetly, warn; diskret
agrees to buy livestock anymore without
beraten, warnen.
saying anything (: without haggling). ...
niemand willigt mehr ein, Vieh zu kaufen,
ohne etwas zu sagen (: ohne Feilschen).
dalankɔbɔ [à-à] Nom. insecte (espèce), coléoptère;
beetle; Käfer. Category: Insect. chrysomèle.
dalannabana [á] Nom. 1 • impuissance masculine;
male impotence; männliche Impotenz.
synonyme: jalagosi.
29/01/2026 108

dalateliya dama
dalateliya [á] 1 • Verbe. presser à parler; hurry to daliluntan [à-ì-ù-á] Nom. sans motif, sans raison;
speak; vorschnell sprechen. Fɛn min b'i without reason; ohne Grund, grundlos. Ko
sennateliya, o b'i dalateliya. L’événement daliluntan tɛ. Ce n'est pas une chose sans
qui te fait presser le pas te fait aussi presser la raison. It's not something without reason. Dies
bouche (proverbe). The event that makes you ist nicht ein Ding ohne Grund.
hurry also makes you hurry your mouth antonyme: daliluma.
(proverb). Das Ereignis, das Sie zur Eile
daliluya [à-ì-ù-á] 1 • Nom. connaissance mystique,
bringt, bringt Sie auch dazu, Ihren Mund zu
beeilen (Sprichwort). être la cause profonde; mystic knowledge, to be
the profound cause; mystisches Wissen, die
2 • Nom. empressement à parler; eagerness to
speak; Bereitschaft zu sprechen.
tiefgründige Ursache sein.
2 • Nom. procédé, solution, raison; process,
dali Emprunt de : français. Nom. dalle; concrete
solution, reason; Prozeß, Lösung, Grund.
slab; Betonplatte.
3 • Verbe. amener qqn à faire qqch, être la cause
daliba [á] Nom. tissu en coton épais, de couleur claire; profonde; to cause somebody to do something,
thick, light-colored cotton fabric; dicker, be the root cause; jemanden veranlassen etwas
heller Baumwollstoff. dalibadɔlɔki chemise
zu tun, die Grundursache sein.
en cotonnade. cotton shirt. Baumwollhemd. dalɔn bambara: dadɔn. Morphemes: da-lɔn. Verbe.
Category: Clothing. avoir connaissance de, être au courant,
dalidinga Nom. trou de dalle; hole in concrete slab; connaître; to have knowledge of, e aware of, to
know about; auf dem Laufenden sein,
Loch in der Betonplatte.
Kenntnis haben von. synonyme: dadɔn.
dalifinin [á] Morphemes: da-li-finin. Nom. pagne
dalɔnbali bambara: damadɔnbali.
tissé à la main, pagne tissé de plusieurs 1
couleurs en bandes parallèles; hand-woven variante: damalɔnbali. n.comp. indénombrable,
fabric, cloth woven in several colors in innombrable; countless, innumerable;
parallel strips; handgewebter Stoff, in unzählig, zahllos, unzählbar.
mehreren Farben in parallelen Streifen synonyme: damadɔnbali.
gewebter Stoff. Category: Clothing.
dalɔnbali Verbe. 1 • inintelligent, stupide, ne pas se
2
dalijɔ [á] Morphemes: da-li-jɔ. Nom. hamac;
rendre compte; unintelligent, be stupid, not be
hammock; Hängematte. synonyme: jɔɔ 2 . aware of; intelligent sein, dumm sein, nicht
auf dem Laufenden sein.
dalilu [à-í-ú] Emprunt de : arabe. Nom.
2 • incompréhensible, inexplicable,
1 • connaissance acquise, , le savoir, manière
mystérieux; incomprehensible, baffling,
de faire, moyen; acquired knowledge, way of
inexplicable, mysterious; unbegreiflich,
doing something, means; angeeignetes
unerklärbar, geheimnisvoll, rätselhaft,
Wissen, Kenntnis, Mittel.
mysteriös.
2 • convention, droit, clause; convention, right,
clause; Abmachung, Recht, Anspruch. Fanga
dama
1
[á-á] Nom. 1 • limite, dimension, taille,
ka dalilu don. C'est un droit du pouvoir. It is a
nombre, mesure; limit, frontier, dimension,
size, measure, number; Limit, Grenze,
right of power. Es ist ein Machtrecht.
Dimension, Ausmass, Mass, Grösse, Anzahl.
3 • pouvoir, secret; power, ability, capacity,
Dɔw bi dɔlɔ min k’a dama tɛmɛ. Il y a des
secret; Macht, Befugnis, Geheimnis. A ka
gens qui boivent à l’excès. Some drink over the
dalilu ka ca. Il a de nombreux secrets. He has
limit, to excess. Es gibt Leute, die beim
many secrets. Er hat viele Geheimnisse. Trinken keine Grenze kennen. Anw damanin
4 • cause, raison, motif; cause, reason, min ye yan... Le petit nombre que nous
grounds, motive; Ursache, Grund, Motiv. N
sommes... The few that we are... Die wenigen,
nana i sɛgɛrɛ dɛ, o de dalilu la. C'est pour die wir sind...
cette raison là que je suis venu te trouver. This 2 • caractère, caractéristique; character,
is why I came to find you. Deshalb bin ich characteristic; Charakter, Eigenschaft,
gekommen, um dich zu finden. Merkmal, Wesenszug. Bana don min dama
daliluma [à-ì-ù-á] Nom. motivé, qui a un motif (une ka kan jolimafɛn bɛɛ la. C'est une maladie
raison), bien fondé, prouvé; motivated, who qui est identique pour toutes les créatures à
has a motive (a reason), well-founded, proven; sang chaud. It is a disease that is the same for
motiviert, wer ein Motiv (einen Grund) hat, all warm-blooded creatures. Es handelt sich
begründet, nachgewiesen. wagati daliluma le um eine Krankheit, die bei allen Warmblütern
bon moment. the right time. der richtige
gleich ist.
Zeitpunkt. antonyme: daliluntan.
29/01/2026 109

dama daman
dama [à-á] Adverbe. seulement, uniquement, à part, 2 • indigence, misère; destitution, misery; Not,
2
Elend.
entièrement; only, solely, uniquely, except;
nur, ausschliesslich, lediglich, ausser. A
3 • manque, besoin; lack, need; Mangel,
Bedürfnis.
tɔndenw ye cɛw dama ye, muso t'a la. Les
4 • disette; famine; Hungersnot.
membres de l'association sont seulement des
hommes, il n'y a pas des femmes. The damajira [à-á-ì-á] Verbe. faire le maximum, faire
members of the association are only men, there tout son possible, faire de son mieux; do your
are no women. Mitglieder des Vereins sind best; sein Bestes geben. U na u seko
ausschließlich Männer, es gibt keine Frauen.
damajira bɛɛ kɛ ... Ils feront tout leur possible
synonyme: damanta.
... They will do everything possible... Sie
dama dɔ [á-á ɔ́] adj. quelques, plusieurs, un certain werden alles Mögliche tun...
nombre de, quelques-uns, un petit nombre de; damakasi [á-ǎ-à-í] 1 • Verbe. supplier quelqu'un,
several, a number of, some, a few; einige,
implorer, invoquer; to beg someone, to
welche, ein paar, mehrere. N ye fɛn dama dɔ implore, to invoke; jemanden anflehen,
san. J’ai acheté plusieurs choses. I bought a anflehen, anrufen. U y'u damakasi polisicɛ
few things. Ich habe einige Sachen gekauft. Cɛ la, a k'u bila. Ils ont supplié le policier de les
dama dɔw bi yan. Un certain nombre libérer. They begged the policeman to release
d’hommes sont ici. A number of men are here. them. Sie flehten den Polizisten an, sie
Einige Männer sind hier. synonyme: damadɔ, freizulassen.
damadama. 2 • Nom. supplication, imploration, invocation;
supplication, invocation; Flehen, Anrufung.
damada [á] Verbe. être humble dans ses propos, son
damakɛɲɛ [à-à] Verbe. 1 • être égal, rendre égal,
attitude; be humble in your words, your
mettre au même niveau; to be equal, to make
attitude; demütig sein in Worten, oder
Einstellung. I k'i damada ! Calme-toi ! (: sois
equal, to put on the same level; gleich sein,
gleich machen, auf die gleiche Ebene bringen.
conscient de ta place modeste). Calm down! (:
U sɔrɔla ka sogo tila ka a damakɛɲɛ. Ils
be aware of your modest place). Beruhige
partagèrent ensuite la viande en deux parts
dich! (: Seien Sie sich Ihres bescheidenen
Platzes bewußt).
égales. They then divided the meat into two
equal parts. Anschließend teilten sie das
damadama [á] Déterminant. 1 • quelques, un petit Fleisch in zwei gleiche Teile.
nombre de, quelques-uns; a few, a small 2 • égalité, équité; equality, fairness;
number of; ein paar, eine kleine Anzahl. ... a Gleichheit, Fairneß.
ka sa tile damadama kɔnɔ. ... qu'il meure au damakɔtaa [á] variante: damakotaa,, banakɔtaa.
bout de quelques jours. ...that he dies after a
Verbe. 1 • faire ses besoins; relieve oneself, go
few days. ...daß er nach ein paar Tagen stirbt.
to the bathroom; sich erleichtern, auf die
synonyme: damadɔ, dama dɔ.
Toilette gehen. A taara damakɔtaa la. Il est
2 • seulement, uniquement; only; nur. olu allé faire ses besoins. He went to relieve
cɛkɔrɔba damadama. uniquement eux les himself. Er ging, um sich zu erleichtern.
vieux. only them, the old people. nur diese 2 • défécation; defecation; Defäkation,
alten Leute. synonyme: damanta. Stuhlgang.
damadɔ [á] Déterminant. quelques, plusieurs, un petit daman 1 [à-á] variante: damanda, dama, ndaman,
nombre de; a few, several, a small number of; ntaman. Nom. mine, puits de mine (d'or);
ein paar, mehrere, eine kleine Anzahl von. A mine; Mine, Bergwerk. damanden mineur,
ye san damadɔ kɛ fanga na. Il est resté orpailleur. miner, gold prospector. Bergmann,
quelques années qu pouvoir. He remained in Goldsucher. Category: Land.
power for a few years. Er blieb einige Jahre an daman [á] variante: dama, ntama. Nom. 1 • groupe
2
der Macht. synonyme: damadama, dama dɔ.
d’entraide dans le travail; work support group;
damadɔnbali [à-à-ɔ̀-á-í] Jula: damalɔnbali. Arbeitsunterstützungsgruppe. Daman de bɛ
Nom. innombrable; innumerable, countless; baarakɛlaw dɛmɛ ka tila baara la joona. Le
unzählig, unzählbar. synonyme: dalɔnbali. groupe d’entraide permet aux travailleurs de
1
terminer un travail rapidement. The support
damaja [á-á-ǎ] variante: dalaja. Verbe. 1 • être dans
group allows workers to complete a job
la misère; to be in misery; im Elend sein. Ni e quickly. Die Selbsthilfegruppe ermöglicht es
mɔgɔ min damajalen tɛ ... Si tu n'est pas dans den Arbeitern, einen Auftrag schnell zu
la misère ... If you are not in poverty... Wenn erledigen. Category: 6.1 Work.
Sie nicht in Armut sind...
29/01/2026 110

damanbɔgɔ daminɛ
2 • acte (action, travail, service) effectué pour damanseenna [à-à-è] Nom. mineur; minor, digger;
une personne (sans rétribution mais à titre de
Bergarbeiter, Minenarbeiter.
réciprocité); act (action, work, service) carried
Category: Worker, occupation.
out for a person (without remuneration but as
reciprocity); Handlung (Arbeit, Dienst), die damanta [à-à] variante: damanda, damada,
für eine Person ausgeführt wird (ohne damandan, damantan, damantankulu.
Vergütung, aber als Gegenleistung).
seulement, uniquement; only; nur. A tɛ dɔwɛrɛ
damanbɔgɔ Nom. minerai; ore; Erz . la Bamakɔ nin damanta kɔ. Elle ne fait rien
damanci [á] Nom. travail en commun du groupe d'autre à Bamako que s'occuper des futilités.
She does nothing else in Bamako than take
d'entraide; joint work of the self-help group;
care of trivialities. Sie macht in Bamako nichts
gemeinsame Arbeit der Selbsthilfegruppe. An
anderes, als sich um Kleinigkeiten zu
ka damanci bilara don jumɛn kan? Notre kümmern. synonyme: dama , damadama,
2
travail en commun, c'est pour quel jour ? Our dɔrɔn.
joint work, for what day? Unsere gemeinsame
Arbeit, für welchen Tag? Category: 6.1 Work. damaɲini [á] Verbe. taquiner, chercher chicane à,
damanda [à-à-á] variante: ndamanda, ntamanda. quémander auprès de quelqu'un de la
nourriture; to tease, to argue with, to beg from
Nom. mine; gold mine; Goldmine. Damanda,
someone for food; jemanden necken, mit ihm
o ye yɔrɔ ye, sanun bɛ ɲini yɔrɔ min na. La streiten, ihn um Essen betteln.
mine, c'est un endroit où l'on cherche l'or. The
damaɲinikɛla [á] Nom. quémandeur, chicaneur;
mine is a place where people look for gold. Die
beggar, quibbler; Bettler, Streiter.
Mine ist ein Ort, an dem Menschen nach Gold
suchen. damasuuli [á-á-ù-í] Verbe. 1 • faire pencher; to tilt,
damanfɛnw Nom. ressource minérale; mineral bend, slant; kippen. I ka syo damasuuli.
resource ; mineralische Ressource. Penche le seau. Tip the bucket. Kippen Sie den
Category: Land. Eimer.
damango [á] variante: dalango. Nom. 1 • fielleux, 2 • dévaloriser; devalue, downgrade,
1
depreciate, demean; abwerten, erniedrigen.
qui parle mal; bitter, who speaks badly; bitter,
Kana n ka kuma damasuuli. Ne dévalorise
wer schlecht spricht. A fɛ kuma man di, bari
pas ce que j'ai dit. Don't demean what I said.
a daman ka go. Ce n'est pas agréable de lui
Erniedrigen Sie nicht, was ich gesagt habe.
parler, parce qu'il parle désagréablement. It's
damatɛmɛ [à-á-ɛ̀-ɛ́] 1 • Verbe. exagérer, être
not pleasant to talk to him, because he answers
unpleasantly. Es ist nicht angenehm, mit ihm excessif; exaggerate, be excessive;
zu reden, weil er unangenehm antwortet. übertreiben, übertrieben sein.
2 • personne qui ne répond pas ou qui répond 2 • Nom. excessivement, exagérément;
de façon désagréable; person who does not excessively; übermäßig. A y'a damatɛmɛ
respond or who responds in an unpleasant susu. Elle l'a pilé excessivement. She pounded
manner; Person, die nicht oder auf it excessively. Sie schlug übermäßig darauf
unangenehme Weise reagiert. ein.
damango 2 [á] Nom. qui ne dort pas bien, qui gêne les daminaci Nom. ligne de départ; start line; Startlinie.
autres en dormant; who does not sleep well,
daminɛ [á-ì-ɛ́] 1 • Nom. début, commencement; start,
who bothers others while sleeping; wer nicht
gut schläft, wer andere beim Schlafen stört. beginning; Anfang, Beginn. ... bana in fana
Karisa fɛ sili man di, bari a daman ka go. Ce daminɛ ye jali de ye... ... le début de cette
n'est pas agréable de dormir avec Untel, car il maladie aussi c'est la rigidité du corps ... ...
gêne les autres. It's not pleasant to sleep with the beginning of this disease is also the rigidity
So-and-so, because he bothers the others. Es of the body... ... der Beginn dieser Krankheit
ist nicht angenehm, mit dem und dem zu ist auch die Steifheit des Körpers ...
schlafen, weil er die anderen stört. 2 • vt. commencer, débuter, entamer; begin,
damanin variante: daman. un certain nombre; a start; anfangen, beginnen. Baara daminɛna.
certain number; eine gewisse Anzahl. Le travail a commencé. The work has started.
Die Arbeit hat begonnen. N ye lakɔli daminɛ
damannafolo Nom. ressource minière; mining
ka n sii to san 5 la. J’ai commencé l’école
resources; Mineralvorkommen .
Category: Land.
quand j’avais 5 ans. I started school when I
was 5 years old. Ich begann die Schulzeit als
ich fünf Jahre alt war.
29/01/2026 111

daminɛ kuma dan
3 • vt. boucher, acculer quelqu’un, couper la damunun [á] Verbe. détourner (la tête), changer de
retraite à quelqu'un; plug a hole, corner
direction, orienter, diriger; turn away (the
someone, cut off someone’s retreat; stopfen,
head), change direction, orient, direct;
jemanden in die Enge treiben, jemandem den
abwenden (den Kopf), Richtung ändern,
Rückzug verwehren.
orientieren, richten. A ye wotoro damunun
daminɛ kuma [á-í-ɛ́ ú-á] Nom. introduction;
so fanfɛ. Il a orienté la charrette vers la
introduction; Einleitung, Einführung. maison. He steered the cart toward the house.
daminɛnan adj. initial; initial, starting; anfänglich, Er steuerte den Karren zum Haus.
beginnend. dan [ã́] 1 • vt. compter, dénombrer; count; zählen.
1
daminɛtuma Nom. temps du début, au / depuis wari dan compter l’argent. count the money.
commencement; time of the beginning, at / das Geld zählen. A ye mɔgɔ tan ni duuru
from the beginning; Zeit des Anfangs, am /seit dan, mobilibolila bi minnu cɛma. Il a
Anfang. compté 15 personnes, y compris le chauffeur.
damini [á] variante: dalamini. Verbe. encercler, He counted 15 people, including the driver. Er
hat 15 Leute gezählt, einschließlich den
entourer, couper la retraite; encircle, surround,
Fahrer. synonyme: jate.
cut off the retreat; den Rückzug einkreisen, 1
umgeben, den Fluchtweg abschneiden, 2 • Nom. compte, total; account, the total;
umzingeln. U ye nson damini ka a minɛ. Ils Zählung, Rechnung, Konto, die Summe.
ont encerclé le voleur et l'ont capturé. They Category: Mathematics.
surrounded the thief and captured him. Sie dan [ã́] vt. tisser, tresser, natter; weave, plait, braid;
2
umzingelten den Dieb und nahmen ihn
weben, flechten, zöpfeln. gese dan tisser.
gefangen. synonyme: lakoori.
weave. weben.
damɔ [á] Verbe. 1 • arrondir la bouche; round his dan comparer: danbaga.[ã́] vt. créer; create;
3
mouth; seinen Mund runden.
schaffen, kreieren. Fɔlɔfɔlɔ Ala ye sankolo ni
2 • faire la moue; pout, pull a face;
dugukolo dan. Au commencement, Dieu créa
Schmollmund, schmollen. Ni i ye dɛgɛminna
le ciel et la terre. In the beginning, God created
damɔnen ye, a diminnen tɛ. Si tu vois un
the heavens and the earth. Im Anfang schuf
buveur de bouillie aigre faire la moue, ce n'est Gott den Himmel und die Erde. Ala ye fɛn bɛɛ
pas qu'il soit fâche. (proverbe). If you see a
dan. Dieu a tout créé. God created everything.
sour porridge drinker pouting, it's not because
he's angry. (proverb). Wenn Sie einen
Gott hat alles geschaffen.
Sauerbrei-Trinker schmollen sehen, liegt das dan [ã̀] vt. semer, semer en poquets; sow; säen. A
4
nicht daran, daß er wütend ist. (Sprichwort). ye bara dan yen. Il a semé là des calebasses.
3 • mûr, fruit mûr; ripe, ripe fruit; reif sein, He sowed gourds there. Er säte dort Kürbisse.
reife Frucht. mangoro damɔ mangue mûre. Category: Agriculture.
ripe mango. reife Mango.
dan [ã̀] vt. dépasser, plus que; overtake, be more
5
damu Emprunt de : français. Nom. dames; draughts,
1 than, better than; überholen, überragen, mehr
checkers; Damespiel. als, besser als, . I bi ne dan boli la. Tu cours
damu [á-ú] Emprunt de : français. Nom. dame; plus vite que moi. You run faster than me. Du
2
queen; Dame. synonyme: madamusonin.
rennst schneller als ich.
dan [à] variante: daan. 1 • Nom. limite, bout, fin,
damuba Nom. échiquier; chessboard; Schachbrett. 6
terme; limit, end, term, deadline; Limit, Ende,
damubatulon Nom. échecs; check; Schachspiel. Frist, Grenze. Dan tɛ áw ka kuma fɔtaw la.
damun [á-ǔ] Verbe. donner un pot-de-vin pour faire
Il n'y a pas des limites à ce que vous pouvez
dire. There are no limits to what you can say.
taire un témoin, suborner, graisser la patte;
Ihrer Aussage sind keine Grenzen gesetzt.
give a bribe to silence a witness, bribe; ein
2 • Verbe. limiter, arrêter, dépasser; to limit, to
Bestechungsgeld geben, um einen Zeugen zum
stop, exceed, surpass sb./sth; einschränken,
Schweigen zu bringen, bestechen. A ye
limitieren, aufhören, übertreffen. Kalanden in
polisikɛ damun. Il a graissé la patte du
ye tɔw bɛɛ dan. Cet élève a dépassé tous les
policier. He bribed the policeman. Er gab dem
autres. This student surpassed all the others.
Polizisten ein Bestechungsgeld.
Dieser Schüler hat alle anderen übertroffen.
Category: Finance.
29/01/2026 112

dan dandaɲɔgɔn
3 • Verbe. comble, pire, apogée; height, worst, danbe [ã̀-é] comparer: hɔɔrɔnya. Nom. dignité,
climax; Höhe, Schlimmstes, Höhepunkt.
honneur, valeur humaine, vertu, réputation,
Jamana kɔnɔ yan, gɛlɛya dan tun don. Dans
renom; dignity, honour, human value, virtue,
cette région ici, c'était la pire des difficultés. In
reputation, renown; Würde, Ehre,
this region here, it was the worst difficulty. In Menschenwürde, Tugend, Ansehen, Ruf,
dieser Region hier war es die größte
Ruhm. An tɛ sɔn mɔgɔ k'án danbe lanɔgɔ.
Schwierigkeit.
Nous n'acceptons pas que notre honneur soit
4 • Verbe. maximum, minimum; maximum, souillé. We do not accept that our honour is
minimum; Maximum, Minimum. ... misi b'a sullied. Wir akzeptieren nicht, daß unsere Ehre
fɛ, a ka ca, caya dan don. ... il a des vaches, besudelt wird.
beaucoup de vaches, le maximum. ...he has danbesegi synonyme: jolasegi. réhabilitation;
cows, lots of cows, as many as possible. ...er
rehabilitation; Rehabilitierung.
hat Kühe, viele Kühe, so viele wie möglich.
danbesɔrɔjo synonyme: danbejo. Nom. droit à la
dan [à] 1 • seulement; only, just; nur. ... o dan ye
7
dignité; right to dignity; Recht auf Würde.
ánw ye. ... ce n'est que nous. ...it's just us. ...es
sind nur wir. danbɔ [à-ɔ́] variante: dancɛbɔ. Verbe. tracer les
2 • interj. donc (dans quelques salutations à une limites, délimiter, avoir frontière commune
personne qui arrive); so (in some greetings to avec, classer, définir; delimit, mark out,
an arriving person); so (in einigen Grüßen an localize; abgrenzen, definieren. O ka foro
eine ankommende Person). I dan ka segin ! danbɔ. Ils ont délimité le champ. They
Bonne arrivée ! Welcome! Willkommen! Ala delimited the field. Sie haben das Feld
dan k'i segin án ma! Merci à Dieu de t'avoir abgegrenzt.
fait venir chez nous ! We thank God for danbɔli n.comp. délimitation; delimitation;
bringing you to our home! Gott sei Dank, daß Abgrenzung.
er dich zu uns nach Hause gebracht hat!
dancɛ [ã̀-ɛ́] Morphemes: dàn-cɛ. Nom. 1 • frontière,
dan [à] Verbe. échapper; escape, slip; entkommen,
8 limite, borne; border, limit, landmark; Grenze,
entfliehen. Ni kɔnɔ ye á dan ... Si l'oiseau Limit, Grenzstein, Markstein. ... ka jamana
vous échappe ... If the bird escapes you... dancɛw kɔlɔsi. ... surveiller les frontières du
Wenn der Vogel euch entkommt...
pays. ...monitor the country's borders. ...die
dan [à] Nom. pluriarc, sorte de petite harpe; harp, Grenzen des Landes überwachen.
9
sort of little harp; eine Art kleine Harfe. Category: Land.
Category: Musical instrument. 2 • différence; difference; Unterschied.
dana [á] Nom. chancre mou, ulcérations génitales, ...dancɛ b'olu ni Senegali ... dagaw ni ɲɔgɔn
cɛ. ... il y a une différence entre ces poteries et
syphilis; chancroid, genital ulcers, syphilis;
Geschwüre im Genitalbereich, Syphilis. Ni
celles du Sénégal. ... there is a difference
between this pottery and that of Senegal. ... es
mɔgɔ min y'a sunguruntigɛ, dana b'i minɛ.
gibt einen Unterschied zwischen dieser
Celui qui couche avec cette femme, il attrapera
Keramik und der aus Senegal.
le chancre. Whoever sleeps with this woman
will get genital ulcers. Wer mit dieser Frau dancɛbɔ Emprunt de : dancɛ-bɔ. Verbe. délimiter;
schläft, wird an Geschwüren im delimit, demarcate; abgrenzen. Cikɛla b'a ka
Genitalbereich erkranken. Category: Disease. foro dancɛbɔ ... Le cultivateur trace les
danan [á] Nom. igname Guinéen; round yam, air yam; limites de son champ ... The farmer draws the
Guineische Yamswurzel. Category: Food. limits of his field... Der Landwirt zieht die
dioscorea bulbifera. Grenzen seines Feldes...
danbaga See main entry: . dancɛlabin [à-ɛ̀-à-í] variante: dancɛlangɔn. Nom.
comparer: dan .[á-á-á] Morphemes: dan-ba herbe de limite, graminée; boundary grass,
3
grass; Grenzgras, Grasart. Category: Grass,
ga. n.comp. créateur; creator; Schöpfer.
herb, vine. panicum anabaptistum.
danda Nom. mur; wall; Mauer.
dandali [á-á-í] Nom. taro; taro root; Taro.
Category: Food.
dandaɲɔgɔn [ã̀-à-ɔ́-ɔ ́] synonyme: sigiɲɔgɔn.
variante: dannaɲɔgɔn, lannaɲɔgɔn. Nom.
voisin; neighbour; Nachbar.
synonyme: dannaɲɔgɔn, sigiɲɔgɔnma.
29/01/2026 113

dandara dankalan
dandara variante: danan. Nom. espèce de plante; kind danfinwulu variante: wulu danfin. Nom. chien noir;
of plant; Pflanzenart. Category: Bush, shrub. black dog; schwarze Hund.
dioscorea bulbifera.
danga [ã́-á] 1 • vt. maudire; curse; verfluchen,
1
danfara [à-á-á] Morphemes: dàn-fara. verwünschen. Ni mɔgɔ fa y'i danga, i tɛ foyi
variante: danfaran, danfaransi. 1 • Nom. sɔrɔ diɲɛ na ... Celui qui est maudit par son
différence, distinction, discrimination; père ne peut rien obtenir sur terre... He who is
difference, distinction, discrimination; cursed by his father cannot obtain anything on
Unterschied, Verschiedenheit, earth... Wer von seinem Vater verflucht ist,
Unterscheidung, Differenzierung, kann auf Erden nichts erlangen ...
Diskriminierung. Manje ni mangoro danfara
2 • Nom. malédiction; curse; Fluch,
ye jumɛn ye ? Quelle est la différence entre Verwünschung.
une mangue et une papaye ? What is the
danga [à-á] variante: dangaba, danganin, dagan,
difference between a mango and a papaya?
2
daganba. Nom. espèce d'arbre; kind of tree;
Was ist der Unterschied zwischen einer Mango
und einer Papaya? Baumart. Category: Tree. afzelia africana.
2 • vi. séparer, distinguer, différencier; danga [á] Nom. 1 • poulette, jeune poule; chicken,
3
separate, distinguish between, differentiate,
pullet; Huhn. Category: Animal husbandry.
discriminate; trennen, abtrennen,
2 • immature (pour une poule); immature (for a
unterscheiden, differenzieren. Soso fila in bɛ
hen); unreif (für eine Henne).
danfara ... On distingue ces deux
dangaden [á] Nom. enfant maudit, personne maudite,
moustiques... We can distinguish these two
mosquitoes.. Wir können diese beiden Mücken
maudit; cursed child, cursed person, cursed;
unterscheiden...
verfluchtes Kind, verfluchte Person, verflucht.
Dugadenw ye se dangadenw na. Les enfants
3 • Nom. frontière, limite; border, limit;
Grenze. bénis peuvent vaincre les enfants maudits.
Blessed children can defeat cursed children.
danfaraba [ã̀-à-à-á] Nom. grande différence;
Gesegnete Kinder können verfluchte Kinder
significant difference; großer / bedeutender besiegen.
Unterschied. Danfaraba tɛ su ni tile funteni
dangadenya [á] Verbe. 1 • maudire; curse;
cɛ. Il n’y a pas beaucoup de différence entre
verfluchen.
les températures pendant la nuit et pendant la
2 • dépraver; deprave; verderben.
journée. There is not much difference between
temperatures in the night and day. Es gibt kein dangan [ã́-ã́] bambara: dankan. Nom. berge, rive,
grosser Unterschied zwischen den bord; river bank; Flussufer, Ufer.
Nachttemperaturen und den Category: Water. synonyme: jida, dankan .
3
Tagestemperaturen.
danganin [à-à] variante: dagannin. Nom. pommier
danfarali Nom. disjonction; disjunction; Trennung,
cannelle du Sénégal; African custard-apple;
Abtrennung. Category: Mathematics.
Zimt-Apfelbaum aus Senegal. Category: Tree.
danfaran ka bɔ ɲɔgɔn na expr. différencier; Annona senegalensis.
differentiate; unterscheiden. dangasanna [á] Nom. maudit, vaurien, voyou,
Category: Mathematics. synonyme: faranfaasi. effronté; cursed, scoundrel, thug, shameless;
danfaranman adj. disjoint; disjunctive, separate verflucht, Schurke, schamloser Schlingel.
parts; getrennt. Category: Mathematics. dangaya [à-à-á] variante: dangatɔya. 1 • Nom.
danfarasɛbɛ [ã̀-à-à-ɛ́-ɛ́] Nom. pièce d'identité; malpropreté, saleté; uncleanliness,
impropriety, dirtiness; Unsauberkeit,
identity card; Personalausweis, Ausweis,
Schmutz, Verschmutzung.
Identitätskarte.
2 • Verbe. être malpropre, rendre malpropre; to
danfɛn [ã-́ ɛ ́] Morphemes: dan-fɛn. variante: danfen. be messy, dity; unsauber sein, chaotisch sein,
Nom. créature, un être; creature, created thing; chaotisch machen. Muso in dangayara. Cette
Kreatur, Geschöpf. Saya tɛ danfɛn to. La femme est malpropre. This woman is messy.
mort n'épargne aucune créature. Death spares Diese Frau ist chaotisch.
no creature. Der Tod verschont kein
danja [à-á] Nom. héron garde-bœufs; cattle egret;
Geschöpf.
Kuhreiher. Category: Bird.
danfin [à-í] Nom. animal de couleur noire; black
dankalan [à-á-á] Nom. vipère heurtant; viper, adder;
animal; schwarzes Tier.
Viper. Category: Snake. bitis arietans.
29/01/2026 114

dankalankule danna
dankalankule [á] variante: dankarankule. Nom. dankɔrɔba [à-ɔ̀-ɔ̀] variante: dankɔrɔ. Nom. être
antilope (espèce), oryx algazelle; antelope sp; (homme ou animal) très vieux, très fort, très
Antilope (Art). Category: Mammal. oryx expérimenté, extraordinaire; (man or animal)
algazella; oryx dammah. very old being, very strong being, very
dankan [ã̀-ã́] synonyme: danɲɛ. Nom. destin,
experienced being, extraordinary; (Mensch
1 oder Tier) sehr alt, sehr stark, sehr erfahren,
ultimatum, avertissement, mise en garde
außergewöhnlich sein. Dankɔrɔba y'i foori ka
ultime, parole solennelle; destiny, fate, lot,
bɔ sokɛ kirikɛ la. (L'homme) extraordinaire
ultimatum, warning, admonition, final
warning, solemn word; Schicksal, Los, se sortit de la selle ... The extraordinary man
Geschick, Ultimatum, Warnung, Mahnung, got out of the saddle... Der außergewöhnliche
letzte Warnung, ernstes Wort. ka dankan fɔ Mann stieg aus dem Sattel...
donner un ultimatum. pronounce an dankuru [à] variante: dankurutɔ. Nom. bosse, bossu;
ultimatum. ein Ultimatum stellen. hump, hunchback; Buckel, Buckliger.
dankan [ã́-ã́] Nom. adjoint, assistant, successeur; Dankuru de bɛ a jaki la. C'est une bosse qu'il
2
deputy, assistant, successor; Stellvertreter, a en haut du dos. It's a bump he has on his
Abgeordneter, Nachfolger. Category: Person. upper back. Es ist ein Buckel, die er am oberen
Rücken hat.
dankan [á] Nom. 1 • berge, rive; riverbank; Ufer,
3
danma- [à] Nom. à part (nominal non autonome),
Flußufer. A taara i ko dankan la. Elle est
spécial, différent du commun, extraordinaire,
allée se laver sur la berge du fleuve. She went
particulier; apart (nominal non-autonomous),
to wash herself on the river bank. Sie ging zum
special, different from the common,
Flußufer, um sich zu waschen.
extraordinary, particular; getrennt (nicht
Category: Water, Land. synonyme: dangan.
autonomes Nomen), besonders, anders als das
2 • successeur, adjoint; successor, deputy; Gewöhnliche, außergewöhnlich. Sogo bɛɛ
Nachfolger, Stellvertreter. kibarudidalaw
danmadaga tɛ sigi. On ne met pas sur le feu
kuntigidankan l'adjoint au rédacteur en chef.
une marmite particulière pour chaque viande
the deputy editor-in-chief. der stellvertretende (proverbe). You don't put a particular pot on
Chefredakteur. the fire for each meat (proverb). Man stellt
dankanna [á] Nom. châle, foulard, écharpe, pièce de nicht für jedes Fleisch einen eigenen Topf aufs
Feuer (Sprichwort).
tissu qui recouvre le cou et les épaules; shawl,
scarf, piece of fabric that covers the neck and danmatɛmɛ n.comp. abus; abuse, falsity, misuse;
shoulder; Schal, Stück Stoff, das den Hals und Missbrauch.
die Schultern bedeckt. A muso ye dankanna
danmatɛmɛwali See main entry: dantɛmɛwali.
bila a kan na. Sa femme mit le châle sur son
n.comp. abus de pouvoir; misuse of authority;
cou. His wife put the shawl on his neck. Seine
Machtmissbrauch.
Frau legte ihm den Schal um den Hals.
synonyme: disa. danna 1 [á-á] synonyme: pɔrɔn. Nom. syphilis; dose,
syphilis; Syphilis. Category: Disease.
dankɛnɛmaya [á] Verbe. préciser, éclaircir,
confirmer, mettre au clair; klären, bestätigen.
danna
2
[á] Jula: lanna. Nom. confiance, foi; trust,
A y'a dankɛnɛmaya n ye bi. Il me l'a confirmé faith; Vertrauen, Glaube. ... danna man kan
aujourd'hui. He confirmed it to me today. Er ka kɛ a la. ... on ne peut pas lui faire confiance.
hat es mir heute bestätigt. ...we can't trust him. ...wir können ihm nicht
dankɔdimin [à-ɔ̀] variante: dankɔgɔdimin. Nom. vertrauen. synonyme: dannatigiya, dannaya,
lanna.
maladie qui rend bossu; disease that makes
you hunchbacked; Krankheit, die einen
bucklig macht.
dankɔnɔ [à] Nom. Hibiscus; Hibiscus; Hibiskus.
Category: Grass, herb, vine. synonyme: da ,
2
dabilen.
dankɔnɔba [à-ɔ̀-ɔ̀-á] Nom. oseille de Guinée, oseille
du Soudan; Guinea sorrel;
Guinea-Sauerampfer. hibiscus sabdariffa.
29/01/2026 115

dannabaga dannitilenni
dannabaga [á] bambara: bambara. dannatigi [á] Nom. croyant; believer; Gläubige.
Morphemes: danna-baga. Nom. personne de Alabato bɛ dannatigi kologɛlɛya.
confiance; trusted person; vertrauenswürdige L’adoration de Dieu fortifie le croyant.
Person. Mɔgɔ tɛ bila jɔyɔrɔ in na ni i tɛ Worshipping God strengthens the believer.
dannabaga ye ani n'a donniya t'i la. On n'est Die Anbetung Gottes stärkt den Gläubigen.
synonyme: alalɔnbaga, lannabaga, lannatigi;
pas mis à ce poste si on n'est pas une personne
de confiance et si on n'a pas des compétences antonyme: kafiri, lannabali.
requises. You are not placed in this position if
dannatigiya [á] Nom. confiance, foi; trust, faith;
you are not a trustworthy person and if you do
not have the required skills. Sie werden nicht Vertrauen, Glaube. synonyme: danna 2 ,
in diese Position gebracht, wenn Sie keine lannatigiya.
vertrauenswürdige Person sind und nicht über
dannaya [á] Jula: lannaya. Nom. confiance, foi;
die erforderlichen Fähigkeiten verfügen.
synonyme: dannamɔgɔ, lannabaga. trust, faith; Vertrauen, Glaube. Dannaya t'u ni
ɲɔgɔn cɛ. Ils n’avaient pas confiance les uns
dannabali [á] Jula: lannabali. Nom. incroyant,
en les autres. They didn't trust each other. Sie
mécréant, personne en qui on n'a pas vertrauten einander nicht.
confiance; unbeliever, person who is not
synonyme: lannatigiya, lanna, lannaya,
trusted; Ungläubiger, Person, der nicht
danna .
vertraut wird. synonyme: lannabali. 2
danni [ã́-í] Morphemes: da-li. Nom. tissage;
dannabaliya [á] Jula: lannabaliya. Nom. 1
weaving; Weben.
1 • incroyance; unbelief; Unglaube.
synonyme: lannabaliya. danni 2 [ã̀-í] Nom. semis; sowing; Aussaat.
2 • défiance, manque de confiance; distrust, Category: Agriculture.
lack of confidence; Mißtrauen, Mangel an danni [ã́-í] comparer: jatili. Nom. recensement;
3
Vertrauen.
census, inventory; Zählung, Volkszählung,
dannamɔgɔ [á] Jula: lannamɔgɔ. Nom. personne Inventar.
de confiance; trusted person; dannidingɛ [ã̀-ì-ĩ́-ɛ́] Nom. poquet; hole for sowing;
vertrauenswürdige Person.
Loch für Samen. Dannidingɛ furancɛ :
synonyme: tinnamɔgɔ, lannamɔgɔ,
santimɛtɛrɛ 30. Intervalle ente les poquets :
lannabaga, dannabaga.
30 cm. Interval between pockets: 30 cm.
dannaɲɔgɔn [á] Morphemes: dan-na-ɲɔgɔn. Nom. Abstand zwischen den Saat-löchern: 30 cm.
voisin; neighbor, neighbour; Nachbar. Category: Agriculture.
synonyme: sigiɲɔgɔnma, dandaɲɔgɔn, dannifɛn [ã̀-ì-ɛ ́] Nom. semis; seedling; Sämling,
sigiɲɔgɔn. Samen. Category: Agriculture.
dannaɲɔgɔnya [á] Jula: lannaɲɔgɔnya. Nom. dannikalo synonyme: zuwɛnkalo. Nom. mois de
confiance mutuelle; mutual trust; semailles, juin; month of sowing, June; Monat
gegenseitiges Vertrauen. Dannaɲɔgɔnya bɛ des Säens, Juni. synonyme: juwɛnkalo.
ánw ni ɲɔgɔn cɛ, a mɛɛnna. Il y a entre nous dannikɛlan [à-ì-ɛ̀-á] Jula: dannikɛnan.
depuis longtemps une grande confiance
variante: dannikɛmansin. Nom. semoir; seed
mutuelle. There has been a great mutual trust
between us for a long time. Zwischen uns
drill; Sämaschine, Drillmaschine.
Category: Agricultural tool.
herrscht seit langem ein großes gegenseitiges
Vertrauen. synonyme: lannaɲɔgɔnya. dannikoro [à-ì] Nom. récipient utilisé pour semer;
dannatigɛ [à-á-ì-ɛ́] Verbe. spécifier, préciser;
container used for sowing; Behälter, der zur
Aussaat verwendet wird.
specify, define sth., detail sth; spezifizieren,
Category: Agricultural tool.
präzisieren, klarstellen. wagati dannatigɛlen
le moment spécifique / le moment précis. the
dannisanji [à-ì] variante: danniji. Nom. pluies de
specific moment / the precise moment. der semis; sowing rain; Regen zum Säen.
spezifische Moment / der genaue Moment. Category: Agriculture, Water, Weather.
dannisiraw Nom. sillons; furrows; Furchen.
Category: Agriculture.
dannitilenni Nom. semis en ligne; sowing in line;
geradliniges Säen. Category: Agriculture.
29/01/2026 116

dannkunbere dantigɛlisɛbɛ
dannkunbere [à-ú-è-é] variante: dannagɛlɛnna. dantan [á-á] variante: datan. Nom. infini, sans
Nom. fillettes ou jeunes filles qui partent bouche, animal; infinity, with no end;
s'engager à la ville comme domestiques, petite unendlich. ... dama ni dantanw ... ... ceux qui
bonne; young girls who leave to work in the ont une bouche pour parler et ceux qui n'en ont
city as domestic servants, little maid; junge pas ... ...those who have a mouth to speak and
Mädchen, die in die Stadt gehen, um als those who do not... ... diejenigen, die einen
Hausangestellte zu arbeiten, kleine Magd. Mund zum Sprechen haben und diejenigen, die
danɲɛ [ã-́ ɛ́] n.comp. destin; destiny; Schicksal, Los, keinen haben ... Category: Mathematics.
Geschick. dantanfɛn [á-ã-́ ɛ ́] Nom. animal, bête; animal, beast;
danɔrɔ [á] Verbe. coller, fermer quelque chose en Tier, Biest. ... nɛɛmafɛnw ni dantanfɛnw ...
collant ou en bouchant; stick, close something ... les plantes et les animaux ... ...plants and
by gluing or closing; kleben, etwas durch animals... ...Pflanzen und Tiere...
Kleben oder Schließen verschließen. A y'a bila dantɛmɛwali Variant: danmatɛmɛwali. n.comp. abus
lɛtiri kɔnɔ, ka a danɔrɔ... Il le mit dans une de pouvoir; abuse of power or authority;
enveloppe qu'il colla... He put it in an envelope Machtmissbrauch.
that he stuck... Er steckte es in einen
dantigɛ [ǎ-ì-ɛ́] Verbe. expliquer, présenter, préciser,
Umschlag, den er zuklebte...
exposer (la raison de sa venue); explain, to
danpere [á] variante: danpɛri. Nom. moue; pull a present, to specify, expose the reason,
face, pout; Schmollmund. introduce someone; erklären, darlegen,
danselan [á] Nom. amortisseurs; shock absorbers; vortragen, präzisieren, jemanden vorstellen. N
Stoßdämpfer.
b'i dantigɛ n fa ye, n b'i dantigɛ n ba ye ... ...
je te présenterai à mon père, je te présenterai à
dansɛ [à-ɛ́] interj. salutation à qqn qu'on n'a pas u
ma mère ... ...I will introduce you to my father,
depuis longtemps ou qui vient d'un voyage; I will introduce you to my mother... ...Ich
greeting to people one hasn't seen for a long werde dich meinem Vater vorstellen, ich
time, or to someone who comes from a werde dich meiner Mutter vorstellen... Wagati
journey; Gruss an jemanden, den man lange
ma dantigɛ a la. La durée n'en a pas été
nicht gesehen hat, oder der von einer Reise
précisée. The duration was not specified. Die
kommt. I daansɛ. Bienvenu. Welcome.
Dauer wurde nicht angegeben.
Willkommen.
synonyme: ɲɛnafɔ.
dansigi [ǎ-ì-í] 1 • Verbe. définir, élaborer, préparer;
dantigɛbali Nom. indéfini; indefinite; unbestimmt.
define (sth.), formulate, elaborate (sth.),
Category: Language.
prepare; definieren, festlegen, erarbeiten,
ausarbeiten, zubereiten, bereiten, dantigɛkan [ã̀-ì-ɛ̀-ã́] Nom. déclaration, explication,
bereitmachen. Baara minnu dansigira... Les paroles de présentation, exposé; declaration,
travaux dont les contenus ont été définis... The explication, presentation, talk, speech;
works whose contents have been defined... Die Erklärung, Darlegung, Erläuterung, Vortrag,
Arbeiten, deren Inhalt definiert wurde... Referat, Referat, Begründung. ... i ni i ka
2 • Verbe. mettre un terme à; put an end to; jama tulo tɛ dunanw dantigɛkan na? ... toi et
Schluß machen. ... fɔlɔ ye dansigili ye tes gens, n'avez-vous pas entendu les
nafolodun na. ... il s'agit tout d'abord de explications des étrangers ? ...have you and
mettre un terme aux détournements (d'argent your people not heard the explanations of the
public). ... it is first of all a question of strangers? ...haben Sie und Ihre Leute die
putting an end to the embezzlement (of public Erklärungen der Fremden nicht gehört?
money). ... es geht zunächst darum, der dantigɛli [à-ì-ɛ̀] Nom. exposé, déclaration, plaidoirie,
Veruntreuung (öffentlicher Gelder) ein Ende
défense; presentation, talk, statement,
zu setzen.
declaration, argument, defence; Vortrag,
3 • Verbe. respecter, avoir des égards; respect, Referat, Erklärung, Aussage,
have respect; Respekt haben. An bɛ ɲɔgɔn Verteidigungsrede. A ye Dauda ka dantigɛli
dansigi. Nous nous respectons mutuellement. kɛ u ye. Il leur transmit ce que David avait
We respect each other. Wir respektieren exposé. He relayed to them what David had
einander.
explained. Er erzählte ihnen, was David erklärt
4 • Nom. accord, convention; agreement, hatte.
convention; Vereinbarung, Übereinkommen,
dantigɛlisɛbɛ Nom. carte d'identité, pièce d'état civil;
Abkommen.
identity card; Identitätskarte.
dansiginin synonyme: seere. Nom. étalon; standard,
Category: Government. synonyme: karadante.
yardstick; Richtmass. Category: Mathematics.
29/01/2026 117

dantɔ daɲini
dantɔ [à-ɔ́] adj. bossu; humped; gebuckelt, daɲɛdalɔnbali n.comp. lexème; lexeme; Lexem.
gekrümmt. Category: Sick. Category: Language.
danworobilen [à] variante: danbilenworo, daɲɛgafe [á-ɛ́-á-é] Morphemes: daɲɛ-gafe. Nom.
danbilen, danworo. Nom. cola toute rouge; lexique, dictionnaire; lexicon, dictionary;
red kola nut; rote Kolanuß. Category: Types of Wortschatz, Wörterbuch, Lexikon.
food. Category: Language. synonyme: kamusi.
danye [á] Nom. 1 • don, présent; gift, present; daɲɛgafeba Nom. gros dictionnaire; dictionary;
Geschenk. Wörterbuch, Lexikon. Category: Learn,
2 • tout ce que Dieu propose à quelqu'un, Language. synonyme: kumadengafe.
bonheur ou épreuve; everything that God
daɲɛkalan [á-ɛ́-á-ã́] Morphemes: daɲɛ-kalan.
offers to someone, happiness or trial; alles,
was Gott jemandem anbietet, Glück oder Nom. lexicologie; lexicology; Wortkunde.
Prüfung. Ala mana ko o ko kɛ mɔgɔ ye, o
Category: Language.
bɛɛ ye danye ye. Tout ce que Dieu fait pour daɲɛkolo n.comp. radical; word-stem; Wortstamm.
les hommes est un don. Everything that God Category: Language.
does for men is a gift. Alles, was Gott für die daɲɛkɔnɔci Nom. le trait d'union; hyphen, dash;
Menschen tut, ist ein Geschenk.
Bindestrich. Category: Grammar.
danyɔrɔ [à] Nom. limite; limit, boundary; Limit,
daɲɛkumasen n.comp. phrase lexicale; lexical
Grenze. ... i danyɔrɔ, e de y'o dɔn ... ... tes
sentence; lexikalischer Satz.
limites, c'est toi qui les connais... ...your
Category: Language.
limits, you are the one who knows them...
...deine Grenzen, du bist derjenige, der sie daɲɛkun [á] Nom. devant la porte, seuil; in front of the
kennt... door, threshold; vor der Tür, Schwelle. Mɔgɔ
danyɔrɔci Nom. ligne d’arrivée; finish line, finishing tɛ sigi daɲɛkun na. On ne s'assoit pas sur le
line; Ziellinie, Zieleinlauf. seuil de la porte. We don't sit on the doorstep.
Man sitzt nicht vor der Haustür.
daɲɛ [á-ɛ́] Nom. mot, item, terme, coup, fois; word,
daɲɛkura See main entry: daɲɛlabɛnni. n.comp.
item, term; Wort, Begriff, Ausdruck.
Category: Language. synonyme: kumaden. néologie; neologism; neugebildetes Wort,
sprachliche Neubildung. Category: Language.
daɲɛ dilanni variante: daɲɛdilanni. n.comp.
daɲɛkuraw Nom. nouveaux mots; new words; neue
construction de mot; word construction;
Wortaufbau. Category: Language.
Wörter. Category: Grammar.
daɲɛ dɔrɔkɔnin variante: daɲɛdɔrɔkɔnin. n.comp.
daɲɛlabɛnni Variant: daɲɛkura. Nom. néologie;
neologism; sprachliche Neubildung,
mot composé; composed word;
zusammengesetztes Wort.
neugebildetes Wort. Category: Language.
daɲɛlatulon
daɲɛ sogolonin Nom. mot complexe; complex
word; komplexes Wort. Category: Grammar.
[á-ɛ́-á-ú-ṍ] Morphemes: daɲɛ-la-tulon.
Nom. jeu de mots; word game; Wortspiel.
daɲɛ surunya [á-ɛ́ ù-ũ̀-á] vi. abréger; shorten, cut
Category: Language.
short; abkürzen, kürzen, verkürzen.
daɲɛlili n.comp. racine; root; Wurzel.
Category: Grammar.
Category: Language.
daɲɛ surunyali Nom. abréviation; abbreviation;
daɲɛɲinitulon Nom. scrabbles; scrabble; Scrabble.
Abkürzung, Kursschreibweise.
Category: Grammar. synonyme: surunyali. daɲɛsɛɛrɛ n.comp. classe de mot; word class;
daɲɛbaju n.comp. lexique de base, base lexicale; basic Wortklasse, Wortart. Category: Language.
vocabulary, basic word-list; Grundwortschatz. daɲini [á] synonyme: darabɔ. Verbe. provoquer
Category: Grammar, Language. (vouloir faire parler quelqu'un), pourvoir à,
daɲɛburuju n.comp. étymologie; etymology; nourrir; provoke (to speak), provide for, feed;
Etymologie. Category: Language.
provozieren, sorgen für, ernähren. Ala bɛ sa
synonyme: daɲɛburujukalan. fiyentɔ daɲini. Dieu nourrit le serpent aveugle
(proverbe). God feeds the blind serpent
daɲɛburujukalan n.comp. étymologie; etymology;
(proverb). Gott füttert die blinde Schlange
Etymologie. Category: Language. (Sprichwort). synonyme: mɔgɔlaɲini.
synonyme: daɲɛburuju.
29/01/2026 118

daɲɔgɔn dari
daɲɔgɔn [á] Nom. compagnon (ou compagne) de lit daraja [á] Emprunt de : arabe. Nom. bonne
(ou de chambre), partenaire (sexuel); bed (or renommée, bonne réputation, célébrité; good
bedroom) companion, (sexual) partner; Bett- name, fame, high esteem; guter Ruf, Ruhm,
(oder Schlafzimmer-) Begleiter, (Sexual-) geschätzt. Nin muso in daraja ka bon. Cette
Partner. ... bɛɛ ka dan daɲɔgɔn kelen ma. ... femme est tenue en haute estime par tous. This
que chacun se limite à un ou une seul woman is held in high esteem by everyone.
partenaire. ...that everyone limits themselves to Diese Frau wird von allen sehr geschätzt.
one single partner. ...daß jeder sich auf nur
darajatigiya [á] Nom. bonne renommée,
einen einzigen Partner beschränkt.
considération; good reputation, consideration;
daŋaniya [á-à-ì-á] 1 • Verbe. faire profession de foi, guter Ruf, Achtung, guter Name. Darajatigiya
attester; make a profession of faith, attest; ein ka fisa cɛɲɛ ye. Mieux vaut la bonne
Glaubensbekenntnis ablegen, bezeugen.
renommée que la beauté. Good name is better
2 • Verbe. se concerter, se mettre d'accord; to than beauty. Ein guter Name ist besser als
consult, to agree; konsultieren, zustimmen. Schönheit.
Mɔgɔw bɛ daŋaniya ka mɔnni kɛ ɲɔgɔn fɛ.
daraka [à-à-á] 1 • Nom. petit déjeuner, repas du matin;
Les gens se concertent pour faire la pêche
ensemble. People work together to go fishing breakfast; Frühstück. daraka dun prendre son
together. Menschen arbeiten zusammen, um petit déjeuner. to eat breakfast. das Frühstück
gemeinsam angeln zu gehen. essen. I bɛ mun dumu daraka la ? Qu’est-ce
3 • Verbe. avoir confiance; have confidence; que tu manges pour le petit déjeuner ? What do
Vertrauen haben. you eat for breakfast? Was hast du zu
4 • Verbe. autoriser; authorize, allow; Frühstück gegessen? Sɔgɔma, ne ka daraka
autorisieren, bewilligen. Kana nin kɛ, a ma ye mɔni ye. Le matin, mon petit déjeuner est
daŋaniya fewu ! Ne fais pas cela, ce n'est pas la bouillie. In the morning, my breakfast is
du tout autorisé ! Don't do this, it's not allowed
gruel. Am Morgen, hatte ich einen Brei zum
at all! Tun Sie das nicht, es ist überhaupt nicht
Frühstück.
erlaubt! 2 • Verbe. donner le petit déjeuner; having
breakfast; frühstücken.
5 • Nom. ferveur, persuasion; fervor,
persuasion; Leidenschaft, Überzeugungskraft. darakantasɛbɛ
dara comparer: birifani.[à-á] Emprunt de [á-á-ã́-á-ɛ́-ɛ́] synonyme: kolakalisɛbɛ.
1
: français. Nom. 1 • draps; bed sheet; Leintuch, variante: dalakantasɛbɛ. n.comp. procès
Decke. Category: Household equipment. verbal; minutes of a meeting; Protokoll,
2 • problèmes, ennuis, risque; problems, Bericht.
troubles, risks; Probleme, Nöte, Risiken. A darakase [à-à-à-é] synonyme: sɔmɔ. Nom.
bɛna dara wuli n na. Il va me poser des pommier-cajou; cashew tree; Cashewnuss
problèmes. He's going to cause me problems. Baum. anacardium occidentale.
Es stellt mich vor Probleme. Dara b'a la ! darali [á] Nom. marché aux bestiaux; cattle market;
C'est risqué ! This is risky! Das ist riskant!
Viehmarkt. Category: Animal husbandry.
3 • con; idiot, conman; Idiot. O cɛnin ye dara
daramasalakulu n.comp. littérature orale; oral
de ye sa ! Ce petit mec-là est vraiment un
literature; mündliche Literatur.
con ! This little guy is really an idiot! Dieser
kleine Kerl ist wirklich ein Idiot! daraɲini Verbe. provoquer; provoke; provozieren.
dara proximité; proximity, nearness; Nähe. synonyme: mɔgɔlaɲini, kolaɲini.
2
darabɔ Verbe. provoquer; provoke; provozieren. darapo [à-à-ó] Emprunt de : français.
synonyme: kolaɲini, mɔgɔlaɲini. synonyme: jɔnjɔn. Nom. drapeau; flag; Fahne,
Flagge. synonyme: sirifinin.
darabu [á] Emprunt de : arabe. Nom. manière, façon;
manner, way of; Art und Weise. A ka kuma
darasi See main entry: daasi.[á-á-í] Nom. unité
darabu ka ɲi. Sa façon de parler est agréable.
monétaire en dioula, cinq francs; monetary
unit in Dioula, currency unit, five francs;
His way of speaking is pleasant. Seine Art zu
Währungseinheit au Dioula, fünf Franken.
sprechen ist angenehm.
synonyme: dalasi.
dari comparer: deli .[á-í] vt. demander, prier; ask,
1
pray; fragen, bitten, erbeten.
29/01/2026 119

daro dasɔgɔ
daro [à] Nom. clochette, sonnerie; bell; Glocke, dasigibali [á] Nom. indiscret, qui manque de
Klingel. synonyme: kolonkololan. discrétion, de tact; indiscreet, lacking
discretion, tact; indiskret, mangelnde
darɔda [á] Verbe. 1 • dire, promettre; say, promise;
Diskretion, Taktgefühl.
sagen, versprechen. synonyme: layiduɲɔgɔnya.
dasigibaliya [á] Nom. indiscrétion, manque de tact;
2 • jurer (qu'on ne va pas faire quelque chose);
indiscretion, intrusiveness, lack of tact;
swear (that we are not going to do something);
Indiskretion, Taktlosigkeit. Dasigibaliya ye
schwören (daß wir etwas tun werden).
fiɲɛ ye, min bɛ mɔgɔ se ko ma.
darɔdun [á] Verbe. mâcher, remuer la bouche; chew,
L'indiscrétion est un défaut qui attire beaucoup
move the mouth; kauen, den Mund bewegen. A d’ennuis. Indiscretion is a fault that attracts a
b'a darɔdun n'a ye dumuni ye. Le remue lot of trouble. Indiskretion ist ein Fehler, der
déjà la bouche en voyant le repas. His mouth is viel Ärger nach sich zieht.
already moving when he sees the meal. Sein dasii [à-í] Morphemes: da-sii. variante: dasi. Nom.
Mund bewegt sich bereits, als er das Essen
moustache, barbes (du poisson); moustache;
sieht.
Oberlippenbart, Schnurrbart. Category: Body.
darula [à-ù-á] Emprunt de : arabe. synonyme: nunsii, nunkɔrɔsii.
variante: daruna. Nom. 1 • preuve; evidence, dasiri [á-í-í] n.comp. 1 • totem, génie protecteur du
1
proof; Beweis. I ye kuma min fɔ, a darula ye
village; totem, protecting spirit of the town;
mun ye? Quelle est la preuve de ce que tu as Totem, Schutzgeist einer Ortschaft. Bama in
dit ? What is the proof of what you said? Was tun ye ji ni kungo dasiri de ye. Ce crocodile
ist der Beweis für das, was Sie gesagt haben?
était le génie protecteur de l’eau et de la
2 • source, raison, but; source, reason, brousse. This crocodile was the protective
purpose; Quelle, Grund, Zweck. ... a darula genius of water and the bush. Dieses Krokodil
ye jumɛn ye ? ... quelle en est la raison ? war das schützende Genie des Wassers und des
...what is the reason? ...was ist der Grund? Busches. Category: Religion.
dasa [á-ǎ] Nom. empêcher; to prevent; zu 2 • emblème; emblem; Wahrzeichen, Wappen,
Abzeichen.
verhindern. Ni i ye nsonsan birilen faga, i ye
dasiri [á-ì-í] Verbe. boucler, attacher (un sac); loop
boliba dasa. Si tu tues un lièvre tapi, tu as 2
empêché une folle course (proverbe). If you
sth., buckle, fasten or tie a bag; zuschließen,
zubinden. A y'a terikɛ don funtun kɔnɔ k'o
kill a lurking hare, you have prevented a mad
chase (proverb). Wenn Sie einen lauernden dasiri ... Il mit son ami dans le panier qu’il
Hasen töten, haben Sie eine verrückte attacha ... He put his friend in the basket which
Verfolgungsjagd verhindert (Sprichwort). he tied... Er legte seinen Freund in den Korb,
dasi [à] Verbe. 1 • frapper avec force, battre, roser,
den er zuschnürte...
cogner; to strike with force, to beat, to strike, dasirikan [á-í-í-ã́] Nom. devise; motto; Devise,
to knock; mit Gewalt zuschlagen, schlagen, Leitspruch, Motto.
klopfen. U y'a dasi fo ka sonyali baci ka a bɔ dasirimasiriw Nom. héraldique; heraldry, heraldic
a a. Ils l'ont rossé au point de lui faire perdre
emblem; heraldisch, Wappen.
toute envie de voler. They beat him to the point
of making him lose all desire to steal. Sie
daso [á] Nom. mâchoire; jaw; Kiefer.
schlugen ihn so weit, daß er jegliche Lust am dasoɲɛ [á-ò-ɛ́] Verbe. révéler un secret, révéler
Stehlen verlor.
anonymement; reveal a secret, reveal
2 • être ou mettre en grand nombre, en excès; to
anonymously; ein Geheimnis preisgeben,
be or put in large numbers, in excess; in großer
anonym preisgeben. N bɛ n dasɔɲɛ ka nin fɔ i
Zahl, im Übermaß vorhanden sein. A ye nɔnɔ
ɲɛna. Je viens t'avertir en grand secret de ceci.
dasi basi la. Elle a mis trop de lait dans le
I have come to warn you in great secret of this.
couscous. She put too much milk in the
Ich bin gekommen, um Sie in aller Stille davor
couscous. Sie hat zu viel Milch in das
zu warnen.
Couscous gegeben.
dasɔgɔ [á-ɔ̀-ɔ́] Nom. fermer à clé; lock with a key;
dasigi [á-ì-í] Verbe. viser, pointer; aim at, target,
sperren, mit dem Schlüssel abschließen.
aim, point; zielen, in Richtung zeigen. ... ni i
ye marifa dasigi a la tuma min na ... ...
quand tu le vises avec le fusil ... ... you aim the
rifle at him... ...wenn du mit dem Gewehr auf
ihn zielst...
29/01/2026 120

dasu datugulan
dasu [á] Morphemes: da-su. Nom. très bon marché, datigi [á] Nom. beau parleur, grande gueule, phraseur;
1
à vil prix, pour rien; very cheap, cheap, for smooth talker; Großmaul, Schwätzer. Datigi
nothing; sehr billig, billig, für nichts. ... o ka tun don, nka a ka farin. C'était une beau
fisa n'a feereli ye dasu la. ... que ça vaut parleur, mais il était brave. She was a smooth
mieux que de le vendre à vil prix. ...that it's talker, but he was brave. Sie konnte gut reden,
better than selling it at a low price. ...das es aber er war mutig.
besser ist, als es zu einem niedrigen Preis zu
datiɲɛbana synonyme: dadimibana. Nom. stomatite;
verkaufen.
stomatitis; Mundhöhlenentzündung.
dasu 2 [á] Morphemes: da-su. Verbe. inciter à parler, Category: Disease.
provoquer, exciter, monter (une personne
datoli [á] Nom. mauvaise haleine, personne à
contre une autre); incite to speak, provoke,
l’haleine mauvaise; bad breath, person with
excite, pit (one person against another); zum
bad breath; Mundgeruch, Person mit
Sprechen anregen, provozieren, aufregen,
aufhetzen (eine Person gegen eine andere). A
Mundgeruch.
ye denmisɛnw dasu ka n neni. Il a incité les datɔ 1 [á] Morphemes: da-tɔ. Nom. restes de
enfants à m'insulter. He made the children nourriture, reliefs u repas; leftover food,
insult me. Er brachte die Kinder dazu, mich zu leftovers from a meal; Essensreste, Reste einer
beleidigen. Mahlzeit. N t'i datɔ dun. Je ne mange pas tes
dasyɛn [á] variante: dasan, dosyan, dɔsyan, restes. I don't eat your leftovers. Ich esse deine
Reste nicht.
dɔsyɛn. Nom. louche à braises; ember ladle;
Glutkelle.
datɔ
2
[á] Nom. blessé, rescapé; injured, survivor;
verletzt, Überlebender. Sɔrɔdasi kɔrɔ caman
data [á-ǎ] Verbe. entamer, commencer; begin, start;
ye disɛdatɔ ye. Beaucoup des vieux soldats
beginnen. ka baara data. commencer le
sont blessés par balle. Many of the old soldiers
travail. start work. mit der Arbeit beginnen.
are wounded by bullets. Viele der alten
datara Verbe. 1 • fermer; close, shut; schließen. Soldaten wurden durch Kugeln verletzt.
2 • terminer, régler un affaire, mettre fin; datu [à-ú] Nom. épice à base de graines d'oseille
finish, settle a matter, put an end to; fermentées, boulette d'oseille, sauce d'oseille;
abschließen, eine Angelegenheit regeln, ein spice based on fermented sorrel grains, sorrel
Ende setzen. An ye kuma in datara. On a sauce; Art Gewürz, Sauerampfersauce.
arrêté de parler de ça. We stopped talking Category: Food.
about that. Wir haben aufgehört, darüber zu
datugu [á-ú-ú] synonyme: dabiri.
reden.
variante: datugun. vt. 1 • fermer, boucler,
datigɛ [á-ì-ɛ́] Morphemes: da-tigɛ. 1 • Verbe.
enfermer; close, lock in; zumachen, schließen,
entamer, ouvrir, commencer; start, open,
einschließen. A datugulen lo. C’est fermé.
begin; anfangen, öffnen, beginnen. U nana
It’s closed. Es ist geschlossen.
kaburu datigɛ. Ils commencèrent à creuser la synonyme: dabiri.
tombe. They began to dig the grave. Sie
2 • couvrir, recouvrir, boucher; cover, overlay,
begannen, das Grab auszuheben.
clog, plug (sth.); zudecken, bedecken,
2 • Verbe. faire une ouverture; make an verstopfen. ... olu b'u kun datugu ni finin
opening; eine Öffnung machen. ka so
kura dɔ ye ... ... ils se couvrent la tête d'une
datigɛ. ouvrir une porte dans une maison.
étoffe neuve ... ...they cover their heads with a
open a door in a house. eine Tür in einem
new cloth... ...sie bedecken ihre Köpfe mit
Haus öffnen.
einem neuen Tuch...
3 • Verbe. couper en deux; cut in half;
datugulan [á-ú-ú-ã́] Jula: datugunan.
halbieren, in zwei Teile schneiden.
4 • Nom. moitié; half; Hälfte.
Morphemes: datugu-lan. Nom. couvercle,
fermeture; lid, cover; Deckel. Daga bonya o
datigɛli n.comp. introduction; introduction; Einleitung,
bonya, datugulan b'a la. Si grosse soit la
Einführung.
marmite, elle a toujours un couvercle
datigɛndala [á] Nom. 1 • bouderie; sulking, (proverbe). No matter how big the pot, it
sulkiness; schmollen. U bɛ datigɛndala la. Ils always has a lid (proverb). Egal wie groß der
boudent. They sulk. Sie schmollen.
Topf ist, er hat immer einen Deckel
(Sprichwort).
2 • personne avec qui on est fâché; person with
whom we are angry; Person, auf die wir
wütend sind.
29/01/2026 121

datugunan de
datugunan [á-ú-ú-ã́] bambara: datugulan. Nom. 2 • se mettre à; get started, set about; anfangen
zu, beginnen. A ye kasi dawuli. Il s'est mis à
couvercle, fermeture, capuchon, porte; lid,
cover, cap; Deckel, Kappe, Verschlusskappe. pleurer. He started to cry. Er begann zu
weinen.
daw yeyɔrɔ expr. affichage; display; Display,
dayɛlɛ [á-ɛ̀-ɛ́] Morphemes: da-yɛlɛ.
Darstellung. 1
variante: dayɛlɛn. vt. ouvrir; open; öffnen. A ye
dawo [á-ó] n.comp. canal buccal; buccal cavity;
sirabara dayɛlɛ. Il ouvrit la tabatière. He
Mundhöhle. Category: Body.
opened the snuffbox. Er öffnete die
synonyme: dakɔnɔna.
Schnupftabakdose.
dawolo [á] Morphemes: da-wolo. Nom. lèvre, bord, dayɛlɛ [á] Nom. niais, imbécile, personne stupide;
2
frontière; lip, edge, boarder; Lippe, Rand,
simpleton, imbecile, stupid person; einfältiger,
Grenze. ba dawolo fɛ au bord du fleuve. by dummer, dummer Mensch. E kɔni ye dayɛlɛ
the riverbank. am Flußufer. Mali dawolo la. ye, i tɛ fɛn dɔn. Tu es un imbécile, tu ne
à la frontière du Mali. on the border of Mali. connais rien. You're an idiot, you don't know
an der Grenze zu Mali. synonyme: dagolo. anything. Du bist ein Idiot, du weißt nichts.
dawɔɔrɔ [á] Nom. fête qui clôt, le sixième jour, le dayɛlɛlan
temps de réclusion des nouveaux circoncis; comparer: konnigɛ.[á-ɛ́-ɛ́-ã́] Jula: dayɛlɛna
festival which ends, on the sixth day, the time
n. Morphemes: dayɛlɛ-lan. Nom. quelque chose
of seclusion of the newly circumcised; Fest,
qui sert à ouvrir, par exemple, une clef, un
das am sechsten Tag endet, der Zeit der
décapsuleur; something used to open, e.g. a
Abgeschiedenheit der frisch Beschnittenen.
key, bottle opener; Schlüssel, Öffner,
Category: Religion.
Flaschenöffner. synonyme: kile, konnigɛ.
dawula [á-ú-á] Emprunt de : arabe.
dayɛlɛli [á-ɛ́-ɛ-í] Nom. ouverture; opening; Öffnung.
variante: dawulaya. 1 • Nom. renommée,
prestige, gloire, célébrité, charme, grande dayira Verbe. exposer, présenter, expliquer; expose
renommée; renown, reputation, fame, (sth.), state, lay out, outline, present (sth.),
prestige, glory, celebrity, charm, great fame; explain; darlegen, vorlegen, vorstellen,
Ansehen, Ruf, Ruhm, Ansehen, Prestige, Ehre, präsentieren, erklären.
Herrlichkeit, Berühmtheit, Charme, großer
dayirakumasen n.comp. phrase affirmative;
Ruhm. U yɛrɛw dawula ka bon. Leur
affirmative sentence; bejahender Satz.
renommée est grande. Their fame is great.
Ihr Ruhm ist groß.
Category: Language.
2 • Verbe. être célèbre, être glorieux, être beau; dayɔgɔyɔgɔ [á] Nom. personne à l'élocution peu
to be famous, to be glorious, to be beautiful; claire, bafouilleur, bredouilleur; person with
berühmt sein, herrlich sein, schön sein. unclear speech, stammerer; Person mit
dawulama [á] Nom. célèbre, renommé, séduisant,
unklarer Sprache, Stotterer, stammeln.
Dayɔgɔyɔgɔ don. Il bafouille. He stammers.
prestigieux; famous, renowned, attractive,
Er stammelt.
prestigious; berühmt, attraktiv,
prestigeträchtig. Amadi dawulama Amadi le dayɔrɔ [á] Nom. 1 • endroit où on se couche; place
prestigieux. Amadi the prestigious. Amadi der where we sleep; Ort, an dem wir schlafen.
Prestigeträchtige. 2 • lieu, place, emplacement; place, location;
dawulatigiya Nom. séduction, charme; seduction, Ort. Bolonkɔni bɛɛ n'a dayɔrɔ don. A chaque
attraction, glamour, charm; Verführung, doigt sa place (proverbe). Each finger has its
Anziehungskraft, Charme. place (proverb). Jeder Finger hat seinen Platz
(Sprichwort).
dawulennin
3 • tombe; grave; Grab.
comparer: daa .[à-ù-è-í] Morphemes: da-w
3 de [è] variante: le. part. 1 • particule de
ulen-nin. Nom. jus d’oseille; sorrel juice; 1
focalisation, c'est... qui / que, ; focus marker, it
Okra Getränk. Category: Food.
is that; Fokus Marker, es ist ... das. A muso de
dawuli [á] Verbe. 1 • recommencer, reprendre; start
y'a fɔ. C'est sa femme qui l'a dit. It was his
again, resume, restart; von vorne anfangen,
wife who said it. Es war seine Frau, die es
nochmal anfangen, wieder beginnen. ka kɛlɛ sagte. Category: Language.
dawuli. reprendre le combat. resume the fight.
den Kampf fortsetzen.
29/01/2026 122

de degukojugu
2 • valeur interrogative, est-ce que ?; degedege [è-è-é-é] Verbe. chatouiller; tickle;
1
interrogative value, do we ... ?; Fragewert, hat
kitzeln. synonyme: ɲɔmiɲɔmi.
... ? An b'o fura dɔn de ? Est-ce qu'on en
connaît le remède ? Do we know the cure? degedege 2 [è-é-è-é] Verbe. 1 • enseigner
Kennen wir das Heilmittel? progressivement, prodiguer des
de variante: je. Verbe. taire; silence, be silent, shut enseignements; teach progressively, provide
2
lessons; schrittweise unterrichten, Unterricht
up; schweigen. I de ! Tais-toi ! Shut up ! Den
erteilen.
Mund halten ! / Halt den Mund ! synonyme: je
1
.
2 • essayer; to try, attempt; versuchen.
dedennin [é] Nom. minuscule, tout petit; tiny, very Degedege bɛ kɔnɔnin se panni na. A force
small; winzig, sehr klein. nɛgɛso dendennin.
d'essayer, le petit oiseau finit par s'envoler
(proverbe). By trying again and again, the
une tout petite bicyclette. a very small bicycle.
little bird ends up flying away (proverb). Dank
ein sehr kleines Fahrrad.
vielen Flugversuchen, fliegt der kleine Vogel
dee Emprunt de : français. variante: de. Nom. dé; am Ende davon (Sprichwort).
dice; Würfel.
degeden [è-è-é] Nom. apprenti, débutant, novice
deen [ẽ́] variante: den. 1 • Nom. enfant; child; Kind. dans la matière; apprentice, trainee, beginner,
Category: Kinship. novice, new to the subject; Lehrling,
2 • Nom. fruit; fruit; Frucht. Auszubildender, Anfänger, Neuling, neu in
der Thematik. kalandenw ni degedenw les
3 • vi. porter des fruits, fructifier; bear fruit,
produce fruit, fructify; Frucht bringen, Früchte élèves et les apprentis. pupils / students and
tragen, befruchten. apprentices. Schüler und Auszubildende.
4 • vi. élément; element; Element, Bestandteil.
Category: Learn.
deenkun [è] variante: dɛɛnkun, jeenkun, degeli [è-è-í] variante: degili. Nom. exercice,
degedegelu. Verbe. 1 • incliner, pencher;
apprentissage; training, exercise, learning,
apprenticeship; Übung, Lernprozeß.
incline, lean; hinauslehnen, sich neigen. ... o
Karamɔgɔ bɛ degeliw labɛn kalandenw ye.
nana i kun deenkun kɔlɔn kɔnɔ. ... il vint
Le maître prépare les exercices pour les élèves.
pencher la tête pour regarder dans le puits. ...he The teacher prepares the exercises for the
came and leaned his head to look into the well. students. Der Lehrer bereitet die Übungen für
...er kam und neigte seinen Kopf, um in den die Schüler vor.
Brunnen zu schauen.
degelikaramɔgɔ
2 • épier; spy, watch; spionieren. Kana án
[è-è-ì-á-á-ɔ́-ɔ́] Morphemes: dege-li-kara
deenkun dɛ ! Ne nous épie pas ! Don't spy on
mɔgɔ. Nom. entraîneur; coach; Trainer, Coach.
us! Spionieren Sie uns nicht aus!
Category: Person.
dege See main entry: .[è-é] variante: degi. vt.
degere Emprunt de : français. Nom. degré; degree;
1 • apprendre; learn; lernen. A b'i ɲɛ dege fɛn
Grad. Category: Mathematics.
dɔw la. Il apprend les choses en regardant
faire. He learns things by watching things
degɛrɛsumalan
happen. Er lernt Dinge, indem er beobachtet, [é] Morphemes: degɛrɛ-suma-lan. Nom.
wie Dinge passieren. Category: Learn. thermomètre; thermometer; Thermometer.
synonyme: degi. synonyme: gwaniyatalan, goniyahakɛtanan,
2 • enseigner; teach; lehren, beibringen, gonitalan.
unterrichten. X dege Y la apprendre X à Y.
degi [è-ì] variante: dege. vt. apprendre, initier;
teach Y to X. X das Y beibringen. A bɛ mɔgɔ
learn, initiate; lernen, einführen, beibringen,
dege cikɛcogo la. Il enseigne aux gens la
lehren. synonyme: dege.
manière de cultiver. He teaches people how to
farm. Er bringt den Leuten bei, wie man degili variante: degeli. Nom. initiation; initiation;
Landwirtschaft betreibt. synonyme: lakalan. Initiation, Einführung.
degebaga [è-è] Nom. celui qui enseigne, maître, degilibaara synonyme: degili, degeli, sefilɛli. Nom.
enseignant; teacher; Lehrer. Degebaga exercice; exercise; Übung, Aufgabe,
ɲuman bɛ mɔgɔ se ko la. Le bon maître fait
Übungsaufgabe.
réussir son élève (proverbe). The good teacher degukojugu Nom. empêchement très sérieux; very
makes his student succeed (proverb). Der gute serious difficulty; sehr schwieriges Problem.
Lehrer sorgt dafür, daß sein Schüler
erfolgreich ist (Sprichwort). Category: Learn.
29/01/2026 123

degun delili
degun [è-ú] Jula: degu. 1 • vt. oppresser, étouffer, deli comparer: dari.[é-í] variante: deeli, daali.
1
être gêné, souffrir, faire souffrir; oppress, 1 • vt. prier, supplier, demander; pray, ask;
stifle, choke, suffer; unterdrücken, ersticken, beten, bitten, erbitten, erbeten. Ala deli prier
drosseln, plagen, leiden, Leiden verursachen. Dieu. pray to God. zu Gott beten. An ka Ala
Ni funteni bɔra, a bi mɔgɔ degun. Quand il
deli ! Prions ! Let’s pray! Laß uns beten! N bɛ
fait chaud, cela étouffe les gens. When the
yafa deli Ala fɛ. Je demande le pardon à Dieu.
weather gets hot, it is stifling. Wenn es heiß ist,
ist es stickig.
I ask for God’s forgiveness. Ich bitte Gott um
Vergebung. N y'a deliwari la. Je lui ai
2 • Nom. contrainte, difficulté, ennui,
demandé de l’argent. I asked him for money.
souffrance, oppression; difficulty, restraint,
Ich habe ihn um Geld gebeten.
coercion, trouble, suffering, oppression;
synonyme: madeli.
Schwierigkeit, Zwang, Schwierigkeiten,
Unannehmlichkeit, Unterdrückung, Leiden. ... 2 • Nom. prière, supplique; prayer, petition,
ka degun ban ... ... en finir avec l'oppression supplication; Gebet, Petition.
... ...end the oppression... ... die deli [è-ì] vi. 1 • habituer, avoir l’habitude de, être
2
Unterdrückung beenden... habitué, accoutumer; get used to, be in the
3 • vi. encombrer; être occupé, gêner, envahir; habit of; sich gewöhnen, gewohnt sein,
burden; to be busy, hinder, bother, hamper; gewöhnt. I bi deli ka lɛsogo dumu wa ?
belasten, beschäftigt sein, behindern,
Est-ce que tu as l’habitude de manger du porc ?
erschweren, hemmen. I bolo degunna wa ? Are you in the habit of eating pork? Bist du dir
Êtes-vous occupé? Are you busy? Bist du gewohnt Schweinefleisch zu esse? A ti deli ka
beschäftigt?
dɔlɔ min. Il n’est pas habitué à boire d’alcool.
degundegun Verbe. taper, damer, tapoter à plusieurs He is not used to drinking beer. Er ist sich
endroits; hit, tap, tamper, tap in several nicht gewohnt Bier zu trinken.
places; an mehreren Stellen klopfen, klopfen. 2 • fait au moins une fois (dans le passé), avoir
deka [ě-à] Morphemes: de-ka. et, et puis, et
eu l'occasion de,; done at least once (in the
past), had the chance to; schon mal gemacht
finalement; and, and then, and finally; und,
haben, hatte die Gelegenheit zu ... I delila ka
und dann, und schließlich. Sɔgɔma fɛ, a tun
lɛsogo dumu wa ? Est-ce que tu as jamais
bɛ jɛgɛ san ne fɛ deka taa. Le matin, elle
mangé du porc ? Have you ever eaten pork?
venait m'acheter du poisson et puis elle partait.
Hast du schon einmal Schweinefleisch
In the morning, she came to buy me fish and
gegessen? I delila ka alikurana kalan wa ?
then she left. Am Morgen kam sie, um mir
Est-ce que tu as jamais lu le Coran ? Have you
Fisch zu kaufen, und dann ging sie.
ever read the Qur’an? Hast du schon einmal
deke Nom. plante (espèce); plant sp; Pflanzenart. den Koran gelesen?
Category: Bush, shrub. cordia myxa. deliko [è-í-ó] Morphemes: deli-ko.
delenkete [è-è-è-é] Verbe. 1 • approcher, variante: delimako, delina. Nom. habitude;
s'approcher; approach; nähern. A delenketera habit, custom, routine; Gewohnheit,
dugu la, nka a ma se. Il s'approcha de la ville Angewohnheit, Brauch, Gepflogenheit. deliko
mais il n'y entra pas. He approached the city jugu. mauvaise habitude. bad habit. schlechte
but did not enter it. Er näherte sich der Stadt, Gewohnheit. A b'a deliko la. Elle vaque à ses
betrat sie aber nicht. synonyme: gɛrɛ, madon. occupations habituelles. She goes about her
2 • être en équilibre instable; to be in unstable usual business. Sie geht ihren üblichen
equilibrium; in einem instabilen Geschäften nach. synonyme: delina.
Gleichgewicht sein. Mɔgɔw delenketelen bɛ
delili [é-í-í] Morphemes: deli-li. Nom. 1 • requête,
mobili sanfɛ ka taa. Les gens s'en vont en
demande, supplique; request, petition,
équilibre en haut sur le véhicule. People
supplication, plea; Bitte, Anfrage,
balance on top of the vehicle. Die Menschen
Anforderung, Bittgebet, Bittschrift, Flehen. O
balancieren auf dem Fahrzeugdach.
ye delili lankolon ye. C'est une supplique
inutile. It's a useless plea. Es ist ein nutzloser
Appell.
2 • prière; prayer; Gebet. delili kɛ prier. pray.
beten. An ka delili kɛ ! Prions ! Let’s pray!
Laßt uns beten! Delili ko lo. C’est un sujet
pour la prière. It’s a matter for prayer. Das ist
ein Gebetsanliegen.
29/01/2026 124

delilikan denbatigi
delilikan [é-í-í-ã́] Nom. 1 • requête, demande; 4 • Nom. *; *; *. Cɛden; duden. Homme de
request; Anfrage, Bitte. troupe; membre d'une famille. Man of a
troupe; member of a family. Mitglied einer
2 • prière; prayer; Gebet.
Truppe; Familienmitglied.
delilikɛla [é] Nom. 1 • quémandeur, mendiant, griot;
5 • Nom. participant; participant; Teilnehmer.
supplicant, beggar, mendicant; Bittsteller, kɔɲɔden participant à une noce. participant of
Bettler. Delilikɛlaw hakɛ min bɛ misiri a wedding. Teilnehmer an einer Hochzeit.
kɔnɔ... Le nombre des mendiants dans les 6 • Verbe. fructifier; fructify; Frucht bringen. ...
mosquées ... The number of beggars in
sani kɔɔro ka den. ... avant que le coton n'ait
mosques... Die Zahl der Bettler in Moscheen...
fructifié. ...before the cotton has fructified.
synonyme: sarakaɲinina.
...bevor die Baumwolle Früchte getragen hat.
2 • toute personne socialement chargée des
denba [ẽ́-á] Nom. 1 • mère, maman, marraine (femme
médiations: conciliateur, médiateur, 1
intercesseur; any person socially responsible chargée de l'organisation des cérémonies de
for mediation: conciliator, mediator, mariage ou de baptême, tante paternelle à qui
intercessor; jede für die Mediation est confié l'enfant; godmother, mother; Patin,
gesellschaftlich verantwortliche Person: Mutter. Category: Person. synonyme: baa 4 .
Schlichter, Mediator, Fürsprecher. An 2 • tante paternelle à qui est confié l'enfant;
delilikɛlaw ni mɔgɔ jugu man di. Nous les paternal aunt to whom the child is entrusted;
conciliateurs n'aimons pas les mauvaises gens.
Tante väterlicherseits, der das Kind anvertraut
We peacemakers don't like bad people. Wir
wird.
Friedensstifter mögen keine schlechten denba variante: denbafura, denbaɲuman. Nom.
2
Menschen.
kinkéliba à fleurs rouges; kind of shrub;
delimako Nom. habitude; habit; Gewohnheit. A Strauch (Art). Category: Bush, shrub.
wulila a delimako la. Il a pris sa vieille
combretum lecardii.
habitude. He got into his old habit. Er verfiel denbafura variante: denbaɲuman. Nom. espèce
in seine alte Gewohnheit. synonyme: delina. d'arbre; kind of tree; Baumart. Category: Tree.
combretum glutinosum, combretum ledardii.
delina [è-ì-á] variante: delinanko. Nom. habitude,
accoutumance; habit; Gewohnheit. Ntolatan
denbajala [é] Nom. marraine chargée de l'organisation
ye n ka delina kɔrɔ ye. Le football est chez
des cérémonies; godmother in charge to
organize ceremonies, sponsor; Patin
moi une vieille habitude. Football is an old
verantwortlich Zeremonien zu organisieren,
habit of mine. Fußball ist eine alte Gewohnheit
von mir. synonyme: deliko, delimako,
Gotte, Patentante, Sponsorin. Kɔɲɔ don,
denba bɛ denbajala siri. Le jour de la noce,
cogoda.
la marraine porte le bandeau. On the wedding
delinanbaliya Nom. manque d’habitude, day, the godmother wears the headband. Am
inexpérience; lack of habit, inexperience; Hochzeitstag trägt die Patin das Stirnband.
Mangel an Gewohnheit, Unerfahrenheit. denbanafurakɛla [é] Nom. pédiatre; paediatrician,
demitalɔn Nom. socque; clog; Holzschuh. medical doctor for children; Kinderarzt.
Category: Clothing. Category: Worker, occupation.
demokarasi [é-ó-á-á-í] Emprunt de : français.
synonyme: dendɔgɔtɔrɔ, denfurakɛdɔgɔtɔrɔ.
synonyme: forobafanga. Nom. démocratie; denbatigi 1 [ẽ́-á-í-í] Nom. parent, mère, femme ou
democracy; Demokratie. femelle qui a déjà eu des enfants (/des petits);
Category: Government. parent, mother, woman or female who has
already had children (/little ones); Elternteil,
den [ẽ́] Jula: deen. 1 • Nom. enfant; child; Kind. N
Verwandter, Mutter, Frau oder Weibchen, die
den don. C'est mon enfant. He's my child. Er bereits Kinder (/Kleine, Junge) hatte.
ist mein Kind. Category: Person. Dennaani tɛ npogotigi kɛ denbatigi.
2 • Nom. petit (d'un animal); little / young (of S'occuper d'un enfant ne fait pas d'une jeune
animal); Junges (von einem Tier). Wuluden, fille une mère (proverbe). Taking care of a
jakumaden, sɛden Chiot, chaton, poussin. child does not make a young girl a mother
puppy, kitten, chick. Welpe, Kätzchen, Küken.
(proverb). Sich um ein Kind zu kümmern,
macht ein junges Mädchen nicht zur Mutter
3 • Nom. fruit; fruit; Frucht. Jiriden Fruit
(Sprichwort). misimuso denbatigi. une
d'arbre. Fruit of a tree. Baumfrucht.
vache qui a déjà eu des veaux. a cow that has
already had calves. eine Kuh, die bereits
Kälber bekommen hat. Category: Kinship.
29/01/2026 125

denbatigi denfa
denbatigi [é] Nom. mère, femme ou femelle qui a denbɛrɛnin [é] Nom. nouveau-né; newborn;
2
déjà eu des enfants ou des petits; mother or Neugeborenes. synonyme: dendennin,
female who had children or young; Mutter denwulenin, denkura.
oder Weibchen, die/das schon Kinder oder
Kleine hatte. misimuso denbatigi Une vache denbilennin Nom. nouveau-né, nourrisson; newborn,
qui a déjà eu des veaux. A cow that had baby, infant, toddler, suckling; Kleinkind,
already calves. Eine Kuh, die schon Kälber Säugling, Baby. Category: Person.
hatte. Category: Person. synonyme: denwulenin.
denbatigiya [é] Nom. maternité, état de la femme que denbo [é] Nom. vaurien; rascal; Schlingel,
est mère; maternity, state of the woman who is Nichtsnutz. Denbo don. C'est un vaurien.
a mother; Mutterschaft, Zustand der Frau, die He's a rascal. Er ist ein Schlingel.
Mutter ist.
denbolo [é] Nom. génération des enfants, branche
denbaya [ẽ́-á-á] Nom. 1 • famille, parents; family,
généalogique des fils; generation of the
parents; Familie, Eltern. N ka denbaya. Ma children; Generation der Kinder, Abstammung
famille. My family. Meine Familie. der Söhne.
Category: Kinship.
dencɛ [ẽ́-ɛ́] bambara: denkɛ. Morphemes: den-cɛ.
2 • responsabilité donnée à une femme de
Nom. fils, neuve, garçon; son, nephew, boy;
l'organisation d'un baptême ou d'un mariage,
Sohn, Neffe, Junge, Knabe. Category: Kinship.
parrainage; responsibility given to a woman
synonyme: denkɛ; antonyme: denmuso.
for the organization of a baptism or a wedding,
sponsorship; Verantwortung, die einer Frau dende [è] Nom. sensibilité au froid, frilosité, froid,
für die Organisation einer Taufe oder Hochzeit
frileux; sensitivity to cold, chilliness, cold,
übertragen wird, Sponsoring. U ye denbaya ta
cautious; Kälteempfindlichkeit, Frösteln,
ka a di sogoba ma. Ils donnèrent le Kälte, vorsichtig. Ne dende ka bon. Je suis
parrainage à la lionne. They gave sponsorship très frileux. I am very cautious. Ich bin sehr
to the lioness. Sie gaben der Löwin eine vorsichtig.
Patenschaft.
dendenden [é] interj. indique la joie (des enfants),
3 • faire souche, avoir une épouse et des
hourra; indicates joy (of children), hurray;
enfants, se multiplier; to breed, to have a wife
zeigt Freude (von Kindern) an, Hurra.
and children, to multiply; zeugen, Frau und
Kinder haben, sich vermehren. ... u bɛ muso
Denmisɛnw kulela : «Seku nana
furu yen, u bɛ denbaya yen. ... ils se marient
dendenden !» Les enfant se mirent à crier : «
là-bas, ils ont des enfants là-vas. ...they get
Sékou est venu, hourra !». The children began
married there, they have children there. ...sie
to shout: “Sekou has come, hurray!” Die
heiraten dort, sie bekommen dort Kinder.
Kinder begannen zu schreien: „Sekou ist
gekommen, Hurra!“.
4 • être plein de monde, être bondé, peupler,
repeupler; to be full of people, to be crowded, dendennin [ẽ́-é-í] Morphemes: den-den-nin.
to populate, to repopulate; voller Menschen variante: denbɛrɛnin. Nom. poupée,
sein, überfüllt sein, bevölkern, neu bevölkern.
nouveau-né; doll, newborn; Puppe,
Sirada denbayalen tun don jama la. Le bord Neugeborener. synonyme: denbɛrɛnin,
de la route était pleine de monde, The roadside
denkuranin, denwulenin, denkura.
was full of people, Der Straßenrand war voller
Menschen, dendetɔ Nom. frileux; chilly, sensitive to cold; kühl,
denbaya ladonwari comparer: madɛmɛbalo. Nom. Kälteempfindlich. Ne ye dendetɔ yɛrɛ de ye.
pension alimentaire; maintenance allowance; Moi je suis un vrai frileux. I'm a real chilly
Alimente, Unterhaltsgeld. Category: Finance. person. Ich bin ein wirklich
kälteempfindlicher Mensch.
denbaya minɛcogo sariyasun Nom. code de la
dendɔgɔtɔrɔ See main entry: denfurakɛdɔgɔtɔrɔ.
famille; family statute book; Familienrecht.
n.comp. pédiatre; paediatrician, medical doctor
denbayasɛbɛ synonyme: gwasɛbɛ. Nom. livret de for children; Kinderarzt. Category: Worker,
famille; family booklet; Familienbuch. occupation. synonyme: denbanafurakɛla.
denbayatigi comparer: gwatigi, sotigi1. Nom. chef denfa [ẽ́-á] Morphemes: den-fa. Nom. papa; father;
de famille, personne qui a des enfants; head of Vater. Category: Person.
the family, person who has children;
Familienoberhaupt; Person, die Kinder hat.
Category: Person.
29/01/2026 126

denfan denmasa
denfan [é] synonyme: kɔnɔnafan. Nom. 1 • ovule; egg denkɔgɔbaliwolo
cell, reproductive cell, ovum; Eizelle, Ovum, [é] Morphemes: den-kɔgɔ-bali-wolo. Nom.
Samenanlage. Category: Body. prématuré, pour une femme accouchant avant
synonyme: fankisɛ, kɔnɔnafan. terme; premature, for a woman giving birth
2 • fœtus; fetus, foetus; Fötus. before term; Frühzeitig, für eine Frau, die vor
synonyme: denkuru, jolikuturunin. der eigentlichen Zeit der Geburt ein Kind zur
Welt bringt.
denfurakɛdɔgɔtɔrɔ Variant: dendɔgɔtɔrɔ. n.comp.
denkɔrɔba [ẽ́-ɔ́-ó-á] n.comp. adolescent;
pédiatre; paediatrician; Kinderarzt.
Category: Person.
adolescent; Jugendlicher. denkɔrɔbaw b'a
synonyme: denbanafurakɛla. fɛ Category: Person.
denjugu [é] Nom. égoïste, jaloux, mauvais type, qui denkun [é] Morphemes: den-kun. Nom. costaud,
fait sournoisement du mal (voleur, débauché, bien bâti, qui s'impose par sa personnalité;
malhonnête); egoist, selfish guy, envious guy, strong, well built, who stands out with his
bad guy, who sneakily does harm (thief, personality; kräftig, gut gebaut, der durch
debauched, dishonest); Egoist, Selbstsüchtig, seine Persönlichkeit hervorsticht.
neidisch Typ, schlechter Kerl, wer hinterhältig denkundi Jula: denkunli. Morphemes: den-kun-di.
Schaden anrichtet (Dieb, ausschweifend,
Nom. cérémonie d’imposition du nom,
unehrlich). cɛkɔrɔba denjugu. un vieux qui
baptême; name giving ceremony, infant
fait ses coups en douce. an old man who does
baptism; Zeremonie für die Namensgebung,
his tricks on the sly. ein alter Mann, der
Taufe.
heimlich seine Tricks ausführt.
denkunlijama variante: denkunlijaman. n.comp.
denjuguya [é] Nom. méchanceté, mauvais
participants au baptême; participants of a
comportement; wickedness, malice, meanness,
baptism; Teilnehmer einer Taufe.
bad behavior; Bosheit, schlechtes Benehmen.
A ka denjuguya ye a mansaw bɛɛ bolose. Sa
denkunlisaga n.comp. mouton immolé lors du
baptême; sheep being killed for the baptism;
méchanceté a donné du fil à retordre à tous ses
parents. His nastiness gave all his parents a
Schaf, das für die Tauffeier geschlachtet wird.
hard time. Seine Gemeinheit machte allen denkunliworo n.comp. cola distribuées lors du
seinen Eltern das Leben schwer.
baptême; cola nut distributed during baptism;
denkɛ [é] Jula: dencɛ. Nom. fils, neveu, garçon; son, Cola Nuss, die man während der Tauffeier
nephew, boy; Sohn, Neffe, Junge. Denkɛnin
verteilt.
danbe ye a baba ye, nka án ka barika ɲini, denkura See main entry: denkuranin.
o y'a ba ye. La dignité du fils vient de son Morphemes: den-kura. Nom. nouveau-né;
père, mais les bénédictions viennent de sa newborn baby; Neugeborene.
mère (proverbe). A son's dignity comes from synonyme: denbɛrɛnin, denwulenin,
his father, but blessings come from his mother dendennin.
(proverb). Die Würde eines Sohnes kommt
von seinem Vater, aber der Segen kommt von denkuranin synonyme: denɲɛrɛnin.
seiner Mutter (Sprichwort). synonyme: dencɛ; Variant: denkura. n.comp. nouveau né;
antonyme: denmuso. newborn baby; Neugeborene.
synonyme: dendennin.
denkisɛ [ẽ́-í-ɛ́] synonyme: kisɛ, . Nom. germe; germ;
Keim, Keimling. Category: Disease. denkuru [ẽ́-ú-ú] variante: denfan. Nom. fœtus;
denko [é-ó] Nom. désir d'enfant; desire to get a child; foetus; Fötus. synonyme: jolikuturunin,
Verlangen ein Kind zu erhalten. Denko bɛ ne
denfan, jɔnɔji.
na cogo min na ... J'ai tant envie d'avoir un denmarayɔrɔ [é] Morphemes: den-mara-yɔrɔ.
enfant ... I really want to have a child... Ich n.comp. garderie d'enfant, crèche; nursery,
möchte wirklich gerne ein Kind haben... day-nursery; Kindergarten, Kinderhort.
denkoro [é] variante: denkuru, dɛnkuru. Nom. Category: Building.
crampe; cramp; Krampf. Denkoro donna denmasa [é] Nom. parents; parents; Eltern. Ni
ntolatanna fari la. Le footballeur a eu des denmasaw ma denw ladon ka ɲɛ, jɔni de
crampes dans le corps. The footballer had bɛna o kɛ? Si les parents n'élèvent pas bien
cramps in his body. Der Fußballer hatte leurs enfants, qui donc le fera ? If parents don't
Krämpfe im Körper. Category: Disease. raise their children well, who will? Wenn
Eltern ihre Kinder nicht gut erziehen, wer
dann?
29/01/2026 127

denminɛla dennin
denminɛla [é] Nom. bonne d'enfant, nourrice, fillette dennabɔnɛ [é] Nom. enfant de malheur, vaurien,
chargée de la garde d'un enfant; nanny, voyou, enfant perdu pour les parents; child of
child-minder, babysitter; Kindermädchen, misfortune, scoundrel, rascal,
Babysitter. Category: Worker, occupation. good-for-nothing, thug, rogue; Kind des
synonyme: dennaanila. Unglücks, Nichtsnutz, Taugenichts, Gauner ,
Schurke. A kɛra e de bolo dennabɔnɛ ye.
denmisɛn [ẽ́-í-ɛ́] Morphemes: den-misɛn. n.comp.
C'est pour toi un enfant perdu (: dont tu ne
jeune enfant, petit enfant, gamin, jeune; young
pourras rien tirer). He is for you a lost child
child, small child , kid, lad, youngster, boy;
(from whom you will be able to get nothing).
junges Kind, Kleinkind, kleiner Junge.
Er ist für dich ein verlorenes Kind (von dem du
Denmisɛn tɛ don yan ! Les enfants ne
nichts bekommen kannst).
peuvent entrer ici ! Children cannot enter
here! Kinder haben hier keinen Zutritt!
dennabɔnɛtɔgɔ [é] Nom. nom spécial donné aux
Category: Person. enfants dont les aînés sont morts dans leur
première semaine (par exemple buguri
denmisɛnjow Nom. droits de l'enfant; children
«poussière», filifɛn «rebut», ɲamaton «tas
rights; Kinderrechte. d'ordures»); special name given to children
denmisɛnjulajuguya synonyme: denjuguyawale, whose older siblings died in their first week
(e.g. buguri 'dust', filifɛn 'refuse', garbage
denmisɛnninw benkanninkanu. Nom.
pile'); besonderer Name für Kinder, deren
pédophilie; paedophilia; Pädophilie.
älteres Geschwister in der ersten Woche starb
denmisɛnkɔnɔ Nom. grossesse précoce; premature (z. B. buguri „Staub“, filifɛn „Müll“, ɲamaton
pregnancy; frühzeitige Schwangerschaft.
„Müllhaufen“).
denmisɛnman Morphemes: denmisɛn-man. Nom. dennanila variante: dennaanila. n.comp. nounou,
nourrice; nanny, nursemaid; Kinderfrau.
enfance, jeunesse; childhood, youth; Kindheit,
Jugend. kabini ne denmisɛnman depuis mon denni Nom. 1 • fille, fillette, jeune fille,
enfance. since my childhood. mademoiselle; daughter, girl, Miss; Tochter,
synonyme: denmisɛnya. Mädchen, Fräulein. Category: Person.
denmisɛnya [ẽ́] Morphemes: denmisɛn-ya. Nom. 2 • fructification; fruit-forming; Befruchtung.
1 • enfance, jeunesse; childhood, youth; denni fɔlɔ synonyme: dabilatali fɔlɔ. Nom. suspension;
Kindheit, Jugend. Bɛɛ bangebaga ye i ka suspension; Aufschub, Ausschluss,
laadilikɛla ye i ka denmisɛnya kɔnɔ. Les Suspension.
parents de chacun sont tes conseillers pendant dennimasaya Nom. relations, devoirs entre parents et
ton enfance. Everyone's parents are your
enfants; relationships, duties between
advisors during your childhood. Die Eltern
parents and children; Beziehungen, Pflichten
eines jeden Menschen sind Ihre Berater
zwischen Eltern und Kindern. Dennimasaya
während Ihrer Kindheit.
ye juru ye. La relation enfant-parents est une
synonyme: bilakoroya, denmisɛnman.
dette (proverbe). The child-parent relationship
2 • virginité; virginity; Jungfräulichkeit,
is a debt (proverb). Die
Unberührtheit. synonyme: pogotigiya, Kind-Eltern-Beziehung ist eine Schuld /
sɔntanya. Pflicht (Sprichwort).
3 • enfantillage; childishness; Kindlichkeit, dennin [é] Nom. 1 • fillette, jeune fille, mademoiselle;
Kindisch.
little girl, young girl, miss; kleines Mädchen,
denmuso [é] [ẽ́-ú-ó] Morphemes: den-muso. junges Mädchen, Fräulein. Dennin jarabira
n.comp. fille (féminin de fils); daughter; cɛnin la o yɔrɔ bɛɛ ... La jeune fille tomba sur
Tochter. Category: Kinship. antonyme: denkɛ, le champ amoureuse de jeune homme... The
dencɛ. young girl immediately fell in love with a
young man... Das junge Mädchen verliebte
dennaanila [é] variante: dennanila, denminɛla,
sich sofort in einen jungen Mann...
dennaminɛden. n.comp. nounou, bonne 2 • petit enfant; little child; kleines Kind.
d'enfant, nourrice, fillette chargée de la garde denninw tɔpɔtɔbaga toi qui est aux petits
d'un enfant; nanny, nursemaid, babysitter;
soins pour les petits enfants. you who take
Kinderfrau, Kindermädchen, Babysitter.
great care of the little children. Du, der du
Category: Person. synonyme: denminɛla. dich liebevoll um die kleinen Kinder
kümmerst.
29/01/2026 128

denntan deredere
3 • garçonnet; little boy; kleiner Junge. E 2 • favoriser la fécondation, la fructification;
dennin ka kegun ! Toi qui est un petit garçon promote fertilization, fruiting; fördern die
Befruchtung und Fruchtbildung.
malin ! You are a clever little boy! Du bist ein
kluger kleiner Junge! dentɔgɔla vi. donner un prénom; give a first name;
denntan Jula: dentan. Nom. sans enfant; without den Vornamen geben.
children, childless; ohne Kinder, kinderlos. denwolo [ẽ́-ó-ó] Nom. accouchement, procréation;
Densaya y'u kɛ denntanw ye. La mort de delivery (birth), procreation; Gebären, Geburt,
leurs enfants a fait d'eux des parents sans Fortpflanzung. synonyme: jiginni, wolo ,
1
enfants. The death of their children left them bangeli.
childless parents. Der Tod ihrer Kinder
hinterließ kinderlose Eltern. denwolobali [é] Nom. stérile, femme qui n'a pas
synonyme: dentan. d'enfant; barren, childless woman;
unfruchtbar, Kinderlose Frau. ... a tɛ den
denɲɛnin [é] bambara: denɲɛrɛnin. Nom. bébé,
wolo, denwolobali don ... ... elle n'a pas
nourrisson, nouveau-né; baby, newborn; Baby,
Neugeborenes. Category: Person.
d’enfant, elle est stérile ... ...she has no
synonyme: denwulenin.
children, she is sterile... ...sie hat keine
Kinder, sie ist unfruchtbar... synonyme: bɔrɔgɛ.
denɲɛrɛninya [é] Jula: denɲɛninya. Nom. petite
denwolobaliya [é] Nom. stérilité; sterility, infertility,
enfance; early childhood; frühe Kindheit.
barrenness; Sterilität, Unfruchtbarkeit,
densaya [é-á-á] Morphemes: den-saya. Nom. Zeugungsunfähigkeit. Denwolobaliyafura bɛ
mortalité infantile, mort des enfants; infant áw bolo de ? Vous avez donc des
mortality; Kindersterblichkeit.
médicaments anticonceptionnels ? So you have
Category: Disease.
birth control medication? Sie haben also
denso [ẽ́-ó] Morphemes: den-so. Medikamente zur Empfängnisverhütung?
variante: bangeso. Nom. utérus, matrice, denwulenin [ẽ́-ú-é-ĩ́] Nom. nouveau-né; newborn;
ventre, ovaire; uterus, womb, ovary; Uterus,
Neugeborenes. synonyme: denkura,
Gebärmutter, Eierstock. Category: Body.
denbilennin, denbɛrɛnin, dendennin,
synonyme: wolonugu, bangenugu, bangeso.
denɲɛnin.
densoda [é] Morphemes: den-so-da. Nom. col de
denya [é] Nom. enfance, état de fils ou de fille;
l’utérus; neck of the uterus, cervix;
Gebärmutterhals. Category: Body.
childhood, state of son or daughter; Kindheit,
synonyme: wolonugu daa.
Zustand des Sohnes oder der Tochter. ...
hadamadenya daminɛ ye danya ye. ... le
densotulo [é] Nom. trompe utérine, oviducte; uterine
début de al vie humaine, c'est l'enfance. ...the
tube, oviduct; Eileiter. beginning of human life is childhood. ...der
densɔrɔbaliya [é] Morphemes: den-sɔrɔ-bali-ya. Beginn des menschlichen Lebens ist die
Kindheit.
Nom. stérilité, condition de la personne sans
enfant; sterility, condition of the childless depite [é-é-é] Emprunt de : français. Nom. député;
person; Unfruchtbarkeit, Zustand der deputy, member of parliament; Regierungsrat,
kinderlosen Person. misimuso ka Abgeordneter, Vertreter.
densɔrɔbaliya la stérilité des vaches. sterility Category: Government.
of cows. Sterilität von Kühen. depitebulon Morphemes: depite-bulon. Nom.
dentan bambara: denntan. Nom. sans enfant, sans parlement, Assemblée Nationale; parliament;
petit, sans fruit; childless, without child, Parlament, Regierungsparlament.
fruitless; kinderlos, fruchtlos. Category: Government.
synonyme: denntan. dere [é] variante: dɛrɛ. Nom. 1 • sorgho; Sorghum;
dentigi [é] Nom. qui a des enfants, père, mère; who has Sorghum, Hirse. Category: Food, Grass, herb,
vine. sorghum guineense.
children, father, mother; wer hat Kinder,
Vater, Mutter. 2 • rouge; red; rot. Category: colour.
dentigiya [é] Nom. 1 • état de celui ou celle qui a des deredere [é] Adverbe. 1 • très chaud; very hot; sehr
enfants, paternité, maternité; status of one who heiß. Tile ganna deredere ! Il fait très chaud !
has children, paternity, maternity; Status einer It's very hot! Es ist sehr heiß!
Person, die Kinder hat, Vaterschaft, 2 • très rouge et joli; very red and pretty; sehr
Mutterschaft. rot und hübsch. A bilenna deredere ! C'est
très rouge ! It's very red! Es ist sehr rot!
29/01/2026 129

dereke dɛfɛ
dereke [è-è-é] synonyme: fani. Nom. chemise, habit; dɛbɛn [ɛ̀-ɛ́] Jula: dɛbɛ. Nom. natte tressée (qu'on
shirt, garment; Hemd, Kleid, Gewand. peut rouler); braided mat (that can be rolled
Dereke don. Porte un habit. Wear a garment. up); geflochtene Matte (die zusammengerollt
Trage ein Kleid. Category: Clothing. werden kann). synonyme: bilali.
derekeba variante: dɔlɔkiba. Nom. grand boubou; dɛbi variante: dabi. Nom. engoulevent; night-jar;
boubou; traditionelles Gewand. Nachtschwalbe. Category: Bird. macrodipteryx
Category: Clothing. synonyme: dɔlɔkiba. vexillarius.
derekebadennin Nom. petit boubou; traditional dɛɛgɛdɛɛgɛ [ɛ̀-ɛ̀] variante: dɛgɛdɛgɛ. Verbe.
garment; traditionelles Kleid. dorloter, cajoler, choyer; cuddle, pamper;
Category: Clothing. verwöhnen, kuscheln. Ni i ye den
deren [é] Verbe. être luisant, reprendre sa couleur, dɛɛgɛdɛɛgɛ, a bɛ tiɲɛ. Si tu choies un enfant,
tu le gâtes. If you pamper a child, you spoil
rendre sa couleur (en mouillant); to be shiny, to
him. Wenn man ein Kind zu sehr kuschelt,
regain its color, to restore its color (by
verwöhnt man es.
wetting); glänzend sein, seine Farbe
wiedererlangen, seine Farbe wiederherstellen dɛɛn bambara: dɛn. synonyme: lɛɛn. Nom. mouche
(durch Benetzung). Jiriden kolen bɛ deren. tsé-tsé, taon; gad-fly, horse-fly; Bremse,
Un fruit qu'on a lavé reprend sa couleur. A fruit Bräme. Category: Insect. glossina palpalis.
that has been washed regains its color. Eine synonyme: lɛn, dɛn .
3 3
gewaschene Frucht erhält ihre Farbe zurück.
synonyme: lɛrɛn.
dɛɛndɛn [ɛ̀] Verbe. 1 • soutenir, aider à marcher;
support, help to walk; unterstützen, Hilfe beim
desanburu Nom. décembre; December; Dezember. Gehen.
desanburukalo Morphemes: desanburu-kalo. Nom. 2 • marcher lentement, marcher en procession;
walk slowly, walk in procession; langsam
décembre; December; Dezember.
gehen, marschieren in einer Prozession.
desɛn Emprunt de : français. Nom. dessin; drawing, Ntorikulu dɛɛndɛnbaga, o ye dusumanɔ ye.
sketch; Zeichnung. Qui peut conduire un troupeau de crapauds fait
dewu [é] Adverbe. 1 • très serré, étranglé; very tight, montre de patience (proverbe). He who can
lead a flock of toads has patience (proverb).
strangled; sehr eng, erdrosselt.
Wer einen Krötenschwarm führen kann, hat
2 • aigu; shrill, strident, sharp; schrill. A Geduld (Sprichwort).
kulela dewu ! Il cria très fort ! He shouted 3 • mener au pâturage; lead to pasture; zur
very loudly! Er schrie sehr laut! Weide führen.
dɛ [ɛ]́ excl. exclamation d’intensité, placée à la fin dɛɛndɛnnikɛla Nom. berger, bouvier; shepherd,
de la phrase; exclamation of intensity, placed cowherd; Hirte, Kuhhirte. Category: Animal
at the end of the phrase; Ausruf der Intensität. husbandry, Worker, occupation.
A ka di dɛ ! C’est très bon ! Qu’est-ce que dɛɛnkun [ɛ́] Verbe. 1 • damer (le sol); tamper (the
c’est bon ! It’s very good! Das ist wirklich sehr
ground); stampfen (den Boden). ka so kura
gut! I fasara dɛ ! Tu as vraiment maigri ! You
dugukolo dɛɛnkun. damer le sol de la
have really lost weight! Du hast wirklich sehr
abgenommen!
nouvelle maison. tamper the floor of the new
house. Stampfen des Bodens des neuen
dɛbɛ 1 [ɛ]́ Nom. 1 • ventre, flancs (uniquement en Hauses.
parlant d'une femme : terme respectueux et 2 • égaliser, niveler.
atténué); belly, sides (only when speaking of a
dɛfɛ [ɛ́-ɛ́] Verbe. tresser, entrelacer, attacher
woman: respectful and attenuated term);
Bauch, Seiten (nur bei Frau: respektvolle und ensemble; plait, weave sth., intertwine sth., tie
abgeschwächte Bezeichnung). A ye dɛbɛ ta. together, bind together; flechten, verflechten,
Elle a conçu. She conceived. Sie wurde zusammenbinden. ka juru dɛfɛ. tresser de la
schwanger. Category: Body. corde. braid a rope. ein Seil flechten.
2 • utérus; uterus, womb; Uterus.
dɛbɛ [ɛ]́ Nom. océan, mer; ocean, sea; Ozean, Meer.
2
Dɛbɛ ye jiba de ye. C'est une très grande
étendue d'eau. It's a very large body of water.
Es ist ein sehr großes Gewässer.
Category: Water.
29/01/2026 130

dɛgɛ dɛn
dɛgɛ [ɛ-̀ ɛ́] Nom. 1 • dèguè, boule d'un mets dɛmɛbaga [ɛ̀-ɛ̀-á-á] Morphemes: dɛmɛ-baa.
consistant en un céréale pilé non tamisé, passé Nom. celui qui aide, assistant (personne),
à la vapeur, bouille aigre, pâte, sauce personne ressource, conseiller; helper,
consistante, aliment fluide à base de petit mil assistant; Helfer. Dɛmɛbaga ɲuman bɛ mɔgɔ
ou du riz; ball of kind of food; eine Art Gericht se ko la. Une personne qui vous conseille bien
zum essen. Tigadɛgɛ, tomatidɛgɛ pâte
vous fait réussir (proverbe). A person who
d'arachide, sauce tomate. groundnut dough, advises you well makes you succeed (proverb).
tomato sauce. Erdnußteig, Tomatensauce. Wer gut berät, macht erfolgreich (Sprichwort).
Category: Food. Category: Person.
2 • brouet, bouille aigre; broth, sour broth; dɛmɛdɛmɛ [ɛ̀-ɛ̀-ɛ́-ɛ́] Nom. 1 • soutenir, se démener,
Brühe, saure Brühe. malodɛgɛ brouet de riz.
faire des efforts, se débrouiller; support,
rice broth. Reisbrühe.
backup, scramble, make an effort, manage,
dɛgɛkuru Nom. grumeaux d'akassa; porridge dish; cope; unterstützen, sich bemühen, sich
Brei Gericht. herumschlagen, sich zu helfen wissen.
Banabagatɔ y'i dɛmɛdɛmɛ ka se yan. Le
dɛgɛn Verbe. goûter, manger un peu (avec
malade arriva péniblement jusqu'ici. The
tempérance); savour, eat a little (with
patient arrived here with difficulty. Der Patient
temperance); probieren, etwas essen (mit
kam mit Schwierigkeiten hierher.
Mäßigung). A t'i dɛgɛn foyi rɔ. Il boit et
2 • aider à marcher (un infirme, un malade);
mange sans retenue. He drinks and eats
help to walk (a cripple, a sick person); beim
without restraint. Er trinkt und ißt ohne
Gehen helfen (einem Krüppel, einem
Hemmung. synonyme: sidɛgɛn.
Kranken).
dɛmɛ [ɛ-̀ ɛ́] vt. 1 • aider; help; helfen. Ne dɛmɛ ! 3 • effort; effort, endeavour, exertion;
1
Aide-moi ! Help me! Hilf mit! Ala k’an bɛɛ Anstrengung, Bemühung, Bestreben. Aw ka
dɛmɛ ! Que Dieu nous aide tous ! May God
dɛmɛdɛmɛ ma kɛ fu ye. Vos efforts n'ont pas
help us all! Möge Gott uns helfen! ni Ala ka
étés vains. Your efforts were not in vain. Ihre
Bemühungen waren nicht umsonst.
dɛmɛ ye avec l’aide de Dieu. with God’s help.
mit Gottes Hilfe. X dɛmɛ + inf. aider X à...
dɛmɛdɛmɛli [ɛ̀-ɛ̀-ɛ̀-ɛ̀-í] variante: dɛm̀ ɛ̀dɛ̀mɛ̀. Nom.
help X to... X helfen zu ... N bi n ba dɛmɛ ka
soutien; support; Stütze, Unterstützung.
ɲɔ susu. J’aide ma mère à piler le mil. I help dɛmɛlitɔn Morphemes: dɛmɛ-li-tɔn. Nom.
my mother pound the millet. Ich helfe meiner organisation humanitaire; aid agency;
Mutter die Hirse zu stampfen. X dɛmɛ Y la Hilfsorganisation.
aider X à faire Y. help X to do Y. X helfen Y zu dɛmɛnan [ɛ̀-ɛ̀-ã́] Nom. auxiliaire; auxiliary; Zusatz,
machen. U b’u kɔrɔmuso dɛmɛ tobili la.
Helfer, Verbündete. Category: Grammar.
Elles aident leur sœur à faire la cuisine. They
help their sister with the cooking. Sie helfen
dɛmɛni Nom. aide, assistance; help, aid, assistance;
ihrer Schwester mit dem Kochen. An bi se ka Hilfe, Unterstützung. An mako b'i ka dɛmɛni
ɲɔgɔn dɛmɛ. Nous pouvons s’entraider. We na. Nous avons besoin de ton aide. We need
can help each other. Wir können einander your help. Wir brauchen deine Hilfe. Ne b'aw
helfen. synonyme: madɛmɛ. fo kosɛbɛ aw ka dɛmɛni kosɔn. Merci
2 • se débrouiller; manage, cope; beaucoup pour votre aide. Thank you very
durchkommen, sich zu helfen wissen. I k'i much for your help. Danke für eure Hilfe.
dɛmɛ ka ... Débrouille-toi pour ... ! Do your synonyme: dɛmɛ 2 .
best to...! Geben Sie Ihr Bestes, um...! dɛmɛɲini [ɛ̀-ɛ̀] Morphemes: dɛmɛ-ɲini. Nom.
dɛmɛ [ɛ-̀ ɛ́] Nom. aide, assistance; help, assistance, recherche d'aide, secours, aide matérielle;
2
aid; Hilfe, Unterstützung. synonyme: dɛmɛni,
search for aid, rescue, help, relief; Suche für
Hilfe, Suche nach Hilfsangeboten,
bolominɛyɔrɔ, nafalan.
Hilfeleistung, Beistand. Ba kɛmɛ sɔrɔla
dɛmɛɲini na ... On a obtenu 500'000 francs de
secours ... We obtained 500,000 francs in
relief... Wir haben 500.000 Franken als
Hilfeleistung erhalten...
dɛn [ɛ́] Verbe. 1 • se faufiler (discrètement); sneak
1
in; einschleichen. a dɛnna ka boli
29/01/2026 131

dɛn dɛndɛnkirinti
2 • se mettre à l'affût, mettre à l'écart; in dɛndɛ [ɛ̀-ɛ́] vt. 1 • prendre soin (d’un objet), afin qu’il
1
ambush; hinterhältig handeln, überfallen. a
dure plus longtemps, être économe, ne pas
dɛnna ka sogo minɛ dépenser, bien gérer, prendre soin, bien
3 • se cacher, épier, se tapir, guetter; spy on utiliser; take care of (an object), so that it lasts
sb./sth., lurk, look out for sb./sth., watch out longer, be economical, sparing, frugal; einem
for sth; ausspähen, Ausschau halten, Objekt Sorge tragen, so dass es länger hält,
verstecken. U y'u dɛn kɛrɛfɛ, hali u mankan sparsam sein, haushälterisch sein,
tɛ mɛn tugun. Ils se cachèrent sur le côté, ils
kostensparend.
ne faisaient plus de bruit. They hid to the side,
2 • surveiller; pay attention, keep an eye on,
they no longer made any noise. Sie versteckten
superintend, control; überwachen,
beobachten.
sich an der Seite, sie machten keinen Lärm
mehr. 3 • épier; spy, eavesdrop; spionieren,
4 • élider, effacer; elide; weglassen. dɛnni,
ausspionieren, spähen, lauschen.
dɛnnan élision, apostrophe. elision, dɛndɛ 2 [ɛ́] variante: dɛɛndɛ. Nom. petite calebasse,
apostrophe. Elision, Apostroph. petit récipient utilisé pour remplir; small
Category: Grammar. calabash, small container used to fill; kleine
5 • isoler; isolate; isolieren. synonyme: mabɔ.
Kalebasse, kleiner Behälter zum Befüllen.
Category: Container.
dɛn [ɛ]́ Verbe. 1 • s'adosser, appuyer contre; lean on,
2 dɛndɛla Nom. berger; shepherd, cowboy; Hirte.
lean back against, lean against, rest against;
Category: Animal husbandry, Worker,
anlehnen . A dɛnnen filɛ kogo kɛrɛfɛ.
occupation. synonyme: bagangwɛnla,
Regarde la lampe posée contre le mur. Look at
the lamp leaned against the wall. Schauen
gwɛnnikɛla.
Sie sich die Lampe, an der Wand angelehnt. dɛndɛn [ɛ̀] variante: dɛndɛ. Verbe. garder pour soi,
1
2 • être suspendu; suspended , be hanging; être économe, ne pas dépenser, bien gérer;
aufgehängt sein. Jurufilen dɛnnen don keep to yourself, be thrifty, don't spend,
suruku la. La puisette est suspendue au manage well; für sich behalten, sparsam sein,
crochet (proverbe). The bucket hangs on the geben Sie nichts aus, kommen Sie gut zurecht,
hook (proverb). Der Eimer hängt am Haken gut verwalten. A b'a ka nafolo dɛndɛn. Il est
(Sprichwort). avare de son bien (: il gère bien sa richesse).
dɛn [ɛ]́ Jula: dɛɛn. Nom. mouche tsé-tsé, glossine,
He is miserly with his property (: he manages
3 his wealth well). Er geht geizig mit seinem
taon; gad-fly, horse-fly; Bräme, Bremse.
Vermögen um (: er verwaltet sein Vermögen
Category: Insect. glossina palpalis.
gut). Category: Finance.
synonyme: nfugu, lɛn, dɛɛn.
2
dɛndɛn [ɛ́] Verbe. partir (ou venir)subrepticement,
2
dɛn [ɛ]́ variante: tɛn. Adverbe. très noir, sombre;
4 filer, se défiler; leave (or come)
very black, dark; sehr schwarz, dunkel. Dibi surreptitiously, slip away; heimlich gehen
bɛ dɛn ! Il fait très obscure ! It's very dark! Es (oder kommen), sich davonschleichen. A yɛrɛ
ist sehr dunkel! maloyara k'i dɛndɛn ka bɔ yen. Il a eu honte
dɛn fɔlɔ synonyme: dabila fɔlɔ. vt. suspendre; suspend; et fila en douce. He was ashamed and slipped
away. Er schämte sich und verschwand
aufschieben, einstellen.
heimlich.
dɛnan donni expr. tuteurage; staking of fruit trees ;
dɛndɛnbiɲɛ [ɛ́] Nom. pancréas; pancreas; Pankreas,
Abstützung. Category: Agriculture.
Bauchspeicheldrüse. Category: Body.
dɛnda [ɛ]́ Nom. petite porte, porte secrète, porte synonyme: samanɛnɛ dɛndɛnbiɲɛ, ninana,
secondaire d'une concession; small door, samanɛnɛ.
secret door, secondary door of a compound;
dɛndɛndɛgɛlɛn Nom. hanneton; cock-chafer;
kleine Tür, Geheimtür, Nebentür eines
Gehöftes. A bɔra dɛnda fɛ. Il est sorti par une Mai-Käfer. Category: Insect.
porte secrète. He left through a secret door. Er dɛndɛnkirinti variante: dɛndɛnbakirinti. Nom. guêpe
ging durch eine Geheimtür.
maçonne; mud-wasp; Lehmwespe.
Category: Insect. synonyme: dundunkala,
dununkala.
29/01/2026 132

dɛndɛrɛ dɛrɛdɛrɛ
dɛndɛrɛ [ɛ̀] Verbe. 1 • se concentrer; to focus, dɛnnan [ɛ ́-ã́] Nom. apostrophe; apostrophe;
1
concentrate; sich konzentrieren. k'i dɛndɛrɛ Apostroph, Auslassungszeichen. ...dɛnnan bɛ
baara kan. se concentrer sur le travail. bila dafalen ɲɛmadogolen nɔna. ...
concentrate on work. Konzentrieren Sie sich l'apostrophe se met à la place de la voyelle
auf die Arbeit. élidée. ...the apostrophe is placed in place of
2 • se contracter; contract, shrink, reduce; the elided vowel. ...das Apostroph wird
schrumpfen, verkleinern. I dɛndɛrɛ ka na anstelle des eliminierten Vokals plaziert.
joona. Fais-toi tout petit et viens vite ! Make
Category: Grammar.
yourself small and come quickly! Mach dich dɛnnan 2 Nom. étançon; stanchion, strut; Stütze.
klein und komm schnell! synonyme: sɔnmɛnan.
3 • être trapu; to be stocky; stämmig sein. Cɛ in
dɛnni Nom. élision, isolement; elision, isolation;
ye dɛndɛrɛnin ye. Ce type-là est trapu. This
Elision, Auslassung, Isolierung, Isolation.
guy is stocky. Dieser Typ ist stämmig.
Category: Grammar. synonyme: mabɔli.
dɛnɛn [ɛ-̀ ɛ́] Nom. 1 • mur (d'une construction); wall
dɛɲɛ [ɛ̀] Nom. cuivre jaune, laiton; yellow copper,
(of a building); Wand, Mauer. Dɛnɛn mana
brass; Messing. synonyme: nsira .
pɛrɛn, ɲɛbɛrɛ bɛ don a la. Quand le mur se
1
fend, les cancrelats s'y mettent (proverbe). dɛrɛ 1 [ɛ̀-ɛ́] variante: dɛrɛn. Verbe. coincer, attraper
When the wall cracks, the cockroaches come in (en coinçant), serrer; trap, pin, catch, grip,
(proverb). Wenn die Wand Risse bekommt, tighten (sth.), clamp; einklemmen, klemmen,
kommen die Kakerlaken herein (Sprichwort). einspannen, festklemmen, zusammenrücken.
2 • cinéma (populaire); cinema (popular); ... datugulan dɛrɛla a bolo kan ... ... la
Kino (beliebt). portière se ferma en lui coinçant la main ...
dɛnɛnbakirinti [ɛ̀-ɛ̀-à] variante: dɛnɛnkirinti.
...the door closed, trapping his hand... ...die
Tür schloß sich und seine Hand war
Nom. guêpe-maçonne; mud dauber, mud wasp;
eingeklemmt...
Wespe. Category: Insect.
synonyme: dununkala. dɛrɛ 2 [ɛ́] variante: dɛrɛsi. part. particule de valeur
valeur intensive, exclamative et adversative,
dɛnkɛlentu Verbe. mal placer, mal ranger, mal
mais ... !, vraiment ! bien sûr !; but ... !, particle
empiler; misplace; fehl am Platz, schlecht of intensive, exclamatory and adversative
plazieren. I ka filenw sigi koɲuman, u value, Really !, Of course !; Aber ... ! Partikel
dɛnkɛlɛntulen bɛ. Pose bien les calebasses, von wert-intensivem, ausrufendem und
elles sont mal placées. Place the calabashes adversativem Wert, Wirklich !, Natürlich ! O
carefully, they are poorly placed. Plazieren Sie ye kabako ye dɛrɛ ! Mais c'est absolument
die Kürbisse vorsichtig, sie sind schlecht incroyable ! But it's absolutely incredible!
plaziert. Aber es ist absolut unglaublich! N b'a kɛ n'a
dɛnkɛrɛfɛya variante: dɛnnkɛrɛfɛ. Nom. exclusion, ye, dɛrɛsi ! Je fais ça avec lui. bien sûr ! I do
ostracisme; exclusion, ostracism; this with him. Of course ! Ich mache das mit
Ausgrenzung. O sera ka muso caman bɔ ihm. Natürlich !
dɛnkɛrɛfɛya la ... Cela a permis à beaucoup de dɛrɛdɛrɛ [ɛ́] Verbe. aligner serré, être l'un derrière
1
femmes de sortir de l'ostracisme qu'elles l'autre; line up close, stand one behind the
subissaient ... This allowed many women to other; Nah aneinanderreihen, hintereinander
escape the ostracism they suffered... Dies stehen.
ermöglichte es vielen Frauen, der
dɛrɛdɛrɛ [ɛ́] 1 • Verbe. être cauteleux, être hypocrite,
Ausgrenzung, die sie erlitten hatten, zu 2
entkommen ... tromper quelqu'un; to be cunning, to be
hypocritical, to deceive someone; listig sein,
dɛnkɛrɛnya Verbe. s'en remettre à Dieu; rely on God;
heuchlerisch sein, jemanden täuschen. ka
vertrauen auf Gott. Ni i banana, i ka
mɔgɔ dɛrɛdɛrɛ tromper quelqu'un par des
dɛnkɛrɛnya Ala la. Si tu es malade, remets-toi
manières cauteleuses. deceive someone
à Dieu. If you are sick, turn to God. Wenn Sie through deceitful ways. jemanden auf
krank sind, wenden Sie sich an Gott. betrügerische Weise täuschen.
synonyme: daani. 2 • Nom. tromperie, hypocrisie; deception,
hypocrisy; Täuschung, Heuchelei.
synonyme: jijukɔrɔsaya.
29/01/2026 133

dɛrɛmɛ di
dɛrɛmɛ [ɛ́] Verbe. tresser (de la paille); braid (straw); dɛsɛbagatɔ [ɛ́-ɛ́-á-á-ɔ́] Nom. personne démunie,
flechten / weben (Stroh). I bɛ bin kan, k'o pauvre, indigent, handicapé, infirme;
yɛrɛ dɛrɛmɛ, ko cɛkala. tu fauches de l'herbe impoverished, needy person, handicapped
et tu la tresses pour en faire une natte de sécot.
person; Behinderter, verkrüppelt, . ... ka
You mow some grass and weave it into a straw dɛsɛbagatɔ ninnu dɛgɛ bololabaaraw la.
mat. Sie mähen etwas Gras und weben es zu ... enseigner à ces infirmes des travaux
einer Stroh-Matte. manuels. ...teach these crippled people manual
dɛrɛnan Nom. 1 • pince motoriste; pliers, pincers,
work. ...lehren Sie diesen Behinderter
Menschen Handarbeit. Da bɛ dɛsɛbagatɔ ye,
tongs, gripper; Zange.
sunsɔgɔ t'a ye. Le pauvre se couche, mais il
2 • étau; vice, bench vise; Schraubstock.
ne dort pas (proverbe). The poor man goes to
dɛru [ɛ]̀ Verbe. esquiver, se pousser; dodge, push; bed, but he does not sleep (proverb). Der arme
ausweichen, schieben. I dɛru, n'o tɛ ji bɛ bɔn i Mann geht zu Bett, aber er schläft nicht
kan. Attention, pousse-toi, sinon l'eau va te (Sprichwort). synonyme: sɛgɛnbagatɔ,
couler dessus. Be careful, push yourself, faantan.
otherwise the water will flow over you. Seien
dɛsɛbagatɔjamana [ɛ́] Nom. pays sous-développé;
Sie vorsichtig, weichen Sie aus, sonst fließt
das Wasser über Sie hinweg.
underdeveloped country; unterentwickeltes
Land.
dɛsɛ [ɛ-́ ɛ́] 1 • vi. ne pas arriver à, manquer, échouer,
1 dɛsɛlan [ɛ́] Nom. petite hache pour travailler le bois,
empêcher, être incapable, être insuffisant; fail,
hachette; small axe for working wood, hatchet;
lack, prevent, hinder, be incapable, be
kleine Axt zur Holzbearbeitung, Beil.
insufficient; nicht können, nicht schaffen,
Category: Tool.
versagen, verfehlen, scheitern, fehlschlagen,
misslingen, verhindern, hindern, hemmen, dɛsɛlen [ɛ́] part. signe moins; minus sign;
ungenügend sein. I ti dɛsɛ tɔnɔ na. Tu ne Minuszeichen. seegin dɛsɛlen saba huit
manques pas de réaliser un bénéfice. You don't moins trois (8 - 3). eight minus three (8 - 3).
fail to get a benefice. Du verfehlst es nicht acht minus drei (8 - 3).
einen Gewinn herauszuschlagen. Dumuni ma
dɛsɛyɔrɔw n.comp. insuffisances; insufficiencies;
dɛsɛ án na ... La nourriture ne nous a pas
Unzulänglichkeiten.
manquée... We didn't lack food... Das Essen
hat uns nicht gefehlt... di 1 [í] vt. donner; give; geben. A ye ji di misi ma.
2 • Nom. impuissance, incapacité; Il a donné de l’eau à la vache. He gave water to
powerlessness, helplessness, inability, the cow. Er gab der Kuh Wasser. N sɔnna,
disability, incapacity; Machtlosigkeit, wari di. D'accord, donne l'argent. OK, give the
Unvermögen, Hilflosigkeit, Unfähigkeit,
money. Einverstanden, gib das Geld.
Unvermögen.
di [í] adj.pred. 1 • être bon (au goût), agréable (au
3 • Nom. pauvreté, manque; poverty, lack; 2
Armut, Mangel. Dɛsɛ bɛ n na sisan. Je suis à goût), doux, sucré, savoureux; to be good,
présent dans la pauvreté. I am now in poverty.
tasty, sweet, interesting; gut sein,
Ich bin jetzt in Armut.
geschmackvoll sein, süß, interessant sein, gut
schmecken. Baranda ka di. La banane est
dɛsɛ
2
[ɛ-̀ ɛ́] variante: dɛsɛbara, dɛsɛkili. Nom.
bonne. Elle a un bon goût. The banana tastes
mollet, patte; calf, paw; Wade, Tatze, Pfote. good. Die Banane schmeckt gut. Gafekalan
Category: Body, Parts of an animal.
ka di n ye. La lecture me plaît. I like reading.
dɛsɛ 3 [ɛ]́ Jula: lɛsɛ. Verbe. tailler, sculpter, Ich lese gerne.
équarrier; carve, sculpt, square; schnitzen, 2 • aimer bien (quelqu'un), être intéressant; like
formen, quadrieren. ka jirikuru dɛsɛ tailler un somebody, find interesting; jemanden mögen,
morceau de bois. carve a piece of wood. ein interessant finden. Musa ko ka di n ye. J'aime
Stück Holz schnitzen. synonyme: lɛsɛ. bien Moussa. I like Moussa. Ich mag Moussa.
3 • facile, aisé; easy, simple, convenient;
einfach, leicht. Julakankalan ka di. C'est
facile d'apprendre le dioula. It is easy to learn
Dioula. Es ist einfach Dioula zu lernen.
29/01/2026 134

di dibimayɔrɔ
4 • de valeur, efficace; valuable, effective; 2 • toute chose agréable, fructueuse, source de
wertvoll, wirkungsvoll, wirksam, plaisir; anything pleasant, fruitful, source of
leistungsfähig. A ka nasuru ka ca, a ka pleasure, successful; angenehm, fruchtbar und
nasuru ka di. Ses formules secrètes sont eine Quelle des Vergnügens ist, erfolgreich. A
nombreuses et efficaces. Its secret formulas ka jago in kɛra dibara ye dɛ ! Son commerce
are numerous and effective. Seine geheimen est devenu très fructueux ! His business has
Formeln sind zahlreich und wirksam. become very successful! Sein Geschäft ist sehr
5 • fréquent; frequent; häufig. Jirikakala ye erfolgreich geworden!
man di kungoda la. On voit rarement un dibi [ì-í] 1 • Nom. obscurité, ténèbres; darkness;
1
menuiser dans les coins de la brousse. You Dunkelheit. Dibi bɛ. Il fait noir. It’s dark. Es
rarely see a carpenter in the corners of the
ist dunkel. Dibi la. Dans l’obscurité. In the
bush. In den Ecken des Busches sieht man
dark. In der Dunkelheit.
selten einen Zimmermann.
2 • Nom. prison; prison, jail; Gefängnis.
di 3 [ì] inter. comment (interrogative), qu'est-ce synonyme: kaso 1 .
que; how; wie. A be di ? A ko di? Ça va
3 • Verbe. être obscure; to be obscure; dunkel
(familier) ? Que dit-il ? How is it (informal)? sein. Dibi bɛ. Il fait sombre. It's dark. Es ist
What did he say? Wie geht es? Was hat er
dunkel.
gesagt? N b'a kɛ di ? Comment vais-je faire ?
How will I do that ? Wie werde ich das tun?
dibi
2
[í-í] Nom. 1 • gril pour les viandes, four; grill;
Somɔgɔw be di ? Comment vont les gens à la Grill, Backofen, Feuergrill, Bratrost.
maison ? How are the people at home? Wie
Category: Household equipment.
geht es den Leuten zu Hause? 2 • viande cuite sur le gril, barbecue; meat fried
on a grill, barbecue; Fleisch vom Grill.
di [í] adj.pred. rapide, adroit, tranchant; quick,
4 3 • four; oven; Ofen.
rapid, fast, skilful, clever, sharp, cutting;
schnell, rasch, geschickt , gewandt, wirksam, dibiba Nom. éclipse; eclipse; Finsternis,
scharf, schneidend. A sen ka di. Il est rapide à Sonnenfinsternis, Mondfinsternis.
la course. He is fast at running. Er ist schnell dibidibi [ì-ì] Nom. coup bas, combine, manigance,
im Laufen. A tɛgɛ ka di. Il est adroit. He is
magouille; low blow, scheme; Tiefschlag,
skilful. Er ist geschickt. Muru da ka di. La gemeiner Plan. kiritigɛ dibidibiw les
lame du couteau est tranchante. The blade of magouilles dans les jugements. the
the knife is sharp. Die Klinge des Messers ist shenanigans in the judgements. die Spielereien
scharf. in den Urteilen. U ye dibidibi kɛ ka a bɔ dugu
di 5 [ì] Jula: li. Verbe. raser; shave; rasieren. Kun kɔnɔ. Ils ont manigancé pour la faire sortir de
bɛ di, nka kuntere tɛ se ka di. On peut raser la ville. They plotted to get her out of town. Sie
la tête, mais pas la chance (proverbe). You can planten Gemeinheiten, um sie aus der Stadt zu
shave your head, but not luck (proverb). Man vertreiben.
kann sich den Kopf rasieren, aber kein Glück dibidon dafabali Nom. éclipse annulaire du soleil;
(Sprichwort). synonyme: gwana, li , gana .
1 1 annular eclipses; ringförmige
di [í] Jula: li. variante: ndi. Nom. miel, hydromel; Sonnenfinsternis. Category: Sky.
6
honey, mead; Honig, Met. U ye di bagan tigɛ. dibigɔrɛ [í] Nom. 1 • huile parfumée (pour l’encense);
Ils ont récolté du miel pur. They harvested scented oil (for incense); Duftöl.
pure honey. They harvested pure honey. synonyme: kasadiyalan.
Category: Food. synonyme: li .
2 2 • pommade parfumée dont s'oignent les
di di Verbe. distribuer; distribute; verteilen. femmes; perfumed ointment with which
women anoint themselves; parfümierte Salbe,
synonyme: tilan.
mit der sich Frauen salben.
dibaga [í] Nom. donateur; donor, giver, contributor, dibilan [ì-ì-á] variante: dibinan. Nom. fétiche, autel
funder; Geber, Spender. An b'u dibagaw fo (boli) permettant de se rendre invisible; fetish,
k'u walenɲumandɔn. Nous remercions altar (boli) allowing one to become invisible;
vivement les donateurs. We sincerely thank the Fetisch, Altar (Boli), der es einem ermöglicht,
donors. Wir danken den Spendern herzlich. unsichtbar zu werden. Category: Religion.
dibara [í] Nom. 1 • gourde de miel; honey-pot; dibimayɔrɔ [ì-ì-à] Nom. endroit obscure; dark place;
Honigtopf. synonyme: libara. dunkler Ort. sow dibimayɔrɔw les endroits
obscurs des maisons. dark places in houses.
dunkle Orte in Häusern.
29/01/2026 135

dibiri digɔn
dibiri [í] Nom. 1 • chéchia, chapeau conique, chapeau digi [í-í] 1 • vt. pousser, presser, enfoncer; push,
1
de paille conique; fez, conical hat, conical press, hammer sth; stoßen, pressen,
straw hat; Fes, Fez, Herrenmütze, einhämmern. A digi kosɛbɛ ! Poussez fort !
kegelförmiger Hut, konischer Strohhut. Push hard! Stoße fest!
Category: Clothing.
2 • vi. appuyer, masser; press on, massage
2 • cône; cone; Kegel, Konus. sb./sth., rub; drücken, massieren. digi X la
Category: Mathematics.
appuyer sur X. press on X. drücke auf X.
dibisogo [í-í-ó-ó] Morphemes: dibi-sogo. Nom. 3 • vi. opprimer, accabler, oppresser; oppress,
viande grillée; grilled meat; gegrilltes Fleisch, afflict; unterdrücken, belasten, bedrücken.
gebratenes Fleisch. Category: Food. 4 • vi. faire mal, blesser, peser; hurt; wehtun,
dibisɔgɔ [ì-ì] Morphemes: dibi-sɔgɔ. Nom. torche, verletzen. I ka kuma digira ne kosɛbɛ. Ta
flambeau; torch; Fackel. synonyme: kalamɔɲɔ,
parole m'a beaucoup blessé. Your words hurt
me a lot. Deine Worte haben mich verletzt.
kalamɛnɛ.
synonyme: majogin.
dibɔ [í] Nom. chose aisée, très facile; easy thing, 5 • vi. déplaire, être insupportable; displease,
very easy; einfache Sache. Bɛɛ y'a dɔn ko o ye be unbearable; verärgern, unerträglich sein.
dibɔ ye. Chacun sait que c'est une chose très 6 • vi. influencer; influence; beeinflussen.
facile. Everyone knows that it is a very easy 7 • vi. en vouloir à; resent, blame; ärgern an,
thing. Jeder weiß, daß es eine sehr einfache anschuldigen. Ni i niyɔrɔkinin bɔnna ka kɛ
Sache ist. synonyme: libɔ. segi kɔnɔ, i kana digi natobila la. Si on met
diden Jula: liden. Nom. abeille; bee; Biene. ta part de riz dans un panier, n'en veux pas à la
cuisinière qui a préparé la sauce (proverbe). If
Category: Insect. synonyme: dikisɛ, likisɛ,
we put your share of rice in a basket, don't
liden.
blame the cook who prepared the sauce
didenkulu [í] Jula: lidenkulu. Nom. essaim (proverb). Wenn wir Ihren Anteil Reis in einen
Korb legen, geben Sie nicht dem Koch die
d'abeilles; swarm of bees; Bienenschwarm.
Schuld, der die Soße zubereitet hat
synonyme: lidenkulu.
(Sprichwort).
didenninkɔyikɔyi variante: didenninkasikasi. Nom. digi [í-í] Verbe. coiffer, tresser; hairstyling, plait
2
abeille de couleur jaune, vivant dans la terre et the hair, braid your hair; frisieren, flechten.
ne produisant pas de miel; yellow bee, living in
digidigi [í] Morphemes: digi-digi. vt. 1 • masser;
the earth and not producing honey; gelbe
Biene, die in der Erde lebt und keinen Honig massage; massieren. A tora ka a fari digidigi
produziert. ... Elle lui masse le corps ... She massages his
didɛgɛ [í] Nom. dèguè au miel: boulette composée de body... Sie massiert seinen Körper...
mil, de miel, de sucre, de pâte d'arachide, de 2 • pousser, bousculer; push, jostle; drücken,
sel, et de piment; dish: ball made of millet, drängen. U yeɲɔgɔn digidigi ka don
honey, sugar, peanut paste, salt, and chili duurunin kɔnɔ. Ils se sont bousculés pour
pepper; Gericht : Kugel aus Hirse, Honig, entrer dans le taxi. They jostled to get into the
Zucker, Erdnußpaste, Salz und Chilischote. taxi. Sie drängten sich, ins Taxi zu steigen.
Category: Types of food.
digisumanan Nom. mesure de la pression,
didi [í] variante: dida. Adverbe. très vite, très plein;
manomètre; pressure measurement, pressure
very fast, very full; sehr schnell, sehr voll. A gauge, manometer; Druckmessung,
bolila didi ! Il a couru très vite ! He ran very Druckmessgerät.
fast! Er rannte sehr schnell! digon [ì-ó] variante: digɔn, jigon, jugo. Nom.
didili Nom. distribution; distribution; Verteilung. grand calao d'Abyssinie; ground Horn-bill;
Category: Mathematics. synonyme: tilali. Hornrabe. Category: Bird. bucorvus
abyssinicus. synonyme: dufon.
diga [í] synonyme: kɔnɔninbin. Nom. espèce
digɔn [í-ɔ ́] synonyme: dufon. variante: digon. Nom.
d'herbe utilisée comme fourrage, riz sauvage;
kind of grass, wild rice; Grasart, Wildreis. calao; Horn-bill; Hornrabe. Category: Bird.
Category: Animal husbandry, Grass, herb,
vine. oryza barthii. synonyme: malosina.
digɛnso Nom. sous-sol; basement; Kellergeschoss.
Category: Building.
29/01/2026 136

diilidiili dilanni
diilidiili [í] Adverbe. titubant sous le poids d'un objet dilalifɛn [í] Nom. produit, toute chose fabriquée;
très lourd; staggering under the weight of a product, anything manufactured; Produkt,
very heavy object; unter dem Gewicht eines alles, was hergestellt wird. Mobili dun ye
sehr schweren Gegenstands taumeln. A ni tubabu ka dilalifɛn ye. Mais les automobiles
ɲɔbɔrɛ taara diilidiili. Elle est parti titubant sont des produits européens. But auto-mobiles
sous le poids du sac de mil. She left staggering are European products. Aber Autos sind
under the weight of the bag of millet. Sie ging europäische Produkte. synonyme: dilanlifɛn.
taumelnd unter dem Gewicht der Ladung
davon.
dilan
1
[í-ã́] Nom. lit, matelas; bed, mattress,
something you sleep on; Bett, Matratze.
diina [í-á] variante: diinɛ. Nom. religion; religion;
Category: Household equipment.
Religion. Category: Religion. synonyme: li.
3
diinɛ 1 [í-ɛ́] Emprunt de : arabe. variante: diina. Nom. dilan [í-ã́] variante: dila. vt. 1 • fabriquer, faire;
2
religion islamique, religion, confession, foi;
make; machen, herstellen. A bɛ segi dilan
Islamic religion, faith, confession; islamische
Religion, Konfession, Glaube. ka diinɛ labato
lɔgɔba la. Il fabrique des corbeilles au grand
suivre une religion. follow a religion. einer
marché. He makes big baskets at the market.
Religion folgen. Category: Religion, Think.
Er stellt au dem Markt große Körbe her.
2 • préparer; prepare; vorbereiten,
diinɛ
2
[í] Emprunt de : arabe. Nom. humeur,
bereitstellen. salati dilan préparer la salade.
caractère; frame of mind, mood, state of mind,
prepare the salad. den Salat anrichten.
character, nature, personality, temperament;
3 • réparer, arranger; repair, arrange, resolve,
Einstellung, Haltung, Charakter,
fix; flicken, reparieren, ordnen, in Ordnung
Temperament. A diinɛ ka ɲi. Il a un bon
bringen. A bɛ nɛgɛso dilan. Il répare la
caractère. He has a good character. Er hat
bicyclette. He repairs the bicycle. Er repariert
einen guten Charakter. diinɛ jugu mal
das Fahrrad.
intentionné. ill-intentioned. böswillig.
4 • frapper (populaire); hit (popular); schlagen
diinɛfuru [í-ɩ́-ú-ú] Nom. mariage religieux (dans (Volksmund).
l'église ou la mosquée); religious wedding in dilan vt. arranger, résoudre; arrange, fix up, sort out;
3
church or mosque; religiöses Hochzeit in der
wiedergutmachen, Problem lösen,
Kirche oder Moschee.
wiederherstellen, schlichten. A sera k'u cɛ
diinɛɲɛmɔgɔ
dilan. Il a pu arranger / finir leur querelle /
[í-ɛ́-ɛ́-ɔ́-ɔ́] Morphemes: diinɛ-ɲɛmɔgɔ. mésentente. He was able to sort out their
Nom. dirigeant religieux: imam, pasteur, etc; query / misunderstanding. Er konnte den Streit
religious leader: imam, church leader, etc; schlichten.
religiöser leiter: wie imam, pastor, usw.
dilanbaga [í-ã́-á-á] Morphemes: dilan-baga. Nom.
Category: Person.
fabricant, réparateur, réalisateur; maker,
diji Jula: liji. Nom. hydromel; mead; Met. repairer, producer, film director; Hersteller ,
Category: Types of food. synonyme: liji, Flicker, Regisseur, Filmregisseur, Produzent.
dikolen. Ne tɛ a dilabaga dɔn. Je ne sais pas qui l’a
fabriqué. I don’t know who made it. Ich weiß
dikɛɲɛ [í] Jula: likɛɲɛ. Nom. cire d'abeilles; beeswax;
nicht wer der Hersteller ist.
Bienenwachs. synonyme: likɛɲɛ. synonyme: dilabaga.
dikisɛ [í] Nom. abeille; bee; Biene. Category: Insect. dilankun [í-á-ú] Nom. objectif, but, raison d'être;
synonyme: diden, liden, likisɛ. objective, goal, aim, target, purpose; Ziel,
dikolen [í-ò-é] Nom. hydromel; mead; Met.
Absicht, Zweck, Daseinsberechtigung.
synonyme: dilakun.
Category: Types of food. synonyme: liji, diji.
dilanlifɛn Nom. produit, toute chose fabriquée;
dilabaga Nom. fabricant, réparateur, réalisateur;
product, all made things, output, item;
manufacturer, repairer, director; Hersteller,
Produkt; alles, was hergestellt wurde,
Reparaturbetrieb, Direktor. Category: Worker,
Erzeugnis, Ware. synonyme: dilalifɛn.
occupation. synonyme: dilanbaga.
dilanni [í-ã́-í] Nom. préparation, l’action de préparer;
dilakun [í] Nom. objectif, but, raison d'être; objective,
fabrication; Herstellung. Tabali dilanni ka
purpose, reason for being; Ziel, Zweck, Grund
gɛlɛn. Il est difficile de fabriquer une table. Is
des Seins. synonyme: dilankun.
is difficult to make a table. Es ist schwierig
einen Tisch herzustellen.
29/01/2026 137

dilanyɔrɔ dimɔgɔ
dilanyɔrɔ Nom. fabrique, usine; factory; Fabrik, 2 • colère, rancœur, animosité; anger,
resentment, rancour, animosity, enmity,
Herstellungsort, Werk, Betrieb.
hostility; Zorn, Wut, Feindseligkeit,
synonyme: dilayɔrɔ.
Feindschaft, Animosität. Dimi b'a la. Il est en
dilayɔrɔ [í] Nom. fabrique, usine; manufactures, colère. He is angry. Er ist zornig.
factory; Hersteller, Fabrik. dimibagatɔ Nom. malade, blessé, souffrant, personne
synonyme: dilanyɔrɔ.
en colère; sick person, hurting person,
dilendunkɔnɔnin synonyme: bilendunkɔnɔnin. suffering person; Kranker, Verletzte,
Nom. gobe-mouche; flycatcher; Vogelart. Leidende. Category: Sick.
Category: Bird. muscicapa sp.. synonyme: diminbagatɔ, gantɔ, sogoratɔ.
synonyme: bilendunkɔnɔnin. dimin [ì] Jula: dimi. Nom. grand filet pour barrer le
1
dili [í] Jula: lili. Nom. 1 • racine; root; Wurzel. fleuve; large net to dam the river; großes Netz
Category: Parts of a plant. synonyme: lili,
zum Aufstauen des Flusses. Category: Hunt
and fish.
fasasira.
dimin [í] 1 • Verbe. souffrir, faire mal; suffer, hurt;
2 • nerf, tendon; nerve, tendon; Nerv, Sehne. 2
kandili nerf du cou. neck nerve. Nacken Nerv. leiden, wehtun. A sen b'a dimin. Il souffre du
Category: Body, Parts of an animal. pied. He has foot pain. Er hat Fußschmerzen.
synonyme: dimi .
dilimayɔrɔ [í] Morphemes: dili-ma-yɔrɔ. Nom. 1
2 • Verbe. se fâcher, s'emporter; get angry, lose
1 • partie de la plante où sont les racines; part
your temper; werde wütend, die Beherrschung
of the plant where the roots are; Teil der
verlieren. Ne diminnen ye a furan a tulo
Pflanze, wo die Wurzeln sind. Category: Parts
of a plant. kɔrɔ. Je l'ai giflé de colère. I slapped him in
anger. Ich schlug ihn wütend.
2 • là où l'on met son espérance; where we put
our hope; wo wir unsere Hoffnung setzen. 3 • Nom. souffrance, douleur; suffering, pain;
Category: Think. Leiden, Schmerz.
diman [í-á] variante: duman. adj. bon; good; gut. 4 • Nom. rancœur, colère, animosité;
resentment, anger, animosity; Groll, Wut,
dimansi [ì-à-í] Emprunt de : français. Nom. Feindseligkeit.
dimanche; Sunday; Sonntag. synonyme: haati, diminbagatɔ [í] Nom. 1 • malade, blessé, souffrant;
karilon, kari 2 . sick, injured, suffering; der Kranke, der
dimi Etym: dímíì.[í-í] variante: dimin. 1 • Nom. Verletzte, der Leidende. Category: Sick.
1
synonyme: dimibagatɔ.
douleur, blessure, souffrance, douloureux;
pain, hurt, suffering; Schmerzen, Wunde, 2 • en colère; angry; wütend.
Leiden, Verletzung. Category: Disease. diminkuru [í] Morphemes: dimin-kuru. Nom.
synonyme: dimin .
2 rancœur, rancune, ressentiment; rancour,
2 • vt. faire mal, souffrir; hurt, suffer; wehtun, resentment; Groll. Diminkuru bɛ n kɔnɔ. J'ai
leiden. E yɔrɔ juman b’i dimi ? N kunkolo de la rancœur. I have resentment. Ich habe
bi n dimi. Où est-ce que vous avez mal ? Ma Groll. synonyme: diminya.
tête me fait mal. Where does it hurt you? My
diminya [í] Jula: dimiya. Nom. colère, rancœur,
head hurts. Was tut dir weh? Mein Kopf tut
mir weh. . synonyme: madimin.
ressentiment; anger, resentment; Wut, Groll. E
t'a dɔn k'i diminya bɛ ne na wa ? Tu ne sais
dimi
2
comparer: kunkolodimin.[í-í] vi. 1 • se fâcher,
pas que je t'en veux ? Don't you know I'm mad
se mettre en colère, s'emporter; to be angry; at you? Weißt du nicht, daß ich sauer auf dich
zornig werde, sich erzürnen. N diminin lo. Je bin? synonyme: dimiya, diminkuru.
suis en colère. I’m angry. Ich bin zornig. A tɛ
dimiworo n.comp. cola ayant / présentant une trace de
dimi joona. Il ne se fâche pas très vite. He
couteau; cola nut having a scar of a knife;
doesn’t get angry quickly. Er wird nicht
Kolanuss mit Messerschnitt Spuren.
schnell zornig. I kana dimi n kɔrɔ ! Ne
mettez-vous pas en colère contre moi ! Don’t
dimiya bambara: diminya. Nom. colère, ressentiment,
be angry with me! Sei nicht zornig gegen rancœur; anger, wrath, rage, fury, resentment,
mich. bitterness, rancour; Ärger, Wut, Zorn, Groll,
Verbitterung, Unmut, Bitterkeit.
Category: Think. synonyme: diminya.
dimɔgɔ [í] Jula: limɔgɔ. Nom. mouche; fly; Fliege.
Category: Insect. synonyme: limɔgɔ.
29/01/2026 138

dimɔgɔminɛwulu diɲɛsosigi
dimɔgɔminɛwulu Nom. taon; horsefly; Bremse. diɲɛden [í] comparer: diɲɛdenya. Nom. bon vivant,
Category: Insect. synonyme: nfugu, jouisseur, libertin; person of pleasure,
limɔgɔminɛwulu, lɛn . libertine, free-thinking attitude;
3
Genußmensch, Lüstling, Freidenker. Diɲɛ ka
dindan [ì] Verbe. placer au-dessus de, suspendre; place
jugu diɲɛden ma. La vie réserve de
above, suspend; oben platzieren, aufhängen.
mauvaises surprises au bon vivant (proverbe).
dinga [ì] variante: dingɛ, dɛngɛ. Nom. fosse; pit; Life has unpleasant surprises in store for the
Grube. good-natured (proverb). Für den Gutmütigen
hält das Leben unangenehme Überraschungen
dingɛ [ì-ɛ́] variante: dinga, dɛngɛ. Nom. trou,
bereit (Sprichwort).
fossé, cavité, orifice; hole, moat, cavity,
diɲɛforobatɔnba
opening, orifice; Loch, Graben, Hohlraum,
Höhle, Kavität, Aushöhlung, Öffnung. dingɛ Morphemes: diɲɛ-foroba-tɔn-ba. Nom.
sogi. / ka dingɛ seen. creuser un trou. dig a
Organisation des Nations Unies, ONU; United
Nations, UN; Vereinte Nationen, UNO.
hole. ein Loch graben.
Category: Government.
dingɛdingɛnin Morphemes: dingɛ-dingɛ-nin. Nom.
diɲɛjamanaw kelenyatɔn synonyme: loni. Nom.
fondrière, nid de poule; pothole, border;
ONU (Organisation des Nations Unies); UN
Grenze, Loch, Grube.
(United Nations); Organisation der vereinigten
dingɛkɔnɔbinmara Nom. ensilage; silage; Silage, Nationen (UNO).
Silofutter. Category: Animal husbandry. diɲɛlaban variante: dɩɲɛwuli. Nom. fin du monde; end
dingɛsogi Nom. trouaison; making the holes; Löcher of the world; das Ende der Welt. ... diɲɛlaban
Graben. Category: Agriculture. bɛna se ... ... la fin du monde va arriver ...
diɲɛ [í-ɛ́] Emprunt de : arabe. variante: duɲa. Nom. ...the end of the world is coming... ...das Ende
der Welt naht...
1 • monde, univers; world, universe; Welt,
Universum. Diɲɛ fan tan ni naani Les quatre diɲɛlatigɛ [í-ɛ́-á-í-ɛ́] synonyme: nin, ɲɛnamaya.
coins du monde. The four corners of the world. variante: diɲɛnatigɛ, diɲɛsosigi. Nom. vie,
Die vier Ecken der Welt. Category: Land. situation, conditions de vie; life, situation,
synonyme: duniɲa. conditions of living, life circumstances, life
2 • vie; life; das Leben. A tɛ diɲɛ diya dɔn. Il condition; Leben, Situation, Lebensumstände,
ne connaît pas la douceur de la vie. He doesn't Lebensbedingungen. A diɲɛlatigɛgɛlɛyara
know the sweetness of life. Er kennt die Süße kosɛbɛ. Sa situation s'est beaucoup détériorée.
des Lebens nicht. His situation has deteriorated greatly. Seine
diɲɛ faan naani variante: dunuɲa faan naani. Nom. Situation hat sich stark verschlechtert.
synonyme: diɲɛsosigi.
points cardinaux; cardinal points;
Himmelsrichtungen. diɲɛlatigɛ kɛcogo postp. mode de vie; way of life;
diɲɛ jamanaw ka baarakɛɲɔgɔnya Nom. Lebensweise.
relations internationales; international diɲɛlatigɛkɛyɔrɔ comparer: sigiyɔrɔ. Nom. cadre de
relations; Internationale Beziehungen.
vie; living conditions; Lebensverhältnisse.
diɲɛ kɛlɛba [í-ɛ́ ɛ̀-ɛ̀-á] synonyme: dunuɲakɛlɛba. diɲɛnabɔ Nom. vie, cours de la vie, restant de la vie;
Nom. guerre mondiale; world war; Weltkrieg. life, life cycle, life events, remaining life ;
Diɲɛ tolatanba coupe du monde de football; Leben, Lauf des Lebens, Lebensgang ,
verbleibende Lebensdauer. Musa ka
football world cup; Fussball
Weltmeisterschaft. diɲɛnabɔ la ... Moussa, pendant toute sa vie ...
diɲɛbakelenyali synonyme: diɲɛbakurubaya. Nom. Moussa, throughout his life... Moussa, sein
ganzes Leben lang...
mondialisation, globalisation; globalization;
Globalisierung. diɲɛsosigi [í] variante: diɲɛlasosigi. Nom. situation,
diɲɛbakurubaya synonyme: diɲɛbakelenyali. Nom. vie, conditions de vie, destinée; situation, life,
living conditions, destiny; Situation, Leben,
mondialisation, globalisation; globalization;
Lebensumstände, Schicksal. Ko bɛɛ n'a
Globalisierung.
taabolo don diɲɛsosigi la. Chaque chose a
son mode de fonctionnement dans la vie.
Everything has its own way of functioning in
life. Im Leben hat alles seine eigene
Funktionsweise. synonyme: diɲɛlatigɛ.
29/01/2026 139

dipilomu diwu
dipilomu Emprunt de : français. Nom. diplôme; disibilen [í] Nom. Gonolek de Barbarie;
diploma; Diplom. Category: Learn. yellow-crowned Gonolok;
diridara [í] Verbe. marcher difficilement; walk with Goldscheitelwürger. Category: Bird. laniarius
1
barbarus. synonyme: kobako.
difficulty, dodder; mit Schwierigkeiten gehen.
A bɛ diridara ka taa. Il parte en marchant disidanfara Nom. diaphragme; diaphragm;
difficilement. He leaves, walking with Zwerchfell. Category: Body.
difficulty. Er geht mit Schwierigkeiten beim synonyme: kɔnɔdatugu, tantandatugu,
Gehen. kɔnɔwolo.
diridara
2
[í] Verbe. salir, assombrir; get dirty, darken;
disidimi [í] Morphemes: disi-dimi. Nom. mal à la
schmutzig werden, verdunkeln. San bɛ
poitrine, pneumonie; chest pains, pneumonia;
diridara. Le ciel s'assombrit. The sky darkens. Lungenentzündung. Category: Disease.
Der Himmel verdunkelt sich.
disikanjufa Nom. poche poitrine; shirt pocket;
diro [ì-ó] variante: jiro. Nom. maladie du mil; Hemdtasche. Category: Clothing.
disease of millet; Hirse Krankheit.
disikolo variante: disikunkolo. Nom. sternum, cage
Category: Agriculture. synonyme: minan .
3
thoracique, thorax; sternum, breastbone,
disa [ì] Nom. écharpe longue, foulard, châle; long thoracic cage, thoracic cavity, thorax;
scarf, headscarf, shawl; langer Schal, Brustbein, Sternum, Brusthöhle, Thorax.
Kopftuch, Schal. Category: Clothing. Category: Body. synonyme: disi cɛmancɛkolo.
synonyme: kunnabila 1 , dankanna. disila [í] variante: disilabila. Nom. collier d'attelage,
disi [í-í] variante: disida. Nom. 1 • poitrine, harnais; coupling collar, harness;
1
poitrail; chest, breast; Brust, Brustkorb, Koppelhalsband, Geschirr. Category: Animal
Brustkasten. A ka siikelen b'a disi la. Il a son husbandry.
monocorde sur la poitrine. He has his musical disilabana [í] Nom. maladie de poitrine, rhumatisme
instrument on his chest. Er hat sein intercostal; chest disease, intercostal
Musikinstrument auf seiner Brust.
rheumatism; Brustkrankheit,
Category: Body, Parts of an animal. Interkostalrheuma. Category: Disease.
synonyme: kɔgɔdisi.
disisansara Nom. cage thoracique; thoracic cavity,
2 • fond (de la pirogue); bottom (of the canoe);
thoracic cage; Brusthöhle. Category: Body.
Boden (des Kanus).
disitiriki Emprunt de : français. Nom. district; district;
disi [í-í] Nom. roi (jeu de cartes); king (card
2
Distrikt.
game); König (Kartenspiel).
disɔngɔ [í] Nom. impôt; tax. ka disɔngɔ bɔ payer
disi cɛmancɛkolo Nom. sternum; breastbone,
l’impôt. pay taxes. Steuern zahlen.
sternum; Brustbein, Sternum. Category: Body.
Category: Finance, Government.
synonyme: disikolo.
synonyme: ninsara, nisɔngɔ, lanpo, lɛnpo,
disi jukɔrɔyɔrɔ Nom. thorax; thorax; Brustkorb, ninsɔngɔ.
Brust. Category: Body.
disɔnɔkanina [í] Nom. collecteur des impôts,
disiba Nom. 1 • orgueilleux, vantard; proud person, percepteur; tax collector; Steuereintreiber.
boaster, bragger, blow-hard; hochmütig, Category: Worker, occupation.
stolz, prahlerisch. synonyme: kuncɛbaya.
ditebin synonyme: binnin. Nom. citronnelle, espèce
2 • puissant, riche; powerful person, rich
d'herbe; kind of grass; Grasart.
person; mächtige Person, Reicher. Tanni bɛ Category: Grass, herb, vine. cymbopogon
kun disiba la. Les riches supportent les coups citratus. synonyme: binin.
de pied (proverbe). The rich take the kicks
divɛn Emprunt de : français. Nom. vin; wine; Wein.
(proverb). Den Reichen geht es gut
(Sprichwort). Category: Types of food.
disibaya [í] Nom. orgueil, vantardise, vanité; pride, diwaa [í] Jula: liwaa. Nom. rayon de miel;
vanity, boasting, boastfulness, conceit, honeycomb; Waben. synonyme: liwaa.
vainglory; Hochmut, Prahlerei, Eitelkeit.
diwu Nom. arbre (espèce); tree sp; Baumart.
synonyme: kuncɛbaya, yawuseya.
Category: Tree. mitragyna inermis.
29/01/2026 140

diya diyagoyasira
diya 1 • adj. être agréable, être bon, plaire, faire diyabɔ [í] Morphemes: diya-bɔ. Verbe. profiter de,
1
plaisir; pleasant, be pleasing, be good; jouir de; profit from, make the most of, enjoy;
wohgefällig, gut sein. Baro diyara. La profitieren, genießen, . ... n ma sunɔgɔ
conversation a été agréable. The conversation diyabɔ. ... je n'ai pas vraiment profité de mon
was pleasant. Das Gespräch war angenehm. sommeil. ...I didn't really enjoy my sleep.
2 • vt. rendre agréable, être favorable; make ...Ich habe meinen Schlaf nicht wirklich
pleasing, be in favour of, be favourable; genossen.
angenehm machen, gefallen, befürworten,
diyacogo [í-á-ó-ó] Nom. goût; taste; Geschmack.
vorteilhaft sein . O bi diya n ye kosɛbɛ ! Cela
me fera plaisir ! That would be good! Das diyadon See main entry: . n.comp. motivation;
gefällt mir. Tagama diyara ? Ton voyage t’a motivation; Motivation.
plu ? Ton voyage s’est bien passé ? Did you diyagoya variante: diyakoya, diyagoyabilen.
have a good journey? Hattest du eine gute
1
Reise?
1 • Nom. obligation, contrainte; obligation,
constraint, compulsion, ; Pflicht,
3 • vt. faire réussir, faciliter; make succeed,
Verpflichtung, Zwang, Einschränkung,
facilitate (sth.), ease; erfolgreich machen,
Nötigung, Beschränkung. O ye diyagoya ye.
erleichtern. Ala ka lɔgɔ diya ! Que Dieu fasse
C’est obligatoire. It’s obligatory. Es ist Pflicht.
réussir votre marché ! (bénédiction adressé à
Aw kana mɔgɔ si ka wari minɛ ni diyagoya
un vendeur). May God give success to your
ye. N’extorquez d’argent à personne. Do not
market ! (blessing to market seller or
shopkeeper). Möge Gott dein Geschäft take anyone’s money by force. Erpreßt von
erfolgreich machen. niemandem Geld. Note: Bible: Luka 3.14
4 • vt. aiguiser; sharpen (sth.), hone, whet, 2 • Verbe. contraindre, forcer; constrain, force;
grind; schärfen, schleifen, wetzen . einschränken, zwingen. U b'a fɛ ka ne
5 • Nom. plaisir, douceur, délice, joie, bonne diyagoya ka taa ... Ils veulent me contraindre
entente; pleasure, sweetness, delight, joy, good à partir ... They want to force me to leave... Sie
understanding; Vergnügen, Süße, Freude, wollen mich zwingen zu gehen...
gutes Verständnis. A tɛ diɲɛ diya dɔn. Il ne diyagoya [á-ó-á] vt. 1 • obliger, contraindre, de
2
connaît pas les douceurs de la vie. He doesn't
force, par la contrainte; oblige, force, compel;
know the sweetness of life. Er kennt die Süße
zwingen, nötigen, verpflichten.
des Lebens nicht.
synonyme: latugu.
diya [í-á] synonyme: diyacogo. Nom. goût
2 2 • contrainte, obligation; constraint,
agréable; good taste, pleasant taste; guter obligation; Zwang, Verpflichtung.
Geschmack, angenehmer Geschmack.
Category: Food.
diyagoyabaara [í] Nom. travail forcé, corvée; forced
labour, compulsory labour, chore, drag;
diya Verbe. se réconcilier, s'entendre; be reconciled,
3 Zwangsarbeit, Pflichtarbeit, Fronarbeit, lästige
agree; versöhnt werden, sich gut verstehen. Pflicht, Schinderei.
Amadu ni Isa tun kɛlɛla nka o diyara sisan.
diyagoyafanga [á-ó-á-ã́-á] comparer: fangafin.
Amadou et Issa s'étaient disputés mais ils sont
réconciliés maintenant. Amadou and Issa were
variante: jagoyafanga. n.comp. 1 • dictature,
in disagreement with each other but now they tyrannie, pouvoir contraignant; dictatorship,
are reconciled. Amadou und Issa waren tyranny, compelling power; Diktatur,
zerstritten aber jetzt sind sie versöhnt. Tyrannei, Willkürherrschaft,
Gewaltherrschaft, verbindlicher Macht.
diya
4
[í-á] Nom. 1 • bonheur, bien-être, plaisir, joie,
Category: Government.
délice, douceur; luck, harmony, good fortune,
2 • colonisation; colonization; Kolonisation.
happiness, pleasure, delight, enjoyment, joy,
gentleness; Glück, Wohlbefinden, Vergnügen, diyagoyajɛn synonyme: benkanni sariyatiɲɛ. Nom.
Freude, Genuss, Sanftheit. O bi diya la. Ils viol; rape, violation; Verletzung, Übertretung,
sont heureux (lit. ils sont dans le bonheur). Vergewaltigung.
They are happy. Sie sind glücklich. diyagoyakumasen n.comp. phrase impérative;
2 • amitié, bonne entente; friendship, good imperative sentence; Satz in Befehlsform.
relationship, good understanding;
Category: Grammar.
Freundschaft, gutes Einvernehmen, gute
Beziehung.
diyagoyali synonyme: bɔsili, benkanni. Nom.
extorsion; extortion; Erpressung.
diyagoyasira n.comp. impératif, ordre; imperative,
order; Befehl, Befehlsform, zwingend,
unbedingt. Category: Grammar.
29/01/2026 141

diyagoyasira senkanta do
diyagoyasira senkanta n.comp. impératif présent; diyanyetɔ variante: diyaɲebagatɔ, diayaɲetɔ. Nom.
present imperative; Befehlsform in der de bon cœur, par plaisir; willingly, heartily, out
Gegenwart. Category: Grammar. of pleasure, for enjoyment; von Herzen,
diyagoyayirata Nom. genre injonctif; injunctive
bereitwillig, aus Freude, zum Vergnügen.
Mɔgɔ diyaɲebagatɔ tɛ bɔ i den na. On ne se
genre; Text in der Befehlsform.
sépare pas de bon cœur de son enfant. You
Category: Grammar, Language and thought.
don't part with your child willingly. Sie
diyalan [í] Morphemes: diya-lan. Nom. ce qui rend trennen sich nicht freiwillig von Ihrem Kind.
agréable; which makes it pleasant; was es diyaɲebaga [í] variante: diyaɲemɔgɔ. Nom.
angenehm macht. ... o bɛɛ de kɛra bi kow
bien-aimé(e), ami très cher, personne préférée;
diyalan ye. ... c'est tout cela qui rend les
beloved, loved one, darling, very good friend,
choses d'aujourd'hui agréables. ...that's all dear friend; Geliebter, Geliebte, Liebling,
that makes things today enjoyable. ...das ist Liebste, guter Freund. Dugu bonya o bonya,
alles, was den heutigen Tag so angenehm
bɛɛ ni i diyaɲebaga don. Un village peut être
macht.
grand, mais chacun n'y a qu'une seule personne
diyalatigɛ [í] variante: jalatigɛ. Verbe. conclure bien-aimée (proverbe). A village may be big,
favorablement (une transaction), négocier, but each has only one beloved person in it
arranger, régler; conclude favourably (a (proverb). Ein Dorf mag groß sein, aber
transaction), negotiate, arrange, settle; jedes hat nur einen geliebten Menschen darin
günstig abschließen (eine Transaktion), (Sprichwort).
verhandeln, arrangieren, regeln. An ye diyaɲefɛn [í] Nom. chose qui plaît, chose qu'on
misifeereli diyalatigɛ. Nous avons conclu la
préfère, préférence; something that pleases,
vente de la vache. We concluded the sale of the preference, thing we prefer; etwas, das gefällt,
cow. Wir haben den Verkauf der Kuh Präferenz, was wir bevorzugen. Ale diyaɲefɛn
abgeschlossen.
ye sogo ye. Ce qu'il aime, lui, c'est de la
diyanako Nom. passions et désirs; passions and viande. What he likes is meat. Was er mag, ist
desires; Leidenschaften und Begierden. Fleisch. synonyme: diyaɲeko.
diyannafɛn Morphemes: diya-n-na-fɛn. diyaɲeko [í] Nom. ce qu'on l'aime, ce qui plaît, plaisir;
variante: diyanyefɛn, diyanyeko. Nom. what we like, what pleases, pleasure; was uns
préférence, à son goût, chose que l'on aime, gefällt, was gefällt, Vergnügen. Mɔgɔ bɛ i
chose qui plaît; preference, what I like, diyaɲeko dɔn, nka Ala de bɛ i nafako dɔn.
favourite; Präferenz, Vorzug, was ich mag,
On connaît ce qui plaît, mais Dieu sait ce qui
nach meinem Geschmack.
est utile (proverbe). We know what pleases, but
diyannamɔgɔ variante: diyanyemɔgɔ. Nom. God knows what is useful (proverb). Wir
wissen, was gefällt, aber Gott weiß, was
1 • personne que l'on aime; person I like;
Person, die ich mag.
nützlich ist (Sprichwort).
2 • bien-aimé, bien-aimée; beloved; Geliebte.
synonyme: diyaɲefɛn.
diyanye Morphemes: diya-n-ye. Nom. 1 • plaisir, objet diyatɔ Nom. 1 • vicieux, débauché; vicious, mean,
de désire; pleasure; Gefallen, Freude. ni
debauched, immoral; niederträchtig,
Ausschweifung , Prasser, unmoralisch.
diyanye avec plaisir, volontiers. with
2 • vaurien; rascal, scoundrel; Schlingel,
pleasure. mit Freude.
Nichtsnutz.
2 • amour, affection, amitié; love, affection,
friendship; Liebe, Zuneigung, Freundschaft. diyatɔya Nom. débauche, relation sexuelle hors
Cɛɲɛ bɛ ɲɛ la, diyanye bɛ sɔnkun de la. La mariage; debauchery, sexual relations outside
beauté est sur le visage, l'amour est dans e marriage; Ausschweifungen, sexuelle
cœur (proverbe). Beauty is on the face, love is Beziehungen außerhalb der Ehe.
in the heart (proverb). Schönheit ist im diyesɛlimansin Nom. moteur diesel; diesel engine;
Gesicht, Liebe ist im Herzen (Sprichwort).
Dieselmotor.
diyanyeta variante: diyaɲeta. Nom. préférence, choix; do [ò] variante: dɔ. inter. comment (va / vont)
1
preference, priority, choice, ; Präferenz,
(interrogatif); how (are); wie (geht es).
Vorrang, Vorzug, Wahl, Auswahl .
Somɔgɔw do? Comment va ta famille ? How
is your family? Wie geht es deiner Familie?
29/01/2026 142

do dolariwari
do variante: don. part. 1 • quant à... ? (après un dogodogi [ó] Verbe. masser, malaxer, palper, tâter;
2
nom); what about...? (after noun); betreffend, massage, knead, palpate, feel; massieren,
und wie...? I muso ka kɛnɛ ? Denmisɛnw kneten, betasten, fühlen. Ni i ko: «Sogo tɛ n
do ? Ta femme va bien ? Et les enfants ? How tɔɲɔn gɛnɛnkala la», i yɛrɛ ta dogidogi. Si tu
is your wife? And the children? Wie geht es prétends que le tibia de ton camarade n'est pas
deiner Frau? Und wie den Kindern? musclé, tâte un peu le tien (proverbe). If you
2 • mais, cependant; but, however; aber. A: Ne claim that your friend's shin is not muscular,
ti Awa fɛ. B: Awa do ka ɲi ! A: Je n’aime
feel yours a little (proverb). Wenn Sie
behaupten, daß das Schienbein Ihres Freundes
pas Awa. B: Mais Awa est gentille ! A: I
nicht muskulös ist, berühren Sie Ihres ein
don’t like Awa. B: But Awa is nice! A: Ich
wenig (Sprichwort).
mag Awa nicht. B: Aber Awa ist nett.
dogodogonin [ó] variante: dogodogo. Nom. coin,
do [ó] Jula: doo. Nom. 1 • association secrète
3
corner, angle, cachette; corner, angle, hiding
traditionnelle, culte; traditional secret
place; Eckball, Winkel, Versteck.
association, cult; traditioneller Geheimbund,
Kult. Category: Religion. synonyme: doo.
dogodogonindogo
2 • théâtre sacré bambara; Bambara sacred [ó] variante: dogodogonintulon. Nom. jeu
theater; Heiliges Theater von Bambara. Cɛya de cachette, jeu de colin-maillard; hiding
yɛrɛ ye do ye. Le monde des hommes est une
game, bobwhite game; Versteckspiel,
Bobwhite-Spiel.
association secrète. The world of men is a
secret association. Die Welt der Männer ist ein dogodogoninmɔgɔ synonyme: dogokatɛmɛna.
Geheimbund. Nom. clandestin; clandestine; heimlich,
do [ó] variante: galo. Nom. groupe, ensemble; verstohlen. synonyme: dogokatɛmɛna.
4
group, together; Gruppe, zusammen. sɛlɛdo / dogokatɛmɛna Nom. clandestin; clandestine,
kaburudo cimetière. graveyard. Friedhof. underground; heimlich. Alizeri ye Maliden
dodo [ǒ-ǒ] variante: doodo. Nom. tétrodon; kind of dogokatɛmɛna 27 lasegin Mali kɔnɔ
1
fish; Fischart. Category: Fish. tetraodon pankurun fɛ ... L’Algérie a renvoyé par avion
fahaka. au Mali 27 Maliens clandestins ... Algeria
returned 27 illegal Malians by plane to Mali...
dodo [ò-ó] Nom. petit grenier en paille; small
2 Algerien hat 27 illegale Malier per Flugzeug
grain-store made of straw; kleiner nach Mali zurückgeschickt ...
Strohspeicher. Category: Agriculture, synonyme: dogodogoninmɔgɔ.
Building. synonyme: jiginɛ.
dogonna [ò-ò] Nom. cachotterie; secrecy;
dogi [ó-í] Verbe. tanner, pétrir, malaxer; to tan
Geheimhaltung. U ye dogonna min kɛ n na,
(animal hide), knead, to massage; Tierhäute
o ma diya n ye. Je n'ai pas aimé ces
gerben, kneten, massieren, durchkneten. ...
cachotteries qu'ils m'ont faites. I didn't like the
wolo dogilen don ... ... c'est de la peau
secrecy they did to me. Mir gefiel die
tannée... ...it's tanned leather... ...es ist Geheimhaltung, die sie mir antaten, nicht.
gegerbtes Leder... synonyme: baron.
dogotu [ò-ò-ú] Nom. cachette, refuge; hiding place,
dogo [ò-ó] 1 • vt. cacher; hide; verstecken. A bi wari hideout, hideaway, refuge, shelter, haven;
dogo. Il cache l'argent. He hides the money. Versteck, Zufluchtsort, Zuflucht, Refugium.
Er versteckt das Geld. synonyme: madogo. Banakisɛ caman bɛ dogotu sɔrɔ o nɔgɔ la ...
De nombreux microbes trouvent un refuge
2 • v.ref. se cacher; hide oneself; sich
verstecken. U bolila ka dogo. Ils ont couru
dans cette saleté ... Many microbes find refuge
in this dirt... Viele Mikroben finden in diesem
pour se cacher. They ran and hid. Sie rannten
Schmutz Zuflucht...
um sich zu verstecken. dogo la en secret. in
secret. im Geheimen.
dokan [ó] Nom. langue secrète des jeunes gens;
3 • Nom. cachotterie; secret, mystery, to secret language of young people;
cover-up; Geheimniskrämerei. Geheimsprache der Jugend.
4 • Nom. mourir (pour quelqu'un qui laisse des dola [ó] Nom. bobine; coil, reel, spool; Spule. ... fo
enfants); die (for someone who leaves ka taa dola fa. ... jusqu'à remplir la bobine.
children); sterben (für jemanden, der Kinder
...until the spool is filled. ...bis die Spule voll
hinterlässt).
ist.
dolariwari Nom. dollar; dollar; Dollar.
Category: Finance.
29/01/2026 143

dolen don
dolen [ó-é] variante: dɔlen, ndolen. Nom. dolon [ó-ó] Verbe. causer des ampoules, faire des
hameçon, ligne; fishing rod, hook; Fischhaken, cloques; cause blister; Blasen verursachen. Ji
Fischerrute. Jɛgɛ bɛ duguɲugun fɔri dolen goni y'a sen dolon. L'eau chaude a provoqué
na. Le poisson détache le ver de l'hameçon. des cloques. The hot water caused blisters.
The fish removes the worm from the hook. Der Das heiße Wasser verursachte Blasen.
Fisch entfernt den Wurm vom Haken. Category: Disease.
Category: Tool, Hunt and fish. dolonin Jula: lolonin. Nom. astérisque; asterisk;
synonyme: dolenkisɛ.
Sternchen. Category: Grammar.
dolendala [ó] Nom. 1 • pêcheur; fisherman; Fischer.
doloo [ó] Adverbe. bruit de détonation; detonation
synonyme: bamɔnna, jɛgɛminɛla, mɔnnikɛla.
noise; Detonation Geräusch. A ye marifa ci
2 • coureur de femmes (populaire); women doloo ! Il a tiré un coup de fusil, pan ! He fired
runner (popular), womaniser; Frauenheld.
a gun, bang! Er hat eine Waffe abgefeuert,
dolenjuru [ó-é-ú-ú] Nom. ligne de pêche; fishing zack! synonyme: kiriwu.
line; Angelschnur, Angelleine. Category: Tool,
dolosɛɛrɛ [ò-ò-ɛ́-ɛ́] Jula: lolosɛɛrɛ. Nom. galaxie;
Hunt and fish.
galaxy; Galaxie. Category: Sky.
dolenkisɛ Nom. hameçon; fish-hook; Angelhaken.
dolotɛrɛndɛninkulu Jula: lolotɛrɛndɛninkulu.
Category: Tool, Hunt and fish.
synonyme: dolen, dulen .
Nom. constellation; constellation;
1
Konstellation. Category: Sky.
doli [ó] variante: dɔli. Nom. perçoir, poinçon; awl;
dolow nɔɔrɔnkɛnɛ Jula: lolow nɔɔrɔnkɛnɛ. Nom.
Ahle.
voie lactée; Milky Way; Milchstrasse.
dolo [ò] Jula: lolo. Nom. étoile, planète, astre; star, Category: Sky.
planet; Stern, Planet. Kalo tɛ jɔ kalo kan sa, doma [ó-á] comparer: soma. Nom. connaisseur des
nka dolo ɲɛ dumanw bɛ falen a kɛrɛfɛ. savoirs traditionnels, devin, féticheur; person
Certes la lune n'a pas d'égale, mais bien des who knows traditional knowledge; Kenner von
étoiles brillantes à côte d'elle (proverbe.) traditionellem Wissen. Category: Religion.
Certainly the moon has no equal, but there are
domaya [ó] Nom. connaissances traditionnelles,
many bright stars beside it (proverb.) Gewiß,
magie, divination, sorcellerie; traditional
der Mond sucht seinesgleichen, aber daneben
gibt es viele helle Sterne (Sprichwort).
knowledge, magic, divination, witchcraft,
Category: Sky. synonyme: lolo.
sorcery; traditionelles Wissen, Magie,
Wahrsagung, Zauberei. Category: Religion,
dolobenta Jula: lolobenta. Nom. étoile filante; Worker, occupation.
shooting star; Sternschnuppe. Category: Sky. domino [ó-í-ó] Emprunt de : français. Nom.
synonyme: tadolo.
dominos; domino game; Dominospiel.
dolokoto [ò-ò-ò] 1 • Verbe. boursoufler, provoquer don [õ̀] 1 • Verbe. entrer , pénétrer, introduire; enter,
1
des ampoules; blister, cause blisters;
penetrate, introduce; eintreten, eindringen,
aufblähen, Blasen verursachen.
betreten, einleiten, einführen. A donna so
2 • Verbe. gonflé, boursouflé; swollen, bloated;
kɔnɔ. Il est entré dans la maison. He went into
geschwollen, aufgebläht. I ɲɛ y'a kɔnɔbara
the house. Er trat ins Haus ein.
dolokotolen na wa ? Tu ne vois pas son gros
2 • vt. mettre; put into; legen, hinlegen
ventre gonflé ? Can't you see her big swollen
reinlegen, tun. A bi ɲɔ don bɔrɔ kɔnɔ. Il met
belly? Kannst du ihren großen, geschwollenen
du mil dans le sac. He is putting millet into the
Bauch nicht sehen?
sack. Er tut die Hirse in den Sack.
3 • Nom. ampoule; blister; Blase.
3 • vt. adhérer; adhere; anhängen, nachfolgen.
dolokulu Jula: lolokulu. Morphemes: dolo-kulu. Nom. 4 • vt. mettre, porter; put on, wear; tragen,
constellation; constellation; Konstellation. anziehen.
doloma [ò-ò] Nom. prestigieux, renommé, étoile qui a 5 • vt. enfiler; shrug on, slip on; einfädeln,
anziehen. A ye dereke don. Il a enfilé une
une grande aura; prestigious, renowned, star
chemise. He slipped into a shirt. Er hat sich ein
who has a great aura; Berühmtheit,
Hemd angezogen.
prestigeträchtiger, renommierter Star, der eine
große Aura hat. dɔnkilidala doloma. une
chanteuse étoile. star singer. eine
Star-Sängerin.
29/01/2026 144

don dondokɔrɔ
6 • vt. dépenser, investir; spend, expend, invest; donda [ò-á] Morphemes: don-da. Nom. 1 • entrée,
1
ausgeben, aufwenden, investieren. U taara
porte d'entrée; entrance; Eingang. A ma
nɔnɔ feere duguba kɔnɔ, ka a don ɲɔ na ...
donda sɔrɔ. Il n'a pas trouvé l'entrée. He
Ils partirent vendre le lait à la ville, et
couldn't find the entrance. Er konnte den
achetèrent du mil ... They went to sell milk in
Eingang nicht finden. Category: Building.
the city, and bought millet... Sie gingen in die
2 • commencement; beginning, start; Beginn,
Stadt, um Milch zu verkaufen, und kauften
Hirse ...
Anfang. Samiyɛ donda fɛ. au début de la
saison des pluies. at the start of the rainy
7 • vt. préparer (de la bière); brew (beer); Bier
herstellen.
season. zu Beginn der Regenzeit.
8 • vt. grossir (cours d'eau); grow donda 2 [ò] Morphemes: don-da. Nom. prix de
(watercourse); wachsen (Wasserlauf). ... revient; cost price; Selbstkostenpreis.
babolo misɛn caman fana donna kosɛbɛ. ... Category: Finance.
de nombreux petits affluents ont également donda [ó] Verbe. fixer le jour, fixer la date; set the day,
3
considérablement grossi. ...many small
set the date; den Tag festlegen, das Datum
tributaries have also grown considerably.
festlegen. ka kɔɲɔ donda. fixer la date d'un
...auch viele kleine Nebenflüsse sind erheblich
mariage. set a date for a wedding. einen
gewachsen.
Termin für eine Hochzeit festlegen.
9 • vt. laisser entrer l'eau; let the water in; das
Wasser reinlassen. So bɛ don. La maison dondala [ò-à-á] Morphemes: don-da-la.
prend l'eau. The house is taking on water. variante: dondalama. Nom. profitable, utile,
Das Haus nimmt Wasser auf. bénéfique, qui a réussi; profitable, valuable ,
don [õ]̀ variante: do. aussi, même chose; also, the useful, rewarding, successful; profitabel,
2
nutzbringend, vorteilhaft, gewinnbringend,
same; auch, das gleiche. I bi taga wa? Ɔnhɔn,
rentabel, gelungen. I salabagatɔ dondala
n bi taga. I muso don? Tu pars? Oui, je pars.
man di. Toi le paresseux tu réussis
Et ta femme (aussi parte)? Do you go? Yes, I
difficilement. You, the lazy one, succeed with
go. And your wife (also goes)? Du gehst? Ja,
difficulty. Dir, dem Faulen, gelingt es nur
ich gehe. Und diene Frau (geht auch)?
schwer.
don 3 [ò] Jula: lo. expr. c'est (valeur représentative); dondaladen [ò-à-à-é] Nom. enfant qui se rend utile,
it is ... (representative value); es ist...
enfant serviable, enfant précieux; child who
(repräsentativer Wert). A muso don. C'est sa
makes himself useful, helpful child, precious
femme. It's his wife. Es ist seine Frau. child; Kind, das sich nützlich macht,
synonyme: lo 1 . hilfsbereites Kind, wertvolles Kind.
don [ó] Jula: lon. Nom. 1 • époque, période, dondalali [ó] Nom. valorisation; appreciation,
4
temps; epoch, period, time; Epoche, Zeitraum, promotion; Wertschätzung, Förderung.
Zeit. E nana don jumɛn ? Quand es-tu venu ? bamanankan dondalali kama ... pour la
When did you come? Wann bist du valorisation de la langue bambara... for the
gekommen? synonyme: lon. promotion of the Bambara language... für die
Förderung der Bambara-Sprache...
2 • jour; day; Tag. Ne ka don sera. Mon jour
est arrivé. My day has arrived. Mein Tag ist dondalama [ò-à-à] Nom. utile, profitable, qui
gekommen. rapporte; useful, profitable; nützlich,
don ... ni ɲɔgɔn cɛ expr. intercaler; insert, intrude, profitabel, gewinnbringend. Nin tɛ baara
interleave; einschieben, dazwischenschieben. dondalama ye. Ce n'est pas un travail
profitable. This is not profitable work. Das ist
don o don chaque jour; each day; jeden Tag. Musow
keine gewinnbringende Arbeit.
bɛ taa dɔgɔfɛ la don o don. Les femmes vont
dondo [ṍ-ó] bambara: donon. variante: donno,
au marché chaque jour. The women go to
market every day. Die Frauen gehen jeden Tag
dundo, donon, dondon. Nom. coq; cockerel,
zum Markt. synonyme: loon o loon. rooster; Hahn. Category: Animal husbandry,
Bird. synonyme: donon.
donba [ó] Nom. grand jour, journée, date; big day,
day, date; großer Tag, Tag, Datum. kunatɔw
dondokɔrɔ comparer: dondo. Nom. vieux coq, coq
ka donba. la journée des lépreux. leper day.
adulte; old cock, old rooster, adult rooster;
alter Hahn, ausgewachsener Hahn.
Lepratag.
Category: Animal husbandry, Bird.
synonyme: dononkɔrɔ.
29/01/2026 145

dondoli donko
dondoli [ṍ-ó-í] Nom. guêpe; wasp; Wespe. Dondoli donitala comparer: bɛla
1
,
ka cinni ka farin. La piqûre de la guêpe est bɛlacɛ.[ò-ì-à] Morphemes: dòni-ta-la. Nom.
douloureuse. The wasp's sting is painful. Der porteur, transporteur, portefaix; porter,
Stich der Wespe ist schmerzhaft. carrier, transporter, conveyor, haulier,
Category: Insect. shipper; Träger, Lastenträger, Gepäckträger,
dondon variante: dondo. Verbe. 1 • hisser, aider à
Frachtführer, Spediteur, Beförderer.
Category: Person.
monter; raise, hoist, lift, elevate, help to climb;
hissen, heben , helfen hochzuklettern. A ye n donitalan Nom. porte-bagages, coffre d'un véhicule;
dondon ka yɛlɛn kogo fɛ. Il m'a aidé à luggage rack, luggage-carrier, baggage rack,
monter sur le mur. He helped me get on the
boot of a vehicle; Gepäckträger,
wall. Er hat mir geholfen, auf die Wand zu
Gepäckablage, Kofferraum eines Fahrzeuges.
kommen.
Category: Travel. synonyme: kɔfɛtalan,
donnitayɔrɔ.
2 • soutenir, accompagner; support,
accompany; unterstützen, begleiten. donitamobili Nom. camion; truck, lorry; Lastwagen.
dondonin bambara: dononbugun. Category: Travel. synonyme: mɔbiliba,
synonyme: somarala. variante: dononfɔlɔkɔ. kamiyɔn.
Nom. petit ou jeune coq, coquelet; small or
donjatelan Jula: lonjatelan. Nom. calendrier, montre;
young rooster, cockerel; junger Hahn.
Category: Animal husbandry.
calendar, watch; Kalender, Uhr.
synonyme: dononbugun. synonyme: lonjatelan.
dondoturu Nom. lys de Pobéguin; kind of lily; Lilie donkabɔ [ò-à] Morphemes: don-ka-bɔ. Nom.
Art. Category: Grass, herb, vine. gloriosa
hésitation, va-et-vient; hesitation, back and
simplex.
forth; Zögern, hin und her.
donfeere [ò] Nom. gage; pledge, guarantee; donkafilɛ [ò-à-í-ɛ́] synonyme: takayuguyugu.
versprechen, Garantie, Pfand. N ye n ka misi
Nom. friperie, vêtement d'occasion;
second-hand clothes; gebrauchte Kleider,
kɛ donfeere ye. J'ai mis ma vache en gage. I
Occasion Kleider. Category: Clothing.
pawned my cow. Ich habe meine Kuh
verpfändet. Category: Finance.
donkari [ò-á-í] variante: donkori, dongari,
donfɛn [ò] Nom. monture, cheval; mount, horse;
dɔngari, donkɔri. Nom. arbre (espèce); tree
sp; Baumart. Category: Tree. acacia senegal.
Reittier, Pferd.
donkarifin Nom. câprier d'Afrique; kind of shrub;
donfinin [ò] Nom. vêtement prêt à être porté, tenue;
Pflanzenart. Category: Bush, shrub. capparis
garment ready to be worn, outfit;
tomentosa. synonyme: jatabali, kilifara.
Kleidungsstück bereit zum Tragen, Outfit.
Category: Clothing. donkatɛmɛ [ò-à] variante: donlatɛmɛ, lonlatɛmɛ.
doni [ò-í] 1 • Nom. charge, bagage, poids à porter, Nom. temporaire, passager, provisoire;
temporary, interim, short-term, provisional;
fardeau, tâche, responsabilité; load, baggage,
vorübergehend, temporär, provisorisch,
task, responsibility; Last, Gepäck, Aufgabe,
Verantwortung. Doni ka guli ne ma. La befristet, vorübergehend. A bɛ kɛ donkatɛmɛ
charge est trop lourde pour moi. The load is dɔrɔn ye. C'est une chose provisoire. It's a
too heavy for me. Die Last ist zu schwer für temporary thing. Es ist eine vorübergehende
mich. doni giliman charge lourde. heavy load. Sache.
schwere Last. donkibarubɔla Jula: lonkibarubɔla.
2 • vt. charger, porter, transporter; load, carry, variante: donkibarobɔla. Nom. voyant, devin;
transport; beladen, aufladen, auferlegen,
seer, soothsayer. Category: Religion, Worker,
belasten, tragen, transportieren. U ye ɲɔgɔmɛ
occupation. synonyme: filɛlikɛla,
doni ni dumuni ye. Ils ont chargé le chameau
lonkibarubɔla, yelikɛla.
avec de la nourriture. They loaded the camel
with food. Sie haben das Kamel mit Esswaren donko 1 [ó-ǒ] Jula: lonko. Nom. l'autre jour; the other
beladen. day; neulich. An m'o fɔ donko wa ? N'a-t-on
3 • vt. colporter, supporter; hawk, peddle, pas dit cela l'autre jour ? Didn't we say that the
support; hausieren, unterstützen, stützen. other day? Haben wir das nicht neulich
gesagt? synonyme: donko .
2
29/01/2026 146

donko dononkɔrɔ
donko bambara: donko. Jula: lonko. Nom. l'autre jour; donnkan Nom. faveur accordée pour corrompre,
2
the other day; am anderen Tag. bakchich; favour granted to corrupt,
synonyme: donko . baksheesh, bribe; Gunst, die den Korrupten
1
gewährt wird, Bakschisch, Bestechungsgeld. A
donkun [ó] Nom. semaine; week; Woche. ka donkun
ye donnkan kɛ walasa kiri ka diya a la. Il a
kelen kɛ passer une semaine. spend a week.
donné un bakchich pour que le jugement lui
eine Woche verbringen. synonyme: lɔgɔkun,
soit favorable. He gave a bribe so that the
dɔgɔkun. judgement would be favourable to him. Er gab
donkunbɛn bambara: donkunbɛn. Jula: lonkunbɛn.
Bestechungsgelder, damit das Urteil für ihn
1 günstig ausfiel.
Morphemes: lon-kun-bɛn. Nom. anniversaire;
donnkɔnɔ [õ̀-ɔ́-ɔ́] synonyme: baga. Nom. poison;
anniversary; Geburtstag, Erinnerungstag.
synonyme: sankunbɛn, sanyɛlɛmaseli, poison; Gift. Mɔgɔ o mɔgɔ, ni i y'o min,
donkunbɛn, kunbɛnseli. donnkɔnɔ don. C'est un poison violent pour
2
toute personne qui le boit. It is a violent poison
donkunbɛn
2
[ó] Jula: lonkunbɛn. Nom.
to anyone who drinks it. Es ist ein heftiges Gift
1 • anniversaire, jour anniversaire; birthday; für jeden, der es trinkt. synonyme: kɛnkɔnɔ,
Geburtstag, Jubiläum. O donkunbɛn kama, baga .
2
ɲɛnajɛw bɛ kɛ ... Pour cet anniversaire, des
donɲɔgɔnna [ò-ɔ̀-ɔ̀-á] comparer: ɲagamuni.
réjouissances sont organisées ... For this
anniversary, celebrations are organized... synonyme: koo ɲagamuni. n.comp. intégration,
Zu diesem Jubiläum werden Feierlichkeiten fusion, amalgame; integration, fusion, melting,
organisiert... synonyme: donkunbɛn. mixture; Integration, Einordnung,
1
Eingliederung, Fusion, Mischung, Gemisch.
2 • jouir en huit, huit jours; eight days; acht
Tagen. Ko dɔ kɛra, o donkunbɛn ye bi ye.
synonyme: ɲagamuni.
Quelque chose s'est passé il y a huit jours. donɲɔgɔnnadaɲɛ Variant: tugulidaɲɛ. n.comp. mot
Something happened eight days ago. Vor acht de liaison; word of liaison; Bindewort.
Tagen ist etwas passiert. Category: Language.
donmakɔnɔ [ó] Nom. 1 • situation provisoire; donɲɔgɔnnali Nom. coordination; coordination;
provisional situation; vorläufige Situation. Koordinierung, Verbindung. synonyme: kafoli.
2 • préventif; preventive; präventiv,
vorbeugend. donmakɔnɔ kasoladon
donɲuman Jula: lonɲuman. n.comp. jour de
détention préventive. preventive detention.
délivrance (grossesse); day of liberation
Sicherungsverwahrung, Vorbeuge Haft.
(pregnancy); Tag der Befreiung
(Schwangerschaft). Ala ka donɲuman di.
donnbolo [ò] Morphemes: don-n-bolo. Nom.
donon [ò] Jula: dondo. variante: dononkɔrɔ,
1 • colis confié aux bons soins d'un voyageur;
package entrusted to the care of a traveller; dondon. Nom. coq; rooster; Hahn. Dononw
Paket, das einem Reisenden anvertraut wird. kasira. Les coqs chantèrent. The roosters
2 • cadeau qu'on apporte; gift we bring; crowed. Die Hähne krähten.
Geschenk, das wir mitbringen. Donnbolo Category: Animal husbandry.
caman kɛra u ye ... Ils ont reçu beaucoup de synonyme: dondo.
cadeaux... They received a lot of gifts... Sie dononbugun [ò-ò] Jula: dondonin.
bekamen viele Geschenke...
variante: dononfɔlɔkɔ, dononwalan. Nom.
3 • récompense; reward; Belohnung.
poulet, coquelet, un coq qui n'est pas encore à
donnikɔrɔtanan Nom. grue à flèche; jib crane; maturité; chicken, cockerel, a rooster that is
Kran. not yet mature; ein Hahn, der noch nicht
donnin Nom. entrée; entrance, entry, input; Eingang,
ausgewachsen ist. Category: Animal
husbandry. synonyme: dondonin.
Eintrag. Category: Mathematics.
dononkɔrɔ [ò-ò] Jula: dondokɔrɔ. Nom. coq, coq
donnita giri expr. grue sur ponton; crane pontoon;
adulte; cock, adult cock; Hahn.
Bargenkran, Schwimmkran.
Category: Animal husbandry.
donnitayɔrɔ Nom. porte-bagages; luggage rack; synonyme: dondokɔrɔ.
Gepäckträger, Dachgepäckträger.
synonyme: kɔfɛtalan, donitalan.
29/01/2026 147

donotulu doroko
donotulu bambara: dononturu. doolo [ò] Verbe. 1 • affaisser, faire ployer sous le
variante: donontunturu. Nom. espèce de fardeau; to collapse, to bend under the burden;
plante; kind of plant; Pflanze (Art). zusammenbrechen, sich unter der Last beugen.
Category: Grass, herb, vine. gloriosa simplex Ni doni girinyara, i kɔ bɛ doolo. Si la charge
/ superba. est trop lourde, le dos ploie. If the load is too
donsigi Jula: lonsigi. Verbe. fixer une date; chose or
heavy, the back bends. Bei zu schwerer
1 Belastung beugt sich der Rücken.
set a date; eine Tag festlegen.
2 • plier, se plier en deux, pencher; bend, bend
synonyme: donsigi.
2 in half, lean; beugen, in zwei Hälften biegen,
donsigi [ó-ì-í] Jula: lonsigi. Nom. 1 • fixer une date; lehnen.
2
set a date; einen Termin festlegen. N ye n ka 3 • tomber, retomber; fall, fall back; fallen,
dugutaa donsigi. J'ai fixé la date de mon
zurückfallen.
voyage. I have fixed the date of my trip. Ich dora [ó] variante: ndora. 1 • Verbe. rendre boueux,
habe den Termin meiner Reise festgelegt. s'embourber; to become muddy, to get bogged
synonyme: donsigi 1 . down; schlammig werden, stecken bleiben. Ji
2 • jours de la semaine consacres aux activités kɛra bɔgɔ la ka a dora. L'eau a rendu la terre
de l'association; days of the week dedicated to boueuse. The water made the earth muddy.
association activities; Wochentage, die den Das Wasser machte die Erde schlammig.
Vereinsaktivitäten gewidmet sind.
2 • Verbe. être très fatigué, être éreinté; to be
donso [õ-̀ ó] variante: donsocɛ. Nom. chasseur; very tired, to be exhausted; sehr müde sein,
1
hunter; Jäger. Donso ŋana don. C'est un
erschöpft sein.
grand chasseur. He is a great hunter. Er ist ein
3 • Nom. bourbier, marais, marécage;
großartiger Jäger. Category: Hunt and fish,
quagmire, marsh, swamp; Sumpf.
Person. synonyme: sogofagala. 4 • Nom. adipeux, collant, visqueux; adipose,
sticky, viscous; fettig, klebrig, zähflüssig.
donso Nom. chien mal; male dog; männlicher Hund.
2 5 • Nom. complètement trempé; completely
Category: Mammal. soaked; völlig durchnäßt.
donsogɔnin Nom. bolon; bass harp; Harfe. doro [ó] Verbe. 1 • mettre trop (sel, eau, sauce); add
1
Category: Musical instrument. too much (salt, water, sauce); zu viel
synonyme: kanbelegɔnin. hinzufügen (Salz, Wasser, Soße).
donsokɛ [ò-ò] Jula: donsocɛ. Nom. chasseur; 2 • être visqueux; to be slimy; schleimig sein.
bɔgɔdoro boue liquide pour crépir des murs.
hunter; Jäger. Category: Hunt and fish,
Person.
liquid mud for plastering walls. flüssiger
Schlamm zum Verputzen von Wänden.
donsoŋana Nom. grand chasseur; big hunter, famous
3 • pâte épaisse; thick paste; dicke Paste.
hunter; grosser Jäger.
doro [ó] variante: dorobara, dorokili. Nom.
2
donsotɔn [ò-ò-ɔ́] Morphemes: donso-tɔn. Nom.
1 • sexe masculin (populaire); male sexual
association des chasseurs; hunters association; organ, penis (popular); männliches
Jägerverein. Geschlecht, Penis (Volksmund). Dugumɛnɛ
donsoya [ò-ò-á] Nom. chasse; hunting; Jagd. ye a bɛrɛmadoro de bon. La fourmi a piqué
Donsoya jarabilen don a bolo. Il est le testicule qu'elle estimait pouvoir piquer
passionné de chasse. He is passionate about (proverbe). The ant stung the testicle it thought
hunting. Er hat eine Leidenschaft für die Jagd. it could sting (proverb). Die Ameise hat den
Category: Hunt and fish. Hoden gestochen, von dem sie glaubte, er
könne stechen (Sprichwort).
-donya [ó] jour (en composition); (in composition):
2 • testicule; testicle; Hoden. Category: Body.
day; (in der Zusammensetzung): Tag.
jumadonya fɛ le vendredi, chaque vendredi.
dorodoro [ó] Adverbe. bien mouillé, visqueux; very
Friday, every Friday. Freitag, jeden Freitag. wet, viscous; sehr naß, zähflüssig. dɛgɛ
Jamadonya fɛ, musow bɛ kasadiyalan kɛ u dorodoro. du dègue bien mouillé. very wet
kan. Les jours de fête, les femmes se degue porridge. sehr nasser Degue Brei.
parfument. On holidays, women wear doroko [ó] variante: doroga, dorogo, dɔrɔkɔ.
perfume. An Feiertagen tragen Frauen Parfüm.
Verbe. 1 • mêler, mélanger, brasser; mix, stir;
doo [ó] bambara: do. Nom. association secrète mischen, rühren. N'a dorokola dun ? Et si ça
traditionnelle, culte; traditional association or se mélange ? What if it gets mixed up? Was ist,
cult; traditionelle Geheimgesellschaft, Kult. wenn es durcheinander kommt?
synonyme: do 3 . 2 • serrer; to squeeze, tighten; quetschen.
29/01/2026 148

doronin dɔfarankan
3 • être en désordre; be messy; chaotisch, 2 • pron. quelque chose; something; etwas. A
unordentlich, durcheinander. ye dɔ fɔ. Il a dit quelque chose. He said
doronin Nom. plante (espèce); plant sp; Pflanzenart. something. Er sagte etwas.
Category: Grass, herb, vine. boerhavia 3 • Déterminant. autre, l'un ... l'autre; other, each
diffusa. other; anderer, einander.
doso [ó-ó] variante: dosokɔrɔ. Nom. 1 • grand dɔ bɔ o ra synonyme: barika. expr. diminue le prix;
chien, molosse; big dog, watchdog; großer lower the price; verringere den Preis. «Nin
Hund, Wachhund. Category: Mammal. wa? «350». “Dɔ bɔ o ra!» « Ceci? Il coûte
2 • grand gaillard; big guy; großer Kerl. 1750 F. » « Diminue ! ». «This one costs 1750
dotigi [ó] Nom. celui qui adore les cultes secrets francs». «Lower the price!». «Das da? Das
kostet 1750 Franken.» Verringere den Preis?».
traditionnels, maître des cultes traditionnels,
idolâtre; one who worships traditional secret dɔ fara hakɛ kan expr. augmenter; increase;
cults, master of traditional cults, idolater; vermehren, erhöhen. Category: Mathematics.
jemand, der traditionelle Geheimkulte verehrt,
dɔbɔlan [ɔ́] Nom. moins, signe de moins; minus sign;
Meister traditioneller Kulte, Götzendiener.
Minuszeichen. Category: Mathematics.
doyi [ó] Adverbe. bruit de détonation; detonation
dɔbɔli [ɔ́] Nom. soustraction, remise, réduction;
noise; Geräusch einer Detonation. A ye marifa
subtraction, discount, reduction, diminution;
ci doyi ! Il a tiré un coup de fusil, pan ! He
Subtraktion, Rabatt, Abzug, Verringerung,
fired a gun, bang! Er hat eine Waffe
Reduktion. Category: Mathematics.
abgefeuert, zack! synonyme: kiriwu.
dɔdɔ [ɔ̀] variante: jɔjɔ. Verbe. suivre quelqu'un,
dɔ [ɔ]́ comparer: dɔw (pl.). adj. 1 • un, un certain,
1 surveiller; follow someone, monitor;
pronom indéfini; one, a certain, indefinite; ein, jemandem folgen, überwachen. U y'a dɔdɔ n'a
eine, einige, ein paar. Don dɔ... Un jour... One
soɲɛni kɛ. Ils l'ont suivi pour savoir s'il volait.
day... Eines Tages ... Muso nana. Muso dɔ
They followed him to see if he was stealing. Sie
nana. La femme est venue. Une femme est folgten ihm, um zu sehen, ob er stahl.
venue. The woman came. A woman came. Die
dɔdɔlima [ɔ̀-ɔ̀-ì] variante: jɔjɔlima. Verbe. 1 • se
Frau ist gekommen. Eine Frau ist gekommen.
N mako bi dɔ ra. J’en ai besoin. I need some.
mettre sur la pointe des pieds, hisser, pousser
vers le haut; stand on tiptoe, hoist, push
Ich brauche welche.
upwards; auf Zehenspitzen stellen,
2 • en, de la, des, un peu de; some; davon, hochheben, nach oben drücken.
welche, einige. A ye mangorow san. A ye
2 • faire l'intrus, écouter aux portes, espionner;
dɔ san. Il a acheté les mangues. Il en a acheté. playing the intruder, eavesdropping, spying;
He bought the mangos. He bought some. Er hat den Eindringling spielen, belauschen,
die Mangos gekauft. Er hat welche gekauft. spionieren.
3 • autre; other, another; andere. A dɔ dɔfarali [ɔ́] Nom. augmentation, ajout; increase,
daminɛtɔ don ánw yɛrɛw ka so, n'o ma augmentation, addition; Erhöhung, Zunahme,
dabila... Une autre affaire est en train de Steigerung, Anstieg, Hinzufügen, Zusatz,
commencer chez nous, si on n'y met pas fin... Zugabe. Dɔfarali sɛnɛfɛnw sɔngɔ kan ...
Another affair is starting with us, if we don't L'augmentation du prix des produits agricoles
put an end to it... Eine andere Sache beginnt ... The increase in the price of agricultural
bei uns, wenn wir ihr nicht ein Ende setzen ... products... Der Preisanstieg bei
4 • quelque, quelqu'un; some, a few, someone, landwirtschaftlichen Produkten...
somebody; manche. N'a fɔra ntɔnnin ka dɔfarankan [ɔ́] variante: dɔfarakan. Nom.
kunan, i b'a sɔrɔ dɔ y'a nɛɛnɛ. Pour augmentation; increase, augmentation,
affirmer quel le petit criquet est amer, il faut increase; Zunahme, Erhöhung. Nin
que quelqu'un l'ait goûté. (proverbe). To say
dɔfarankanw ye kodaminɛ de ye ... Ces
that the little locust is bitter, someone must
augmentations ne sont qu'un commencement
have tasted it. (proverb). Um zu sagen, daß die
... These increases are just the beginning...
kleine Heuschrecke bitter ist, muß jemand sie
Diese Erhöhungen sind nur der Anfang...
probiert haben. (Sprichwort).
dɔ [ɔ]́ 1 • pron. quelqu'un, quelque, quelques;
2
somebody, some of; jemand, einige. Dɔ nana.
Quelqu'un est venu. Somebody came. Jemand
ist gekommen.
29/01/2026 149

dɔgɔ dɔgɔmaya
dɔgɔ [ɔ-́ ɔ́] adj.pred. être petit, peu, étroit, rare; small, dɔgɔden [ɔ́] Jula: lɔgɔden. Nom. personne
1
little; klein sein, nicht viel, wenig, eng, participant au marché; person participating in
schmal, selten, rar, knapp. Dugusɛjɛ tɛ tɛmɛ the market, market visitor; Person, die am
dugu kunna, k'a ka dɔgɔ. Il n'est point de Markt teilnimmt, Marktbesucher.
synonyme: lɔgɔdenw.
village trop petit pour que le matin ne s'y lève
(proverbe). There is no village too small for dɔgɔdɔgɔli 1 • Verbe. chatouiller; tickle; kitzeln. I
morning to rise (proverb). Es gibt kein Dorf,
kana n dɔgɔdɔgɔli sa ! Ne me chatouille pas !
das zu klein ist, um morgen zu werden
(Sprichwort). O ka dɔgɔ án ka ba in na dɛ !
Don't tickle me! Kitzel mich nicht!
synonyme: ɲɔmiɲɔmi.
Ce poisson est extrêmement rare dans notre
fleuve, ici. This fish is extremely rare in our 2 • Nom. chatouillement; tickling; das Kitzeln.
river here. Dieser Fisch ist in unserem Fluß dɔgɔdɔgɔnin [ɔ́] Adverbe. discrètement, légèrement,
hier äußerst selten. antonyme: bon.
1 peu à peu, doucement, par épisodes; discreetly,
dɔgɔ [ɔ-́ ɔ́] Nom. cadet (neutre), plus jeune, jeune; lightly, gently, bit by bit, quietly; diskret,
2
leicht, ruhig, still. A y'a dɔgɔdɔgɔnin weele
younger (brother or sister); jüngerer, jüngere
(Bruder oder Schwester). Category: Kinship. ... Il l'appela discrètement ... He called her
dɔgɔ [ɔ]̀ Verbe. retourner la terre, piocher, bêcher,
discreetly... Er rief sie diskret an...
3
creuser profondément; turn over the earth, dɔgɔfɛɛ [ɔ́] Nom. marché, place du marché; market,
pick, dig, dig deeply; die Erde umdrehen, market place; Markt, Marktplatz. Ni dɔgɔfɛɛ
pflücken, graben, tief graben. ka dugukolo tun ye kɛlɛtigɛyɔrɔ ye ... Si la place du
dɔgɔ retourner le sol. turn over the soil. den marché était un champ de bataille ... If the
Boden umgraben. Category: Agriculture. market square was a battlefield... Wenn der
dɔgɔ [ɔ]́ Jula: lɔgɔ. Nom. bois de chauffe, bois
Marktplatz ein Schlachtfeld wäre...
4
synonyme: saafyɛ, lɔgɔfiyɛ.
mort; firewood, dead wood; Brennholz,
Totholz. synonyme: lɔgɔ. dɔgɔfurancɛ [ɔ́] Jula: lɔgɔfurancɛ. Nom. semaine,
1
dɔgɔ [ɔ]́ Jula: lɔgɔ. Nom. 1 • marché; market; Der
intervalle entre deux jours de marché; week,
5
interval between two market days; Woche,
Markt. A bɛ taa dɔgɔ jɔ. Elle part faire le
Intervall zwischen zwei Markttagen. ... o ma
marché. She goes to the market. Sie geht auf
dɔgɔfurancɛ kelen bɔ ... ... ça n'a pas pris une
den Markt. synonyme: lɔgɔ .
2 semaine ... ...it didn't take a week... ...es hat
2 • semaine; week; Woche. Kalandenw tun bɛ keine Woche gedauert...
dɔrɔmɛ duuru sara dɔgɔ o dɔgɔ. Les élèves synonyme: lɔgɔfurancɛ.
payent vingt-cinq francs chaque semaine.
dɔgɔkɛ [ɔ́] Jula: dɔgɔcɛ. Nom. frère cadet, cadet, petit
Students pay twenty-five francs each week.
Studierende zahlen jede Woche 25 Franken.
frère; younger brother, younger, little brother;
jüngerer Bruder, jüngerer, kleiner Bruder.
dɔgɔ ni ... ye expr. inférieur à; inferior to; kleiner Category: Kinship. synonyme: dɔgɔcɛ.
als. Category: Mathematics.
dɔgɔkun Jula: lɔgɔkun. Nom. semaine; week; Woche.
dɔgɔbere [ɔ́] Jula: lɔgɔbere. Nom. bâton, gourdin;
synonyme: donkun, lɔgɔkun.
stick, club; Stock, Keule. synonyme: lɔgɔbere.
dɔgɔman adj. petit; small, narrow, few, young; klein,
dɔgɔbolo [ɔ́] Jula: lɔgɔbolo. Nom. bois de chauffage
schmal, eng, wenig, jung. barama
débité en morceaux, bûche; firewood cut into
dɔgɔmanninw les toutes petites marmites. the
pieces, log; Brennholz in Stücke geschnitten,
Scheit. synonyme: lɔgɔbolo.
very small pots. die sehr kleinen Töpfe.
dɔgɔmannin adj. petit, peu, le plus petit, le plus
dɔgɔcɛ [ɔ-́ ɔ́-ɛ́] bambara: dɔgɔkɛ.
jeune; small, few, smallest, youngest; klein,
Morphemes: dɔgɔ-cɛ. Nom. petit frère, frère
wenig, das Kleinste, der Jüngste.
cadet; younger brother; jüngerer Bruder.
Category: Kinship. synonyme: dɔgɔkɛ.
dɔgɔmaya Nom. humiliation, soumission, irrespect;
humiliation, submission, disrespect;
dɔgɔda [ɔ]́ Verbe. fixer la date, prévoir; set the date, Demütigung, Unterwerfung, Respektlosigkeit.
plan; Termin festlegen, planen. Dugutaa ... i ka dɔgɔmaya tɛ kun ne fɛ. ... je ne
dɔgɔdalen bɛ ne fɛ ... J'ai un voyage prévu ... supporterai pas ton manque de respect. ...I
I have a trip planned... Ich habe eine Reise won't stand for your disrespect. ...Ich werde
geplant... deine Respektlosigkeit nicht dulden.
synonyme: ɲɛdonya.
29/01/2026 150

dɔgɔmi dɔgɔya
dɔgɔmi variante: dɔgɔbi. Nom. espèce de poisson; kind dɔgɔtɔrɔso [ɔ̀-ɔ̀-ɔ̀-ɔ̀-ó] bambara: dɔkɔtɔrɔso.
of fish; Fischart. Category: Fish. polypterus Morphemes: dɔgɔtɔrɔ-so. Nom. dispensaire,
endlicheri. hôpital, poste de santé, lieu de soins;
dɔgɔmɔ Jula: lɔgɔmɔ. Nom. petit cadeau fait à ses dispensary, clinic, hospital; Spital,
Gesundheitsstation, Klinik. Category: Treat
proches par celui qui revient du marché; small
disease, Building. synonyme: labitani,
gift given to loved ones by the one who returns
from the market; kleines Geschenk, das dɔkɔtɔrɔso.
derjenige, der vom Markt zurückkehrt, seinen
dɔgɔtɔrɔsoba Morphemes: dɔgɔtɔrɔ-so-ba. Nom.
Lieben schenkt. synonyme: lɔgɔmɔ.
hôpital; hospital; Spital. Category: Treat
dɔgɔmuso [ɔ́] Morphemes: dɔgɔ-muso. Nom. petite disease, Building. synonyme: labitani.
sœur, sœur cadette, sœur puînée; younger
dɔgɔtɔrɔsodennin Nom. infirmerie; infirmary, sick
sister; jüngere Schwester. Category: Kinship.
room; Lazarett, Krankenhaus, Krankenstube.
dɔgɔnin Morphemes: dɔgɔ-nin. Nom. cadet, cadette; Category: Building.
younger; jüngerer, jüngere. U bɛɛ la dɔgɔnin dɔgɔtɔrɔsonin See main entry: .
... Leur cadet à tous ... The youngest of them
variante: dɔgɔtɔrɔsodennin. n.comp.
all... Der Jüngste von allen...
infirmerie; infirmary, sick room; Lazarett,
Category: Kinship.
Krankenhaus, Krankenstube.
dɔgɔnɔ [ɔ̀-ɔ̀-ɔ́] Nom. Dogon (ethnie); Dogon (ethnic
dɔgɔtɔrɔsotaga Nom. consultation; consultation,
group); Dogon Volksgruppe.
doctor's advice; Sprechstunde, Konsultation.
Category: Community. synonyme: kaadɔ.
dɔgɔtɔrɔw Nom. personnel de santé; health personnel,
dɔgɔnɔkan See main entry: kaadɔkan.
health staff, medical personnel;
Morphemes: dɔgɔnɔ-kan. Nom. langue dogon; Gesundheitspersonal, medizinisches Personal .
Dogon language; Dogon-Sprache. Category: Worker, occupation.
dɔgɔsiri Jula: lɔgɔsiri. Nom. fagot; bundle of wood; synonyme: furakɛlaw.
Bündel, Holzbündel. synonyme: lɔgɔsiri. dɔgɔtɔrɔya Nom. médecine, profession médicale,
dɔgɔtɔrɔ [ɔ̀-ɔ̀-ɔ́-ɔ́] Nom. médecin, docteur, agent de
connaissances médicales; medical profession,
medical knowledge; Beruf im
santé , infirmier, infirmière; doctor, hospital
Gesundheitswesen, Medizinisches Wissen.
nurse, male nurse, nurse; Arzt,
Krankenpfleger, Doktor. Category: Treat dɔgɔtɔrɔyaminanw Nom. matériel médical;
disease. synonyme: dɔkɔtɔrɔ. medical equipment; medizinische Ausstattung.
Category: Treat disease, Tool.
dɔgɔtɔrɔba Morphemes: dɔgɔtɔrɔ-ba. Nom.
chirurgien; surgeon; Chirurg. Category: Treat
dɔgɔya comparer: lamaloya, lebu.[ɔ́-ɔ́-á] 1 • vt.
disease. réduire, diminuer, amoindrir, atténuer,
minimiser, abréger, affaiblir; reduce, ease,
dɔgɔtɔrɔcɛ Nom. docteur, médecin, infirmier; medical
diminish, denigrate, lessen, minimize,
doctor, nurse, male nurse, hospital nurse; abbreviate, shorten, weaken; verkleinern,
Arzt, Doktor, Krankenpfleger, Pflegepersonal. wegnehmen, reduzieren, verringern, mindern,
Category: Treat disease. minimieren, herunterspielen, kürzen,
dɔgɔtɔrɔfura Nom. médicament; medicine, drug; schwächen. Ala k’a tɔɔrɔ dɔgɔya ! Que Dieu
Arzneimittel, Medikament.
atténue la douleur ! May God ease the
synonyme: dɔkɔtɔrɔfura.
pain/problem ! Möge Gott das Leiden
verringern ! synonyme: madɔgɔya.
dɔgɔtɔrɔmobili variante: dɔkɔtɔrɔmobili. Nom.
2 • vt. être peu, être trop petit; to be little, to be
ambulance; ambulance; Ambulanz,
too small; klein sein, zu klein sein. Bonya
Krankenwagen. synonyme: pipɔnpi.
dɔgɔya tɛ. Il n'est pas de cadeau trop petit
dɔgɔtɔrɔmuso Nom. infirmière, doctoresse; nurse (proverbe). There is no gift too small
(female), doctor (female) ; Krankenschwester, (proverb). Kein Geschenk ist zu klein
Ärztin. (Sprichwort).
3 • vt. humilier, dénigrer, mépriser, offenser;
humiliate, belittle, denigrate, despise, scorn,
offend; demütigen, anschwärzen, verachten,
beleidigen.
29/01/2026 151

dɔgɔyabali dɔlɔkoro
4 • Nom. petitesse, infériorité, faiblesse, rareté, dɔkɔtɔrɔfura Nom. médicament; medicine, drug,
humiliation; smallness, inferiority, weakness,
medication; Medizin, Medikament.
rarity, rareness, humiliation; Kleinheit,
dɔkɔtɔrɔfura gɛlɛyalen bɛ. Les médicaments
Minderwertigkeit, Schwachheit, Seltenheit,
Demütigung. Dɔgɔya tɛ kɛlɛ sa,
sont chers. Medicines are expensive.
Medikamente sind teuer. Category: Treat
dusukunntanya b'a sa. La faiblesse
disease. synonyme: dɔgɔtɔrɔfura.
n'empêche pas de combattre, mais la lâcheté si
(proverbe). Weakness does not prevent you dɔkɔtɔrɔso Jula: dɔgɔtɔrɔso. Nom. hôpital,
from fighting, but cowardice does (proverb). dispensaire. lieu de soins; hospital, dispensary.
Schwäche hindert dich nicht am Kämpfen, place of care; Krankenhaus, Spital,
Feigheit hingegen schon (Sprichwort). Krankenstation, Apotheke. Ort der Pflege.
dɔgɔyabali variante: dɔgɔyabali tilanni. Nom. synonyme: dɔgɔtɔrɔso, labitani.
irréductible (fraction); irreducible (fraction); dɔkɔtɔrɔya Nom. la médecine, profession médicale,
nicht reduzierbare (Fraktion) .
connaissance médicale; medicine, medical
Category: Mathematics. profession, medical knowledge; die Medizin,
dɔgɔyalen variante: dɔgɔyalenba. Nom. minimum; medizinischer Beruf, medizinisches Wissen.
minimum; Minimum. A dɔgɔyalen ye mɔgɔ
... ka dugukɔnɔmɔgɔw dege dɔgɔtɔrɔya la
fila ye. Le minimum est de deux personnes.
... .... et inculquer aux villageois des
The minimum is two people. Das Minimum
connaissances médicales ... .... and teach
sind zwei Personen. synonyme: dɔgɔyanin.
medical knowledge to the villagers... .... und
den Dorfbewohnern medizinisches Wissen
dɔgɔyali Nom. infériorité; inferiority; vermitteln...
Minderwertigkeit. dɔlen synonyme: jɔlen. Nom. espèce d'herbe, herbe
dɔgɔyanan n.comp. qui sert à diminuer, diminutif; baïonnette; kind of grass; Grasart.
used to diminish, diminutive; gebraucht um zu Category: Grass, herb, vine. imperata
verkleinern, Verkleinerungsform. cylindrica.
Category: Grammar. dɔlɔ [ɔ̀-ɔ́] variante: dɔrɔ. Nom. bière de mil,
dɔgɔyanin variante: dɔgɔyaninba. part. minimum; alcool, boisson alcoolisée; beer, alcohol,
minimum; Minimum. A dɔgɔyanin ye mɔgɔ alcoholic beverage; Hirsebier, Bier, Alkohol,
fila ye. Le minimum est de deux personnes.
alkoholisches Getränk. Ale tɛ dɔlɔ min. Lui, il
The minimum is two people. Das Minimum
ne boit pas d'alcool. He doesn't drink alcohol.
sind zwei Personen. synonyme: dɔgɔyalen.
Er trinkt keinen Alkohol. synonyme: cap.
dɔin [ɔ]́ Morphemes: dɔ-in. variante: pluriel: dɔlɔbaga [ɔ̀-ɔ̀] Nom. alcool (en tant qu'élément
dɔinnu, dɔnunun. Déterminant. l'autre, l'une
contenu dans une boisson alcoolisée); alcohol
(as part of an alcoholic beverage); Alkohol
(uniquement dans un choix alternatif); the
(als Teil eines alkoholischen Getränks). ...
other, one (only in an alternative choice); der
andere, einer (nur in einer Alternativwahl).
dɔlɔbaga bɛ se joli la ... ... l'alcool passe dans
Muso dɔin den laban kɛra tɛgɛwusu ye.
le sang ... ...alcohol passes into the blood...
...Alkohol gelangt ins Blut... synonyme: alikɔli,
Finalement l'enfant de l'autre femme devint un
voleur. Eventually the other woman's child dɔrɔbaga.
became a thief. Schließlich wurde das Kind
dɔlɔdonna Nom. fabricante de bière de mil; millet
der anderen Frau zum Dieb.
beer manufacturer; Hirsebierhersteller.
dɔkɛbali [ɔ́] Nom. inactif, fainéant, paresseux; synonyme: dɔrɔdonna.
inactive, slacker, idler, lazybones, lazy
person; Faulenzer, Nichtstuer, Faulpelz.
dɔlɔji [ɔ̀-ɔ̀] Nom. bière; beer; Bier.
Dɔkɛbali dɛmɛcogo ye Ala yɛrɛ lafili. Aider synonyme: warabadaji, biyɛri.
les paresseux embarrasse Dieu lui-même dɔlɔki [ɔ̀-ɔ̀] variante: dulɔki. Nom. vêtement de
(proverbe). Helping the lazy embarrasses God
dessus, chemise, habit; outer garment, shirt,
himself (proverb). Den Faulen zu helfen bringt
coat; Oberbekleidung, Hemd, Mantel.
Gott selbst in Verlegenheit (Sprichwort).
Category: Clothing. synonyme: duleki.
dɔkɔtɔrɔ [ɔ̀-ɔ̀] Nom. docteur, médecin, infirmière;
dɔlɔkiba [ɔ̀-ɔ̀-ì-á] Nom. grand boubou; big boubou;
doctor, nurse; Arzt, Krankenschwester,
Krankenpfleger. Category: Treat disease, großer Boubou. Category: Clothing.
Worker, occupation. synonyme: dɔgɔtɔrɔ. synonyme: derekeba, dulokiba.
dɔlɔkoro [ɔ̀-ɔ̀] Nom. calebasse à bière; beer calabash;
Bier-Kalebasse. synonyme: dɔrɔkoro.
29/01/2026 152

dɔlɔmafɛn dɔnkililala
dɔlɔmafɛn [ɔ̀-ɔ̀-à] Morphemes: dɔlɔ-ma-fɛn. Nom. dɔnbagalafili [ɔ́] Nom. méconnaissable, totalement
boisson alcoolisée; alcoholic drink, booze; transforme, métamorphosé; unrecognisable,
alkoholisches Getränk. synonyme: dɔrɔmafɛn, totally transformed, metamorphosed;
tubabudɔlɔ, jikɔrɔ. unkenntlich, völlig verwandelt. Dɔlɔ y'a kɛ
dɔnbagalafili ye. L'alcool l'a rendu
dɔlɔmin [ɔ̀-ɔ̀] Nom. alcoolisme; alcoholism;
méconnaissable. The alcohol made him
Alkoholismus. synonyme: dɔrɔmin, dɔrɔtɔya.
unrecognisable. Der Alkohol machte ihn
dɔlɔminna variante: dɔlɔtɔ. Nom. buveur, ivrogne, unkenntlich.
alcoolique; drinker, drunkard, alcoholic; dɔnbakalo variante: dɔnba. Nom. troisième mois
Trinker, Trunkenbold, Alkoholiker. lunaire; third lunar month; dritter Mond
synonyme: minkɛla. Monat.
dɔlɔtɔya [ɔ̀-ɔ̀-ɔ̀] Nom. alcoolisme; alcoholism; dɔnbaliya [ɔ́] Jula: lɔnbaliya. Nom. ignorance;
Alkoholismus. ignorance; Unwissenheit. Sagajigi ka
dɔmi [ɔ-̀ í] [ɔ̀] Nom. personne de petite taille; small kunmajigin tɛ siradɔnbaliya ye. Si le bélier
person (not tall); kleingewachsene Person. Cɛ
baisse la tête, ce n'est pas parce qu'il ignore le
chemin (proverbe). If the ram lowers his head,
in ye dɔmi ye. Cet homme est petit. This man
it is not because he ignores the path (proverb).
is small. Dieser Mann ist klein.
Wenn der Widder den Kopf senkt, liegt das
dɔn [ɔ]́ variante: dɔɔn. 1 • Nom. danse; dance; nicht daran, daß er den Weg nicht kennt
1
Tanz. (Sprichwort). synonyme: ɲɛdɔnbaliya,
2 • Verbe. danser, faire danser, piétiner, fouler; lɔnbaliya, kodɔnbaliya.
dance, trample underfoot; tanzen, stampfen. U dɔndɔ [ɔ́-ɔ́] bambara: dɔnɔn. synonyme: singa, juru
ye dɔn kɛ. Ils ont dansé. They danced. Sie
ta. 1 • Verbe. emprunter, faire un prêt, prêter,
tanzten.
avancer; borrow, loan; leihen, ausleihen,
dɔn [ɔ]́ Jula: lɔn. 1 • Verbe. connaître, savoir; to entlehnen. Category: Finance.
2
know; wissen, kennen. N y'i dɔn. Je te connais synonyme: dɔnɔn.
bien. I know you well. Ich kenne dich gut. 2 • Nom. prêt, emprunt; loan, lending, credit,
synonyme: lɔn. borrowing, mortgage; Darlehen, Leihgaben,
Ausleihe, Kredit, Anleihe, Kreditaufnahme,
2 • Verbe. reconnaître; recognize, acknowledge;
Entlehnung.
erkennen. Warabilen tɛ wulu kakala dɔn. Le
singe rouge ne sait pas reconnaître le chien qui dɔndɔ garanti vt. gage; security, surety, pawn,
est lâche (proverbe). The red monkey does not forfeit; Pfand, Sicherheitsgage.
know how to recognize a dog that is cowardly dɔndɔli Nom. emprunt; loan, borrowing; Darmlehen,
(proverb). Der rote Affe weiß nicht, wie man
einen feigen Hund erkennt (Sprichwort).
Entlehnung. Category: Finance.
3 • Verbe. avoir des rapports sexuels; have sex; dɔnkan [ɔ̀] Nom. tambour d’aisselle, petit tambour de
Sex haben. ... cɛ si tɛ Jume dɔn muso ye diɲɛ griot avec cordes tension; armpit drum, small
na ... ... aucun homme jamais n'a eu de relation griot drum with tension strings, glass hour
sexuelle avec Dioumé. ...no man ever had
drum; Achseltrommel, kleine Griot Trommel
sexual relations with Dioumé. ...kein Mann
mit Spannsaiten. Category: Musical
instrument.
hatte jemals sexuelle Beziehungen mit
Dioumé. dɔnkɛ [ɔ̀] Verbe. 1 • danser; dance; tanzen.
4 • Nom. le savoir, la connaissance; knowledge; 2 • danse; dance; Tanz.
das Wissen.
dɔnkɛla [ɔ̀-ɛ̀-á] Morphemes: dɔn-kɛ-la. Nom.
dɔnbaga [ɔ́] Nom. 1 • ami, camarade, connaissance;
danseur, danseuse; dancer, ballerina; Tänzer,
friend, comrade, acquaintance; Freund,
Tänzerin. Category: Person.
Kamerad, Bekannter. synonyme: lɔnbaga,
dɔnkili Nom. chant, chanson; song; Lied. Dɔnkili kɔrɔ
terima.
une vieille chanson. an old song. ein altes
2 • connaisseur; connoisseur; Kenner.
Lied.
dɔnkilila comparer: dɔnkili. Verbe. chanter; sing;
singen. ka dɔnkili la ni ɲagali ye chanter avec
joie. sing with joy. mit Freude singen.
dɔnkililala Morphemes: dɔnkili-la-la. Nom. chanteur,
chanteuse; singer; Sänger, Sängerin.
29/01/2026 153

dɔnko dɔrɔ
dɔnko [ɔ]́ Nom. culture, savoir, art, savoir occulte, dɔnniya [ɔ́] Jula: lɔnniya. Nom. 1 • savoir, savoir
érudition; culture, knowledge, art, occult magique; knowledge, magical knowledge;
knowledge, scholarship; Kultur, Wissen, Wissen, magisches Wissen.
Kunst, okkultes Wissen, Gelehrsamkeit. Mɔgɔ synonyme: lɔnniya .
2
bɛ to i dɔnko de la. L'homme périt de son 2 • connaissance, compétence; knowledge,
savoir (proverbe). Man perishes from his skill; Wissen, Können.
knowledge (proverb). Der Mensch geht an 3 • coutumes, traditions; customs, traditions;
seinem Wissen zugrunde (Sprichwort). Bräuche, Traditionen.
synonyme: sekojira , lɔnko.
2 dɔnɔn [ɔ́] comparer: singa (objet). Jula: dɔndɔ.
dɔnkotigi [ɔ́] Jula: lɔnkotigi. Nom. personne de Verbe. faire un prêt, faire une avance, prêter,
grand savoir; person of great knowledge; avancer, emprunter; make a loan, make an
Person mit großem Wissen. Category: Think. advance, lend, advance, borrow; einen Kredit
synonyme: lɔnkotigi. aufnehmen, einen Vorschuß leisten, leihen,
vorstrecken. Category: Finance.
dɔnmako Jula: lɔnmako. Nom. chose connue; known
synonyme: dɔndɔ, singa .
1
thing; bekannte Sache. Bɛɛ dɔnmako tɛ wa,
dɔnsen [ɔ̀-é] n.comp. 1 • rythme de danse, pas de
baadi ? C'est quelque chose que tout le monde
danse; dance rhythm; Tanzrhythmus,
savait, non ? That’s something everyone knew,
right? Das wußte doch jeder, oder?
Rhythmus. I dɔnsen ka ɲi. Ton pas de danse
synonyme: lɔnmako. est bon. Your dance move is good. Deine
Tanzbewegung ist gut.
dɔnmɔgɔ [ɔ́] Jula: lɔnmɔgɔ. Nom. connaissance,
2 • orientation, direction, attitude, position;
ami, camarade; acquaintance, friend, orientation, direction, attitude, position;
comrade; Bekannter, Freund, Kamerad. Richtung, Ausrichtung, Orientierung, Haltung,
synonyme: lɔnmɔgɔ. Position.
dɔnni [ɔ]́ Jula: lɔnni. Nom. connaissance, savoir; dɔnya [ɔ́] Jula: lɔnya. Verbe. 1 • savoir, connaître; to
knowledge; Wissen. ... n ko dɔnni de b'o kɛ. know; wissen. synonyme: lɔnya.
... je dis que c'est le savoir qui fait cela. ...I 2 • reconnaître, découvrir; recognize, discover;
say that it is knowledge that does this. ...Ich erkennen, entdecken.
sage, daß es das Wissen ist, das dies bewirkt.
dɔɔn [ɔ́] bambara: dɔn. Nom. danse; dance; Tanz.
dɔnnibaga [ɔ́] Jula: lɔnnibaga. Nom. 1 • personne
dɔɔnin [ɔ́-ĩ́] variante: sɔɔnin. Adverbe. petit à petit,
de savoir occulte (féticheur, marabout); person 1
un peu, doucement; little by little, a little,
of occult knowledge (witch doctor,
gently; ein bißchen, ein wenig, ein paar, sanft.
soothsayer); Person mit okkultem Wissen
(Hexendoktor, Wahrsager). I jɔ dɔɔnin ! Attends un peu ! Wait a moment!
Category: Religion. synonyme: lɔnnibaga. Warte ein wenig! N ye mangoro dɔɔnin san.
J’ai acheté quelques mangues. I bought a few
2 • savant, scientifique; scholar, scientist;
Gelehrter, Wissenschaftler. Category: Think.
mangos. Ich habe ein paar Mango gekauft.
dɔnnifin [ɔ́] Nom. savoir occulte, savoir secret; occult dɔɔnin 2 synonyme: sɔɔnin. Adverbe. bientôt; soon; bald,
gleich.
knowledge, secret knowledge; okkultes
Wissen, geheimes Wissen. Category: Religion, dɔɔnin dɔɔnin [ɔ́] variante: dɔgɔ dɔgɔnin,
Think. antonyme: dɔnnijɛ.
dɔɔnindɔɔnin. Adverbe. lentement, petit à
dɔnnijɛ [ɔ]́ Nom. savoir, connaissance, science, savoir petit, un tout petit peu, doucement; slowly,
little by little, gently; langsam, bisschen um
scientifique; knowledge, science, scientific
bisschen, Stück um Stück, nach und nach,
knowledge; Wissen, Wissenschaft,
wissenschaftliches Wissen. Dɔnnijɛ tɛ dɔnni allmählich. Dɔɔnin dɔɔnin, kɔnɔnin bi a ɲaa
dogolen ye. La science n'est pas un savoir la. Petit à petit, l'oiseau fait son nid. Little by
caché. Science is not hidden knowledge. little, a bird makes its nest. Nach und nach
Wissenschaft ist kein verborgenes Wissen. baut der Vogel sein Nest. (Steter Tropfen höhlt
antonyme: dɔnnifin.
den Stein).
dɔrɔ comparer: capalo, ɲɔdɔrɔ. variante: dɔlɔ.
dɔnnikɛla [ɔ́] Jula: lɔnnikɛla. Nom. personne de 1
Variant: biyɛri. Nom. bière, boisson alcoolisée;
savoir (traditionnel ou non), savant; person of
beer, alcoholic drink; Bier, alkoholisches
knowledge (traditional or not), scholar;
Person des Wissens (traditionell oder nicht), Getränk. Category: Types of food.
Gelehrter. Category: Think. dɔrɔ Nom. alcool; alcohol; Alkohol.
2
synonyme: lɔnnikɛla.
Category: Types of food.
29/01/2026 154

dɔrɔbaga dɔwɛrɛ
dɔrɔbaga variante: dɔlɔbaga. Nom. alcool; alcohol; dɔrɔminna [ɔ̀-ɔ̀-ì-á] Morphemes: dɔrɔ-min-na.
Alkohol. synonyme: dɔlɔbaga. variante: dɔlɔminna. Nom. buveur, alcoolique,
dɔrɔdonna Morphemes: dɔlɔ-don-na.
ivrogne; drinker, alcoholic, drunkard;
Alkoholiker, Trinker, Betrunkene.
variante: dɔlɔdonna. Nom. fabricante de bière
Category: Person. synonyme: minkɛla, dɔrɔtɔ.
de mil; brewer of millet beer; Bierherstellerin.
synonyme: dɔlɔdonna. dɔrɔminyɔrɔ Morphemes: dɔlɔ-mìn-yɔrɔ. Nom. bar;
bar; die Bar. Category: Building.
dɔrɔgi [ɔ-́ ɔ́-í] Emprunt de : français.
synonyme: dɔrɔso.
synonyme: cɛkelendɛmɛnan, lajine.
dɔrɔn [ɔ́-ɔ ́] synonyme: dama. part. seulement, seul,
variante: dɔrɔgu. Nom. drogue; drug; Drogen,
Rauschgift.
uniquement, à peine, dès que, juste au moment
où; only, alone, as son as; nur, allein, sobald.
dɔrɔgu Emprunt de : français. variante: dɔrɔgi. Nom. Julakan dɔrɔn bi fɔ yan. On parle seulement
drogue; drug; Droge, Rauschgift. dɔrɔgu le dioula ici. Only Dioula is spoken here. Hier
kɛlɛli lutte contre la drogue. fight against spricht man nur Dioula. O dɔrɔn tɛ. Ce n’est
drugs. Kampf gegen das Rauschgift. pas tout. That’s not all. Das ist nicht alles.
dɔrɔgutala Morphemes: dɔrɔgu-ta-la. Nom. drogué; Muso dɔrɔn nana. La femme seulement est
venue. Only the woman has come. Nur die
drug addict, junkie; Drogensüchtiger, Junkie,
Frau ist gekommen. synonyme: damanta.
der Süchtige. Category: Person.
dɔrɔkoro variante: dɔlɔkoro, dɔrɔminkoro. Nom. dɔrɔɲaga [ɔ̀-ɔ̀-á-á] synonyme: sumanɲaga. Nom.
drêche; residue; Treber, Biertreber,
calebasse à bière; calabash for drinking beer;
Kalebasse zum Bier trinken.
Rückstand.
synonyme: dɔlɔkoro. dɔrɔɲɔ [ɔ̀-ɔ̀-ɔ́] n.comp. mil germé et fermenté (pour la
dɔrɔkɔtɔ [ɔ̀-ɔ̀-ɔ̀-ɔ́] Verbe. être assidu, appliqué, préparation du dolo); germinated millet (to
make beer); gegärte Hirse (für die
tenace, bien s'occuper de; hard working,
Bierherstellung).
assiduous, diligent, take care well; eifrig sein,
emsig sein, sorgfältig, gut umsorgen. I dɔrɔso Morphemes: dɔrɔ-so. variante: dɔlɔso. Nom.
dɔrɔkɔtɔ dɛ ! Sois tenace ! (et applique-toi). bar, cabaret; bar; Bar. Category: Building.
Be tenacious! (and make every effort). Seien synonyme: dɔrɔminyɔrɔ.
Sie hartnäckig! (und bemühen Sie sich). ka dɔrɔtɔ Morphemes: dɔlɔ-tɔ. Nom. ivrogne; drunkard;
misi dɔrɔkɔtɔ bien s'occuper des vaches. take
Betrunkene, Trinker. Category: Person.
good care of the cows. Paß gut auf die Kühe synonyme: dɔrɔminna.
auf.
dɔrɔtɔya Morphemes: dɔrɔtɔ-ya. variante: dɔlɔtɔya.
dɔrɔkɔtɔya Verbe. prendre soin de, prendre au
Nom. ivresse, ivrognerie, alcoolisme;
sérieux, bien s'occuper de; take care of, take
drunkenness, getting drunk, alcoholism;
seriously, take good care of; aufpassen, ernst
Trunkenheit, Trunksucht, Alkoholismus,
nehmen, gut aufpassen. ka baara dɔrɔkɔtɔya
Alkoholabhängigkeit. synonyme: sulenya,
bien s'occuper d'une tâche. handle a task well.
dɔlɔmin.
eine Aufgabe gut bewältigen.
dɔrɔmafɛn variante: dɔlɔmafɛn. Nom. boisson dɔw [ɔ́ù] comparer: dɔ (sg.). pron. certains,
d'autres, des, les uns, quelques, des gens, des
alcoolisée; alcoholic beverage; alkoholisches
Getränk. synonyme: dɔlɔmafɛn, tubabudɔlɔ.
choses; some; einige. Dɔw ka bon, dɔw ka
dɔgɔ. Il y a ceux qui sont grands, et ceux qui
dɔrɔmɛ [ɔ-́ ɔ́-ɛ́] Nom. cinq francs CFA, pièce de cinq
sont petits. (Certaines sont grandes, d'autres
francs, unité de base pour compter l'argent; five sont petites). Some are big, some / others are
francs CFA; fünf Franken CFA. Dɔrɔmɛ fila. small. Einige sind gross und einige /andere
Deux pièces de 5 Francs = 10 francs. Two sind klein.
coins of 5 francs = ten francs. Zwei 5 Franken
dɔwɛrɛ [ɔ́-ɛ́-ɛ́] pron. un autre, autre (indéfini); another
Münze = 10 Franken. Category: Finance.
synonyme: dalasi.
one; ein anderer. A ye dɔwɛrɛ san. Il a acheté
un autre. He bought another one. Er hat ein
dɔrɔmin variante: dɔlɔmin. Nom. alcoolisme; anderes gekauft.
alcoholism; Alkoholismus, Trunksucht,
Alkoholabhängigkeit. synonyme: dɔlɔmin.
29/01/2026 155

dɔyi Dugalenjɔsinan
dɔyi [ɔ]́ variante: jɔyi. Adverbe. doucement, avec duda [ú] Jula: luda. Nom. porte de la cour;
adresse, netteté; gently, skilfully, clearly; sanft, courtyard door; Hoftür, Hoftor.
gekonnt, klar. A bila dɔyi ! Pose-le synonyme: luda.
doucement ! Put it down gently! Legen Sie es
duden [ú] Jula: luden. Morphemes: du-den. Nom.
vorsichtig ab!
personne résidant dans la concession; person
du 1 [ù] Verbe. épaissir, durcir, figer, prendre; residing in the compound, resident of the
thicken, harden, clot, congeal; eindicken, house; Person, die im Gehöft wohnt,
härten, erstarren. Na dura. La sauce a figé. Hausbewohner. synonyme: luden.
The sauce has frozen. Die Soße ist gefroren.
du-duuru num. cinq par cinq, cinq à chacun; five for
du 2 [ù] Verbe. courber, arquer, tordre, aller à each one; fünf für jedes.
travers; bend, twist, slant; biegen, verdrehen,
dufa [ù-á] variante: nuga, duga. Nom. vautour,
krümmen. Sira in dulen numan fɛ. Ce
1
percnoptère brun, charognard; hooded vulture;
chemin oblique vers la gauche. This path
Aasgeier. Category: Bird. neophron monachus.
slants to the left. Dieser Weg verläuft schräg
synonyme: duga .
nach links. 1
du [ú] Jula: lu, luu. Nom. concession, cour, dufa 2 [ú] Nom. divination (par la poussière, par les
3
cauris); divination (by dust, by cowrie shells);
maisonnée, famille; compound, yard,
Weissagung (durch Staub, durch
household, family; Gehöft, Hof, Haushalt,
Familie. I bɛ du dɔn, i tɛ dudadu dɔn. Tu
Kaurimuscheln). Category: Religion.
connais la première cour, tu ne connais pas la dufere [ù-é-é] Nom. supplément gratuit fait à
cour du fond (proverbe). You know the first l'acheteur, cadeau, ristourne; extra given to the
yard, you don't know the back yard (proverb). buyer, gift, rebate, discount; Zugabe als
Man kennt den ersten Hof, den Hinterhof Geschenk an den Käufer, Geschenk, Rabatt.
kennt man nicht (Sprichwort). Yan y'a ka du A ye dufere don n kɔnɔ. Il ma' fait une
ye. Considérez que vous êtes ici comme chez ristourne. He gave me a discount. Er gab mir
vous. Consider yourself at home here. Fühlen einen Rabatt.
Sie sich hier wie zu Hause. synonyme: luu, lu. dufon [ù-ṍ] synonyme: digon. Nom. grand calao
duba 1 • Nom. bénédiction; blessing; Segen. duba ta d'Abyssinie; ground Horn-bill; Hornrabe.
1
X ye bénir. bless. segnen.
Category: Bird. bucorvus abyssinicus.
synonyme: digon.
2 • vt. bénir; bless; segnen. Ala ka duba i ye.
Que Dieu te bénisse. May God bless you. duga 1 [ù-á] variante: nufa. Nom. vautour,
Möge Gott dich segnen. charognard; vulture; Geier. Category: Bird.
neophron monachus; pseudogyps africanus.
duba [ú] Nom. grande famille; big family, enlarged
2 synonyme: dufa .
family; große Familie, erweiterte Familie. An
1
bɛɛ ye duba kelen ye. Nous sommes tous de duga 2 [ú-á] synonyme: yɔrɔ. Nom. endroit; place;
la même grande famille. We are all from the Ort.
same big family. Wir stammen alle aus duga [ù-á] Emprunt de : arabe. variante: duba,
3
derselben großen Familie.
duwa, dubabu, dugawu. 1 • Nom.
dubabu Nom. bénédiction; blessing; Segen. Ala ka bénédiction, vœux; blessing, wish; Segen,
dubabu minɛ ! Que Dieu accepte les Wunsch, Wünsche. Ala ma duga minɛna.
bénédictions ! May God accept the blessings! Que Dieu exhausse tes vœux. May God grant
Möge Gott deine Segnungen annehmen! your wishes. Möge Gott deine Wünsche
erhören.
dubaden Morphemes: duba-den. Nom. celui qui est
2 • Verbe. bénir; to bless; segnen.
béni, qui reçoit des bénédictions; someone who
is blessed; ein gesegneter. Minw bi Ala ka dugaden [ù-à-é] Nom. enfant béni; blessed child;
kuma lamɛn k’a kɛ, olu ye dubadenw le ye. gesegnetes Kind. synonyme: badugawuden.
Ils sont heureux, ceux qui écoutent la parole de dugalen [ù-à-é] Emprunt de : arabe.
Dieu et qui lui obéissent. Blessed are those
1
who hear the word of God and obey it.
variante: dugaren, dugare, dungare. Nom.
Gesegnet sind die, welche Gottes Wort hören miroir; mirror; Spiegel.
und befolgen. Note: Bible: Luka 11.28 dugalen Nom. lentille; lens; Linse, Objektive.
2
dubalen [ù-à-é] variante: dufalen. Nom. Dugalenjɔsinan Nom. essuie glace; wind-shield
figuier-palabres; kind of fig tree; Baumart,
wiper; Scheibenwischer.
Feigenbaum. Category: Tree. ficus thonningii.
29/01/2026 156

dugalenman dugukɛnɛ
dugalenman Nom. commode; chest of drawers; dugubasigi [ù-ù-à-í-í] n.comp. citadin (action de..);
Kommode. Category: Household equipment. city-dweller; Stadtbewohner. dugubasigi bi
dugan variante: duga, dufa. Verbe. 1 • éteindre; turn mɔgɔ danbe tunun
off, put out, extinguish; ausschalten, löschen. U dugubila n.comp. exile; exile; Exil, Verbannung,
ye tasuma kɛlɛ fo ka a dugan. Ils ont Emigration.
combattu l'incendie jusqu’à ce qu'il soit éteint.
dugubiyɛkɛ Nom. bergeronnette pie; kind of bird;
They fought the fire until it was put out. Sie
bekämpften das Feuer, bis es gelöscht war.
Vogelart. Category: Bird. motacilla aguimp.
synonyme: faga . duguci synonyme: dugukolosanin. Nom. petit serpent
1
2 • supprimer (une odeur); remove (an odour); inoffensif; small harmless snake; kleine
(einen Geruch) entfernen, beseitigen. ka kasa harmlose Schlange. Category: Snake.
toli dugan. supprimer les mauvaises odeurs.
leptotyphlops sp..
eliminate bad odours. schlechte Gerüche dugudasiri n.comp. lieu ou animal sacré; sacred place
beseitigen. or sacred animal; heiliger Ort, heiliges Tier.
dugawu [ù-à-ú] Emprunt de : arabe. duguden [ù-ù-ẽ́] Morphemes: dùgu-den.
variante: duwabu, duga. Nom. bénédiction, synonyme: dugulen, dugukɔnɔmɔgɔ. Nom.
vœu, promesse; blessing, good wish, vow, villageois, autochtone, indigène; villager,
promise; Segen, Eid, Schwur, Versprechen, local, native; Eingeborener, Dorfbewohner,
Gelübde. Dugawu bɛ dusukun na, a tɛ da la. Einheimischer.
La vraie bénédiction vient du cœur et non des
dugudenjow Nom. droits civils; civil rights;
lèvres (proverbe). True blessing comes from
the heart and not from the lips (proverb).
Bürgerrechte.
Wahrer Segen kommt vom Herzen und nicht dugudugu Verbe. murmurer, marmonner; murmur,
1
von den Lippen (Sprichwort). mumble; murmeln. Denmisɛnw bɛ
synonyme: dalakan.
mɔgɔkɔrɔbaw dugudugu. Les enfants
dugu [ù-ú] Nom. 1 • village; village; Dorf. An ka marmonnent contre les vieux qui leur parlent.
1
dugu don. C'est notre village. This is our The children mutter against the old people
who speak to them. Die Kinder murren gegen
village. Das ist unser Dorf.
die alten Leute, die mit ihnen sprechen.
2 • pays, région; land, region, area; Land,
Region. Category: Region. dugudugu 2 Nom. sarcelle, canard sauvage; duck (kind
3 • sol, terre; ground, earth; Erdboden, Erde. of), wild duck; Enten Art, Wildente.
Category: Land. Category: Bird. anas querquedula.
dugu [ù] Nom. nuit (dans un certain nombre dugufofo [ù-ù] Nom. pois de terre, pois bambara;
2
d'expressions); night (in a number of ground peas; Erbsen. Category: Food, Grass,
expressions); Nacht (in verschiedenen herb, vine. voandzeia subterranea.
Ausdrücken). Dugu mana tila ... / dugujɛ [ù-ù-ɛ́] Jula: dugusagwɛ. Nom. 1 • aube;
dugutilama fɛ ... au milieu de la nuit ... in the dawn; Dämmerung. Category: Weather.
middle of the night... mitten in der Nacht... synonyme: kɛnɛmilikimalaka, fajiri.
dugu masɔrɔli diyali variante: dugu masɔrɔli 2 • lever du jour; daybreak; Tagesanbruch.
nɔgɔyali. expr. désenclavement; to improve 3 • lendemain matin; next morning; nächste
access, integrate isolated regions; Steigerung Morgen.
der regionalen Attraktivität, verkehrliche dugujɛda variante: dugujɛnda. Nom. petit matin,
Erschliessung und Anbindung einer Region.
point du jour, aube; early morning, daybreak,
dugu yiriwalikulu expr. Comité Villageois du dawn; früher Morgen, Tagesanbruch,
Développement; Village Development Morgendämmerung. Category: Weather.
Committee; Dorfkomitee für Entwicklung. synonyme: kɛnɛtigɛnda, dugusagwɛ, fajirida.
duguba [ù-ù-á] Morphemes: dùgu-ba. Nom. ville, dugukɛnɛ [ù-ù] Nom. place du village, place
grande ville, gros village; town; Stadt. publique; village square, public square;
duguba komini variante: duguba kafo. expr. Dorfplatz, öffentlicher Platz. ... bɛɛ ka ɲɔgɔn
sɔrɔ dugukɛnɛ kan sisan. ... que tous se
commune urbaine; urban municipality, urban
commune; Stadtgemeinde, urbane Gemeinde. rassemblent maintenant sur la place du village.
Category: Government, Region. ...let everyone now gather in the village
square. ...laßt euch jetzt alle auf dem Dorfplatz
versammeln.
29/01/2026 157

dugukolo dugukolokunsi
dugukolo [ù-ù-ó-ó] variante: dugumakolo. Nom. dugukolo maracogo Emprunt de : dugukolo
terre, sol, globe terrestre; soil, earth; Boden, marali. Nom. conservation du sol; soil
Erde. ka dugukolo seen creuser le sol. dig conservation; Bodenerhaltung.
the ground. den Boden ausgraben. Category: Agriculture.
Category: Sky, Land. dugukolo munumunucogo Nom. rotation de la
dugukolo bɔgɔman synonyme: bɔgɔnyɔrɔ. Nom. terre; rotation of the earth; Erdumdrehung,
sol argileux; clay ground; lehmiger Boden. Rotation der Erde. Category: Sky.
Category: Land. dugukolo munumunufan Nom. sens de rotation
dugukolo bɔgɔnman expr. vertisol; soil in which de la terre; direction of the earth rotation;
there is a high content of expansive clay; Richtung der Erdrotation. Category: Sky,
Böden der wechselfeuchten Tropen . Land.
Category: Agriculture, Land. dugukolo munumunuyɔrɔ Nom. axe de rotation;
dugukolo cogoya expr. caractéristique physique du axis of rotation; Rotationsachse.
sol; physical feature of the soil; Category: Sky, Land.
Bodeneigenschaften. Category: Agriculture, dugukolo nagasinin synonyme: farayɔrɔ. Nom.
Land.
litho-sol; lithosol; Lithosol.
dugukolo diya kɔsegili expr. restauration du sol; Category: Agriculture, Land.
soil re-mediation; Wiederherstellung des
dugukolo sɛnɛta [ù-ù-ó-ó ɛ ̀-ɛ̀-á] Nom. sol
Bodens. Category: Agriculture.
agricole; farmland; Ackerland.
dugukolo diyali synonyme: lafisayali. Nom. Category: Agriculture, Land.
amendement du sol; soil amendment;
dugukolo tilanda jiginin See main entry: . Nom.
Bodenverbesserung. Category: Agriculture.
longitude; longitude, degree of longitude;
Dugukolo fánwí tílancogo See main entry: Längengrad. antonyme: dugukolo tilanda
.[ù-ù-ó-ó á-í í] Nom. coordonnées terrestres; koorinin.
land coordinates; Land Koordinaten.
dugukolo tilanda koorinin Nom. Latitude; lines
dugukolo janin Nom. terre aride; barren / dry land;
of latitude, degree of latitude; Breitengrad.
dürres Land. Category: Land. antonyme: dugukolo tilanda jiginin.
dugukolo jukɔrɔji Nom. nappe phréatique; dugukolo tilanni sɛnɛfɛnw cɛ expr. assolement;
groundwater; Grundwasser. Category: Water.
crop rotation; Fruchtfolge.
dugukolo ka jimin Nom. infiltration de l'eau; water Category: Agriculture.
infiltration; Wasserinfiltration. Dugukólo yécogo já Nom. carte physique;
Category: Water.
physical map; Landkarte. Category: Land.
dugukolo kɔgɔman Nom. sol holomorphe; dugukologoman Nom. terre inculte; land that is not
holomorphic soil; holomorpher Boden.
farmed; nicht bebautes Land. Category: Land.
Category: Agriculture.
dugukologwan [ù-ù-ò-ò-ã́] Nom. réchauffement
dugukolo kɔrɔtanin Nom. plateau; plateau;
de la planète; global warming of the planet;
Hochebene, Plateau. Category: Land.
Erderwärmung.
dugukolo labɛncogo
dugukolokalan
synonyme: dugukololɔnnikalan. Nom. relief,
[ù-ù-ò-ò-á-ã́] Morphemes: dugukolo-kala
formation géologique; relief (geography);
n. Nom. géologie; geology; Geologie,
Relief.
Erdkunde. Category: Land.
dugukolo labɛnsigicogo expr. relief; relief,
dugukolokalanla Morphemes: dugukolokalan-la.
topography, land-form; Relief.
Category: Land.
Nom. géologue; geologist; Geologe.
Category: Land.
dugukolo lafiɲɛ See main entry: . expr. jachère;
dugukolokɔnɔsira Nom. passage souterrain;
fallow land; Brachland. Category: Agriculture,
Land.
underground passage, underpass, pedestrian
underpass; Unterführung,
dugukolo magaya Verbe. ameublir (le sol); to Fußgängerunterführung. Category: Travel.
loosen the soil; den Boden lockern.
dugukolokunsi Nom. espèce de plante; kind of
Category: Agriculture.
plant; Pflanze (Art). Category: Grass, herb,
vine. fimbristylis cioniana.
29/01/2026 158

dugukololabɛn dugumɛnɛnin
dugukololabɛn [ù-ù-ò-ò-á-ɛ́] Nom. préparation dugumadagannin Nom. pomme cannelle de
du terrain; ground preparation; Sénégal; cinnamon; Zimtapfel.
Bodenvorbereitung. Category: Agriculture. Category: Food. annona senegalensis.
dugukolonɔn [ù-ù-ò-ò] Nom. érosion; erosion; synonyme: sunsun 1 .
Erosion. Category: Land. dugumadawolo Nom. lèvre inférieure; lower lip;
synonyme: dugukolowulan, nɔmuni. Unterlippe. Category: Body.
dugukolowulan Nom. érosion; erosion; Erosion. dugumafɛn [ù-ù-à-ɛ ́] Morphemes: dugu-ma-fɛn.
synonyme: dugukolonɔn, nɔmuni. Nom. 1 • reptile, serpent (surnom du serpent);
reptile; Reptil. Category: Reptile.
dugukoloyɛrɛyɛrɛ
synonyme: kala .
6
Morphemes: dugukolo-yɛrɛyɛrɛ. Nom. séisme,
2 • terrestre; terrestrial; erdgebunden, irdisch.
tremblement de terre; earthquake; Erdbeben.
Category: Land.
dugumakalan
dugukɔnɔmɔgɔ Morphemes: dugu-kɔnɔ-mɔgɔ. [ù-ù-à] Morphemes: dugu-ma-kalan. Nom.
école primaire, premier cycle, enseignement
synonyme: duguden. Nom. villageois; villager;
primaire, enseignement fondamental; primary
Dorfbewohner.
school; Primarschule, Unterstufe.
dugukɔnɔna Nom. centre ville, intérieur du village; Category: Learn, Building.
centre of town, inside the village; dugumakolo
Stadtzentrum, Innenstadt, Dorfinnern.
[ù-ù-à] Morphemes: dugu-ma-kolo. Nom.
dugukunsigi Nom. espèce d'herbe; kind of grass; terre, sol; earth, soil; Erde, Erdboden. Sa b'i
Grasart. Category: Grass, herb, vine. sɔɔri dugumakolo jukɔrɔ ... Un serpent
sporobolus festivus. s'enfonce sous terre ... A snake burrows
dugulen [ù-ù] Morphemes: dugu-len. underground... Eine Schlange gräbt sich unter
synonyme: duguden. Nom. villageois,
der Erde ein...
autochtone, indigène, habitant; villager, local, dugumana [ù-ù-à] variante: dugumala. Nom. bas,
native, inhabitant, resident; Landeskind, sol; the bottom, ground; Unterseite, der
Dorfbewohner, Einheimischer, Eingeborener, Boden. I bɛ sanfɛla kɔlɔsi ..., n bɛ
Einwohner. Dunanw t'o yɔrɔ dɔn ni dugumana kɔlɔsi. Tu surveilleras le haut, et
dugulenw dama tɛ. Les étrangers ne moi le bas. You will watch the top, and I the
connaissent pas cet endroit, seuls le bottom. Du wirst auf die Oberseite achten und
connaissent les autochtones. Foreigners don't ich auf die Unterseite.
know this place, only locals do. Ausländer
dugumaɲamaku Nom. gingembre; ginger; Ingwer.
kennen diesen Ort nicht, nur Einheimische.
Category: Types of food. synonyme: ɲamaku.
dugulentɔgɔ Nom. surnom, sobriquet; nickname;
Spitzname. dugumaɲɛwolo Nom. paupière inférieure; lower
dugulenya [ù-ù-è] 1 • Verbe. acquérir la citoyenneté,
eyelid; unteres Augenlid. Category: Body.
synonyme: jukɔrɔ ɲafara.
devenir un habitant à part entière; acquire
citizenship, become a full resident; die dugumasara [ù-ù-à] Nom. défaite; defeat;
Staatsbürgerschaft erwerben, vollwertiger Niederlage. San o san, Mali taw bɛ
Einwohner werden.
dugumasara cɛ. Chaque année les équipes du
2 • Nom. citoyenneté; citizenship;
Mali connaissent la défaite. Every year the
Staatsbürgerschaft.
Mali teams experience defeat. Jedes Jahr
dugulukolo lafiɲɛ [ù-ù-ó-ó erleiden die Mannschaften aus Mali
á-í-ɛ́] variante: dugukololafiɲɛ. Nom. la Niederlagen.
jachère; fallow; Brache, Brachfeld. dugumatu Nom. basse forêt; low forest; Buschwald.
Category: Agriculture. Category: Bush, shrub, Agriculture, Land.
duguma [ù-ú-à] 1 • postp. par terre, à terre, au sol; on dugumɛnɛ comparer: dugumɛnɛnin.[ù-ù-ɛ́-ɛ́] Nom.
the ground; auf dem Boden. Dɛbɛ bi duguma. petite fourmi noire; small black ant; schwarze
La natte est par terre. The mat is on the ground. Ameise. Category: Insect.
Die Matte ist auf dem Boden. A bila duguma dugumɛnɛnin comparer: dugumɛnɛ.[ù-ù] Nom.
Mets-le par terre. Put it on the ground. Lege es
fourmi noire; black ant; schwarze Ameise.
auf den Boden.
Category: Insect.
2 • Adverbe. en bas; downstairs; unten.
29/01/2026 159

dugunugu dulen
dugunugu [ù-ú-ù-ú] variante: duguɲugu, dugutigilaka Nom. membre d'une famille titulaire de
duguci, dugurɔsa. Nom. lombric, ver de terre; la chefferie; member of a family holding
earthworm; Erdwurm, Regenwurm. chiefdom; Mitglied einer Familie, die das
Category: Small animals. synonyme: nugu. Häuptlingstum innehat. I b'a dɔn ánw ye
6
dugutigilakaw ye. Tu sais que nous sommes
dugura variante: dugurɛ. Nom. arbre (espèce), dim
de la famille du chef de village. You know we
(grand); Bush mango; Wilde Mango oder
are from the village chief's family. Sie wissen,
Buschmango. Category: Tree. cordyla pinnata.
daß wir aus der Familie des Dorfvorstehers
duguru [ú] Nom. enflure démesurée, œdème; excessive stammen.
swelling, edema; Schwellung. A da fununna dugutigiya [ú-ú-í-í-á] Nom. chefferie traditionnelle,
duguru. Sa bouche a beaucoup enflé. His chefferie du village; traditional
mouth swelled a lot. Sein Mund war stark chiefdom-ship; traditionelles Häuptlingstum.
angeschwollen. Category: Disease. dugutilama [ù-ú-í-á-à] variante: dugutilaman,
dugusagwɛ bambara: dugusɛjɛ. Nom. lendemain, dugutila. Nom. tard dans la nuit, milieu de la
lendemain matin, petit matin (vers 6 heures); nuit; late at night; spät in der Nacht. U sera
the following day, the next day; morgiger Tag,
wɛrɛ la ka bɛn ni dugutilama ye. Ils
anderntags, Tag darauf, morgen früh, früh
arrivèrent au campement au milieu de la nuit.
morgens. synonyme: dugusɛjɛ, dugujɛda.
They arrived at the camp in the middle of the
dugusen [ù-ù] Nom. voyage, voyage itinérant; travel, night. Sie kamen mitten in der Nacht im Lager
travelling journey; Reise. A taara dugusen
an.
fɛ. Il est parti en voyage. He went on a trip. Er dugutilan [ù-ù-í-á] variante: dugutila. Nom.
machte eine Reise. Category: Travel. minuit, tard la nuit (de 23 h à minuit), milieu
synonyme: dugutaga, wayasi. de la nuit; midnight, late at night; Mitternacht,
spät in der Nacht.
dugusɛjɛ [ù-ù-ɛ̀] Jula: dugusagwɛ. Nom. petit
duguyiriwatɔn Nom. association villageoise; village
matin (vers 6 heures), lendemain matin,
lendemain; early morning (around 6 a.m.), association; Dorfverein.
next morning, next day; früher Morgen (ca. 6 dukɛnɛ [ú] Jula: lukɛnɛ. Nom. cour de la concession;
Uhr), am nächsten Morgen, am nächsten Tag.
courtyard; Innenhof. Ni i b'a fɛ ka jo sɔrɔ
Don bɛɛ dugusɛjɛ man kan. Tous les jours
buntenin fɛ, i ka dukɛnɛ faari ka a jɛ. Si tu
n'ont pas le même lendemain (proverbe). Not
every day has the same tomorrow (proverb).
veux avoir raison contre le scorpion, balaie
bien ta cour (proverbe). If you want to be right
Nicht jeder Tag hat morgen das Gleiche
against the scorpion, sweep your courtyard
(Sprichwort). synonyme: dugusagwɛ.
well (proverb). Wenn Sie dem Skorpion die
dugutaa [ù-ù] Jula: dugutaga. Nom. voyage; Stirn bieten wollen, fegen Sie Ihren Innenhof
journey, travel, trip; Reise. gut (Sprichwort). synonyme: lukɛnɛ.
synonyme: dugutaga. dukɔnɔmɔgɔ [ú] Jula: lukɔnɔmɔgɔ. Nom. membre
dugutaga [ù-ù] bambara: dugutaa. de la famille, personne vivant dans la même
synonyme: tagama. variante: dugusen. Nom.
cour; family member, person living in the same
yard; Familienmitglied, Person, die im selben
voyage; travel; Reise. synonyme: dugusen,
Hof lebt. Category: Kinship.
dugutaa.
synonyme: lukɔnɔmɔgɔ.
dugutagagaari Nom. gare voyageurs; passenger duleki synonyme: dereke. variante: dulɔki, dɔlɔki.
railway station; Personenbahnhof.
Nom. chemise, habit, vêtement de dessus; shirt,
Category: Travel, Building.
garment; Hemd, Gewand. Category: Clothing.
dugutagalaw synonyme: tagamayɔrɔ, lɔyɔrɔ. Nom. synonyme: dɔlɔki.
quai des voyageurs; passenger platforms; dulen Nom. hameçon; hock, fishing hock;
Reisezugbahnsteig, Passagiergehsteig.
1
Angelhaken. Category: Hunt and fish.
Category: Travel.
synonyme: dolenkisɛ.
dugutagamɔbili Nom. transport en commun; public
dulen [ú] 1 • Verbe. faire de l'ombre; cast a shadow;
transport; öffentlichen Transport, öffentliche 2
Verkehrsmittel. Category: Travel. einen Schatten werfen.
dugutigi [ù-ù-í-í] Morphemes: dùgu-tigi. n.comp.
chef du village; village chief; Dorfchef,
Häuptling. Category: Government, Person.
29/01/2026 160

dulenbereba dumuni bayɛlɛmali
2 • Nom. ombre; shadow; Schatten. N bɛna n 2 • dépenser; spend, pay out, expend;
da o jiri dulen na. Je me coucherai à l'ombre ausgeben, verbrauchen. U ka wari bɛɛ dumu.
de cet arbre. I will lie down in the shade of this Ils ont dépensé tout l'argent. They spent all the
tree. Ich werde mich in den Schatten dieses money. Sie haben alles Geld ausgegeben.
Baumes legen. synonyme: suma . 3 • vaincre; overcome, defeat, conquer, beat;
4
besiegen, überwinden, bezwingen.
dulenbereba Nom. canne à mouche; fishing rod;
4 • détourner (argent), bouffer (argent), voler;
Fischerrute. Category: Hunt and fish. divert (money), misappropriate, steal money;
duloki See main entry: .[ù-ɔ̀-í] Nom. chemise: abwenden (Geld), stehlen (Geld).
vêtement qui couvre la partie supérieure du 5 • tromper qqn, rouler qqn; cheat; reinlegen.
corps; shirt: any piece of clothing which dumubali Morphemes: dumu-bali. Nom.
covers the upper part of the body; hemd:
immangeable, qui ne doit être consommé;
kleidung für den oberen Teil des Körpers.
uneatable; unessbar, ungeniessbar.
Category: Clothing.
synonyme: dunbali.
dulokiba Morphemes: dulɔki-ba. Nom. grand boubou;
dumuduguma Nom. personnel, privé, propre,
long garment; Langes Herrenkleid.
Category: Clothing. synonyme: dɔlɔkiba.
intime; personal, private, own, intimate;
persönliche, private, eigene, intime. Nin ye n
dulon [ú-ṍ] variante: dolon. vt. 1 • pendre,
ka dumuduguma ye. C'est ma part
accrocher, suspendre; hang, hang out; hängen, personnelle. This is my personal part. Das ist
aufhängen, aussetzen. ka dulon juru la mein persönlicher Anteil.
suspendre avec une corde. to hang on a rope. synonyme: dunduguma.
an einer Schnur hängen. I bɛ an hakili
dumunfɛ [ú-ú-ɛ́] Nom. parasite; parasite; Parasit,
dulonnin to fo tuma jumɛn ? Combien de
Schmarotzer. synonyme: dunnfɛ.
temps nous tiendras-tu encore en haleine ?
How long will you keep us in suspense? Wie dumunfɛbana Nom. parasitose; parasitosis;
lange läßt du uns im Ungewissen? Note: Bible:
Parasiten -krankheit. Category: Disease.
Yuhana 10.24
2 • dépendre; depend; abhängen. Diɲɛ fɛn bɛɛ
dumunfɛfaga synonyme: banakisɛfaga, tɛtɛban.
dulonnen bɛ barika la. Toute chose dans la
Nom. déparasitage; getting rid of parasites; von
Parasiten befreien.
vie dépend des bénédictions qu'on a reçues
(proverbe). Everything in life depends on the dumunfɛfagafura
blessings we have received (proverb). Alles synonyme: fɛnɲanamanfaganan. Nom.
im Leben hängt von den Segnungen ab, die wir
pesticide; pesticide; Pestizid, Insektengift.
erhalten haben (Sprichwort).
dumunfɛtumu [ú-ú-ɛ̀-ù-ú] Nom. nématode;
duman [ú-ã́] comparer: di. variante: diman. adj.
nematode; Rundwürmer, Nematoden.
1 • bon, agréable; good, pleasant, nice; gut,
Category: Agriculture.
angenehm. Na duman bɛɛ lajɛrɛlen ju ye ji
dumuni [ú-ú-í] synonyme: balo. Nom. 1 • nourriture,
ye. L'eau est à la base de toute bonne sauce
repas, aliment, consommation, vivres, action
(proverbe). Water is the basis of any good
de manger; food, meal, food supplies, eating;
sauce (proverb). Wasser ist die Basis jeder
guten Soße (Sprichwort).
Nahrung, ein Essen. ka dumuni kɛ manger.
2 • facile; easy; einfach.
eat. essen. Na dumuni kɛ ! / Na an ka
3 • utile; useful, helpful; nützlich, hilfreich.
dumuni kɛ ! Viens manger ! Come and eat!
4 • efficace; effective, efficient; wirksam, Komm wir essen! Dumuni sigira / dumuni
effizient, wirkungsvoll. fura duman mɔna. Le repas est prêt. The food is ready.
médicament efficace. effective medicine. Das Essen ist bereit. Category: Food.
wirksame Medizin. synonyme: balo 2 .
5 • aiguisé; sharpened; geschärft, geschliffen. 2 • donner à manger; give food, feed; Essen
da duman bien aiguisé. well sharpened. gut geben, füttern. N bɛ kamalen in dumuni ... Je
geschärft. donne à manger à ce jeune homme ... I feed
duminiba [ú] Morphemes: dumini-ba. Nom. festin; this young man... Ich füttere diesen jungen
Mann...
feast; Gastmahl.
dumuni bayɛlɛmali variante: dumuniyɛlɛma. Nom.
dumu [ú-ú] Verbe. 1 • manger; eat; essen. A ka malo
digestion; digestion; Verdauung.
dumu. Il a mangé du riz. He ate rice. Er hat
synonyme: dumuniyɛlɛma.
Reis gegessen. synonyme: dun.
5
29/01/2026 161

dumuni daganin dun
dumuni daganin Nom. aliment conseillé; dumunikɛminan synonyme: koon, koron.
recommended balanced healthy food; variante: dumunikɛminɛn. Nom. mangeoire,
ausgeglichene Ernährung. Category: Food. toute ustensile pour la nourriture; crib, all
dumuni di kura ye Verbe. réalimenter; restart utensils for food; Krippe, alle Geräte für das
feeding; die Ernährung wieder aufnehmen.
Essen. Category: Food, Agriculture.
Category: Food.
synonyme: dumunikɛminɛn.
dumuni kasadiyanan Nom. arôme; flavoring, dumunikɛminanw Nom. couvert; place setting;
aroma; Geschmack, Aroma. Besteck, Gedeck. Category: Household
equipment.
dumuni kɛ [ú-ú-í ɛ́] Verbe. manger; eat; essen.
dumunikɛminɛn [ú] Nom. 1 • mangeoire; manger;
Denmisɛnw bi dumuni kɛra. Les enfants sont
en train de manger. The children are eating.
Krippe, Trog. synonyme: dumunikɛminan,
Die Kinder sind am Essen. waaro.
dumuni nafa [ú-ú-í à-á] synonyme: dumuni 2 • toute ustensile pour la nourriture; any
utensil for food; jedes Utensil zum Essen.
lɔyɔrɔ bonya. Nom. valeur nutritionnelle;
nutritional value; Ernährungswert.
dumunikɛyɔrɔ Morphemes: dumuni-kɛ-yɔrɔ. Nom.
restaurant, salle à manger; restaurant, dining
dumuni nɛɛmayɔrɔ expr. nutriment; nutrient;
room; Gaststube, Restaurant, Esszimmer,
Nährstoff. Category: Food. synonyme: balofɛn Speisesaal. tubabu ka dumunikɛyɔrɔ
nafamanyɔrɔ, fari balofɛn. restaurant (occidental). Western-style
dumuni siyaw Nom. catégorie d'aliments, groupes restaurant. Europäisches Restaurant.
Category: Building.
d'aliments; food category;
Lebensmittelkategorie. dumunimɔgɔ [ú] variante: dumuniŋana. Nom.
dumuni tananin synonyme: dumuni dagabali. Nom. gourmand, gros mangeur, glouton; gourmet,
gourmand, glutton; Schlemmer, Vielfrass.
tabou alimentaire; food taboo, food restriction;
synonyme: dumuniden.
Essverbot, Nahrungstabu.
dumuni tuluman Nom. aliment lipide; fats; Fette dumuninege [ú] Nom. faim; hunger; Hunger.
(Nahrung). Category: Food. synonyme: kɔngɔ, cɛkisɛbana.
dumuniden [ú] Nom. gourmand; gourmand; dumuniɲuman variante: dumunidafanin. Nom.
Gourmand, Vielfraß. synonyme: dumunimɔgɔ, repas équilibré; balanced meal, healthy meal;
nugutɔ, bɛɛdun, nuguma.
ausgewogene Mahlzeit. Category: Food.
dumunisira Nom. voie digestive; alimentary canal
dumunidɛsɛ [ú] Nom. pénurie alimentaire; food
/tract; Verdauungsweg. Category: Body.
shortage; Nahrungsmangel,
synonyme: sumanyɛlɛmaminan.
Nahrungsknappheit.
dumunidɛsɛbana [ú] Nom. malnutrition; dumunitɔ Morphemes: dumuni-tɔ.
malnutrition; Unterernährung, Fehlernährung. variante: dumunitɔɔ. Nom. restant de
Category: Disease. nourriture; leftover food; Essensreste.
dumunifɛn [ú] Morphemes: dumuni-fɛn. dumuniwolomabali Nom. omnivore; omnivorous;
variante: dumunimafɛn. Nom. aliment, Allesfresser.
nourriture; foodstuff, nutrition, food; Nahrung, dumuniyɛlɛma [ú] Nom. digestion; digestion;
Esswaren, Nahrungsmittel, Lebensmittel,
Verdauung. Category: Food.
Speise. Category: Food. synonyme: dunfɛn. synonyme: dumuni bayɛlɛmali.
dumunifɛnsaniya Nom. hygiène alimentaire; food dun [ũ̀] variante: duun. vt. insecte qui ronge le
1
hygiene; Lebensmittelhygiene.
bois, ver du bois; insect that eats wood,
Category: Food. woodworm; Insekt das Holz frißt, Holzwurm.
dumunikɛbaliya Morphemes: dumuni-kɛ-bali-ya. Category: Insect.
Nom. manque d’appétit; lack of appetite; dun [ũ̀] 1 • adj.pred. être profond; to be deep; tief
2
Appetitmangel. Category: Disease. sein. Ni jiyɔrɔ min man dun, i bɛ bɔ de ta
dumunikɛla Morphemes: dumuni-kɛ-la. Nom. yen. Pour les endroits qui ne sont pas
convive; eater; Esser. profonds, on se sert de la perche. For places
dumunikɛlaba Morphemes: dumuni-kɛla-ba. Nom. that are not deep, we use the pole. Für Stellen,
die nicht tief sind, verwenden wir die Stange.
gros mangeur; big eater; grosser Esser.
synonyme: kɔnɔdun.
29/01/2026 162

dun dunankili
2 • adj.pred. grave; serious, severe, critical; dun [ú] variante: duku. Nom. mammite, cancer;
6
schwerwiegend, schlimm. Ko bɛ mɔgɔ sɔrɔ
mastitis, cancer; Mastitis, Krebs.
min kɔnɔ ka dun ni nin ye ... Il arrive des Category: Disease.
choses beaucoup plus graves que celle-là ...
dun Nom. verre; glass; Glas. Lupu ye dun ye ... La
Much more serious things happen than this... 7
Es passieren viel schlimmere Dinge als das...
loupe c'est du verre ... The magnifying glass is
glass... Die Lupe ist aus Glas... synonyme: vɛri.
3 • Nom. endroit profond; deep place; tiefe
Stelle. I sera dun na sa, n b'i bila yan. Tu est dunamangola synonyme: siyawolomala. Nom.
arrivé à l'endroit profond, je te laisse ici. You xénophobe; xenophobe; Fremdenhasser.
have arrived at the deep place, I leave you
here. Du bist am tiefen Ort angekommen, ich
dunamangoya synonyme: siyawolomajugu. Nom.
lasse dich hier zurück. xénophobie; xenophobia; Fremdenhass,
Fremdenfeindlichkeit.
dun [ù] variante: don. part. contraste: cependant,
3
dunan [ú-ã́] Nom. étranger, visiteur, hôte; visitor,
pourtant, or, mais, quant à; contrast: however,
nevertheless, though, but; Kontrast: allerdings, stranger, foreigner; Fremder, Gast, Besucher.
dennoch, doch, jedoch, aber. ... n dun y'a dɔn Dunan ɲɛkalamɛnɛ ye a jatigi ye. Pour
n tɛ sa habada ! ... mais moi je sais qu'en l'étranger, l'hôte est comme une torche qui
aucun cas je ne veux mourir ! ...but I know that
éclaire (proverbe). For the stranger, the host
under no circumstances do I want to die!
is like a torch that sheds light (proverb). Für
den Fremden ist der Gastgeber wie eine
...aber ich weiß, daß ich auf keinen Fall sterben
möchte! synonyme: li .
Fackel, die Licht spendet (Sprichwort).
4
Category: Person. synonyme: lonan.
dun [ú] variante: duun, jun. Nom. jarre d'eau;
4 dunanba [ú-ã-́ á] n.comp. hôte de marque;
water pot; Wasserkrug. I ka dun filɛ ! I ka ba
distinguished guest; der hohe Gast, verehrter
filɛ ! Regarde où est ta jarre, et regarde où est
Gast. Category: Person.
ta chèvre ! (proverbe). Look where your
dunandon Nom. immigration; immigration;
water jar is, and look where your goat is!
(proverb). Schauen Sie, wo Ihr Wasserkrug ist, Einwanderung, Zuwanderung, Immigration.
und schauen Sie, wo Ihre Ziege ist! dunanfana [ú-ã-́ á-á] n.comp. repas réservé à un
(Sprichwort). Category: Container.
hôte; meal for a guest; Gastmahl.
dun [ú] Verbe. 1 • manger; eat; essen. A dun sa !
5 dunanjigin [ú] Verbe. accueillir, bien recevoir;
Mange-le donc ! So eat it! Also iß es!
welcome, receive well; willkommen, gut
synonyme: dumu.
empfange. A dunanjiginra Musa ka so. Il a
2 • dévorer (en sorcellerie); devour (in été reçu dans la maison de Moussa. He was
witchcraft); verschlingen (in Hexerei). ... ko a received in Moussa's house. Er wurde in
b'a den dun. ... qu'elle dévore son enfant. Moussas Haus empfangen.
...that she devours her child. ...daß sie ihr Kind dunanjiginso [ú] comparer: lotɛli.
verschlingt.
Morphemes: dunan-jigin-so.
3 • vaincre; defeat, overcome, conquer;
besiegen. Ŋana ye ŋana dun, balan dɔ kɛra.
variante: dunanjigiso. Nom. hôtel, auberge,
maison de passage, campement, chambre de
Un héros a eu raison d'un héros, l'accrochage
passage, chambre d'hôte; hotel, guest house,
est terminé (proverbe). A hero got the better of
inn, guest room; Gasthof, Wirtshaus, Hotel,
a hero, the skirmish is over (proverb). Hat ein
Gästezimmer. Category: Building.
Held einen Helden besiegt, ist das Gefecht
vorbei (Sprichwort). dunanjiginyɔrɔ [ú] variante: dunanjigiyɔrɔ. Nom.
4 • dépenser, détourner (argent), voler; spend, hôtel; hotel, guest house, inn; Gasthof,
misappropriate (money), steal; Geld Wirtschaft, Hotel. Category: Building.
ausgeben, zweckentfremden (Geld), Geld
dunankɛ Nom. étranger, visiteur; stranger, visitor;
veruntreuen, stehlen. ka wari dun dépenser,
gaspiller ou détourner l'argent. spend, waste or
Fremder, Besucher. ... dunankɛ min dalen bɛ
misappropriate money. Geld ausgeben, jirisun kɔrɔ... ... l'étranger qui est couche' sous
verschwenden oder zweckentfremden. l'arbre... ...the stranger who is lying under the
5 • tromper; deceive, mislead, fool; täuschen. I
tree... ...der Fremde, der unter dem Baum
liegt...
ye ne dun ! Tu m'as roulé ! You tricked me!
Du hast mich ausgetrickst! dunankili [ú] Nom. coléoptère, cétoine; beetles;
Käfer. pachnoda consentanca.
29/01/2026 163

dunanya dunkafa
dunanya [ú] Nom. extranéité, état de celui qui est dunfɛn [ú] Nom. aliment, nourriture; food,
étranger; foreignness; Fremdartigkeit. nourishment; Nahrung. Kolo min ye namakɛ
Dunanya man ɲi. Il n'est pas bon d'être un bali, wulukɛ dunfɛn tɛ. L'os qui a tenu en
étranger. It is not good to be a foreigner. Es ist échec une hyène ne peut servir de nourriture
nicht gut, ein Ausländer zu sein. pour le chien (proverbe). The bone that kept a
dunbali Nom. immangeable, qui ne peut (ou ne doit) hyena in check cannot serve as food for the
dog (proverb). Der Knochen, der eine Hyäne
être consommé; inedible, which cannot (or
in Schach hielt, kann dem Hund nicht als
must not) be consumed; ungenießbar, was
nicht verzehrt werden kann (oder darf).
Futter dienen (Sprichwort). Category: Food.
synonyme: dumubali.
synonyme: dumunifɛn.
dundala [ú] Morphemes: dun-da-la. Nom.
dunfin [ù] Nom. abîme; abyss; Abgrund.
consommable; consumable, edible; eßbar. dunge [ù] Nom. 1 • peuple, nation, communauté;
Sogo kɛnɛ tɛ sɔn dundala ma. La viande people, nation, community; Volk, Nation,
fraîche ne peut être consommée telle quelle. Gemeinschaft. silamɛdungew les nations
Fresh meat cannot be consumed as is. Frisches islamiques. Islamic nations. Islamische
Fleisch kann nicht so verzehrt werden. Nationen.
dunden variante: ndunden. Nom. bouteille, canari à 2 • adepte, fidèle, partisan; follower, adherent,
col étroit, gargoulette; bottle, recipient with a partisan; Anhänger. balikukalan dugenw les
narrow neck; Flasche, Gefäss mit engem Hals. adeptes de l'alphabétisation des adultes. adult
Category: Container. synonyme: buteli. literacy enthusiasts. Erwachsene, die sich für
Alphabetisierung begeistern.
dunduguma [ú] Nom. 1 • personnel, privé, propre;
dungɔ [ù-ɔ́] variante: dɔngɔ, dungɔn. Nom. choix,
personal, private, own; persönlich, privat,
eigen. synonyme: dumuduguma.
goût, bon plaisir, désire; choice, taste,
pleasure, desire; Wahl, Geschmack,
2 • intime; intimate; intim. To dunduguma ka
Verlangen. Faantanya tɛ mɔgɔ faga, nka a
fisa forobato ye. Le to familiale vaut mieux
b'a dungɔko sa. La pauvreté ne tue pas, mais
que le to communautaire (proverbe). The
elle empêche de satisfaire ses désirs
family porridge is better than the community
(proverbe). Poverty does not kill, but it
porridge (proverb). Der private Familienbrei
prevents you from satisfying your desires
ist besser als die Gemeinschaftsbrei
(proverb). Armut tötet nicht, aber sie hindert
(Sprichwort).
dich daran, deine Wünsche zu befriedigen
dundun [ũ̀-ṹ] variante: dunun. Nom. tam-tam, (Sprichwort).
tambour; drum; Trommel. Category: Musical dungɔna [ù-ɔ̀-á] Nom. bon plaisir, goût; good
instrument. synonyme: dunun.
pleasure, taste; Guter Genuß, Geschmack. A
dundunba n.comp. grosse caisse; big box, case, dungɔna ye wari ye. Il aime l'argent. He likes
1
chest; grosse Kiste, grosse Trommel. money. Er mag Geld.
Category: Container. duniɲa Nom. monde, univers; world, universe; Welt,
dundunba 2 [ù-ù-á] Nom. grand tambour; big drum; Universum. Category: Land. synonyme: diɲɛ.
grosse Trommel. Category: Musical
duniɲa jamakulu synonyme: duniɲa diɲɛ mumɛ
instrument.
kunkan jɛnkuluba. variante: diɲɛ jamakulu.
dundunfɔkala Nom. mailloche de tambour; beater
Nom. communauté internationale;
for drum; Trommelschläger.
international community; internationale
Category: Musical instrument. Gemeinschaft.
dundunfɔla Nom. joueur du tambour, tambourinaire; dunkafa [ṹ-à-á] Nom. 1 • autosuffisance alimentaire,
drummer; Trommler.
suffisance alimentaire; nutritional
dundunkala Nom. guêpe maçonne; mud-wasp; self-sufficiency,, food sufficiency;
Lehmwespe. Category: Insect.
Selbstversorgung in Sachen Ernährung,
synonyme: dununkala, dɛndɛnkirinti. Nahrungsmittelversorgung. Du tɛ se ka
yiriwa ni dunkafa tɛ. La famille ne peut se
développer s'il n'y a pas la suffisance
alimentaire. The family cannot develop if there
is not sufficient food. Ohne ausreichend
Nahrung kann sich die Familie nicht
entwickeln. Category: Food.
29/01/2026 164

dunkojugu dus
2 • rassasiement, satiété; satiation, satiety; 2 • Verbe. être ou devenir profond; be or get
Sättigung. deep; tief sein oder tief werden. Kɔlɔn
dunkojugu Nom. dépensier, malhonnête; spendthrift, dalasigi b'a dunya. Le puits s'approfondit
dishonest; verschwenderisch, unehrlich. A grâce à ceux qui sont assis au bord (proverbe),
The well deepens because of those who sit on
bilala ɲɛmɔgɔya la, nka mɔgɔ dunkojuguba
the edge (proverb), Der Brunnen wird tiefer
don. Il a été mis à la direction, mais c'est
wegen derer, die am Rande sitzen
quelqu'un de très malhonnête. He was put in (Sprichwort),
charge, but he is a very dishonest person. Ihm
dura Emprunt de : français. droit; straight; gerade.
wurde die Verantwortung übertragen, aber er
ist eine sehr unehrliche Person. duru [ù] variante: duli, duruku, duuli, duuru.
dunman [ù-ã́] adj. profond; deep; tief. ji dunman Verbe. 1 • se placer sous une charge pour la
l'eau profonde. deep water. tiefes Wasser. soulever, soulever; place oneself under a load
synonyme: kɔnɔdun. to lift it, lift; sich unter eine Last stellen, um sie
anzuheben, heben. I duru ɲɔbɔrɛ kɔrɔ.
dunnfɛ [ú] Morphemes: dun-n-fɛ. Nom. parasite,
Soulève le sac de mil. Lift the bag of millet.
pique-assiette; parasite, free-loader; Parasit, Heben Sie den Hirsesack an.
Trittbrettfahrer. Dumuni tobi ka caya, mɔgɔ 2 • supporter; support; unterstützen.
t'a dɔn ni dunnfɛ dɔ bɛ na. Prépare beaucoup
duruntu [ù-ù] Verbe. 1 • disperser, se répandre,
de nourriture, on ne sait pas s'il ne viendra pas
disséminer; disperse, spread, disseminate;
quelque pique-assiette. Prepare a lot of food,
we don't know if some free-loader won't come.
ausbreiten, verbreiten. Kuma duruntulen bɛ.
Bereiten Sie viel Essen vor, wir wissen nicht, La parole se répand. The word is spreading.
ob nicht irgendein Trittbrettfahrer kommt. Das Wort verbreitet sich. synonyme: jɛnsɛn.
synonyme: nabɛlɛ, dumunfɛ. 2 • animer; lead; führen, leiten. ka baro
dunta [ú] Morphemes: dun-ta. Nom. 1 • destiné à la duruntu animer une discussion. lead a
discussion. eine Diskussion führen.
consommation, partie consommable; intended
for consumption, consumable part; zum 3 • mélanger, brouiller, troubler; mix, confuse,
Verzehr bestimmt, Verbrauchsteil. disturb; vermischen, verwirren, stören.
2 • nourriture, alimentation; food, diet; 4 • ficher, foutre, frapper; beat, hit, knock;
Nahrung, Essen, Diät. Category: Food. verprügeln, schlagen. N y'u duruntu ɲɔgɔn
dunun [ù] Nom. tambour; drum; Trommel. Dunun na. Je leur ai foutu une sacré volée ! I gave
diyatuma bɛ bɛn a faratuma ma. C'est quand
them a hell of a beating! Ich habe sie ganz
schön verprügelt!
il résonne le mieux que le tambour crève
(proverbe). It is when it resonates best that the durusi [ù-ù] Emprunt de : arabe. vt. mémoriser,
drum bursts (proverb). Wenn es am besten apprendre par cœur, retenir qqch; memorize,
schwingt, platzt die Trommel (Sprichwort). learn by heart; auswendig lernen, speichern,
Category: Musical instrument. sich merken. ka kilisi durusi apprendre une
synonyme: dundun. formule secrète par cœur. learn a secret
dununfɔla [ù-ù-ɔ̀-á] Nom. tambourinaire, joueur de formula by heart. Lerne eine Geheimformel
auswendig. Category: Learn.
tambour; drum player; Schlagzeuger,
Trommler. synonyme: wolofɔla. durututu Adverbe. fortement, en parlant d'un bruit,
d'une parole, d'une odeur qui se répandent;
dununkala variante: dununkalan. Nom.
strongly, speaking of a noise, a word, a smell
guêpe-maçonne; mud wasp; Mauerwespe. that spreads; stark, von einem Geräusch,
Category: Insect. synonyme: dɛnɛnbakirinti, einem Wort, einem Geruch sprechen, der sich
dundunkala, dɛndɛnkirinti. ausbreitet. A kumana durututu ! Il na' pas
dunya [ù-á] Morphemes: dùn-ya. 1 • Nom.
arrêté de bavarder ! He hasn't stopped
chatting! Er hat nicht aufgehört zu schwatzen!
profondeur; depth; Tiefe. kɔ dunya la
ka buru fyɛ durututu. souffler de la trompette
profondeur du marigot. the depth of the river.
très fort. blow the trumpet very loudly. Blasen
die Tiefe des Flusses.
Sie die Trompete sehr laut.
dus [ú] Adverbe. très mauvais (pour une odeur);
very bad (for a smell); sehr schlecht (für den
Geruch). A suma ka go dus ! Ça sent très
mauvais ! It smells very bad! Es riecht sehr
schlecht!
29/01/2026 165

dusu dusukunbana
dusu [ù-ú] Nom. 1 • cœur (au sens figuré), courage, 3 • encourager, réconforter; encourage,
comfort; ermutigen, trösten. O ye ko ye, min
sentiment, passion; heart, courage, feeling,
passion; Herz, Mut, Gefühl, Passion, bɛ kɔfɛmɔgɔ dusugɛlɛya. C'est quelque
Leidenschaft. A dusu kasinin lo. Il est très chose qui encourage celui qui est derrière. It's
triste. He is very sad/grieving. Er ist sehr something that encourages the one behind it.
traurig. A ye dusu don a den kɔnɔ ... Il a
Es ist etwas, das denjenigen, der dahinter
steckt, ermutigt.
encouragé son enfant ... He encouraged his
child... Er ermutigte sein Kind... dusukasi [ù-ù-á-í] comparer: haaminako.
Category: Body. synonyme: sɔnkun 1 . variante: dusudimi, dusuja. n.comp.
2 • colère; anger; Zorn, Wut. Dusu ye ji goni 1 • chagrin, peine, douleur morale, affliction;
ye, a tɛ minnɔgɔ ban. La colère est comme grief, sorrow, trouble, affliction; Kummer,
Gram, Klage, Schmerz, Betrübnis. ... muso
l'eau chaude, elle ne calme pas la soif
(proverbe). Anger is like hot water, it does fana na dusukasi ... ... sa femme à son tour
not quench thirst (proverb). Wut ist wie heißes aura du chagrin ... ...his wife in turn will be
Wasser, sie löscht nicht den Durst sad... ...seine Frau wiederum wird traurig
(Sprichwort). sein... synonyme: dusudimin.
3 • se fâcher; get angry, cross; wütend werden, 2 • déception, amertume, colère;
sich aufregen. Dugutigi, e fana dusu ka teli disappointment, bitterness, anger;
kojugu ! Mais toi, chef de village, vraiment tu Enttäuschung, Bitterkeit, Zorn.
te fâches trop vite. But you, village chief, you dusukasibagatɔ Nom. peiné, chagriné, éploré; hurt
really get angry too quickly. Aber Sie,
one, bereaved one; Betroffene, Trauernde. Ni i
Dorfvorsteher, werden wirklich zu schnell
wütend.
ko dusukasibagatɔ ma ko a ka tasuma
mana, n'a daji ma a sa, a ɲɛji b'a sa. Quand
dusuba Nom. susceptible, coléreux, irascible; touchy,
on dit à un éploré d'allumer le feu, si sa salive
angry; empfindlich, heikel, überempfindlich,
ne l'éteint pas, ses larmes ;'éteindront
wütend. Mɔgɔ dusuba don. C'est une
(proverbe). When we tell a grieving person to
personne coléreuse. He's an angry person. Er light the fire, if his saliva does not extinguish
ist ein wütender Mensch. it, his tears will extinguish it (proverb). Wenn
dusubaya Nom. susceptibilité, défaut de celui qui est wir einem trauernden Menschen sagen, er solle
das Feuer anzünden, werden seine Tränen es
coléreux; touchiness; Empfindlichkeit,
löschen, wenn sein Speichel es nicht löscht
Reizbarkeit.
(Sprichwort).
dusudimin variante: dusuja. Nom. chagrin, peine;
dusukun [ù-ù-ú] variante: dasukolo. Nom.
sorrow; Trauer. A saya dusudimin bɛ n na.
1 • cœur, courage; heart, courage; Herz, Mut.
J'ai du chagrin qu'il soit mort. I'm sad that he
Dugawu bɛ dasukun na, a tɛ da la. La vraie
died. Ich bin traurig, daß er gestorben ist.
bénédiction vient du cœur et non des lèvres
synonyme: dusukasi.
(proverbe). True blessing comes from the heart
dusufaga Nom. patience, calme, pondération; and not from the lips (proverb). Wahrer Segen
kommt vom Herzen und nicht von den Lippen
patience, calm, weighting; Geduld, Ruhe,
Abwägung. Hadamadenw marali tɛ ɲɛ
(Sprichwort). Category: Body.
synonyme: sɔnkun .
dusufaga kɔ. On ne peut diriger les hommes 1
sans patience. We cannot lead people without 2 • colère; anger, wrath; Zorn, Wut.
patience. Wir können Menschen nicht ohne Dusukun bɛ mɔgɔ tiɲɛ, a tɛ mɔgɔ ɲɛ. La
Geduld führen. colère mène les gens à l'échec, et non à la
réussite (proverbe). Anger leads people to
dusugɛlɛya Jula: dusugwɛlɛya. Nom. 1 • dureté,
failure, not success (proverb). Wut führt
fermeté; hardness, firmness; Härte, Menschen zum Scheitern, nicht zum Erfolg
Unnachgiebigkeit, Festigkeit. An ye e ka (Sprichwort).
dusugɛlɛya dɔn ... Nous avons reconnu ta dusukunbana [ù-ù-ù] variante: dusukundimin,
fermeté ... We recognized your firmness... Wir
dusukunadimin. Nom. cardiopathie, mal de
haben Ihre Festigkeit erkannt...
cœur, palpitations cardiaques; heart condition,
2 • énergie, vigueur, solidité; energy, vigour,
heart disease; Herzleiden. Category: Disease.
solidity; Energie, Festigkeit.
29/01/2026 166

dusukunnata duurudaara
dusukunnata comparer: kɔnɔnako1 , fɛko. Nom. dusumanɔ variante: dusumanjɔ, dusumantɔ. Verbe.
sentiments, opinion; feelings, opinion; être patient, être doux, être calme; be patient,
Gefühle, Meinung. k'i dusukunnata fɔ. dire be gentle, be calm; geduldig, sanft, ruhig sein.
son opinion. say your opinion. sagen Sie Ihre Ni i bɛ mɔgɔ mara, f'i k'i dusumanɔ. Si tu
Meinung. commandes quelqu'un, il faut être calme. If
dusukunntan variante: dusukuntan, dusuntan.
you order someone, you have to be calm.
Wenn Sie jemandem etwas befehlen, müssen
Nom. sans courage, lâche, peureux; without
Sie ruhig sein.
courage, coward, fearful person; mutlos,
Feigling, Angsthase. dusumantɔya Nom. patience, calme; patience, calm;
dusukunntanya variante: dusukuntanya. Nom.
Geduld, Ruhe.
paresse, lâcheté, poltronnerie; laziness, dusuɲugun [ù-ù] Nom. nausée; nausea; Brechreiz,
cowardliness; Faulheit, Trägheit, Feigheit. Übelkeit. Kasa goman ye dusuɲugun bila a
Dɔgɔya tɛ kɛlɛ sa, dusukunntanya b'a sa. la. L'odeur désagréable lui a donné la nausée.
La faiblesse n'empêche pas de combattre, mais The unpleasant smell made him nauseous. Der
la lâcheté si (proverbe). Weakness does not unangenehme Geruch verursachte ihm
prevent you from fighting, but cowardice does Übelkeit. synonyme: jirikɔrɔtali.
(proverb). Schwäche hindert dich nicht am
Kämpfen, Feigheit hingegen schon dususuma Verbe. apaiser, calmer, rendre serein;
(Sprichwort). soothe, calm, serene; beruhigen, ruhig,
dusukunyɛrɛyɛrɛ gelassen. Lagabo fɛ teriya tɛ mɔgɔ
Morphemes: dusu-kun-yɛrɛ-yɛrɛ. Nom.
dususuma. L'amitié avec un vaurien ne rend
pas serein. Friendship with a scoundrel doesn't
1 • palpitations cardiaques; heart palpitations;
Herzklopfen.
make you feel calm. Die Freundschaft mit
einem Schurken läßt dich nicht ruhig werden.
2 • battements de cœur; heartbeat; Herzschlag.
synonyme: lafiɲɛbɔ.
dusuma [ù-ù-á] Verbe. calmer, apaiser, rendre serein;
dute [ù] Emprunt de : français. synonyme: tee,
calm down, pacify, appease, quieten down;
beruhigen, stillen. synonyme: mala .
atayi. variante: dutɛ. Nom. thé, du thé à la
1
menthe; tea; Tee. An bi dute min. Nous
dusuman [ù-ù-á] Nom. humeur, caractère; mood,
buvons du thé. We drink tea. Wir trinken Tee.
temper, character; Stimmung, Laune, Category: Types of food. synonyme: te.
2
Charakter. A sɛgɛnnen don, a dusuman ka
go. Il est fatigué, il est de mauvais humeur.
dutigi Jula: lutigi. Nom. chef de famille; head of
He's tired, he's in a bad mood. Er ist müde, er
family; Familienoberhaupt. synonyme: lutigi,
hat schlechte Laune. gatigi.
dusumandi [ù-ù-à-í] Nom. aimable, de bon duumi [ú] variante: duumɛ. Verbe. persévérer, durer,
caractère, agréable; lovely, pleasant, polite, rester longtemps; persevere, stay a long time;
kind, of good character; liebenswürdig, durchhalten, aushalten, lange bleiben. A
gutmütig, angenehm, nett, freundlich. duumina yan. Il est resté longtemps ici. He
dusumango Nom. désagréable, de mauvais caractère, stayed here for a long time. Er blieb lange hier.
irritable; unpleasant, of bad character, duuru [ú-ú] num. cinq (5); five (5); fünf, 5.
1
irritable; unangenehm, unfreundlich,
Category: Mathematics.
schlechter Charakter, schnell gereizt.
Dusumango tɛ waliden tɔnɔ dun. Celui qui a duuru 2 [ù-ú] Verbe. 1 • être trouble, troubler, agiter; be
mauvais caractère ne tire aucun profit de misty, indistinct, unclear, disturb, shake, toss
l'enfant d'autrui (proverbe). He who has a bad and turn; trüb sein, trüben, aufwühlen,
character does not benefit from someone else's schütteln. Dɔlɔ duurula. La bière est trouble.
child (proverb). Wer einen schlechten The beer is cloudy. Das Bier ist trüb.
Charakter hat, profitiert nicht vom Kind eines 2 • se répandre; spread; verbreiten.
anderen (Sprichwort).
duuru duuru num. cinq par cinq, cinq chacun; five by
five, five each; fünf um fünf, jedes fünf.
duurudaara [ù-ù] Verbe. se couvrir (ciel); cover (for
the sky); sich bedecken (Himmel). Kaba
duurudaarala. Le ciel s'est couvert. The sky
got covered. Der Himmel ist bedeckt.
29/01/2026 167

duuruhakɛ fa
duuruhakɛ Nom. densité (liquide); density (liquid); duurunin [ú] Nom. taxi collectif utilisé en ville;
Dichte (einer Flüssigkeit). shared taxi used in town; Sammeltaxi in der
Category: Mathematics. Stadt genutzt. Category: Travel.
duurunan [ú] Morphemes: duuru-nan. adj. duwaɲɛso Nom. bureau des douanes; customs office;
cinquième; fifth; fünftes. Jamana marayɔrɔ Zollbehörde, Zollamt, Zollstelle.
duurunan. la cinquième région. the fifth Category: Building.
region. die fünfte Region.
E - e
e [é] [ê] synonyme: i. pron. tu, tes, ta, ton, te; you emerode Emprunt de : français. Nom. émeraude;
1
(sg.), your; du, dich, dir, dein. E ko tɛ o ! Ça ne emerald; Smaragd.
te concerne pas ! It doesn't concern you! Es erepresantan Emprunt de : français.
geht dich nichts an!
variante: ereprezantan. Nom. représentant;
e 2 variante: ɛ. pron. 1 • forme abrégée de ale, il, representative; Vertreter, Beauftragter.
lui, elle; short form of ale, he, him, she; Category: Person.
Kurzform von Ale, er, ihn, sie.
eresi Emprunt de : français. Nom. reçu; receipt;
2 • le, la, son, sa, ses; the, its, his, her; der, das,
Quittung. Category: Finance.
es, sein, ihr. ... u bɛ taa boliso in jɔ e siso
kɔfɛ ... ... ils vont construire cette case aux
Eritire Nom. Érythrée; Eritrea; Eritrea.
fétiches derrière sa chambre à lui ... ...they Erɔpu comparer: faragwɛla. Nom. Europe; Europe;
are going to build this fetish hut behind his
Europa. synonyme: farajɛla.
room... ...sie werden diese Fetischhütte
hinter seinem Zimmer bauen... esansi Emprunt de : français. Nom. essence; petrol
egilidanbɔci Nom. ligne de touche; sideline; (UK), gas (US); Benzin, Sprit. N ye mobili fa
Seitenlinie. esansi la kunu. J’ai rempli la voiture
d’essence hier. I filled the car with petrol
egilisi Emprunt de : français. Nom. église; church;
yesterday. Gestern habe ich Benzin ins Auto
Kirche, Gemeinde.
getankt.
ekuru Nom. écrou; nut; Mutter. ewe [é] interj. 1 • ça alors !; Gosh!; Meine Güte!
elikɔpitɛri Emprunt de : français. variante: ɛlikɔputɛri. 2 • bien entendu !; of course!; Natürlich!
Nom. hélicoptère; helicopter; Hubschrauber. eye [é] interj. oh !, ah !; oh!, ah!; oh!, ah! Eye eye
Category: Travel.
lilɔn yo ! Oh ! Oh ! Toi, la mignonne ! Oh !
Oh ! You, the cute! Oh ! Oh ! Du, die Süße!
F - f
f'ɔri [ɔ]́ variante: fɔrin. Verbe. détacher (grains, fa [á] 1 • vi. remplir, être rassasié, rassasier,
1
feuilles); detach (grains, leaves); ablösen combler, satisfaire; fill, be satiated, full,
(Körner, Blätter). Dafɔri ka fisa a sunbɔ ye. replete, satiate, satisfy; füllen, voll sein, genug
Mieux vaut effeuiller l'oseille de Guinée qu'en gegessen haben, sättigen, satt machen,
arracher le pied (proverbe). It is better to strip überhäufen, befriedigen, zufriedenstellen. N
the leaves of Guinea sorrel than to tear off the fara / N fanin lo. Je suis rassasié. I’m full (i.e.
stem (proverb). Es ist besser, die Blätter des I’ve had enough to eat). Ich bin satt. X fa Y la
Guinea-Sauerampfers abzustreifen, als den
remplir X de Y. fill X with Y. X mit Y füllen. A
Stiel abzureißen (Sprichwort).
ye buteli fa ji la. Il a rempli la bouteille d’eau.
He filled the bottle with water. Er hat die
Flasche mit Wasser gefüllt. Mɔbili fanin lo
mɔgɔ la. Le véhicule est plein de gens. The
vehicle is full of people.
29/01/2026 168

fa faamanw ka weeleli
2 • vi. accomplir; accomplish; erreichen. N ka faaba [á-á] synonyme: fagaba, ɲɛmɔgɔdugu,
wagati fara. Mon temps est accompli. My faamadugu, faamayɔrɔ. Nom. 1 • capitale;
time is fulfilled. Meine Zeit ist erfüllt. ... o capital; Hauptstadt. Pari ye Faransi faaba ye.
kɔnɔma falen don. ... elle est proche du Paris est la capitale de la France. Paris is the
terme de sa grossesse. ...she is nearing the end capital of France. Paris ist die Hauptstadt von
of her pregnancy. ...sie nähert sich dem Ende Frankreich.
ihrer Schwangerschaft.
2 • refuge, tanière de certains animaux; refuge,
3 • vi. être imbu de sa personne; to be full of den of certain animals; Zufluchtsort, Höhle
oneself; voll von sich selbst sein. Bakari fara bestimmter Tiere.
sa dɛ ! Bakari est imbu de lui-même faala [à] variante: fɛɛlɛ. Nom. veillée des jeunes
vraiment ! Bakari is really full of himself!
filles (pour filer le coton, pour causer); vigil of
Bakari ist wirklich von sich selbst überzeugt!
young girls (to spin cotton, to chat);
4 • vi. plein de; full of; voller. ... ka bɔrɛ fa Mahnwache junger Mädchen (Baumwolle
cɛncɛn bila o kɔnɔ ... ... et mettre à l'intérieur spinnen, plaudern).
des sacs pleins de sable ... ...and put bags full faama [à-á] Jula: faaman. variante: faman. Nom.
of sand inside... ...und Säcke voller Sand
1 • roi, gouverneur, officiel, personne
hineinlegen...
puissante, influente; king, governor, official,
5 • Nom. capacité, volume; capacity, volume; rich or influential person; König, Gouverneur,
Kapazität, Volumen. Staatsbeamter, einflussreiche Person.
fa [à] Jula: faa. Nom. père, oncle paternel ( et Category: Government.
2
tout homme assimilable au père, à qui l'on est 2 • riche; rich person; Reicher. Dugumɛnɛ tɛ
lié par le respect); father, uncle (father's side) faantan bobara ni faama bobara dɔn ka bɔ
(and any man comparable to a father, to whom ɲɔgɔn na. La fourmi ne fait pas des différence
one is bound by respect); Vater, Onkel
entre les fesses du pauvre et les fesses du riche
(väterlichen Seite), (und jeder mit einem Vater
(proverbe). The ant does not differentiate
vergleichbare Mann, dem man durch Respekt
between the poor man's buttocks and the rich
verpflichtet ist). Fɔlɔ tuma ... mɔgɔ fa teri man's buttocks (proverb). Die Ameise
tun ye i fa dɔ ye. Autrefois ... l'ami de ton père unterscheidet nicht zwischen dem Gesäß des
était un autre père pour toi. In the past... your armen Mannes und dem Gesäß des reichen
father's friend was another father to you. Mannes (Sprichwort).
Früher war der Freund deines Vaters ein 3 • fonctionnaire; civil servant, government
weiterer Vater für dich. Category: Kinship. official; Staatsbeamter,
fa 3 [à] Jula: faa. variante: faa. Nom. folie, rage; faamabaara [à-à] Nom. travail forcé, travaux
madness, insanity, rage; Wahnsinn, Tollheit, d’intérêt public; forced labour, community
Wut, Zorn. Fa b'i la wa? Tu es fou ? Are you service; Zwangsarbeit, Zivildienst.
crazy? Bist du verrückt? faamaden [à-à] Nom. prince, enfant de riche; prince,
faa 1 [àá] bambara: fa. synonyme: facɛ. Nom. père, child of a rich person; Prinz, Kind eines
oncle paternel; father, uncle father's side; Reichen. Ni faantanden b'i ɲɛmada
Vater, Onkel väterlichen Seite. faamaden ma, faantan fa na sɛgɛn. Si le fils
Category: Kinship. de pauvre se compare au fils de riche, son père
faa bambara: fa. Nom. 1 • folie; madness, insanity; souffrira (proverbe). If the poor man's son
2
Tollheit, Wahnsinn. Fa b’i la wa ? Tu es fou ?
compares himself to the rich man's son, his
father will suffer (proverb). Wenn der Sohn
Are you mad? Bist du wahnsinnig?
des armen Mannes sich mit dem Sohn des
2 • rage; rabies; Tollwut. Category: Disease. reichen Mannes vergleicht, wird sein Vater
faa [áà] bambara: fa. variante: fa. Nom. capacité, leiden (Sprichwort).
3
volume; capacity, volume; Kapazität, faamadugu [à-à] Nom. capitale; capital; Hauptstadt.
Volumen.
Bamako, n'o ye Mali faamadugu ye ...
faa sumanikɛnanw variante: faa sumananw. Nom. Bamako est la capitale du Mali. Bamako is the
mesures de capacité, mesures de volume; capital of Mali. Bamako ist die Hauptstadt
capacitance measurements; Hohlmasse. Malis.
Category: Mathematics. faamanw ka weeleli comparer: weelesɛbɛ.
variante: faamanw ka weleli. Nom.
convocation; summons, notification to attend,
call-up; Vorladung, Aufforderung.
29/01/2026 169

faamaw faan
faamaw [à] Nom. les autorités, les pouvoirs publics; faamuya variante: faamunen. 1 • vt. comprendre,
the authorities, public authorities, government déchiffrer; understand, decode, decipher;
authorities; die Obrigkeit, öffentliche verstehen, entziffern. ... n b'a fɛ k'o faamuya.
Behörden, Behörden, staatliche Stellen. A ni Je veux comprendre cela. I want to understand
faamaw tun ka di. Il s'entendait bien avec les this. Ich möchte das verstehen.
autorités. He got along well with the synonyme: faamu.
authorities. Mit den Behörden kam er gut 2 • Nom. compréhension, faculté de
zurecht. comprendre, intelligence vive;
faamaya [à-à] Nom. 1 • pouvoir, richesse, puissance; comprehension; Verständnis, Begreifen,
Begriffsvermögen, Fassungsvermögen.
power, richness, might, strength; Macht,
Reichtum, Kraft. Dɔ bɛ fara a ka faamaya 3 • Nom. signification; meaning; Bedeutung.
Faamuya jumɛn bɛ nsiirin in na ? Quelle est
kan. Son pouvoir sera accru. His power will be
la signification de ce conte ? What is the
increased. Seine Macht wird zunehmen.
meaning of this tale? Was bedeutet diese
2 • royauté; kingship; Königtum. Geschichte?
3 • comportement du roi, de puissant;
faamuyali comparer: faamuli.
behaviour of the king, of the powerful;
Verhalten des Königs, der Mächtigen. synonyme: madonsiyayɛlɛma. Nom.
faamayɔrɔ Nom. ville royale, lieu de résidence du roi,
compréhension, assimilation, compétence;
comprehension, assimilation; Verständnis,
capitale; royal city, place of residence of the
Anpassung, Assimilation. Category: Grammar.
king, capital; Königsstadt, Wohnort des
Königs, Hauptstadt. faamuyalikɛlaba Nom. expert, grand connaisseur;
faamu [à-ù] Emprunt de : arabe. variante: faamuya.
expert, very knowledgeable person; Experte,
Fachmann. Warikoɲɛ faamuyalikɛlabaw ka
vt. 1 • comprendre, assimiler; understand,
assimilate; verstehen. I y’a faamu ? Est-ce que
jate la ... Selon les experts en finances ...
According to financial experts... Laut
tu as compris ? Did you understand? Hast du
Finanzexperten...
es verstanden? N m’a faamu. Je n’ai pas
compris. I did not understand. Ich habe es faamuyanin part. qualifié, compétent, cultivé;
nicht verstanden. An tun ma ɲɔgɔn faamu. qualified, competent, well behaving;
Nous avions eu un malentendu. We had qualifiziert, kompetent, gut benehmend.
misunderstood each other. I bi ka min fɔra, a faan [á] variante: fan. Nom. œuf, ovule, testicule;
1
t’o faamuna. Ce que tu dis, il ne le comprend egg, ovule, testicle; Ei, Samenanlage, Hoden.
pas. What you are saying, he does not synonyme: fan .
1
understand. Er verseht nicht, was du sagst. A
faan bambara: fan. variante: fan. Nom. direction,
y’a faamu ko... Il a compris que... He 2
côté, face; direction, side; Richtung, Seite. U
understood that... Er hat verstanden dass ... U
taara Bobo fan fɛ. Ils sont allés vers Bobo.
ma foyi faamu. Ils n’ont rien compris. They
They went in the direction of Bobo. Sie sind in
didn’t understand anything. Sie haben nichts
Richtung Bobo gegangen. N bi taa fan wɛrɛ
verstanden. synonyme: faamuya.
lajɛ. Je vais regarder ailleurs. I’ll go and look
2 • déchiffrer; decode, decipher; entziffern,
elsewhere. Ich werde anderswo schauen. faan
entschlüsseln, decodieren.
jumɛn (fɛ) ? quelle direction ? which way?
faamubaliya Nom. incompréhension;
Was für eine Richtung? Wohin? A bi Bobo
incomprehension, lack of understanding;
faan jumɛn fɛ ? Il est de quel côté de Bobo ?
Unverständlichkeit.
What side of Bobo is he? Auf welcher Seite
faamuli
von Bobo ist er? burkina faan tan ni naani
comparer: faamuyali.[à-ù-í] Morphemes: faa na partout au Burkina. all over Burkina.
mu-li. Nom. compréhension; understanding, überall in Burkina. synonyme: ɲɛsinyɔrɔ, fan.
2
comprehension; Verständnis, Einsicht,
Versehen. walisa u ka faamuli sɔrɔ afin
faan
3
variante: fan. Nom. partie, côté; part, bit, piece,
qu’ils comprennent. so that they understand. side; Teil, Anteil, Stück. U tagara Bobo faan
so dass sie es verstehen. f'ɛ. Ils sont allés vers Bobo. They went towards
faamuta part. intelligible; intelligible; klar, Bobo. Sie gingen in Richtung Bobo.
verständlich.
29/01/2026 170

faan fɛ faburama
faan fɛ [àá ɛ̀] synonyme: tagafan. variante: fan fɛ. faasi [á-í] Adverbe. sans problème, tout à fait,
Adverbe. vers, en direction de, en ce qui définitivement, absolument, complètement,
concerne, concernant; towards, in direction of, catégoriquement; without problems, definitely,
concerning; gegen, in Richtung, betreffend. completely, absolutely, categorically; ohne
faana [à] variante: fwan. Verbe. découvrir,
sorgen, sorglos, unbekümmert, ganz und gar,
vollständig, absolut, völlig, kategorisch. A
déshabiller; uncover, undress, remove;
abdecken, ausziehen. ka maaɲɔ faana enlever
dumu faasi. Mange sans problème. Eat
without problems. Iss davon unbekümmert.
l'enveloppe de l'épi de maïs. remove the husk
from the corn cob. Entfernen Sie die Schale
Waraba y'i yɛlɛma faasi. Le lion s'est
vom Maiskolben. transformé complètement. The lion has
completely transformed. Der Löwe hat sich
faantan [à-á] variante: fantan. 1 • adj. pauvre,
völlig verwandelt. A y'i ban faasi. Il a
faible, sans pouvoir; poor, weak, without
catégoriquement refusé. He flatly refused. Er
power; arm, dürftig, armselig, schwach, ohne
lehnte rundweg ab. synonyme: ta .
Macht, machtlos. Burkina ye faantan jamana
4
ye. Burkina est un pays pauvre. Burkina is a
faatu Verbe. 1 • décéder, mourir; pass away, die;
poor country. Burkina ist eine armes Land. sterben. A cɛ fɔlɔ faatulen kɔ... Son premier
synonyme: tɛgɛjɛ, sɛgɛnbagatɔ, dɛsɛbagatɔ. mari décédé ... Her first husband died... Ihr
erster Ehemann starb... synonyme: fatu.
2 • Nom. pauvre; poor person; Armer, eine
arme Person. Faantan jigi ye Ala ye. Proverbe 2 • disparaître; disappear, vanish;
: L’espoir du pauvre, c’est Dieu. Proverb: The verschwinden. Bana jugu fɛn o fɛn bɛ dɩɲɛ
hope of the poor is God. Sprichwort: Die kɔnɔ yan, Ala k'o faatu ! Dieu fasse
Hoffnung einer armen Person ist Gott. disparaître toutes maladies de la terre ! God
faantanya Morphemes: faantan-ya. make all diseases disappear from the earth!
Gott lasse alle Krankheiten von der Erde
variante: fantanya. Nom. pauvreté, misère;
verschwinden!
poverty, misery; Armut, Dürftigkeit.
faantanya kɛlɛli la lutte contre la pauvreté. faatumatakujannin Nom. veuve à collier d'or;
fight against poverty. Der Kampf gegen die paradise whydah bird; Sahel-Paradieswida,
Armut. Faantanya bi mɔgɔ bila yɛrɛfaga la. Gelbnackenwida oder Nördliche
Paradieswida. Category: Bird. vidua orientalis.
La pauvreté provoque des gens à se donner la
mort. Poverty drives people to suicide. Armut
synonyme: mamarikujannin.
treibt Menschen in den Selbstmord. fabali [á-á-í] Nom. insatiable, non rempli, à jeune;
faari Emprunt de : français. variante: fari. Nom. insatiable, not filled, before eating;
1
phare; headlight; Autoscheinwerfer, unbefriedigt, ungesättigt, nicht gefüllt, vor
Scheinwerfer. dem Essen. Mɔgɔ fabali tɛ fura ta. On ne
faari [à] Verbe. 1 • balayer, épousseter; sweep, dust;
prend pas de médicaments à jeune. You don't
2 take medicine on an empty stomach.
fegen, abstauben. A y'a ɲaman faari ... Il en Medikamente nehmen Sie nicht auf
balaya les ordures ... He swept away the nüchternen Magen ein.
trash... Er hat den Müll weggefegt...
fabolo Nom. lignée paternelle, branche agnatique; line
2 • raser; shave; rasieren. ka den sii jugu
of descendants from father's side;
faari. raser les premiers cheveux d'un enfant.
Abstammungslinie von väterlichen Seite.
shaving a child's first hair. Die ersten Haare Category: Kinship.
eines Kindes rasieren.
fabonya variante: baboɲɛ. n.comp. cadeau offert au
faari [á] variante: fari, fori, foori. Adverbe. avec
3 père (en signe de respect); gift given to a
décision, d'un seul coup, brusquement; father; Geschenk für den Vater.
decisively, suddenly, abruptly; entschieden,
faburama Nom. espèce de plante; kind of plant;
plötzlich, abrupt. A y'i faari ka wuli ka tɛmɛ. 1
Il se leva brusquement et s'en alla. He abruptly
Pflanze (Art). Category: Grass, herb, vine.
got up and left. Er stand abrupt auf und ging.
coleus blumei ; dysentericus.
synonyme: pukɛ. faburama [à-ú-á-á] variante: faburema. Nom.
2
petite patate, pomme de terre du Soudan; small
potatoes; kleine Art Kartoffel.
Category: Types of food. solenostemon
rotundifolius.
29/01/2026 171

facɛ faga
facɛ [à-ɛ́] synonyme: faa, fa. Nom. père, oncle; fadugabu variante: fadugawu. n.comp. bénédiction
father, uncle; Vater, Onkel. I facɛ taara min? paternelle; paternal blessing, blessing of the
Où ton père est-il parti ? Where did your father father; väterlicher Segen.
go? Wohin ist dein Vater gegangen? fafara Nom. carapace; shell, carapace; Panzer,
Category: Kinship.
Rückenschild. Category: Parts of an animal.
facɛfitinin synonyme: fafitinin. Nom. oncle paternel
fafilamaden Nom. cousin germain par le père; first
(cadet); uncle (father's younger brother);
cousin (father's side); Vetter, Cousin
Onkel (jüngerer Bruder des Vaters).
väterlicherseits. U bɛɛ ye fafilamadenw ye.
Category: Kinship. synonyme: bɛndɔgɔ.
Ils avaient pour père deux frères. Their fathers
facɛkɔrɔba synonyme: fakɔrɔba. Nom. oncle paternel were two brothers. Ihre Väter waren zwei
(aîné); uncle (father's brother); Onkel (Vaters Brüder. Category: Kinship.
Bruder). Category: Kinship. fafitinin synonyme: facɛfitinin. Nom. oncle paternel
faden [à-ẽ́] Nom. 1 • frère consanguin, demi-frère (du (cadet); uncle (father's younger brother);
même père), rival; brother (from same father), Onkel (jüngerer Bruder des Vaters).
half-brother (same father), rival, stepbrother; Category: Kinship. synonyme: bɛndɔgɔ.
Bruder mit selben Vater, Halbbruder, Rivale,
fafolo [à-ó-ó] Nom. nasse de forme circulaire;
Stiefbruder.
circular fish trap; kreisförmige Fisch Falle.
2 • personne malveillante, jalouse, haineuse;
Category: Hunt and fish. synonyme: nsɔɔlɔ.
malicious, jealous, hateful person; böswillige,
eifersüchtige, haßerfüllte Person. Ni i faga [à-á] vt. 1 • tuer, abattre; kill, slaughter, fell;
1
fadenkɛw y'i koniya, dabakala kɛ i teri ye. töten, abholzen. Ni dɔ ka ba ma faga, dɔ ka
Quand tes demi-frères te haïssent, prends ta na tɛ diya. Si la chèvre de l'un n'est pas tuée, la
houe pour amie (proverbe). When your
sauce de l'autre ne sera pas bonne (proverbe).
stepbrothers hate you, take your hoe as a
If one person's goat is not killed, another
friend (proverb). Wenn deine Stiefbrüder dich
person's sauce will not be good (proverb).
hassen, nimm deine Hacke als Freund
Wenn die Ziege des einen nicht getötet wird,
(Sprichwort).
ist die Soße des anderen nicht gut
fadenkɔrɔcɛ [á] Nom. grand frère consanguin; older (Sprichwort). synonyme: dugan.
brother (same father); älterer Bruder (selbe 2 • éteindre; turn off, extinguish; löschen,
Vater). Category: Kinship. ausschalten. ka tasuma faga éteindre le feu.
fadenma [à-è] Nom. rival; rival; Rivale. N put out the fire. Das Feuer löschen. tele faga
fadenmaw don. Ce sont mes rivaux. They are éteindre la télévision. turn off the television.
my rivals. Sie sind meine Rivalen.
Den Fernseher ausschalten.
3 • supprimer, abroger; abrogate, abolish, ;
fadenmanw Nom. frère et sœur consanguins; brother
aufheben, annullieren, abschaffen, widerrufen.
and sister (same father); Bruder und
4 • manger (populaire); eat (popular); essen
Schwester (selbe Vater). Category: Kinship.
(Volksmund). An ye nsaamɛ faga nin dɔn.
fadenɲɔgɔn cɛman Nom. frère consanguin; brother On a bouffé une sacre quantité de riz au gras ce
(same father); Bruder (selbe Vater). jour-là. We ate a hell of a lot of rice that day.
Category: Kinship. Wir haben an diesem Tag verdammt viel Reis
gegessen.
fadenya [à-è] Nom. rivalité (entre enfants de même
5 • prendre (aux cartes); take (cards); (Karten)
père et d'une manière plus générale entre
nehmen. A ye kelenin kɛ ka marasi tɔ faga.
parents); rivalry (between children of the
Il a joué l'as et pris les autres cartes. He played
same father and more generally between
the ace and took the other cards. Er spielte das
relatives); Rivalität, Konkurrenzkampf,
Aß und nahm die anderen Karten.
(zwischen Kindern desselben Vaters und
allgemeiner zwischen Verwandten). Fadenya faga [á-á] Nom. cuvette, récipient en terre cuite;
2
kolen, a ma jɛ. La rivalité entre demi-frères, bowl, clay pot; Becken, Schale, Schüssel,
même bien lavée, ne redevient jamais propre Lehmgefäss, Lehmschale. Malo bɛ daji faga
(proverbe). Rivalry between half-brothers, kɔnɔ. On mouille le riz dans une grande
even when washed well, never becomes clean
cuvette. We wet the rice in a large bowl. Wir
again (proverb). Rivalität zwischen befeuchten den Reis in einer großen Schüssel.
Halbbrüdern wird nie wieder rein, selbst wenn Category: Container.
man sie gut wäscht (Sprichwort).
29/01/2026 172

faga fala
faga [à-á] 1 • Verbe. forger; to forge; schmieden. U fajiri [á-í-í] Emprunt de : arabe. variante: fayiri.
3
bɛ biɲɛnɛgɛ faga ... Ils forgent des clous... Nom. 1 • aube, aurore, point du jour, moment
They forge nails... Sie schmieden Nägel... qui précède le lever du jour; dawn;
synonyme: fan . Dämmerung. Ala ka fajiri yira an na ! Que
3
2 • Nom. forge; forge; Schmiede.
Dieu nous montre l’aube ! (bénédiction du
soir). May God show us the dawn! (goodnight
fagaba [á-á-á] synonyme: faaba. n.comp. capitale; blessing). Möge Gott uns die Dämmerung
capital city; Hauptstadt. Category: City. zeigen. (Abendsegen). Category: Weather.
fagali [à-à-í] Morphemes: faga-li. Nom. exécution, synonyme: kɛnɛfarada, kɛnɛtigɛnda,
kɛnɛmilikimalaka, milikimalaka, alifajiri,
homicide; execution, homicide; Hinrichtung,
Mord, Totschlag. kɛnɛbɔda, dugujɛ, kɛnɛjɛnda.
fagaliɲangili Nom. peine de mort; capital 2 • première prière musulmane (avant le lever
du soleil, vers 5 h); first Muslim prayer (before
punishment, death penalty; Todesstrafe.
sunrise, at around 5 am); erstes Muslim Gebet
fagon [á] variante: fago, fagun, faku. adj.pred. (gegen 5 Uhr morgens).
1 • inutile, sans valeur, sans intérêt; useless, fajirida [á] variante: fajirinda. Nom. petit matin ,
worthless; sinnlos, nutzlos, unbrauchbar,
point du jour, aube; early morning, dawn; früh
unnütz. Kulusi kolon ka fagon, mɔgɔ kolon
morgens, morgen früh, Morgendämmerung.
ka fagon ... Le vieux pantalon usé ne sert à sɔgɔma fajirida fɛ. un matin à l'aube. one
rien, le vaurien ne sert à rien ... The old worn
morning at dawn. eines Morgens im
pants are of no use, the scoundrel is of no use... Morgengrauen. Category: Weather.
Die alten, abgenutzten Hosen nützen nichts,
synonyme: dugujɛda, kɛnɛtigɛnda.
der Schurke nützt nichts...
2 • corrompre, pervertir, gâter; to corrupt, to fakelenɲɔgɔn Nom. frère ou sœur de père commun,
pervert, bribe, spoil; korrumpieren, bestechen, frère ou sœur consanguine; brother or sister
verderben. Wari, n'a donna mɔgɔninfinya la, (from same father); Bruder oder Schwester
a b'a fagon, nka n'a t'a la, a tɛ taa bi. Si (selben Vater). Category: Kinship.
l'argent intervient dans les relations humaines, fakitiri Emprunt de : français. Nom. facture; invoice,
il les gâte, mais de nos jours, rien ne marche bill; Rechnung. Category: Finance.
sans argent. If money intervenes in human
fakɔ [à] Morphemes: fa-kɔ. variante: fakɔden.
relationships, it spoils them, but these days,
nothing works without money. Wenn Geld in Nom. enfant né après la mort de son père; child
menschliche Beziehungen eingreift, ruiniert es born after the death of his father; Kind, das
diese, aber ohne Geld geht heutzutage nichts nach dem Tod seines Vaters geboren wurde.
mehr. Fakɔ tɛ bakɔ fɔ. L'enfant qui n'a pas connu
3 • avoir un mauvais comportement; have bad son père ne fait pas de reproches à celui qui n'a
behavior; schlechtes Benehmen haben. ... u bɛ pas connu sa mère (proverbes). The child who
fagon ka taa a fɛ. ... ils se comportent de
did not know his father does not reproach the
one who did not know his mother (proverbs).
plus en plus mal. ...they behave more and more
Das Kind, das seinen Vater nicht kannte,
badly. ...sie benehmen sich immer schlechter.
macht demjenigen, der seine Mutter nicht
fagonbagatɔ variante: fagunbagatɔ. Nom. bon à kannte, keine Vorwürfe (Sprichwörter).
rien, raté; good for nothing, failure; zu nichts fakɔrɔba [à-ɔ̀-ɔ̀-á] synonyme: facɛkɔrɔba. Nom.
nützen, scheitern. Nin fagonbagatɔ sigilen
oncle paternel (aîné), frère aîné du père; uncle
kan bɔra. Le bon à rien qui était là se mit à (father's brother), father's oldest brother;
chanter. The good-for-nothing guy who was Onkel (Bruder des Vaters), ältester Bruder des
there started to sing. Der Nichtsnutz, der da Vaters. Category: Kinship.
war, fing an zu singen. synonyme: fuyan.
fala [à-á] Nom. bas-fond, terrain qui est inondé
1
fagoya [á-ó-á] n.comp. l'inutilité; uselessness; pendant les pluies, et où on cultive du riz;
Nutzlosigkeit, Sinnlosigkeit, Zwecklosigkeit, lowland, low, irrigated land, which gets
Unbrauchbarkeit. flooded, e.g. where rice is grown; seichte
Stelle, Landstück das während der Regenzeit
fahakɛ Nom. contenance; capacity, bearing; Inhalt,
überschwemmt ist und man gut z.B. Reis
Fassungsvermögen. Category: Mathematics. anpflanzen kann, Tiefstelle. Malo bi sɛnɛ fala
la. On cultive le riz dans le bas-terrain. Rice is
grown in the flood plain. Man baut den Reis an
einer Tiefstelle an. Category: Land.
29/01/2026 173

fala falanfala
fala [á] Nom. orphelin, état d’orphelin; orphan, 3 • nul, sans valeur, pour rien; worthless, for
2
nothing; wertlos, umsonst. Wari in dun kɛra
being an orphan ; Waise, Waisenstatus. Ni
falaki ye ... Mais cette argent a perdu toute
da man kumun, fala tɛ fa. L'orphelin n'est
valeur ... But this money has lost all value...
jamais rassasié si l'oseille n'est pas acide
Aber dieses Geld hat jeglichen Wert verloren ..
(proverbe). The orphan is never satisfied if the
sorrel is not acidic (proverb). Die Waise wird falakɔ [á] variante: falankɔ. Nom. celui qui répète les
nie satt, wenn der Sauerampfer nicht sauer ist gestes et les paroles derrière l'imam, adjoint de
(Sprichwort). synonyme: yatiimɛ, falatɔnin, l'imam; the one who repeats the gestures and
fatan, falatɔ. words behind the imam; derjenige, der die
Gesten und Worte hinter dem Imam
falafala
1
[à-à-á-á] variante: falaka, fɛlɛkɛ. Nom.
wiederholt, Gehilfe vom Imam. Alimami n'a
voile, membrane, peau; sail, membrane, skin;
ka falakɔ ye mɔgɔw laseli. L'imam et son
Segel, Membrane, Haut.
adjoint ont fait prier les gens. The imam and
falafala 2 [á-á-á-á] Nom. 1 • souple, flexible, léger; his deputy made people pray. Der Imam und
supple, soft, flexible, light; beweglich, flexibel, sein Stellvertreter ließen die Menschen beten.
geschmeidig, leicht. kolo falafala cartilage, os Category: Religion, Worker, occupation.
non rigide. cartilage, non-rigid bone. Knorpel, falaku [á] variante: falako. Verbe. toucher en
nicht starrer Knochen.
passant, frapper au passage; to touch as one
2 • plat, mince; flat, small; flach, klein. woro goes by, hit in passing by; beim Vorbeigehen
falafala noix de cola plate, de mauvaise berühren, schlagen beim Vorbeigehen.
qualité. flat, poor quality kola nut. Flache Kɔnɔbɔnna bɛ kɔnɔ falaku ni manabɛlɛ ye.
Kolanuß von schlechter Qualität. Le chasseur d'oiseaux touche beaucoup
3 • peu utile; not very useful; nicht sehr d'oiseaux avec sa fronde, mais sans les tuer.
nützlich. yɔrɔ falafala endroit non cultivable.
The bird hunter hits many birds with his
slingshot, but without killing them. Der
non cultivable place. Ort den man nicht
Vogeljäger trifft mit seiner Steinschleuder
bewirtschaften kann.
viele Vögel, ohne sie jedoch zu töten.
falagɔn variante: falangɔn. Nom. espèce de plante;
falamu [à-à] Emprunt de : arabe. variante: faramu.
kind of plant; Pflanze (Art). Category: Grass,
herb, vine. melochia corchorifolia.
Nom. pièce de harnais, constituée de la bride et
du mors; piece of harness, consisting of the
falaka 1 [à-à-á] Nom. parents paternels; kin father's bridle and the bit; Teil des Geschirrs,
side; Verwandtschaft väterlicherseits. bestehend aus dem Zaumzeug und dem Gebiß.
Category: Kinship. falan [á-á] variante: fanfan. Nom. antre, terrier,
1
falaka 2 variante: fɛlɛkɛ. Nom. 1 • membrane, peau; gîte, caverne, grotte souterraine; den, lair,
membrane, skin; Membran, Haut. hole, hiding place; Höhle, unterirdischer Bau.
2 • peau du lait (ou de la bouille); milk (or Tinba bɛ falan seen. L’oryctérope creuse des
porridge) skin; Milchhaut (oder Breihaut). terriers. The aardvark digs burrows. Das
3 • cataracte; cataract; Katarakt Star. Falaka Erdferkel gräbt Höhlen. synonyme: fo 6 , ɲaga 2 .
b'a ɲɛ kan. Il a le cataracte. He has cataracts. falan [á] Nom. 1 • silo; silo; Silo.
2
Er hat den grauen Star. Category: Disease.
2 • plate-forme sur laquelle on entasse la
falakabana [á-á-á-á-á] n.comp. diphtérie; récolte du mil; platform on which the millet
diphtheria; Diphtherie. Boloci bɛ mɔgɔ tanga harvest is piled; Plattform, auf der die
falakabana ma. On se protège de la diphtérie
Hirseernte aufgestapelt wir. A ye ɲɔ tigɛ ka a
par la vaccination. We protect ourselves
don falan la. Il coupa le mil et le mit en silo.
against diphtheria by vaccination. Wir He cut the millet and put it in a silo. Er schnitt
schützen uns durch Impfung vor Diphtherie. die Hirse und legte sie in ein Silo.
Category: Disease. synonyme: kannɔrɔ. Category: Agriculture.
3 • meule; millstone; Mühlstein. ɲɔfalan
falaki [á] Adverbe. 1 • à toute allure; at full speed; auf
meule de mil. millstone of millet. Mühlstein
Hochtouren. A tɛmɛna falaki ! Il est passé à für Hirse.
toute allure ! He went by at full speed! Er raste
falanfala [à-à] Verbe. 1 • onduler (pour un liquide, une
mit voller Geschwindigkeit vorbei!
fumée...); wave (for a liquid, a smoke, etc.);
2 • complètement (détruire); completely
Wellen machen (für eine Flüssigkeit, einen
(destroy); vollständig (zerstören). ...k'u
Rauch usw.)
bunten falaki. ... les anéantir complètement.
...wipe them out completely. ...sie komplett
auslöschen.
29/01/2026 174

falankata falenfɛn min dancogo yɛlɛmana
2 • vague (dans l'eau); wave (in water); Welle 2 • apparaître, pointer; appear, to point at;
(im Wasser). Ji bɛ falanfala. L'eau fait des erscheinen, zeigen auf. O dolo bɛ falen
vagues. The water makes waves. Das Wasser tilebiɲanfan fɛ. Cette étoile apparaît à l'ouest.
macht Wellen. This star appears in the west. Dieser Stern
falankata variante: falankantan, falankatama. Verbe. erscheint im Westen.
1 • pencher (en perte d'équilibre); leaning falen [à-é] 1 • Verbe. échanger, changer, troquer,
3
(losing balance); lehnen (das Gleichgewicht convertir, modifier; exchange, convert,
verlieren). Fiɲɛ ye n ka ga falankata. Le vent change, modify; wechseln, auswechseln,
a fait perdre l'équilibre à mon hangar. The umwechseln, umrechnen, verändern. ... ka taa
wind knocked my shed out of balance. Der o falen nɔnɔ kumun ni naarekuru la ... ... et
Wind brachte meinen Schuppen aus dem
l'échanger contre du lait caillé et des boules de
Gleichgewicht.
beurre ... ...and exchange it for curds and
2 • incliner, pencher, déséquilibrer; tilt, lean, balls of butter... ...und gegen Quark und
unbalance; Neigung, Unwucht. Butterbällchen eintauschen...
falatɔ [á-á-ɔ́] variante: fala. Nom. orphelin; synonyme: mafalen, bayɛlɛma, yɛlɛma 1 .
orphan; Waise. Category: Person. 2 • Nom. échange, troc, monnaie; change,
synonyme: fala , misikinɛ. exchange, barter, currency; Wechsel,
2
Austausch, Wechselgeld, Tauschhandel.
falatɔnin Nom. orphelin; orphan; Waise.
Feere tun bɛ kɛ de falen ni falen. Autrefois
Category: Person. synonyme: fala 2 , batan, on commerçait par troc. In the past we traded
misikinɛ. by barter. Früher haben wir im Tauschhandel
gehandelt.
falaya variante: falatɔya. Nom. état de celui qui est
falen [á-é] variante: fɛlɛn. Verbe. délier, détacher,
orphelin, devenir orphelin; the state of being 4
an orphan, becoming an orphan; das Dasein dénouer, déplier (jambes); untie, unfasten,
eines Waisen, Waise werden. ... denw bɛ undo; aufschnüren, auflösen, loslösen,
falaya. ... les enfants deviendront orphelins. losmachen. Kuru tɛ ngɔn na ko o tɛ falen. Il
...the children will become orphans. ...die
n'y a pas de nœud dans l’anneau de bras pour
Kinder werden Waisen. prétexter qu'on ne peut le de;lier (proverbe).
There is no knot in the arm ring to justify that it
fale [à] Nom. fil de trame; weft thread; Schußfaden.
cannot be untied (proverb). Es gibt keinen
Fale ni gese bɛ da, u bɛ bɛn ka kɛ Knoten im Armring, der rechtfertigen würde,
fininmugu ye. On tisse les fils de trame et de daß er nicht gelöst werden kann (Sprichwort).
chaîne pour faire le tissu. We weave the weft falenfalen [à-é-à-é] Verbe. changer de façon
and warp threads to make the fabric. Wir
continue, se relayer; change continually, to
verweben die Schuß- und Kettfäden, um den
take over from, relieve, to take turns; dauernd
Stoff herzustellen.
wechseln, abwechseln, übernehmen von. An
falema [á] Nom. 1 • bois de chauffage dur débité en cɛ 50 tun bɛ ɲɔgɔn falenfalen kɔlɔnseen na.
petits morceaux; hard firewood cut into small Nous nous relayons continuellement à
pieces; hartes Brennholz, in kleine Stücke cinquante hommes pour le creusement du
geschnitten. puits. We continually take turns with fifty men
2 • morceau; piece; Stück. digging the well. Wir wechseln uns ständig mit
fünfzig Männern ab, die den Brunnen graben.
falen [à-ẽ́] Nom. monnaie; change; Kleingeld. Kɛmɛ
1
falen b’i bolo wa ? Tu as de la monnaie pour
falenfɛn [á-ẽ́-ɛ ́] Morphemes: falen-fɛn. Nom. plante;
500F ? Do you have change of 500F ? Hast du plant; Pflanze. Falenfɛnw mago bɛ yeelen
Kleingeld für 500 Franken? na. Les plantes ont besoin de lumière. Plants
Category: Finance. need light. Pflanzen brauchen Licht.
falen 2 [á-ẽ́] vi. 1 • pousser, germer; grow, germinate, falenfɛn cɛtɛmusotɛ expr. plante asexuée;
sprout; sprießen, keimen . Ɲɔsi falenna asexually reproduced plants; vegetativ
tugun. La semence de mil a germé de vermehrbarer Pflanzen. Category: Agriculture.
nouveau. The millet seed has sprouted again. falenfɛn faramanw expr. légumineuse; legume,
Der Hirsesamen ist wieder gekeimt.
pulse; Hülsenfrucht. Category: Food.
Category: Agriculture.
falenfɛn min dancogo yɛlɛmana
synonyme: OZƐMU. Nom. OGM, organismes
génétiquement modifiées; GMO, genetically
modified organism; genmanipulierte
Nutzpflanzen. Category: Food.
29/01/2026 175

falenfɛnsɛnɛ faliturunin
falenfɛnsɛnɛ synonyme: falenfɛnbuguyabaara. Nom. falibabaara [à-ì-à-á-á] Nom. travail très pénible;
production végétale; plant breeding; very hard work; sehr harte Arbeit. U nana n
Pflanzenzucht. Category: Agriculture. bolobɔ falibabaara in na. Ils m'ont remplacé
falenfɛntaji Nom. biocarburant; bio-fuel, bio-diesel; dans ce travail pénible. They replaced me in
Biotreibstoff, Biobrennstoff. this difficult job. Sie haben mich in diesem
Category: Agriculture. schwierigen Job ersetzt.
falenfɛntulu Nom. huile végétale; vegetable oil, plant falibo [à-ì] Nom. 1 • crottin d’âne; donkey droppings;
oil ; Pflanzenöl. Category: Food. Eselskot.
2 • dèguè de sésame (populaire); sesame dèguè
falenfɛnw [á-ẽ́-ɛ ́] Morphemes: falen-fɛn-w.
(popular); Sesam dèguè (beliebt).
synonyme: yirimanfɛnw. Nom. végétation, Category: Types of food.
couvert végétal, flore, ressource floristique;
faliden [à-ì-ẽ́] Nom. ânon; donkey colt; Eselfohlen.
vegetation, flora; Vegetation, Pflanzenwelt.
Category: Land. Category: Mammal.
falenfɛnw ka kaba expr. mildiou; mildew; Mehltau, falifali [à-ì-á-í] Verbe. se tourner, se rouler, s'agiter,
Braunfäule. Category: Agriculture. courir de ci de là; turn round, roll, get agitated,
run here and there; sich drehen, sich
falenkun [á-ẽ́-ṹ] Nom. germe, bourgeon; germ;
umdrehen, rollen, wälzen, zappeln. Wulu bɛ
Keim, Keimling. Category: Grass, herb, vine. falifali, a bɛ Bakari lamini. Le chien,
synonyme: kisɛ
1
.
d'impatience, tourne autour de Bakari. The
falenni Nom. conversion; conversion; Umrechnung, dog, impatiently, circles around Bakari.
Umwandlung. Category: Mathematics.
Ungeduldig umkreist der Hund Bakari.
synonyme: bayɛlɛmali. falifɔrɔ variante: falifɔrɔba. Nom. espèce de plante;
falenya [á] Nom. 1 • complétude, maturité; kind of plant; Pflanzenart. amorphophallus
aphyllus. synonyme: falikɛwulu.
completeness, maturity; Vollständigkeit,
Reife. Dennin in ka falenya bɛ kɛnɛ kan, a faligɛnfulanin Jula: faligwɛnfulanin.
di a cɛ ma. La maturité physique de la jeune synonyme: misigwɛnkɔnɔ, tɛrɛbɔkɔnɔnin.
fille est évidente, donne-la à son mari. The Nom. pique-bœuf à bec jaune; yellow-billed
girl's physical maturity is evident, give it to her Ox-pecker; Vogelart. Category: Bird.
husband. Die körperliche Reife des Mädchens buphagus africanus.
ist offensichtlich, geben Sie es ihrem Mann. synonyme: joliminkɔnɔnin.
2 • forfanterie, vantardise; braggadocio,
falikɛwulu Morphemes: fali-kɛ-wulu. Nom. espèce de
boasting; prahlen. Bakari ye nin
plante; kind of plant; Pflanze (Art).
falenyakuma in de fɔ bi. Voilà les
Category: Grass, herb, vine. amorphophallus
vantardises que Bakari a dites aujourd'hui.
aphyllus. synonyme: falifɔrɔ.
These are the boasts that Bakari said today.
Dies sind die Prahlereien, die Bakari heute falimɔgɔ [à-ì] Morphemes: fali-mɔgɔ. Nom. têtu,
sagte. orgueilleux, désobéissant; stubborn, proud
fali [à-í] Nom. âne; donkey; Esel. Fali sara, boci person, disobedient; Dickkopf, stolzer
banna. L'âne est mort, il ne pétera plus
Mensch, ungehorsam. synonyme: kanmɛnbali.
(proverbe). The donkey is dead, it will no falimuso [à-ì-ú-ó] comparer: fali. Nom. ânesse;
longer fart (proverb). Der Esel ist tot, er wird female donkey, she-ass; Eselin.
nicht mehr furzen (Sprichwort). Category: Mammal, Animal husbandry.
Category: Mammal.
falitulo [à-ì] Morphemes: fali-tulo. Nom. espèce de
faliba [à-ì-á] Morphemes: fali-ba. synonyme: sofali.
chaussure; kind of shoe; Schuh (Art).
Nom. mulet; mule; Maulesel. Category: Clothing.
Category: Mammal.
faliturunin Nom. espèce de coiffure (crâne rasé en
falibaara [à-ì] n.comp. travail fastidieux; tedious
laissant une bande de cheveux tressé au
work, tiresome work; langweilige Arbeit, centre); type of hairstyle (head shaved leaving
ermüdende Arbeit. a strip of braided hair in the centre); Art der
Frisur (Kopf rasiert, wobei ein Streifen
geflochtenes Haar in der Mitte verbleibt).
Category: Adornment.
29/01/2026 176

faliwotoro fan
faliwotoro Morphemes: fali-wotoro. Nom. charrette fama variante: kɔfama, famajɔn. Nom. plante
2
d’âne; donkey cart; Eselskarren. (espèce); plant (species); Pflanze (Art).
Category: Travel. Category: Bush, shrub. anthostema
faliya [à-ì-á] Nom. entêtement, obstination, bêtise,
senegalensis.
insensibilité, stupidité; stubbornness, famamɔ [à-à] Nom. donner longue vie à son père
obstinacy, stupidity, foolishness; Sturheit, (uniquement dans les formules de vœux aux
Hartnäckigkeit, Starrköpfigkeit, Dummheit. enfants); give your father a long life (only in
Npogotiginin in bɛ faliya kɛ. Cette fille est wishes for children); Schenke deinem Vater
d'un entêtement incroyable. This girl is ein langes Leben (nur bei Wunschformeln an
incredibly stubborn. Dieses Mädchen ist Kinder). Ala ka a famamɔ, ka a bamamɔ ....
unglaublich stur. filayakuma parole stupide. Que Dieu donne longue vie à ses père et mère
stupid words. dumme Worte. ... (: que Dieu lui donne longue vie auprès de
ses père et mère). May God give him long life
falo [á-ó] variante: fale, jalo. Nom. petite houe,
with his father and mother... Möge Gott ihm
pioche; small hoe, e.g. for breaking up ground, ein langes Leben mit seinem Vater und seiner
mattock; kleine Hacke. Category: Agricultural Mutter schenken...
tool.
famisɛn [à-í-ɛ́] Nom. oncle paternel (plus jeune);
falon [á-ó] synonyme: paron. Verbe. prendre au
1 younger uncle (father's side); jüngerer Onkel
passage, happer, gifler; catch going by, seize, (väterlicherseits). Category: Kinship.
slap; packen, im Vorübergehen an sich reißen,
fan [á] Jula: faan. Nom. œuf, ovule, testicule;
ohrfeigen. Syɛ y'a falon ka a kunun. La poule 1
egg, ovule, testicle; Ei, Hoden, Eizelle.
l'a happé et l'a avalé. The hen grabbed it and
swallowed it. Die Henne packte es und
kamifan œuf de pintade. guinea fowl egg.
schluckte es. ka mɔgɔ falon. gifler quelqu'un. Perlhuhn-Ei. synonyme: kɔnɔnafan, kili 1 ,
slap someone. jemanden eine Ohrfeige geben / faan 1 , syɛkili.
schlagen.
fan [à] Jula: faan. Nom. 1 • direction, côté, face;
2
falon 2 [á] Verbe. fendre en long (du bois); split direction, side; Richtung, Seite. A taara fan
lengthwise (wood); längs gespalten (Holz). ka jumɛn fɛ ? De quel côté est-il parti ? Which
dɔgɔ falon. fendre du bois. to split wood. direction did he go? Auf welche Seite ist er
Holz spalten. gegangen? synonyme: faan.
2
fama [à-á] 1 • Nom. longue absence; long absence; 2 • partie, proportion; part, proportion; Teil,
1
lange Abwesenheit. I ni fama ! / A kɛra fama Proportion. Mali fan bɛɛ partout au Mali.
ye dɛ ! Toi et la longue absence ! Ça fait everywhere in Mali. Überall in Mali.
longtemps depuis notre dernier rencontre ! You 3 • aspect, forme, manière, sorte; aspect, form,
and the long absence! I’ve not seen you for manner, kind; Aspekt, Form, Art und Weise,
ages! Du und die lange Abwesenheit. Es ist Sorte. Kɛlɛ fan si man ɲi. La guerre, sous tout
lange her seit wir uns das letzte Mal gesehen ses aspects, est haïssable. War, in all its
haben. Fama ka fisa ni kɔmunike ye. aspects, is hateful. Krieg ist in all seinen
Aspekten haßerfüllt.
Proverbe: Une longue absence vaut mieux
qu’un communiqué (d’un décès). Proverb: fan [á] Jula: faan. 1 • Nom. forge, soufflet de
3
Meeting after a long time is better than
forge; forge, forge bellows; Schmiede,
hearing a death announcement. Sprichwort:
Schmiedebalg. Numukɛ y'o nɛgɛ ta, ka n'o
Eine lange Abwesenheit ist besser als die
Ankündigung eines Todes.
don fan na, ka b'o dila. Le forgeron prit le
morceau de fer et le mit dans la forge pour le
2 • vi. être absent pendant longtemps, être
travailler. The blacksmith took the piece of
longtemps sans; be away a long time, to be for
iron and put it in the forge to work on it. Der
a long time without; lange abwesend sein,
Schmied nahm das Stück Eisen und legte es in
lange ohne sein. I famana kosɛbɛ ! Tu as
die Schmiede, um es zu bearbeiten.
beaucoup duré là-bas ! You’ve been away a
synonyme: numutogon, fanda, faga .
long time! Du warst lange abwesend. I famana
3
2 • Verbe. forger; to forge; schmieden.
ka na yan wa ? Ça fait longtemps que vous
n’êtes pas venu ici ? Has it been a long time
since you came here? Ist es ist lange her seit du
hierher gekommen bist ?
29/01/2026 177

fana fandɔnbaliya
fana [á-á] variante: fɛnɛ. part. 1 • aussi, fanaya [à-à-á] 1 • Verbe. dénoncer, médire,
1
également, à son tour, de plus, d'autre part, moucharder; denounce, speak ill, malign,
pareillement; also, as well, too, in the same inform; anklagen, verklagen, anschwärzen,
way; auch, ebenfalls, gleichfalls. N bi kini fɛ. schlecht reden über, informieren, verraten. Ni i
N bi to fana fɛ. J’aime le riz. J’aime aussi le « ye fanaya siɲɛ kelen fɔ ... Si tu as mouchardé
tô ». I like rice. I also like ’to’. Ich mag Reis. une seule fois ... If you snitch just once... Wenn
Ich mag auch Hirsebrei. A ye julakan kalan. A man nur einmal verpfeift..
ye fulakan fana kalan. Il a étudié le dioula. Il synonyme: fɔranɲɛna.
a aussi étudié le fulfuldé. He studied Dioula. 2 • Nom. dénigrement, médisance,
He also studied Fulfulde. Er hat Dioula mouchardage, rapportage; denigration,
studiert. Er hat ebenfalls Fulfulde studiert. malicious gossip, tale-telling; Verleumdung,
2 • par contre, non plus; on the other hand, böses Gerede, Heruntermachen, Lästerung,
neither; andererseits, auch nicht, hingegen. Ni Petzen. Fanaya jujɔn ye yɛlɛ misɛn ye. Le
n ma se ka don fana ... Si par contre je petit sourire est le d/but du dénigrement
n'arrive pas à entrer ... If, on the other hand, I
(proverbe). The little smile is the beginning of
can't get in... Wenn ich hingegen nicht
denigration (proverb). Das kleine Lächeln ist
reinkomme...
der Anfang der Verunglimpfung (Sprichwort).
fana [à-á] 1 • vi. réserver un repas spécial (copieux) fanayakɛla [à-à-à-ɛ̀] Nom. rapporteur, délateur,
2
mouchard; reporter, informer, snitch;
à quelqu'un, offrir à manger, faire plaisir; cook
Reporter, Informant, Spitzel. ...
a generous meal for someone, offer food to,
rejoice somebody; für jemanden ein kobɛnɛseerew ni fanayakɛlaw bɛ ánw fɛ
ausgiebiges essen bereithalten, Essen anbieten, yan. ... il y a parmi nous des espions et des
jemandem Freude machen. Dugutigi y'u fana. mouchards. ...there are spies and snitches
Le chef du village leur offrit à manger. The among us. ...es gibt Spione und Spitzel unter
village chief offered them something to eat. uns. synonyme: naafigi, kolakalila.
Der Dorfvorsteher bot ihnen etwas zu essen an.
a y'a fana sisɛ ra
fanba [ã̀-á] Nom. la majorité de, une partie
importante de, la plus grande partie de,
2 • Nom. repas, plat; food, dish, meal; Mahlzeit,
l'essentiel de; majority, a great part of;
Gericht, Essen. Yiranyirantɔ fana ye mɔni ye.
Mehrheit, Mehrzahl, ein großer Teil von. An
Le repas du peureux, c'est la bouille de mil
ka jamana fanba ye ji sɔrɔ. La plus grande
(proverbe). The meal of the fearful is millet
porridge (proverb). Die Mahlzeit der
partie de notre pays a reçu de l'eau. Most of our
Ängstlichen ist Hirsebrei (Sprichwort).
country received water. Der größte Teil
unseres Landes erhielt Wasser. U ka baara
fana [à-á] variante: fɛnɛ. Nom. menteur,
3 fanba ye ... L'essentiel de leur travail consiste
rapporteur, dénonciateur, calomniateur; liar,
à ... The main part of their work is... Der
tell-tale, informer, slanderer; Lügner,
Hauptteil ihrer Arbeit ist...
Verräter, Verleumder. A ka fana. Elle est
menteuse. She's a liar. Sie ist eine Lügnerin.
fanda [á-á] Nom. forge; forge; Schmiede. numukɛ
... n tɛ fanakuma lamɛn ... ... je n'écoute pas ka fanda. la forge du forgeron. the
les calomnies ... ...I don't listen to slander... blacksmith's forge. die Schmiede des
...Ich höre nicht auf Verleumdungen... Schmieds. synonyme: fan 3 , numutogon.
synonyme: nkalontigɛla, faniɲatigɛla,
fandennin synonyme: dadɔgɔmannin. Nom. minorité;
sabaranintigi.
minority; Minderheit.
fanan [ã-́ ã́] variante: nfanan. Nom. poisson synonyme: dadɔgɔmannin.
1
(espèce); fish sp; Fisch (Art). Category: Fish. fandɔnbaliya [à-ɔ̀-à-ì] Nom. 1 • état de celui qui ne
heterotis niloticus.
connaît pas sa place, son rôle (et également
fanan 2 [á] variante: nfanan. Nom. au loin, à distance ignorance de l'endroit où l'on va); state of one
(dans l’expression fanan fɛ); far away, at a who does not know his place, his role (and also
distance (in the expression fanan fɛ); weit weg, ignorance of where we are going); Zustand
in einiger Entfernung (im Ausdruck fanan fɛ). von jemandem, der seinen Platz, seine Rolle
Mɔgɔ tɛ mɔgɔ dɔn fanan fɛ ka a lasaa. On ne nicht kennt (und auch nicht weiß, wohin wir
peut pas distinguer les gens au loin. You can't
gehen).
recognise people in the distance. In der Ferne 2 • innocence, ignorance; innocence,
erkennt man keine Menschen. ignorance; Unschuld, Unwissenheit.
29/01/2026 178

fanfali fangalasigi
fanfali [á] variante: fanfaliba. Adverbe. très gros, 2 • autorité, règne; authority, reign; Autorität,
énorme; very big, enormous; sehr groß, enorm.
Regierung. A bɛ kɛ faama ye, a ka fanga bɛ
A ye dumuni kɛ ka a kɔnɔ bɔ fanfali. Il a foori ... Il deviendra roi, son pouvoir durera
mangé au point d'avoir le ventre rebondi. He longtemps ... He will become king, his power
ate to the point where his stomach was chubby. will last a long time... Er wird König, seine
Er aß so weit, daß sein Magen dick wurde. Macht wird lange anhalten ...
synonyme: yabi. 3 • les autorités, les pouvoirs publics; the
authorities, the political powers; Staatsgewalt,
fanfan [á] Nom. 1 • antre, grotte, abri; lair, cave,
Herrschergewalt, Behörden. ... ka jagokɛla
shelter; Versteck, Höhle, Unterschlupf.
jugu lase fanga ma. ... et dénoncer les
synonyme: farawo.
commerçants malhonnêtes aux autorités.
2 • antichambre, salle de séjour, salon; ...and report dishonest traders to the
anteroom, living room, lounge; Vorraum, authorities. ...und melden Sie unehrliche
Wohnzimmer, Aufenthaltsraum. So fanfanma Händler den Behörden.
cɛ ka ɲi. Les maisons avec salon sont fanga ben [ã-̀ á ẽ̀] Verbe. destituer; discharge,
agréables. Houses with living rooms are
depose, relieve somebody of their duties;
pleasant. Angenehm sind Häuser mit
absetzen, entthronen.
Wohnzimmer. Category: Building.
fangaben [ã̀-à-ẽ́] Nom. coup d'État; coup;
fanfara Nom. coquille d’œuf; egg shell; Eierschale.
Staatsstreich. Category: Government.
fanfɛ [á-ɛ́] expr. en ce qui concerne, vers, dans la fangabonda [à-à] Morphemes: fanga-bon-da.
direction de, du côté de, près de; concerning,
Nom. 1 • endroit où se trouvent les autorités,
towards, in the direction of; was so und so
administration, autorités; place where the
betrifft, betreffend, gegen, in Richtung von.
authorities are, administration offices,
Faya fanfɛ, kanɛmɛkɛ tɛ ne fɛ. Du côté administration, authorities; Ort, an dem die
paternel, je n'ai pas de cousin. On my father's Behörden sind, Administration,
side, I don't have any cousins. Väterlicherseits Regierungsstellen, Verwaltung, Behörden. U
habe ich keine Cousins.
ka kan ka a tigi lase fangabonda dɔ la. Ils
fanfɛla [à-ɛ̀] Nom. 1 • endroit, zone, région, alentours; doivent emmener le propriétaire aux autorités.
place, zone, region, surrounding; Ort, Zone, They must take the owner to the authorities.
Region, Umgebung, Gegend. ... Segu fanfɛla Sie müssen den Eigentümer zur Behörde
la. ... dans les alentours de Ségou. ... in the
bringen. Category: Government.
surroundings of Ségou. ... in der Umgebung
2 • camp militaire; military camp; Militärlager.
von Ségou. fangadidumuni Nom. aliment énergétique; energy
2 • ce qui concerne, problème; about, foods, carbohydrates and sugars; Energie
concerning, problem; bezüglich, Problem, Nahrung.
betreffend. ... musow ta fanfɛla ... ... en ce
fangadinan [à-à-ì-à] Nom. fortifiant; fortifier, tonic,
qui concerne les femmes ... ...as far as the
restorer; Stärkungsmittel, stärkend.
women are concerned... ...was die Frauen
betrifft...
synonyme: barikadinan.
fanforoko Nom. cloaque; cloaca; Kloake. fangafin [ã̀-à-ĩ́] n.comp. dictature, pure force,
Category: Parts of an animal. brutalité, violence, tyrannie, force physique;
dictatorship, tyranny, brutality, violence,
fanfyɛ [á] Jula: fanfiyɛ. Verbe. râler, haleter, pousser
physical force; Diktatur, Tyrannei, Brutalität,
le dernier soupir; moan, groan, gasp for Gewalt, physische Gewalt. Fangafin dɔrɔn tɛ
breath, pant, breathe the last breath; röcheln,
nin ko in ɲɛ. La seule force physique ne
schwer atmen, atme den letzten Atemzug.
résoudra pas cette affaire. Physical force alone
Wara fanfyɛra ka sa. Le fauve eu un dernier
will not solve this matter. Physische Gewalt
râle et mourut. The beast had a final death
allein wird dieses Problem nicht lösen.
rattle and died. Das Biest hatte ein letztes
Category: Government.
Todes-röcheln und starb. synonyme: hihanhi.
fangalasigi Nom. décentralisation; decentralization;
fanga [ã-̀ á] Nom. 1 • pouvoir, force, puissance;
Dezentralisierung. Category: Government.
power, force; Macht, Kraft, Gewalt. Fanga synonyme: fangatilan, marasegiso.
b’a la. Il est fort. He’s strong. Er ist stark.
Peresidan sigira fanga la tuguni. Le
président est encore au pouvoir. The president
is in power again. Der Präsident ist wieder an
der Macht.
29/01/2026 179

fangama fanla
fangama [à-à] Nom. 1 • puissant, important; powerful, fanikobaga synonyme: fanikola. Nom. laveur d'habits,
important, mighty, numerous; mächtig, lessiveur; washer of clothes; Kleiderwäscher.
wichtig. Segu mara yɔrɔ fangamaw les Category: Person.
endroits importants du royaume de Ségou. the fanikolon comparer: kolon. Morphemes: fani-kolon.
2
important places of the kingdom of Ségou. die
variante: finikolon. Nom. chiffon; rag;
wichtigen Orte des Königreichs Ségou.
Lumpen. A ka finiw bɛɛ kɛra finikolonw ye.
2 • beaucoup; a lot, many, numerous; viel,
zahlreich. ... ne ma wari fangama di mɔgɔ si
Tous ses habits sont devenus chiffons. All his
clothes became rags. All seine Kleider wurden
ma ... ... je n'ai pas donné beaucoup d'argent à
zu Lumpen.
qui que ce soit ... ...I didn't give much money to
anyone... ...Ich habe niemandem viel Geld
fanimugu nɔrɔta Nom. ruban de tissu adhésif;
gegeben... adhesive tape; Klebeband, Klebstreifen.
fangata [à-à-á] Nom. prise du pouvoir; taking of faninncinin [à-ì] Nom. frère cadet du père; father's
power, seizure of power, taking state power; younger brother; der jüngere Bruder des
Machtergreifung, Machtübernahme. Vaters. Category: Kinship.
sɔrɔdasiw ka fagata la prise du pouvoir par synonyme: baancinin.
les militaires. the seizure of power by the faniɲa comparer: kumayɛlɛma.
military. die Machtergreifung durch das
Militär.
synonyme: dalakolonya, galon. Nom.
mensonge, calomnie; lie, calumny; Lüge,
fangatan Nom. pauvre sans force; pauper without
Verleumdung. synonyme: nporo, nkalon,
strength; arme Person ohne Macht.
faniya.
fangatayɔrɔ Nom. piste d’élan (ex. pour saut en
faniɲatigɛla Nom. menteur; liar; Lügner.
longueur); runway, run-up; Anlaufbahn.
synonyme: dalakolon, nkalontigɛla,
fangatilan [ã̀-à-í-ã́] synonyme: fangalasigi,
galontigɛla, fana .
3
marasegiso. n.comp. partage de pouvoir,
fanisaniya Nom. hygiène vestimentaire; clothing
décentralisation; sharing of power,
hygiene; Wäsche Hygiene.
decentralization; Dezentralisation, Macht
Teilung. Category: Government. Category: Clothing.
synonyme: marasegiso, fangalasigi. faniya [à-ì] Nom. mensonge; lie; Lüge. ka faniya fɔ
fani [à-í] synonyme: dereke. variante: fini. Nom. dire des mensonges. tell lies. Lügen erzählen.
1
vêtement, habit; clothes, garment; Kleid.
synonyme: nporo, faniɲa, wuya, dalakolonya,
Category: Clothing. galon 1 , dagwɛlɛya.
fani Nom. toile; projection screen, screen; fanji nɛrɛmuguman synonyme: faan
2
Leinwand. nɛrɛmuguman yɔrɔ. Nom. jaune d'œuf; egg
fani [à-í] Verbe. conjurer, exorciser; conjure, ward yolk; Eigelb.
3
off, avert sth., exorcize; abwenden, fanjigwɛ [ã́-í-ɛ́] Nom. blanc d'œuf; egg white, white of
beschwören, bannen, auszutreiben. ... ka kilisi egg, albumen; Eiweiss. synonyme: jɛman.
tu ka bɔnɛ fani. ... prononcer des formules
fankelensa [à-è-è] Morphemes: fan-kelen-sa.
pour conjurer le malheur. ...pronounce
formulas to ward off misfortune. ...Formeln
Nom. hémiplégie, poliomyélite; hemiplegia,
poliomyelitis; Hemiplegie, Poliomyelitis.
aussprechen, um Unglück abzuwehren.
Category: Disease. synonyme: nanoro.
fani [à] Verbe. se révolter; revolt, rebel, rise up;
4
fankisɛ Morphemes: fan-kisɛ. Nom. ovule; egg cell,
sich auflehnen. Wulu fanina, a kilisi duman
ye bere ye. Le chien s'est révolté, la bonne
ovum; Eizelle. Cɛ ka lawakisɛ ni muso ka
formule magique est le bâton (proverbe). The
fankisɛ, olu bɛ ɲagami ɲɔgɔn na. Les
dog rebelled, the right magic formula is the spermatozoïdes de l'homme et les ovules de la
stick (proverb). Der Hund rebellierte, die femme se meulent. The man's sperm and the
richtige Zauberformel ist der Stock woman's eggs unite together. Das Sperma des
(Sprichwort). Mannes und die Eizellen der Frau vereinen
sich. Category: Body. synonyme: kɔnɔnafan,
fanifeere Morphemes: fani-feere. Nom. vente de tissu;
denfan.
fabric sale; Stoffverkauf.
fanla [ã́-á] Nom. ponte; laying eggs; Eierlegen.
fanifeerela [à-ì-è-è-á] Nom. vendeur de tissu; cloth
Category: Agriculture.
seller; Stoff-Verkäufer. Category: Worker,
occupation.
29/01/2026 180

fansabajago fara
fansabajago Nom. commerce triangulaire; triangular 3 • être vaniteux, rendre orgueilleux; to be
conceited, to make one proud; eingebildet
trade; Dreieckshandel.
sein, einen stolz machen. Sɔrɔbagatɔ den
fansi [à] Emprunt de : English. Nom. imitation de
caman fanyanen don. Beaucoup de fils de
pagne Wax, tissu de coton imprimé de
riches sont vaniteux. Many sons of rich people
fabrication industrielle; imitation of Wax
are proud. Viele Söhne reicher Leute sind
cloth, industrially manufactured printed cotton
eitel.
fabric; Imitation vom Wachs-Stoff, industriell
hergestellter bedruckter Baumwollstoff. faɲafaɲa 1 [á] Verbe. grésiller; sizzle, crackle; brutzeln.
Category: Clothing. Sogo bɛ ka faɲafaɲa tulu kalaman na. La
fanso Nom. ovaire; ovary; Eierstock, Eierstöcke. viande grésille dans l'huile chaude. Das
Fleisch brutzelt im heißen Öl.
Fankisɛ bɔra fanso la ka na densotulo kɔnɔ.
Les ovules sortent des ovaires et viennent dans faɲafaɲa 2 [á] Adverbe. très affûté; very sharp; sehr
les trompes utérines. The eggs leave the scharf. Muru dadiyara faɲafaɲa. Le couteau
ovaries and enter the fallopian tubes. Die Eier est très bien affûté. The knife is very well
verlassen die Eierstöcke und gelangen in die sharpened. Das Messer ist sehr gut geschärft.
Eileiter. Category: Body.
faɲi [á] Verbe. aller (populaire); go (popular);
fantanfala Jula: fatanfala. Nom. orphelin de père;
gehen (beliebt). An ka faɲi ! Allons-y ! Let's
fatherless; vaterlos. Nin den kelen in na kɛ
go! Laß uns gehen! synonyme: taa .
3
fantanfala ani bantanfala. Ce petit deviendra
fara [á-á] Nom. pierre, roche dure, en dure; stone,
orphelin de père et de mère. This little one will 1
become an orphan of both father and mother. hard rock, made out of cement; Stein, Fels,
Dieser Kleine wird zur Waise sowohl des Gestein, aus Beton, aus Zement. ... k'u ka
Vaters als auch der Mutter. furakɛliyɔrɔ jɔ ni fara ye. ... et construire leur
synonyme: fatanfala. dispensaire «en dur». ...and build their
fantanya [à-à-á] variante: faantanya. Nom.
dispensary with cement stones. ...und bauen
ihre Apotheke aus Zementsteinen.
pauvreté; poverty; Armut.
Category: Land.
fantɛmɛsiraw Nom. trompes de Fallope; fallopian fara comparer: ka fara o kan.[à-á] vt. ajouter,
2
tube, oviduct; Eileiter. Category: Body.
additionner, plus, s'ajouter à; add, add up, in
synonyme: bangesira.
addition, moreover, furthermore; anfügen,
fantogo [á] Nom. atelier du forgeron, forge; addieren, zusammenzählen, dazu, zudem,
hinzufügen zu. X fara Y kan ajouter X à Y.
blacksmith's workshop; Schmiedewerkstatt.
add X to Y. X zu Y dazu geben. ka fɛn dɔ fara
fantori [à-ó-í] variante: fantoriya. Verbe. déserter,
fɛn dɔ kan ajouter une chose à une autre. to
abandonner, laisser tomber; to desert, flee,
add one thing to another. ein Ding zu einem
abandon, give up, drop, let go of; desertieren,
anderen dazu geben. su fara tile kan nuit et
aufgeben, verlassen, abbrechen, gehen
lassen. A ye kalan fantori. Il a abandonné
jour. night and day. Nacht und Tag. Dunan
l'étude. He dropped out of school. Er hat die fara dugulen kan, an bɛɛ ye kelen ye. Que
Schule abgebrochen. tu sois étranger ou autochtone, nous sommes
tous égaux. Outsider or local, we are all equal.
fanw variante: fanwolow. Nom. soufflets (de
Fremder oder Einheimischer, wir sind alle
forgeron); bellows (of blacksmith); Blasebalg gleich.
(Schmiede). synonyme: fanwolo.
fara [à-á] Nom. 1 • écaille, peau de certains
3
fanwolo [á] Nom. soufflet; bellows; Balg, Blasebalg. animaux, peau des fruits, pelure, écorce des
synonyme: fanw, fugufugu. arbres; scale, skin of certain animals, skin of
1
fruit, peel, bark; Schuppe, Haut gewisser
fanya [á-á] Verbe. 1 • se révolter, se rebeller, rendre
Tiere, Fruchthaut, Baumrinde, Rinde. O ye
orgueilleux; to revolt, rebel, make proud;
nɔɔnsifara ye. C'est une peau de caméléon
revoltieren, rebellieren, hochmütig machen,
(proverbe). It's a chameleon's skin (proverb).
stolz machen. Misi fanyana. La vache s'est
Es ist die Haut eines Chamäleons
rebellée. The cow rebelled. Die Kuh
(Sprichwort). Category: Parts of an animal.
rebellierte. synonyme: kuncɛbaya, kuncɛbaya.
2 • croûte; crust, rind, scab; Kruste, Rinde,
2 • être vif, fougueux, agissant (feu, fétiche); Schorf.
being lively, fiery acting (fire, fetish); lebhaft
3 • coquille (de l’œuf), cosse, enveloppe,
sein, feuriges Auftreten (Feuer, Fetisch).
coque; shell (of the egg), pod, envelope, hull;
Tasuma bɛ fanya. Le feu est vif. The fire is
Schale (des Eies), Schote, Hülle.
bright. Das Feuer ist hell.
29/01/2026 181

fara Farafinna
4 • ongle; fingernail, nail; Nagel. A ye farabulon [á] Nom. grotte; cave; Höhle. Waraw bɛ
mukɛngɛn sɔɔri a bololankɔnikunba fara daga farabulonw de kɔnɔ. C'est dans les
kɔrɔ. Il a mis du poison sous l'ongle de son grottes que les fauves se terrent. It is in the
pouce. He put poison under his thumbnail. Er caves that the wild animals burrow. In den
hat sich Gift unter den Daumennagel Höhlen verstecken sich die Wildtiere.
geklemmt. synonyme: farawo.
fara 4 [à-á] Nom. coquille, coque, cosse, enveloppe; farada [á] Nom. déchirure, accroc; tear, breach, snag;
1
shell, hull, husk, pod; Muschel, Schale, Hülse,
Riss, Knick. Farada kɛra a la. Il y a une
Schote.
déchirure (au vêtement). There is a tear (in the
fara [à-à] Nom. 1 • peau (d’un fruit), pelure; peel, clothing). Es gibt einen Riß (in der Kleidung).
5
skin (of fruit); Schale, Haut. Category: Parts of farada Nom. natte dans laquelle s'effectue le transport
2
a plant.
de certaines marchandises (poisson séchés ou
2 • écorce; bark; Rinde. Sira fara. Écorce de fumé, tabac ...); mat in which the transport of
baobab. Bark of a baobab tree. Baobab Baum certain goods takes place (dried or smoked
Rinde. fish, tobacco, etc.); Matte, in der der Transport
3 • croûte; scab; Schorf. bestimmter Güter erfolgt (getrockneter oder
geräucherter Fisch, Tabak usw.)
fara [á-á] variante: faran. Verbe. 1 • séparer,
6
diviser, écarter, tourner, bifurquer; separate, faradi [á] Emprunt de : arabe. Nom. bar de sel
divide, spread, part, turn, branch off, fork; gemme; rock salt bar; Steinsalzriegel.
teilen, trennen, spreizen, verdrängen, kɔgɔfaradi une barre de sel. a bar of salt. ein
abdrehen, abbiegen, abzweigen. Juru ye Stück Salz. synonyme: jalankɔgɔ.
misiden n'a ba fara. La corde a séparé le veau
farafara [à-á-à-á] Verbe. ajouter (plusieurs fois,
de sa mère (proverbe). The rope separated the
1
plusieurs personnes), rajouter; add (several
calf from its mother (proverb). Das Seil trennte
times, several people); hinzufügen (mehrmals,
das Kalb von seiner Mutter (Sprichwort). Fara
mehrere Personen). An bɛ musokɔrɔninw
numan fɛ ! Tourne à gauche ! Turn left!
farafara ɲɔgɔn kan ... Nous mettons les
Biegen Sie links ab! synonyme: mafara.
vieilles femmes ensemble ... We put old
2 • éviter, se garder de, cesser; avoid, guard women together... Wir haben alte Frauen
against, cease; vermeiden, sich davor hüten, zusammengebracht...
aufhören. A' ye fara ka yɛlɛ banabagatɔw la.
farafara [á] Verbe. déchirer, déchiqueter; tear, shred;
Gardez-vous de rire des malades. Be careful 2
not to laugh at sick people. Achten Sie darauf,
reißen, zerfetzen. ... kulusi kolon, minnu
kranke Menschen nicht auszulachen. farafaralen don. ... des vieux pantalons
fara [á-á] variante: faran. 1 • Verbe. déchirer,
complètement déchirés. ...old, completely torn
7
pants. ...alte, völlig zerrissene Hose.
fendre, briser, fracasser; to tear, spilt, break,
smash; reißen, zerreißen, zerteilen, spalten, farafin [à-à-ĩ]́ Morphemes: fara-fin. Nom. homme
brechen, zerbrechen, zerschmettern. I ɲuman noir, Africain, Noir; black person, African;
ka a fara ! Que tu sois en bonne santé lorsque Schwarzafrikaner, Afrikaner. farafinjamana
ce tissu se déchirera ! (: salutation du vendeur pays africain. African country. Afrikanisches
de tissu à l’acheteur). May you be healthy Land. Category: Person.
when this fabric tears! (: greeting from the farafin siya Nom. race locale; local race; lokale
fabric seller to the buyer). Mögen Sie gesund
Rasse.
sein, wenn dieser Stoff reißt! (: Gruß des
Stoffverkäufers an den Käufer). farafindɔgɔtɔrɔ See main entry:
2 • Nom. accroc, déchirure; tear; Riß. fininfara filatigi.[à-à-ĩ̀-ɔ́-ɔ́-ɔ́-ɔ́] Morphemes: farafin
accroc, déchirure de vêtement. snag, tear of -dɔgɔtɔrɔ. Nom. guérisseur traditionnel;
clothing. Haken, Riß der Kleidung. traditional healer; traditioneller Heiler,
farabilen [à-à] Nom. teint clair, personne de teint clair Medizinmann. Category: Person.
(africain); bright skin, fair complexion, Farafinna comparer: Faragwɛla.[à-à-ĩ̀-á] Nom.
light-complexioned person (African); helle Afrique, Afrique Noire; Africa; Afrika.
Haut, hellhäutige Person (Afrikaner). Farafinna tilebinyanfan L’Afrique de
farabɔnan Nom. éplucheur; potato peeler; l’Ouest. West Africa. Westafrika.
Schälmesser, Gemüseschälmesser. Category: Region. synonyme: Afiriki.
Category: Tool.
29/01/2026 182

Farafinna dugukolo jakalan farali
Farafinna dugukolo jakalan See main entry: . faragwɛla lɔnko synonyme: tilebenfan lɔnko. Nom.
Nom. cartographie de l’Afrique; mapping culture occidentale; western culture; westliche
Africa; Kartographie von Afrika, Kartierung Kultur.
Afrikas. Category: Region. farajɛ Jula: faragwɛ. Nom. Européen, Blanc;
farafinna ka jɛnkuluba synonyme: farafinna ka European, White; Europäer, Weißer.
kelenyatɔn, Farafinnatɔnba. Nom. Union Category: Person. synonyme: ɲɛbilen,
Africaine; African Union; Afrikanische faragwɛ .
1
Einheit.
farajɛla [à-à] Nom. Europe; Europe; Europa.
Farafinnatɔnba synonyme: farafinna ka jɛnkuluba.
Category: Region. synonyme: faragwɛla,
Nom. Union africaine (UA); African Union
Erɔpu.
(AU); Afrikanische Einheit /Union.
farafinnɔgɔdon farakaturu Morphemes: fara-ka-turu. Nom.
repiquage; sub-culturing; Umpflanzen von
[à-à-ĩ̀-ɔ́-ɔ́-ṍ] variante: farafinnɔgɔ. Nom.
Pflanzen. ... ka turuli ni farakaturu kɛ ... ...
fertilisation organique, engrais naturel,
planter et faire repiquage ... ...plant and
fumure; organic fertilization, natural
transplant... ...pflanzen und verpflanzen...
fertilizer, manure; organische Dünger,
natürlicher Dünger, Mist.
Category: Agriculture.
Category: Agriculture. farakolo [á] Nom. étendue de latérite, rocher, roc;
farafinw jɔnyala tile Nom. traite négrière; slave stretch of laterite, rock,; Abschnitt aus Laterit,
trade; Sklavenhandel.
Gestein, Fels. Bajiyɔrɔ dɔw, farakolo ka ca. Il
y a des endroits dans le fleuve où les rochers
farafinya [à-à-ì] Nom. négritude, condition
sont nombreux. There are places in the river
d'Africain; Negritude, blackness, condition of where there are many rocks. Es gibt Stellen im
being an African; Negritude, das Afrikaner Fluß, an denen es viele Steine gibt.
sein, Rückbesinnung der Afrikaner auf ihre Category: Land.
eigene Identität. Farafinya o, farajɛya o, a si
farakoloci variante: farakanburen. Nom. gardénia de
tɛ san ... On n'achète pas sa condition, qu'on
Sokoto; tiger bush; Rötegewächs.
soit noir ou blanc ... We don't buy our
Category: Bush, shrub. gardenia sokotensis.
condition, whether we are black or white...
Wir kaufen unseren Zustand nicht ab, egal ob farakongo [á-á-ó-ó] Nom. désert de pierre; stone
wir schwarz oder weiß sind ... desert; Steinwüste. Category: Land.
faragale [à-à-á-é] synonyme: jɛnɛkalayiri. Nom. farakɔrɔba [á] synonyme: kulubalen. Nom. daman
ébène du Sénégal; kind of Ebony tree; de rocher; hyrax; Kippdachs.
Baumart. Category: Tree. dalbergia Category: Mammal. procavia capensis.
melanoxylon. synonyme: kulubalen.
faragwɛ 1 [à-à-ɛ́] bambara: farajɛ. farakɔrɔdon Nom. 1 • enflure sous la peau, abcès
Morphemes: fàra-gwɛ. synonyme: tubabu, profond; swelling under the skin, deep
nansara, nanpe. Nom. Blanc, Européen; white abscess; Schwellung unter der Haut, tiefer
person, European; Weisser, weisse Person, Glutealabszess. Category: Disease.
westliche Person, Europäer. synonyme: farajɛ. synonyme: nɛnbɔ, nɛnfunu.
faragwɛ [à-à-ɛ́] Nom. écorce, péricarpe; peel, skin, 2 • hernie ombilicale; umbilical hernia;
2
Nabelbruch.
pericarp; Fruchthülle, Schale. Category: Parts
of a plant. farakuru [á-á-ú-ú] Morphemes: fara-kuru.
faragwɛ jamana Nom. monde occidental; the variante: farakuru. Nom. rocher, falaise,
caillou, pierre de forme ronde; rock, cliff,
Western world; der westliche Welt, der
round stone; Felsen, Felswand, runder Stein.
Westen. Category: Region.
faragwɛla comparer: Erɔpu.[à-à-ɛ̀-á] n.pro. Europe;
farali
1
See main entry: sirafara. Morphemes: fara-li.
Europe; Europa. Category: Region.
Nom. virage; turning; Biegung, Drehung,
Kurve.
synonyme: nanzara, farajɛla, tubabu.
farali [à-à-í] Nom. ajout; addition; Ergänzung.
Faragwɛla comparer: Farafinna. 2
synonyme: farankan.
Morphemes: Faragwɛ-la. Nom. pays des blancs,
Europe, Amérique; land of the whites, Europe,
America; Europa, Land der Weissen, westliche
Welt. Category: Land, Region.
29/01/2026 183

farama faraɲɔgɔnkan
farama [á-á-á] Jula: faraman. 2 • discernement, clairvoyance; discernment,
clairvoyance; Urteilsvermögen, Umsicht.
Morphemes: fara-ma. adj. pierreux, rocheux;
stony, rocky; steinig, felsig. faramayɔrɔ
faranfaran Morphemes: faran-faran.
endroit rocheux, partie rocheuse. rocky place, variante: farafara. vt. déchirer en petits
rocky part. felsiger Ort, felsiger Teil. morceaux, déchiqueter; tear into pieces, tear
faramansi synonyme: filafeereyɔrɔ. Nom. pharmacie;
to shred; in Stücke zerreißen, reißen (in
Stücke); .
pharmacy, chemist's shop; Apotheke,
Drogerie. Category: Building. faranfasibali Nom. ambiguë; ambiguous;
synonyme: furamarayɔrɔ. doppeldeutig, mehrdeutig, unklar, zweideutig.
faran [á-ã́] variante: fara. 1 • vt. séparer, diviser; faranfasinan Nom. déterminant; determiner,
1
separate, divide; trennen, aufteilen. determinant; Begleiter, Determinante.
synonyme: mafara. Category: Grammar, Language and thought.
2 • vi. déchirer; tear, rip; reissen, zerreissen. A faranfasiya [á] variante: faranfaasiya. 1 • Verbe.
farannin lo. Il est déchiré. It’s torn. Es ist désambiguïser, préciser, distinguer; to
zerrissen.
disambiguate, specify, distinguish; genauer
angeben, spezifizieren,, ausführen,
3 • vi. tourner, virer; turn; drehen, abdrehen. I
beschreiben, unterscheiden. A y'a faranfasiya.
bi faran i numan/kinin fɛ. Tu tournes à
Il l'a précisé. He made it clear. Er hat es
gauche/droite. You turn left/right. Du drehst deutlich gemacht.
links /rechts ab.
2 • Nom. précision, distinction, compréhension;
4 • vi. se séparer de; separate from; sich distinction, comprehension, precision,
trennen von. accuracy; Präzision, Genauigkeit,
5 • vi. inciser; incise; einschneiden. Unterscheidung, Verständnis. A kanunnen bɛ
faran [à] Nom. côté, pan (d'un toit, d'un bonnet); side ka faranfasiya di ... Il est souhaité que des
2
(of a roof, of a cap); Seite (eines Daches, einer précisions soient données ... It is requested
Kappe). that details be given... Es wird um nähere
Angaben gebeten...
faranda [à-à-á] Verbe. racler, touiller, mélanger;
farankan [à-ã̀-ã́] synonyme: benkanni. n.comp.
scrape, stir, toss, mix; abkratzen, rühren,
mischen. Den tulonkɛtɔ bɛ mɔni faranda k'a 1 • annexe, annexion; annex; Anhang.
bɔn. L'enfant en s'amusant à touiller sa bouille
synonyme: farali
2
.
d'un bord à l'autre la renverse. The child, while 2 • bonus, ajout, supplément, additif, surplus;
having fun stirring his porridge from one side bonus, supplement, additive, surplus; Zulage,
to the other, knocks it over. Während das Kind Zuschuß, Zuschlag, Zusatz, Überschuß. O
Spaß daran hat, seinen Breit von einer Seite farankan ka di mɔgɔ dɔw ye ... Cet ajout
zur anderen zu bewegen, wirft es ihn um. plaît à certaines personnes... This addition
faranfaasi [á] variante: faranfasi. 1 • Nom. pleases some people... Dieser Zusatz gefällt
einigen Leuten... synonyme: kafoli.
différence, distinction; difference, distinction;
Unterschied, Abweichung. 3 • assistant, remplaçant; assistant, substitute,
synonyme: danfaran ka bɔ ɲɔgɔn na. supply, replacement; Aushilfe, Stellvertreter,
Ersatz.
2 • vt. distinguer, différencier, être distinct;
distinguish, differentiate; unterscheiden, faransɛkan [á] variante: faransikan. Nom. langue
differenzieren. Ji minta ... ani ji jugu .... fo i française; French language; französisch
k'u faranfaasi ka bɔ ɲɔgɔn na dɛ. L'eau (Sprache). Category: Language.
potable ... et l'eau non potable, il est Faransi n.pro. France; France; Frankreich.
absolument nécessaire de bien les distinguer.
Category: Country.
Drinking water... and non-potable water, it is
absolutely necessary to distinguish them faraɲɔgɔnkan Nom. regroupement, rassemblement,
clearly. Trinkwasser... und Brauchwasser, es union; grouping, pooling, gathering, rally,
ist unbedingt notwendig, diese klar zu meeting, union; Zusammenfindung,
unterscheiden. Vereinigung, Sammlung, Gesellschaft,
faranfaasilenya [á] Verbe. 1 • préciser, expliciter; Einigkeit, Bund. Fosi tɛ faraɲɔgɔnkan bɔ ...
specify, explain; spezifizieren, erklären. A
Rien ne vaut l'union ... Nothing beats unity...
Nichts geht über die Einheit...
faranfaasilenyana áw bɛɛ lajɛlen ɲɛna. Cela
a été clairement précisé devant vous tous. This
has been made clear to you all. Das wurde
Ihnen allen klar gemacht.
29/01/2026 184

faraɲɔgɔnma fari dilancogo
faraɲɔgɔnma variante: faraɲɔgɔn. Nom. compagnon, 3 • Verbe. faire attention, se méfier; be careful,
compagne; companion; Begleiter.
be wary; vorsichtig sein, aufpassen. I farati,
faraɲɔgɔnmaw ni ɲɔgɔn cɛ entre sirayɔrɔ in man ɲi ! Fais attention, cette route
compagnons. between companions. zwischen est dangereuse ! Be careful, this road is
Gefährten. synonyme: bilaɲɔgɔn.
dangerous! Seien Sie vorsichtig, diese Straße
ist gefährlich!
faraɲɔgɔnya [à-à-ɔ̀-ɔ̀] 1 • Verbe. regrouper,
1 farati bi kɔnɔ min na expr. grossesse à risques;
rassembler; regroup, gather; sich neu
high-risk pregnancy; Risikoschwangerschaft.
gruppieren, versammeln.
2 • Nom. regroupement, rassemblement, union, faratiman Morphemes: farati-ma. adj. dangereux;
entente; regrouping, gathering, union, dangerous; gefährlich.
agreement; Neugruppierung, Versammlung,
farawo [á] comparer: woo1. Morphemes: fara-wo.
Vereinigung, Vereinbarung.
Nom. caverne, grotte; cave, cavern; Höhle,
faraɲɔgɔnya 2 [á] 1 • Verbe. séparer; separate; Grotte. Ne taara a dogo farawo la. Je suis
trennen. A ye diɲɛ faraɲɔgɔnya. Il est mort (: allé le cacher dans une grotte. I went to hide
il s'est séparé du monde). He is dead (: he him in a cave. Ich habe ihn in einer Höhle
separated himself from the world). Er ist tot (: versteckt. Category: Land. synonyme: kuruwo,
er hat sich von der Welt getrennt). fanfan, farabulon, kuluwo.
synonyme: mafara.
farawolo [á] Nom. gros sorgho rouge; thick red
2 • Nom. séparation; separation, segregation;
Trennung.
sorghum; dicker roter Sorghum.
faraso [á] Nom. maison en dur; solid house, cement farɛnti sumada expr. échelle Fahrenheit; Fahrenheit
house; solides Haus, Haus aus Zementsteinen.
scale; Fahrenheit-Skala.
Category: Building. fari [à-í] Nom. 1 • corps; body; Körper. A fari tɔ
1
farasu [á] Morphemes: fara-su. synonyme: lakɛrɛ, finna. Le reste de son corps est noir. The rest
gwagala. Nom. craie, calcaire, chaux, calcium, of its body is black. Der Rest seines Körpers ist
schwarz. Category: Body.
cartilage; chalk, lime, whitewash, calcium,
cartilage; Kreide, Kalk, Kalzium, Knorpel. 2 • peau, épiderme; skin, epidermis; Haut.
Farasu de b'a to kolo jalen bɛ. C'est le Situlu bɛ mɔgɔ fari ɲɛ. Le beurre de karité
calcium qui rend les os rigides. It is calcium rend belle la peau. Shea butter makes the skin
that makes bones rigid. Es ist Kalzium, das die beautiful. Sheabutter macht die Haut schön.
Knochen steif macht. Category: Learn. 3 • teint, aspect extérieur; complexion, external
synonyme: gaala . appearance; äußeres Erscheinungsbild.
1
farati [à-à] 1 • Nom. danger, risque; danger, risk; fari 2 [á-í] adj.pred. 1 • piquant, ardent, cuisant; hot,
Gefahr, Wagnis, Risiko. Farati b’a la. Il y a spicy, ardent; pikant, rassig, würzig, brennend,
du danger: c’est dangereux. It’s dangerous. Es
feurig. Foronto ka fari. Le piment est piquant.
ist gefährlich. A bi farati la. Il/elle est en The pepper is hot. Der Pfeffer ist pikant.
danger. He/she is in danger. Er / sie ist in 2 • féroce; fierce, ferocious; erbittert,
Gefahr. Mɔgɔw ka kan ka mobili boli ungestüm, bissig, grausam, wild, wütend. Tile
dɔɔnin-dɔɔnin barisa farati bi teliya la. Les ka fari. Le soleil est très chaud. The sun is very
gens doivent conduire lentement parce que la hot. Die sonne ist bissig heiss.
vitesse est dangereuse. People should drive fari [à-í] Nom. mets de haricots; bean dish;
3
slowly because speed is dangerous. Man soll
Bohnengericht. ... dunfɛn kɛra fari ye ... ... il
langsam fahren den schnell fahren ist
gefährlich.
y a des boulettes de haricots à manger ...
...there are bean balls to eat... ...es gibt
2 • Verbe. se risquer, prendre des risques,
Bohnenbällchen zum Essen... Category: Food.
braver; to risk, to take risks, to brave; wagen,
riskieren, Risiken eingehen, mutig sein. ... ni n fari balofɛn Nom. nutriment; nutrient; Nährstoff.
ye n farati ka a laadi ... ... si je me risque à lui Category: Food. synonyme: dumuni
donner des conseils ... ...if I risk giving him nɛɛmayɔrɔ, balofɛn nafamanyɔrɔ.
advice... ...wenn ich riskiere, ihm Ratschläge
fari cogo Nom. morphologie; morphology;
zu geben...
Morphologie.
fari dilancogo [à-í- í-ã́-ó-ó] synonyme: fari
labɛncogo. Nom. anatomie; anatomy;
Anatomie. Category: Body.
29/01/2026 185

fari faga farijɔsisɛrɛbɛti
fari faga vi. délaisser, négliger; leave, abandon, farifoni [à-ì-ó-í] Jula: farifooni. variante: farifoni.
neglect; verlassen, vernachlässigen. n.comp. courage, détente, distraction; courage,
fari latanganan Nom. anticorps; antibodies;
relaxation, recreation, leisure; Mut, Courage,
Entspannung, Erholung, Ablenkung. Ne
Antikörper, Abwehrstoffe. Category: Treat
disease.
farifoni bɛɛ ye dɔgɔdonya in ye ... Ma seule
distraction, c'est d'aller au marché ... My only
fari makoya bi barikafɛn min na
distraction is going to the market... Meine
synonyme: fari makoya bi fangasɔrɔdumuni einzige Ablenkung ist, auf den Markt zu gehen
min na. expr. besoin énergétique; energy ...
requirement, energy need; Energiebedarf. farigan See main entry: .
1
farida [à-ì-á] Nom. obligation religieuse; religious comparer: gwaan.[à-ì-ã́] Jula: farigwan.
1
obligation; religiöse Verpflichtung. Sun ye Morphemes: fari-gwan. synonyme: farigantɔ.
farida ye. Le jeûne est obligatoire. Fasting is Nom. 1 • fièvre, avoir de la fièvre, température;
obligatory. Fasten ist Pflicht. fever, temperature; Fieber, Temperatur.
Category: Religion. Farigan bɛ den na. L’enfant a de la fièvre.
The child has a fever. Das Kind hat Fieber.
farida [à-ì] Nom. maladie, état corporel; illness, body
2 Category: Disease. synonyme: farigan.
2
condition; Krankheit, Körperzustand. Bi ye
2 • maladie; illness, disease; Krankheit.
Musa tile tan ni duuru ye, a ni farida bɛ
3 • souffrance; suffering; Leiden.
ɲɔgɔn na. Voici quinze jours aujourd'hui que
Moussa est malade. Moussa has been ill for
farigan
2
[à-ì] Jula: farigwan. 1 • Nom. fièvre,
two weeks today. Moussa ist heute seit zwei température; fever, temperature; Fieber,
Wochen krank. Ne farida man di n na bi. Je Temperatur. synonyme: farigan 1 .
ne me sens pas bien dans ma peau aujourd'hui. 2 • Nom. maladie; disease, illness, sickness;
I don't feel good about myself today. Ich fühle Krankheit. Category: Disease.
mich heute nicht gut. Category: Disease. 3 • Verbe. avoir de la fièvre; have a fever;
farifaga [à-ì-á-á] variante: farifaa. 1 • Nom. Fieber haben. Farigan b'a la. Il a de la fièvre.
découragement; ache; Schwermut, He has a fever. Er hat Fieber.
Depression. O farifaga bonyana án kan, fo fariganbagatɔ variante: farigwanbaatɔ, farigantɔ.
án tun miiri taara baara dabilali la. Notre Nom. fiévreux; feverish; fiebrig.
découragement grandit, tant et si bien que nous
farigolobana [à-ì-ò-ò-á-á] Nom. typhus; typhus;
pensions abandonner le travail. Our
Typhus, Fleckfieber. Category: Disease.
discouragement grew, so much so that we
thought about giving up the work. Unsere farigoloɲa Nom. surface de la peau; surface of the
Entmutigung wuchs so sehr, dass wir darüber skin; Hautoberfläche. Category: Body.
nachdachten, die Arbeit aufzugeben.
Category: Disease.
farigoloɲagwɛyɔrɔ variante: farikoloɲanagwɛla.
2 • Verbe. décourager, épuiser, être sans force; Nom. stade; stadium; Stadion.
discourage, exhaust, wear out; entmutigen, Category: Building.
erschöpfen, kraftlos sein. Farifaga bɛ n na, n synonyme: farikoloɲɛnajɛyɔrɔ.
bɛ n lafiɲɛ bɔ. Je suis fatigué, sans force, je farigoloɲanagwɛ sanbara Nom. chaussure de
me repose. I am tired, without strength, I am sport; sports shoe; Sportschuh.
resting. Ich bin müde, ohne Kraft, ich ruhe Category: Clothing.
mich aus.
farigwantɔ [à-ì-ã̀-ɔ́] synonyme: jangaratɔ,
farifari [á] interj. hourra; hurray; Hurra. Farifari ! N
1 banabagatɔ. Nom. malade, patient, fiévreux;
dɔgɔnin farinyara ! Hourra, mon cadet a été
sick person, patient, feverish; Kranker,
courageux ! Hurray, my youngest was brave! Patient, fiebrig. Category: Sick.
Hurra, mein Jüngster war mutig! synonyme: gantɔ.
farifari
2
[á] Adverbe. très chaud, très rapide; very hot,
farijolo [à-ì] Nom. plume, plumage, poil, pelage;
very fast; sehr heiß, sehr schnell. A fari bɛ
feather, plumage, hair, coat; Feder, Gefieder,
farifari ! Son corps est très chaud ! Her body is Haar, Fell.
very hot! Ihr Körper ist sehr heiß!
farijɔsisɛrɛbɛti Nom. serviette de bain; bath towel;
Badetuch.
29/01/2026 186

farikansii farimasiɲɛ
farikansii [à-ì-à-í] Nom. poils du corps, pelage; hair farikuru [à-à-ú-ú] Morphemes: fari-kuru. Nom.
on the body, coat; Haar auf dem Körper, Felle, petits boutons sur la peau; small spots on skin,
Pelz. Ne farikansii wulilen bɛ n kan. J'ai la pimples on the surface of the skin; Pickel auf
chair de poule. I have the chills. Ich habe der Haut. Category: Disease.
Schüttelfrost. farila [à-ì-á] Morphemes: fari-la. Nom. peau,
farikolo Morphemes: fari-kolo. Nom. corps, squelette; épiderme, corps; skin, epidermis, body; Haut,
body, skeleton; körper, skelett. O ka ɲi Körper. ... a farila ka fin. ... il a le corps
farikolo ma. C’est bien pour le corps. It’s sombre. ... he has a dark body. ... er hat einen
good for the body. Es ist gut für den Körper.
dunklen Körper.
Category: Body. fariladiya Nom. plaisirs corporels, plaisir du corps;
farikolo makoyafɛn Nom. calorie; calorie; Kalorie. bodily pleasures, pleasure of the body;
körperliche Freuden, Vergnügen des Körpers.
Category: Food. synonyme: funteni,
Munumɛnɛ ye fariladiya ye. Les caresses
gwaniyakɛlɛbu.
sont un plaisir du corps. Caresses are a
farikolobana Nom. maladie dont les signes sont pleasure for the body. Liebkosungen sind ein
immédiatement visibles sur le corps; disease Genuß für den Körper.
whose signs are immediately visible on the farilafɛn Morphemes: fari-la-fɛn. Nom. 1 • parasite
body; Krankheit, deren Anzeichen sofort am
(pou, puce, punaise ...); parasite (lice, flea,
Körper sichtbar sind. Category: Disease.
bedbug, etc.); Parasit (Läuse, Floh, Wanze
antonyme: kɔnɔnabana.
usw.) farilafɛn cinnidaw les piqûres des
farikolojibɔ [à-ì-ò-ò-í-ɔ́] synonyme: jibɔli. Nom. parasites. parasite bites. Parasitenbisse.
sécrétion; secretion; Sekretion. Category: Small animals.
Category: Body. 2 • toute lésion cutanée; any skin lesion; jede
farikolojidɛsɛ
Hautläsion. Category: Disease.
[à-ì-ò-ò-í-ɛ́-ɛ́] synonyme: farilajiban. Nom.
farilajiban synonyme: farikolojidɛsɛ. Nom.
déshydratation; dehydration; Dehydration.
déshydratation; dehydration; Dehydration,
Wasserentzug.
farikolominan synonyme: fariminan. Nom. organe;
farilankolon adj. nu; naked; nackt. U farilankolon
organ; Organ. Category: Body.
lo. Ils sont nus. They are naked. Sie sind nackt.
farikoloɲanagwɛla bambara: farikoloɲɛnajɛla.
Nom. sportif; sportsman, athlete, farilantumun variante: farilatumu. Nom.
sports-person; Sportler, Athlet. puce-chique; chigger flea, kind of worm; Floh,
farikoloɲɛnajɛ Jula: farikoloɲanagwɛ.
Sandfloh, Zecke, Wurmart. Farilantumun ka
ca kosɛbɛ tukɔrɔlaw la. La puce-chique est
Morphemes: farikolo-ɲanagwɛ. Nom. sport,
très fréquente dans les régions forestières. The
activité sportive, athlétisme; sport,
flea-chick is very common in forested regions.
athleticism; Sport, Athletik . Farikoloɲɛnajɛ
Das Flohküken kommt in bewaldeten
bɛ kɛnɛya sabati. Le sport nous garde en Regionen sehr häufig vor. Category: Disease,
bonne santé. Sport keeps you in good health. Insect.
Sport hält uns bei guter Gesundheit.
fariman [á-í-á] adj. dur, méchant, violent, sévère,
synonyme: jarasisi.
fort, puissant; hard, evil, mean, violent, severe,
farikoloɲɛnajɛyɔrɔ Nom. stade; stadium; Stadion. strong, mighty; hart, böse, listig, gewalttätig,
synonyme: farigoloɲagwɛyɔrɔ. streng, stark, mächtig.
farikoloyɔrɔw Nom. parties du corps; body parts; farimanfɛn Nom. matière organique; organic matter;
Körperteile. Category: Body. organisches Material . synonyme: nɔgɔkɛnɛ.
farikɔnɔkuru dɔ Nom. kyste de lamblias; lamblia farimanfɛnnɔgɔ Nom. fumure organique; organic
cysts; Giardien-Lambada-Infektion. manure; organischer Dünger.
Category: Disease. Category: Agriculture.
farikumun [à-ì-ú-ú] Nom. courbatures, douleur farimasicɛ comparer: farisicɛ. n.comp. émotion, chaire
musculaire; aches, soreness, muscle soreness; de poule; emotion, feeling; Emotion, Gefühl,
Muskelkater, Muskelschmerz. Farikumun bɛ Gefühlsregung.
n na. Je suis courbatu. I'm sore. Ich habe farimasiɲɛ variante: farimuɲumuɲu. Nom.
Muskelschmerzen. Category: Disease. démangeaison, prurit; itching, itch, scratching,
synonyme: kolosabana. irritation, pruritus; Jucken, Juckreiz,
Hautjucken. synonyme: fariŋɛɲɛ, muɲumuɲu.
29/01/2026 187

fariminan faritɔntɔn
fariminan [à-ì-í-ã́] synonyme: farikolominan. farinya [á-í-á] Jula: fariya. 1 • Verbe. être ou rendre
Nom. organe; organ; Organ. Category: Body. courageux, rassurer, être fort ou puissant, être
farimugu Nom. luxation, douleur musculaire;
violent; to be courageous, reassure, be strong,
be violent; mutig sein, tapfer sein, beruhigen,
dislocation, luxation; Luxation, Verrenkung.
beschwichtigen, versichern. Ni i y'a mɛn
Category: Disease.
muso bɛ ɲagaliba kɛ, a cɛ farinyana. Si tu
farin See main entry: .[á-í] Jula: fari. variante: fari.
entends dire qui l'épouse déborde de joie, c'est
1 • adj.pred. être dur, méchant, mauvais; to be que son mari a été courageux (proverbe). If you
hard, evil, bad; hart sein, böse sein; schlecht. hear that the wife is overflowing with joy, it is
Wulu dɔ b'a bolo, o ka farin. Il a un chien qui because her husband was courageous
est méchant. He has a dog that is naughty. Er (proverb). Wenn Sie hören, daß die Frau vor
hat einen Hund, der bösartig ist. Bana ka Freude überströmt, liegt das daran, daß ihr
farin. Cette maladie est mauvaise. This
Mann mutig war (Sprichwort).
disease is bad. Diese Krankheit ist schlimm. 2 • Nom. méchanceté, violence, bravoure,
synonyme: jugu.
courage, force, puissance; meanness, violence,
2
nastiness, viciousness, malice, wickedness,
2 • adj. être fort, puissant, courageux, brave, bravery, courage, power; Bosheit, Gewalt,
sévère, violent; be strong, powerful, spicy,
Mut, Tapferkeit, Macht, Stärke.
courageous, bold, severe, harsh, violent; stark
sein, mächtig, mutig, tapfer, streng, fariŋɛɲɛ [à-ì-ɛ́-ɛ́] variante: farimuɲumuɲu,
gewalttätig. Furamugu in ka farin dɛ ! Ce farisiɲɛ, farisyɛn. Nom. démangeaison du
médicament est très puissant ! This medicine is corps, prurit; irritation of the skin, pruritus;
very powerful! Dieses Medikament ist sehr jucken, Juckreiz. fariŋɛɲɛ b'a la. Il a des
wirksam! démangeaisons dans tout le corps. He has
farinin [á-í-í] Emprunt de : français: farine. itching all over his body. Er hat Juckreiz am
ganzen Körper. Category: Disease.
Jula: farini. Nom. farine de blé, beignet fait
synonyme: farimasiɲɛ, muɲumuɲu.
avec de la farine; wheat flour, small
dough-nuts made from flour; Weizenmehl, farisa [à-ì] Morphemes: fari-sa. Nom.
kleiner Pfannkuchen. Category: Food. 1 • courbatures; body aches;
farinisogoman n.comp. beignet fait à base de farine Körperschmerzen. Category: Disease.
synonyme: kolosabana.
(à la viande); kind of dough-nut with meat;
Pfannkuchen mit Fleisch. Category: Food. 2 • impuissance sexuelle; sexual impotence;
sexuelle Impotenz.
farinisukaroman n.comp. beignet fait à base de
farisaniya [à-ì-á-í-á] Nom. hygiène corporelle; body
farine (sucré); sweet dough-nut; süsser
Pfannkuchen. Category: Food. hygiene; Körper Hygiene.
farinman [á] Nom. violent, sévère; violent, severe; farisaniyaminanw Nom. effets de de toilette; toilet
gewalttätig, schwerwiegend. A fa ye cɛ products; Toilettenartikel.
farinman ye. Son père est un homme violent. farisicɛ comparer: farimasicɛ. n.comp. émotion;
His father is a violent man. Sein Vater ist ein emotion; Gefühlsregung.
gewalttätiger Mann.
farisogo [à-ì-ó-ó] Morphemes: fari-sogo. Nom.
farinpɔsɔn [à-ì] variante: farimɔsɔn, faripɔsɔn.
chair, corps; flesh, body; Fleisch, Körper. Joli
Nom. ride; wrinkle, ripple; Runzel, Fältchen.
b'án farisogo ladumuni. Le sang nourrit
Kɔrɔ ye farimɔsɔn lase ma. L'âge lui a
notre corps. Blood nourishes our body. Blut
donné des rides. Age has given him wrinkles.
nährt unseren Körper. Category: Body.
Das Alter hat ihm Falten beschert.
faritɔntɔn Nom. varicelle; chicken pox; Varizellen,
Windpocken. Faritɔntɔntɔ fariji bɛ bɔ. Celui
qui a la varicelle a la peau qui suinte. Anyone
who has chickenpox has oozing skin. Wer
Windpocken hat, hat nässende Haut.
Category: Disease. synonyme: lawɔɔrɔ,
bakɔrɔnson, kulensɔn.
29/01/2026 188

fariyɛrɛyɛrɛ fasannenya
fariyɛrɛyɛrɛ Morphemes: fari-yɛrɛ-yɛrɛ. Nom. frisson, fasaja [à-à-á] Morphemes: fasa-ja. Nom.
convulsion, tremblements, maladie de 1 • paralysie; paralysis; Lähmung.
Parkinson; thrill, chill, shiver, shudder, Category: Disease.
convulsion, trembling; Schauder, Zittern, 2 • ankylose; ankylosis, stiffness; Starrheit.
Frösteln, Schüttelfrost, Verkrampfung,
3 • rhumatisme; rheumatism; Rheuma.
Konvulsion, . Category: Disease.
4 • crampe; cramp; Krampf.
faro [à-ó] variante: faaro. Nom. pâte de haricots;
fasajabana
bean paste; Teig aus Bohnen. Category: Food.
[à-à-à-á-á] Morphemes: fasa-ja-bana.
fasa
1
[à-á] variante: fasan, pasa. 1 • vi. maigrir,
synonyme: sonbana, jaŋɔyi. Nom. tétanos,
faire maigrir; lose weight; abmagern, mager méningite, poliomyélite; tetanus,
werden. Den fasara. A man kɛnɛ. L’enfant a poliomyelitis, meningitis; Tetanus,
maigri. Il est malade. The child has grown Kinderlähmung, Hirnhautentzündung.
thin. He is not well. Category: Disease. synonyme: nɛgɛtigɛbana,
2 • adj. dur, coriace, résistant, maigre; hard, fasasurundu, nanoro.
tough, leathery, resistant, skinny, thin; hart,
zäh, widerstandsfähig, resistent, mager, dünn. fasajuru [à-à-ú-ú] Nom. nerf, tendon, ligament;
Ba kan, a ka fasa. Le cou de la chèvre, il est nerve, tendon, ligament; Nerv, Sehne, Bänder.
résistant. The goat's neck is strong. Der Hals Category: Body. synonyme: fasasira.
der Ziege ist stark.
fasajuruw [à-à-ú-ú] Nom. système nerveux; nervous
3 • adj. battre (le to); beat (millet porridge);
system; Nervensystem. Category: Body.
schlagen (Hirsebrei). ka to fasa. battre le tô
avec la spatule. cooking millet porridge with a
fasaki [á] Adverbe. très sec, très maigre; very dry, very
ladle. Hirsebrei schlagen mit einer Holzkelle. skinny; sehr trocken, sehr mager. Tiga jara
fasa [à-á] Nom. louange, air, hymne national, fasaki. Les arachides sont bien sèches. The
2
peanuts are very dry. Die Erdnüsse sind sehr
devise; praise, melody, tune, anthem, hymn,
trocken. synonyme: ngɔyin.
devise, slogan; Lob, Melodie, Hymne, Motto,
Leitspruch. Burikina fasa L’hymne national fasali Nom. amaigrissement; slimming, wasting;
du Burkina. The national anthem of Burkina. Abnehmen, Abmagerung.
Die Nationalhymne von Burkina Faso. ka fasa
fasaman [à-ã̀-ã́] Jula: fasanman. adj. résistant,
da. composer un air de louange. compose a
coriace, consistant; resistant, stiff;
tune of praise. ein Loblied komponieren.
widerständig, steif, unnachgiebig, kräftig. to
fasa
3
[à-á] Nom. nerf, tendon; nerve, tendon; Nerv,
fasaman du tô bien consistant. very consistent
Sehne. ... dɔw tɛ fasaw ni fasasiraw bɔ porridge. sehr konsistenter Hirsebrei.
ɲɔgɔn na. Wa, u tɛ kelen ye. ... certains ne fasan [à-ã̀] variante: fasa. adj.pred. être résistant,
1
font pas la différence entre les ligaments et les
coriace; be resistant, stiff; steif sein,
nerfs: or ce n'est pas la même chose. ... some
widerstandsfähig sein.
do not differentiate between ligaments and
nerves: but they are not the same thing. ... fasan 2 [á] Emprunt de : arabe. Verbe. 1 • gâter; spoil,
manche unterscheiden nicht zwischen Bändern pamper; verderben. Foyi ma e fasan ni i ka
und Nerven: aber sie sind nicht dasselbe.
dentiɲɛnenya tɛ. Ce qui t'a gâté, c'est d'avoir
Category: Body. synonyme: fasasira.
été trop choyé. What spoiled you was being too
fasaba [à-à-á] Nom. tendon d'Achille; Achilles pampered. Was dich verdorben hat, war, daß
tendon; Achilles-sehne. Category: Body.
du zu sehr verwöhnt wurdest.
synonyme: gɔnfasa. 2 • être faible; be weak; schwach sein.
3 • abrutir, abêtir, avilir; stupefy, degrade;
fasabana [à-à] Morphemes: fasa-bana. Nom.
betäuben, erniedrigen.
1 • marasme (amaigrissement maladif);
fasannenya [á] Nom. 1 • faiblesse, manque de
marasmus (unhealthy weight loss); Marasmus
(ungesunder Gewichtsverlust). vigueur, avilissement; weakness, lack of
Category: Disease. vigour, degradation; Schwäche, Mangel an
2 • SIDA; AIDS, HIV; AIDS. Kraft, Erniedrigung. ka fasannenya don
fasadimin [à-à] Morphemes: fasa-dimin.
baara la. prendre un travail à la légère (: sans
s'y donner vraiment). take a job lightly (:
variante: fasadimi. Nom. névrite; neuritis;
without really giving it a try). einen Job auf die
Neuritis, Nervenentzündung. leichte Schulter nehmen (: ohne sich wirklich
Category: Disease. Mühe zu geben).
29/01/2026 189

fasansenna fasodenw damakɛɲɛni
2 • manque de sérieux; lack of seriousness; 4 • très vite; very quickly; sehr schnell. A
Mangel an Ernsthaftigkeit. tɛmɛna fasayi. Il est passé très rapidement. It
fasansenna [à-à-è] Morphemes: fasa-n-sen-na. passed very quickly. Es ging sehr schnell
variante: pasansenna. Nom. marasme (maladie vorbei.
infantile: fort amaigrissement); marasmus faseribaga [à-è] Nom. journaliste; journalist,
(childhood illness: severe weight loss); reporter; Journalist, Schriftsteller. An bɛ a
Marasmus (Kinderkrankheit: starker
faseribaga bɛɛ lajɛlen fo. Nous saluons tous
Gewichtsverlust). Category: Disease.
les journalistes. We greet all journalists. Wir
fasari [à-à] Emprunt de : arabe. variante: faseri. grüßen alle Journalisten.
Verbe. traduire, commenter (le Coran), synonyme: kunnafonijɛnsɛnna,
transmettre; translate, comment on (the kunnafonilasela, lakalitaɲinina,
Quran), transmit; übersetzen, kommentieren
kibarulasela, kunnafonidila.
(den Koran), übermitteln. ka kuranɛ fasari
traduire le coran. translate the Quran. den fasiya [à-ì] Nom. tradition des pères; tradition of the
Koran übersetzen. fathers; Tradition der Väter. Denmisɛn
fasasira [à-à] Morphemes: fasa-sira. Nom. nerf; minnu ye fasiya bato... Les enfants qui ont
nerve; Nerv. Fasasiraw ye juru misɛnninw
suivi la coutume de leurs pères... The children
who followed the custom of their fathers... Die
ye, u ɲɛ ka jɛ. Les nerfs sont des liens très
Kinder, die dem Brauch ihrer Väter folgten...
fins, de couleur blanche. The nerves are very
Category: Religion.
thin links, white in colour. Die Nerven sind
sehr dünne Glieder von weißer Farbe. faso comparer: Burukina
Category: Body. synonyme: fasa , fasajuru, lili, Faso.[à-ó] Morphemes: fa-so. Nom. état,
3
dili. patrie, pays natal, maison natale, nation; state,
homeland, home country, native home,
fasasurundu [à-à] variante: fasasurun. Nom.
fatherland, nation; Staat, Heimat, Heimatland,
tétanos; tetanus; Tetanus. Category: Disease. Vaterland, Geburtsland, Nation. Ɛ, Malidenw,
synonyme: sonbana, sogoɲama,
án ka wuli ka faso baara... Eh, Maliens,
nɛgɛtigɛbana, fasajabana.
debout, allons construire notre patrie... Hey,
fasaya [à-à] Verbe. 1 • durcir, rendre consistant, people of Mali, stand up, let's go build our
homeland... He, Leute von Mali, steht auf, laßt
épaissir (pâte); harden, make consistent,
uns unsere Heimat aufbauen ...
thicken (dough); aushärten, gleichmäßig
machen, eindicken (Teig). Sonkala bɛ kɛ ka faso bulonba [à ù] Nom. assemblée nationale;
to fasaya. C'est avec la spatule qu-on rend le national assembly; Nationalversammlung.
to bien épais. It is with the spatula that we Category: Government.
make the porridge very thick. Mit dem Spatel faso nafa [à-ò à-à] synonyme: jamana nafa. Nom.
machen wir den Brei Teig sehr dick.
intérêt national; national interest; von
2 • s'obstiner, s'acharner; to persist; bestehen nationalem Interesse.
bleiben. A y'i fasaya sɛnɛ fɛ. Il s'est acharné à
fasoden [à-ò-ẽ́] Morphemes: faso-den.
la culture. He worked hard on agriculture. Er
arbeitete hart in der Landwirtschaft. synonyme: jamanaden. Nom. citoyen, patriote;
3 • maigrir; lose weight; Gewicht verlieren. E citizen, patriot; Bürger, Patriot. Faso tɛ jɔ
fasayara dɛ ! Tu as maigri ! You lost weight! fasodenw kɔ. La patrie ne se construit pas
Du hast abgenommen!
sans ses fils. The homeland cannot be built
without its citizens. Die Heimat kann nicht
fasayi Adverbe. 1 • complètement, bien, tout à fait; ohne ihre Bürger aufgebaut werden.
completely, well; völlig. A tilala fasayi. Il a
fasoden ka kɛta synonyme: fasoden ka wajibiyako.
complètement terminé ! He's completely
Nom. devoir de citoyen; duty of a citizen;
finished! Er ist völlig fertig! synonyme: ta .
4 Pflichten eines Bürgers, Bürgerpflicht.
2 • de toute façon; anyway; trotzdem sowieso.
fasodenɲumanya Nom. civisme; good citizenship;
O na kɛ fasayi ! Ça se fera de toute façon ! It
gute Sitten, gut bürgerliches Benehmen.
will happen anyway! Es wird sowieso
passieren! fasodenw damakɛɲɛni expr. égalité des citoyens;
3 • définitivement, pour toujours; definitely, equality of citizen; Gleichstellung aller Bürger.
forever; auf jeden Fall, für immer. O ye muso Category: Government.
dilen ye i ma fasayi. La femme s'est donnée
définitivement. The woman gave herself
definitively. Die Frau gab sich endgültig hin.
29/01/2026 190

fasodenya fatɔya
fasodenya [á-ó-ẽ́-á] synonyme: jamanadenya. fata [á-á] variante: fatani, fɛnta. vi. terrasser,
Nom. civisme, citoyenneté, nationalité, gifler; knock down, slap; niederschlagen,
patriotisme; public spirit, public-spiritedness, ohrfeigen. N b'i fata sisansisan. Je vais te
good citizenship, nationality, patriotism; gifler toute de suite. I'm going to slap you right
Bürgersinn, staatsbürgerliches Pflichtgefühl, now. Ich werde dir jetzt eine Ohrfeige geben.
Nationalität, Staatszugehörigkeit,
Patriotismus.
fatan [ã̀-ã́] Morphemes: fa-tan. variante: fantan,
farita. Nom. orphelin (sans père); orphan
fasodenya ta vi. naturaliser; naturalize, acquire the
(without father); Waise. Category: Person.
nationality of a country; einbürgern.
synonyme: bantan, misikinɛ, fala .
2
fasodenyakalan Nom. éducation civique; social
fatanfala [à-à-á-á] bambara: fantanfala. Nom.
education, social studies, civics; Sozialkunde.
orphelin de père; orphan without father; Waise
fasojama [á-ó-á-á] comparer: jama. ohne Vater. synonyme: fantanfala.
variante: fasojaman. Nom. population;
fatawu [à-á-ú] Emprunt de : arabe. Nom. faveur
population; Bevölkerung, Volk.
divine; divine favour; göttliche Gunst. An ka
fasokan [à-ò-ã́] Morphemes: faso-kan. Nom. langue
ɲinan baaraw kɛra fatawu ye. Dieu a
nationale; national language; National
favorisé nos travaux de cette année. God has
Sprache, Landessprache. Fasokanw kalanni
favoured our work this year. Gott hat unsere
l'apprentissage des langues nationales. Arbeit in diesem Jahr begünstigt.
learning national languages. Landessprachen Category: Religion.
lernen. synonyme: barakan.
fatɔ [à-ɔ́] Morphemes: fa-tɔ. 1 • Nom. fou, folle,
fasokanu [à-ò-á-ú] variante: fasodenya. Nom. sot, imbécile; insane person, madman, fool,
patriotisme; patriotism; Patriotismus, imbecile; Irre, Verrückte, Dummkopf, Narr,
Vaterlandsliebe. Idiot. Fɛn tɛ fatɔ fɛ, a ka dunan ɛ bugɔ. Le
fasokanubaga [à-ò-ù-à-á-á] Nom. patriote; fou n'a rien, mais on ne frappe pas son hôte
(proverbe). The fool has nothing, but one does
patriot; Patriot. Category: Person.
not strike his host (proverb). Der Narr hat
fasola [à-ò] Morphemes: faso-la. Nom. pays natal, nichts, aber man schlägt seinen Gastgeber
patrie, pays des aïeux; native country, nicht (Sprichwort).
homeland, country of ancestors; Heimatland, 2 • adj. enragé; rabid; tollwütig. wulufatɔ
Heimat, Land der Vorfahren. chien enragé. rabid dog. Ein tollwütiger Hund.
fasoɲɔmɔgɔ synonyme: ɲamanakuntigi, peresidan. Category: Disease.
Nom. président; president; Präsident. fatɔbo [à-ɔ̀] Morphemes: fatɔ-bo. Nom. savon
Category: Government. fabriqué localement (surnom du -); locally
fasɔnya [á] Nom. façon, nature, sorte, espèce; manner, made soap (nickname of -); lokal hergestellte
Seife (Spitzname von -).
nature, sort, species; Art, Art und Weise. Ne
ma nin tigafasɔnya in dɔn dɛ. Je ne connais fatɔya [à-ɔ̀] Nom. 1 • folie; madness, folly, insanity,
pas cette espèce d'arachide. I don't know this craziness; Wahnsinn, Verrücktheit. Ni fatɔya
type of peanut. Ich kenne diese Erdnußsorte tɛ, mɔgɔ boɲɛbaga t'i ka mɔgɔ kɛlɛta ye. A
nicht. moins d'être fou, on ne cherche pas querelle à
fasu [à] Nom. mânes paternels, aïeux paternels; celui qui vous a fait du bien. Unless you are
crazy, you do not seek a quarrel with someone
paternal manes, paternal ancestors; väterliche
Vorfahren. ka fasu kasi pleurer les mânes de
who has done you good. Sofern Sie nicht
verrückt sind, suchen Sie keinen Streit mit
son père. cry for his father's ancestors. weine
jemandem, der Ihnen Gutes getan hat.
um die Vorfahren seines Vaters.
Category: Kinship.
2 • comportement anormal, comportement
stupide; abnormal behaviour, stupid
fasugu Nom. sorte, espèce; sort, species; Art. Jiri behaviour; abnormales Verhalten, dummes
fasugu caman bɛ kungo fɛ, n t'a bɛɛ dɔn. Il Verhalten.
y a en brousse beaucoup de sortes d'arbres, je
ne les connais pas toutes. There are many
kinds of trees in the bush, I don't know them
all. Es gibt viele Arten von Bäumen im Busch,
ich kenne sie nicht alle. synonyme: sigidama,
sifa, nasuguya, suma , sugu.
7 1
29/01/2026 191

fatu feeren nugudafɛɛrɛn
fatu [á-ú] Emprunt de : arabe. synonyme: sa, ban. feere [è-é] vt. 1 • vendre; sell; verkaufen. Baba ye
1
variante: faatu. vi. mourir, décéder, disparaître; fani feere. Papa a vendu un habit. Dad sold a
die, disappear; sterben, verschwinden. A garment. Vater hat ein Kleid verkauft.
fatura k’a sii to san 48 na. Il est mort à l’âge 2 • vente, commerce, transaction; sale, selling,
de 48 ans. He died at the age of 48. Peresidan trade, commerce, transaction; Verkauf,
Handel, Transaktion.
Modibo Keyita fatura a san 26 ye ɲinan ye.
Le président Modibo Keita est mort il y a 26 feere 2 [é-ẽ́] Jula: feeren. synonyme: filɛri. 1 • Nom.
ans. President Modibo Keita died 26 years fleur, inflorescence; flower, inflorescence;
ago. Note: Kibaru, Zuwɛnkalo 2003 Blume, Blütenstand. Feere ni den tɛ kelen
synonyme: faatu, ban 1 . ye. La fleur n'est pas identique au fruit
fatuli [á-ú-í] synonyme: saya, banni. Nom. décès; (proverbe). The flower is not the same as the
fruit (proverb). Die Blume ist nicht dasselbe
death; Tod, Todesfall.
wie die Frucht (Sprichwort). Category: Grass,
faw [á] Nom. volumes; volume; Volumen, herb, vine.
Rauminhalt. Category: Mathematics. 2 • Verbe. fleurir; flourish, bloom, blossom;
faya [à] Nom. paternité, côté paternel; paternity, blühen.
paternal side; Vaterschaft, väterliche Seite. feereda [è-è-á] Nom. prix de vente; selling price;
Faya fanfɛ, kanɛmɛkɛ tɛ ne fɛ. Du côté Verkaufspreis. N t'a feereda dɔn. Je ne
paternel, je n'ai pas de cousin. On my father's connais pas le prix de vente. I don't know the
side, I don't have any cousins. Väterlicherseits sale price. Ich kenne den Verkaufspreis nicht.
habe ich keine Cousins. Category: Kinship. Category: Finance.
fayida [á] Nom. 1 • élégance, prestance, classe, belle feerekala [é] Morphemes: feere-kala. Nom. pétiole,
allure; elegance, presence, class, good looks; pédoncule floral, hampe florale; petiole, flower
Eleganz, Präsenz, Klasse, gutes Aussehen. peduncle, flower stalk; Blattstiel, Blütenstiel.
2 • prestige; prestige, status; Prestige. Fɔlɔfɔlɔ Category: Parts of a plant.
lakɔli tun ye fayida ani sankɔrɔta ye ... synonyme: kɔnɔkala.
Autrefois l'école était prestige et gloire... In the feerekɛfɛn [è-è] Morphemes: feere-kɛ-fɛn.
past the school was prestige and glory... In der
variante: feerefɛn. Nom. marchandise; goods,
Vergangenheit war die Schule Prestige und
Ruhm...
merchandise; Güter, Ware. ... ne ka feerefɛn
in kana gala ... ... que ma marchandise ne
3 • intérêt, utilité; interest, usefulness;
Interesse, Nützlichkeit. gorobɔnɛ ni fayida à reste pas sans acheteur ... ... that my
la grande dame l'élégance. to the great lady
merchandise does not remain without a
elegance. zur großen Dameneleganz.
buyer... ...daß meine Ware nicht ohne Käufer
bleibt... synonyme: karayogo.
fayin [à] variante: fɛyin. Verbe. 1 • convenir, être
1
feerekɛla Morphemes: feere-kɛ-la.
d'accord; agree; zustimmen, sich einigen. An
fayinna min ma ... Ce sur quoi nous sommes
variante: feerelikɛla. Nom. vendeur; seller;
convenus ... What we agreed on... Worauf wir
Verkäufer. Category: Worker, occupation.
uns geeinigt haben... feereli [è-è-í] Nom. vente; selling, sale; Verkauf.
2 • être informé, être tenu au courant; to be
feerelikaradasi Nom. cahier de vente; sales book;
informed, to be kept informed; informiert sein,
auf dem Laufenden gehalten werden. ... hali
Verkaufsbuch. Category: Finance.
ne ma fayin a la. ... je n'en ai même pas été feerelisɛbɛ Nom. fiche de vente; sell sheet;
informé. ...I wasn't even informed about it. Verkaufsabrechnung. Category: Finance.
...Ich war darüber nicht einmal informiert.
feeren cɛyayɔrɔ Nom. étamine; stamen; Stamen,
fayin 2 [á] Verbe. aller, partir, ficher le camp; go, Staubblatt. Category: Parts of a plant.
leave; gehen. An ka fayin, n'o tɛ su bɛ ko. synonyme: jɔnbɔjɔnbɔ.
Allons-y, car la nuit tombe. Let's go, because feeren musoyayɔrɔ Nom. pistil; pistil; Stempel.
night is falling. Laß uns gehen, denn die Nacht
bricht herein.
Category: Parts of a plant.
fe Emprunt de : français. variante: fee. Nom.
feeren nuguda Nom. stigmate; stigma; Narbe.
Category: Parts of a plant.
signalisation tricolore, signalisation
lumineuse; traffic lights; Lichtsignal. feeren nugudafɛɛrɛn Nom. anthère; anther;
Category: Sign, Symbol. Staubbeutel. Category: Parts of a plant.
29/01/2026 192

feeren tulonin fereke
feeren tulonin Nom. sépale; sepal; Kelchblatt. 2 • flâner, rester à ne rien faire; to stroll, to
remain doing nothing; spazieren gehen, nichts
Category: Parts of a plant.
tun. Faatu tora felekefeleke la. Fatou resta à
synonyme: nfirinfirinkaman.
flâner. Fatou remained strolling. Fatou
feerenjubaranin Nom. calice; calyx; Blütenkelch. schlenderte weiter.
Category: Parts of a plant. feleku [é] 1 • Verbe. passer rapidement; pass quickly;
feerentuloba Nom. pétale; petal; Blütenblatt. schnell vorbeigehen.
Category: Parts of a plant. 2 • Nom. silhouette; silhouette; Silhouette. N ye
feerentulow Nom. corolle; corolla; Blumenkrone. Faatu feleku tɛmɛtɔ ye. J'ai vu passer la
Category: Parts of a plant. silhouette de Fatou. I saw Fatou's silhouette
pass by. Ich sah Fatous Silhouette
feereta [è-è-á] part. à vendre, vendable, pour la
vorbeiziehen.
vente; to be sold, saleable, for sale; zu
3 • Nom. sillage (odeur); trail (smell); Spur
verkaufen, verkäuflich, . Faatu ka jagofɛn
(Geruch). A kasa felekura ne nun kɔrɔ. J'en
feereta ka ca. Fatou a beaucoup de
ai légèrement senti l'odeur. I faintly smelled it.
marchandises à vendre. Fatou has a lot of Ich habe es leicht gerochen.
merchandise to sell. Fatou hat eine Menge
Waren zu verkaufen.
felewu [é] Adverbe. rapidement, à toute allure; quickly,
at full speed; schnell, mit voller
felefala [è-è] variante: filifala. Verbe. balancer,
Geschwindigkeit. A tɛmɛna felewu. Il est
osciller; swing, rock, oscillate, sway;
passé rapidement. It passed quickly. Es ging
schwingen, baumeln, schwanken. Ni fiɲɛ cira, schnell vorbei.
jiribolow bɛ felefala. Quand il a du vent, les
fen [ẽ́] bambara: fɛn. Jula: feen. variante: fɛn,
branches se balancent. When it's windy, the
branches sway. Wenn es windig ist,
fɛɛn. Nom. chose; thing; Ding, Sache.
schwanken die Äste. fenuyi Emprunt de : français. Nom. fenouil; fennel;
felefele 1 variante: felenfelen, folofolo, fɔlɔn. Verbe. Fenchel. Category: Food.
1 • partir très vite, filer; go away quickly, dash fere [è] variante: feren, foron. Verbe.
1
off, scoot. speed away; schnell weggehen,
1 • retrousser, ourler; roll up, hem; aufrollen,
flitzen, davonrasen. A' ye nson felefeletɔ filɛ.
säumen. A y'a ka kulusi sen fere. Il a
Regardez le voleur qui parte à toute allure.
retroussé le bas de son pantalon. He rolled up
Watch the thief speed away. Beobachten Sie,
the bottom of his pants. Er krempelte das
wie der Dieb davonrast.
Hosenbein hoch.
2 • flotter au vent; float in the wind; im Wind
2 • ourlet, retroussis, revers; hem, turned up,
schweben. Fiɲɛ bɛ fininw felefele. Le vent
cuff; Saum, umgeschlagen, Manschette.
fait flotter les étoffes. The wind makes the
fabrics float. Der Wind läßt die Stoffe
fere
2
[é] Nom. bicolore, avec du blanc et du rouge;
schweben. two-tone, with white and red; zweifarbig, mit
3 • partir à la dérive; drift away; wegdriften. Weiß und Rot. Ba kun jɛ den ye fere ye. Le
Kurun felefelela ka taa. La pirogue est partie petit d'une chèvre à tête blanche sera aussi
à la dérive. The canoe went adrift. Das Kanu
bicolore (proverbe), The baby of a
trieb ab.
white-headed goat will also be two-colored
(proverb), Auch das Baby einer weißköpfigen
felefele 2 [é] variante: felenfelen. Verbe. menacer, Ziege wird zweifarbig sein (Sprichwort),
faire peur, effrayer, inquiéter; threaten,
fereke [é] variante: ferekefereke. 1 • Verbe.
frighten, scare, worry; bedrohen, erschrecken,
beunruhigen. Kana denmisɛnnin felefele sa !
embrouiller, emmêler, entraver; confuse
sb./sth., entangle, hamper, impede; verwirren,
Ne va pas effrayer l'enfant ! Don't scare the
sich verfangen, behindern, hindern. ... min bɛ
child! Erschrecken Sie das Kind nicht!
synonyme: jasiran. se ka nin ko ferekelen in ɲɛnabɔ i bolo. ...ce
qui peut te permettre de régler cette affaire
felekefeleke [é] Verbe. 1 • disposer librement de;
embrouillée. ...which may allow you to resolve
freely dispose of; frei verfügen über. A bɛ k'i this tangled matter. ...was Ihnen vielleicht
felekefeleke. Il dispose de toi à sa guise. He dabei helfen wird, dieses verwirrende Problem
has you as he pleases. Er hat dich, wie er will.
zu lösen.
29/01/2026 193

ferekete fɛɛn labɛnkisɛw
2 • Nom. entrave; hindrance; Behinderung. A fɛ comparer: bi ... fɛ, bi ... fɛ.[ɛ]̀ postp. 1 • avec;
1 1 2
ye ɲɛsenfereke don a la. Il lui mit l'entrave with; mit. N bi kuma Salifu fɛ. Je parle avec
des pattes de devant. He put the hobble on his Salif. I am speaking with Salif. Ich spreche mit
front legs. Er legte die Einschränkung auf
Salifu. I bi taga sugu la ni ne ye ? Tu vas au
seine Vorderbeine.
marché avec moi ? Are you going to the market
ferekete variante: furuku. Verbe. mettre à l'envers, with me? Gehst du mit mir zum Markt? Nne
retourner; turn upside down, turn over, fɛ, ... Selon moi, à mon avis, pour moi ...
inside-out; auf den Kopf stellen, umdrehen. (lorsqu’on donne son opinion). For me, ...
dɔlɔki ferekete envers d'un vêtement. back of (when giving an opinion). Meiner Meinung
a garment. Rückseite eines Kleidungsstücks. nach ...
synonyme: furuku 2 . 2 • par; by; durch, von. Diɲɛ dara Ala fɛ. Le
fereketeyɛlɛma Verbe. retourner complètement (une monde a été crée par Dieu. The world was
created by God. Die Welt wurde von Gott
poche), mettre à l'envers (un vêtement); turn
geschaffen.
completely inside out (a pocket), turn inside
out (an item of clothing); ganz umstülpen (eine fɛ [ɛ̀] comparer: ɲɛfɛ «devant», kɔfɛ
2
Tasche), umstülpen (ein Kleidungsstück). I y'i «derrière», dafɛ «près de», kɛrɛfɛ «à côté
ka dɔlɔki fereketeyɛlɛma. Tu as mis ton de», fanfɛ «vers», nɔfɛ «sur les traces de»,
vêtement a l'envers. You put your clothes on senfɛ «au cours de», sanfɛ «en haut de » ....
inside out. Du ziehst deine Kleidung von innen
postp. valeur de : lieu ou direction;
nach außen an.
l'accompagnement; le temps, le moyen,
ferun [è] variante: ferin. Verbe. serrer, presser; l'agent; la cause; la possession; le souhait; le
squeeze; drücken. ... buw bɛ ferun ɲɔgɔn désir, chez etc; value of : place or direction;
time; means; agent, possession; wish; desire;
kan, ka mɔsɔn. ... les muscles se serrent l'un
at, to ..; bei, zu, zur, zum. A bi Musa fɛ. Il est
contre l'autre et se tendent. ...the muscles
chez Moussa. He is at Moussa's home. Er ist
squeeze together and tense. ...die Muskeln
bei Moussa.
ziehen sich zusammen und spannen sich an.
synonyme: gɛrɛntɛ. fɛ 3 [ɛ̀] Verbe. 1 • aimer; love, like; lieben, mögen. I
feviriyekalo Nom. février; February; Februar. bi mun fɛ ? Qu’est-ce que tu veux/aimes ?
What do you want/like? Was magst/willst du?
Category: Weather. synonyme: fevuruyekalo.
2 • vouloir; want; wollen. N bi fɛ ka taga lɔgɔ
fevuruye Nom. février; February; Februar.
ra. Je veux aller au marché. I want to go to the
fevuruyekalo Morphemes: fevuruye-kalo. Nom. market. Ich will zum Markt gehen.
février; February; Februar. 3 • avoir; have; haben. Joli b'i fɛ? Combien
synonyme: feviriyekalo. as-tu? How much have you? Wieviel hast du?
fewu [é-ú] absolument, pas du tout; absolutely, not fɛ yen expr. chez; at, in, to (locative); bei, zu. A
at all; absolut, unbedingt, zwingend, niemals, tagara Musa fɛ yen. Il est parti chez Moussa.
ganz und gar nicht, überhaupt nicht. ... ne kɔni He went to Moussa's place. Er ging zu
tɛ nin ko la bilen fewu ! ... pour ma part je ne Moussa.
suis plus de tout dans cette affaire ! ... for my fɛɛlɛ [ɛ̀] Verbe. être maigre; be skinny; dünn sein,
part I am no longer involved in this matter! ... mager sein. Banabagatɔ bɛ fɛɛlɛ. Le malade
für meinen Teil bin ich in diese Angelegenheit
maigrit. The patient lost weight. Der Patient
nicht mehr involviert! O layidu tɛ wuli fewu !
verlor an Gewicht.
Cette promesse ne sera absolument pas trahie !
This promise will absolutely not be betrayed!
fɛɛn [ɛ ́ɛ ̀] bambara: fɛn. variante: fɛn, feen. Nom.
Dieses Versprechen wird auf keinen Fall 1 • chose, biens; thing, goods; Ding, Sache,
gebrochen! Güter. cɛ y'a ka fɛɛn fɛɛn synonyme: fɛn.
2 • élément; element; Element, Bestandteil.
fɛɛn kologwɛlɛ [ɛ ́ ó-ó-ɛ́-ɛ́] Nom. matière solide;
solid matter; Feststoff.
fɛɛn koorinin synonyme: disiki. Nom. disque; disc;
Scheibe, Disk. Category: Mathematics.
fɛɛn labɛnkisɛw Nom. composition chimique;
chemical composition; chemische
Zusammensetzung.
29/01/2026 194

fɛɛn tagamasiɲɛ fɛgɛfɛgɛ
fɛɛn tagamasiɲɛ expr. signalisation; signalling, 2 • Verbe. habiller; dress, clothe; kleiden,
traffic signs; Beschilderung, Signalisierung.
ankleiden, anziehen. Ne bɛ e balo k'i fɛɛrɛbɔ
Category: Travel. synonyme: fɛɛn yirali. ... Je te nourris et je t'habille... I feed you and I
clothe you... Ich füttere dich und ich kleide
fɛɛn yirali expr. signalisation; signalling, traffic signs;
dich ..
Beschilderung, Signalisierung,
fɛɛrɛn [ɛ̀] 1 • Nom. fragment, éclat, morceau;
Kennzeichnung. synonyme: fɛɛn tagamasiɲɛ.
fragment, shard, piece; Fragment, Scherbe,
fɛɛnɛ 1 [ɛ-̀ ɛ́] variante: fɛnnɛ, fyɛɛnɛ. Nom. crème du Stück.
lait, peau (du lait ou de la bouille chaude); milk 2 • Nom. moitié; half; Hälfte.
cream, milk fat; Creme, Rahm. nɔnɔ kumun 3 • Nom. latte, planche, tranche; slat, board,
ni fɛɛnɛ. du lait caillé et de la crème. curds slice; Latte, Brett, Scheibe. jirifɛɛrɛn planche
and cream. Quark und Sahne. en bois. wooden board . Holzbrett.
fɛɛnɛ [ɛ]̀ variante: fɛnfɛn, fɛɛnɛfɛɛnɛ. Verbe. 4 • Nom. tesson; shard; Scherbe. butelifɛɛrɛn
2
étendre, étaler (surtout pour une chose); tesson de bouteille. shard of bottle. Scherbe
extend, spread out (especially for one thing); einer Flasche.
ausdehnen, ausbreiten (besonders für eine 5 • Verbe. fendre, débiter; split; spalten. ka jiri
Sache). ka finin fɛɛnɛ dugu ma. étendre du fɛɛrɛn débiter des planches. cut boards.
linge par terre. lay laundry on the floor. Bretter schneiden.
Wäsche auf den Boden legen.
fɛɛrɛsɛbɛ Nom. fiche technique; technical data sheet;
fɛɛnɛfura [ɛ̀-ɛ̀] Nom. espèce de plante; kind of plant;
Technisches Datenblatt.
Pflanze (Art). Category: Grass, herb, vine.
fɛɛrɛsira Nom. méthode; method; Methode.
eriosema afzelii.
synonyme: minɛbolo, fɛɛrɛ.
fɛɛnɛtasanin Nom. crémier; milk jug; 2
Milchkännchen. fɛɛrɛsiraw yiriwali expr. développement
fɛɛrɛ [ɛ-́ ɛ́] variante: fɛɛrɔ. Nom. besoin de se vêtir,
technologique; technology development;
1 technologische Entwicklung. Category: Work
manque d’habits; dénuement; rags, lack of
and occupation. synonyme: baarafɛɛrɛw
clothing; Kleidungsnot, Bedürfnis nach
Kleidung. Gorobɔnɛya ka di mɔgɔ caman
yiriwali.
ye, ni fɛɛrɛ y'i minɛ, a bɛ nege bɔ i la. Bien fɛɛrɛtɔ variante: fɛɛrɔtɔ. Nom. 1 • loqueteux; ragged;
de gens aimeraient se pavaner, mais faute zottig, lumpig, zerlumpt.
d'habits corrects, ils n'en ont plus envie 2 • pauvre en habillement; poor in clothing;
(proverbe). Many people would like to strut, arm an Kleidung. A mana fɔ dugu ka di,
but due to lack of proper clothes, they no
fɛɛrɛtɔ tɛ dugu diya dɔn. Le village peut être
longer want to (proverb). Viele Menschen
agréable, mais le loqueteux n'en connaît pas le
würden gerne stolzieren, aber aus Mangel an
charme (proverbe). The village may be
angemessener Kleidung wollen sie es nicht
pleasant, but the ragged person does not know
mehr (Sprichwort).
its charm (proverb). Das Dorf mag angenehm
fɛɛrɛ 2 [ɛ-̀ ɛ́] variante: fɛrɛ. Nom. 1 • méthode, moyen, sein, aber der zerlumpte Mensch kennt seinen
tactique, astuce, ruse, stratagème, plan, Charme nicht (Sprichwort).
procédé; method, means, tactic, ruse, fɛfɛ variante: fiyɛfiyɛ. Nom. poivre de Guinée;
1
stratagem, plan; Methode, Mittel, Taktik,
pepper; Pfeffer. Category: Food, Grass, herb,
Kniff, Trick, List, Kunstgriff, Plan. Fɛɛrɛ
vine. piper guineense.
caman b'a to ji bɛ se ka kɛ minta ye. Il y a
fɛfɛ [ɛ́-ɛ́] Nom. épaule; shoulder; Schulter.
beaucoup de procédés qui permettent de rendre 2
l'eau potable. There are many methods that Category: Parts of an animal.
make water drinkable. Es gibt viele Methoden, synonyme: kamankun, kaman 1 .
die Wasser trinkbar machen.
fɛgɛ [ɛ́-ɛ́] synonyme: fiɲɛ. variante: fɛgɛn. adj.pred.
synonyme: kɛcogo, fɛɛrɛsira.
être léger; to be light (weight); leicht sein
2 • technique, solution; technique, solution; (Gewicht). synonyme: fiɲɛ .
Verfahren, Kunstfertigkeit, Lösung.
2
fɛgɛfɛgɛ [ɛ́] variante: fɛgɛlɛn, fɛgɛnwu, fɛgɛn.
fɛɛrɛbɔ variante: fɛɛrɔbɔ, fɛɛrɛfara. 1 • Nom.
Adverbe. très léger; very light; sehr leicht. I ka
habillement, vêtements, habits; clothes;
Kleidung, Bekleidung. fɛɛrɛbɔ ɲumanw de
bɔrɛ in bɛ fɛgɛfɛgɛ. Ton sac est très léger.
beaux habits. beautiful clothes. schöne
Your bag is very light. Deine Tasche ist sehr
Kleidung. leicht. synonyme: fɔgɔlɔn, ɲɔgɔlɔn 2 , fiɲɛ 2 .
29/01/2026 195

fɛgɛn fɛndilanbaliw
fɛgɛn [ɛ]́ variante: fyɛn, finyɛ. adj. 1 • léger, fragile; fɛlɛfɛlɛ [ɛ̀-ɛ̀] Nom. 1 • fanon (de bœuf); dewlap (beef);
light, fragile; leicht, zerbrechlich. Bumun bɛ Wamme (Rind).
kɛ kurun ye, nka a si man ca, a ka fɛgɛn 2 • jabot, double menton; jabot, double chin;
kojugu. On fait des pirogues en bois de Doppelkinn. synonyme: ncɔki.
kapokier, mais elles ne durent pas, car c'est un fɛlɛku [ɛ́] Verbe. manquer de peu, effleurer, toucher
bois trop léger. We make canoes out of kapok
légèrement; just miss, touch, lightly touch;
wood, but they don't last, because it's too light
knapp verfehlen, berühren, leicht berühren. Ni
a wood. Wir stellen Kanus aus Kapokholz her,
mobili y'i bin k'i sen kari, a y'i fɛlɛku ... Si
aber sie halten nicht lange, weil es ein zu
leichtes Holz ist. une voiture te renverse et te casse la jambe, il
2 • mince; thin, slim; dünn.
n'a fait que te toucher légèrement ... If a car
hits you and breaks your leg, it only touched
fɛgɛnman [ɛ́-ɛ́-ã́] Jula: fɛgɛman. you lightly... Wenn dich ein Auto anfährt und
synonyme: fiɲɛman. adj. léger, fragile; light, dir das Bein bricht, hat es dich nur leicht
fragile; leicht, zerbrechlich. Finin fɛgɛnman berührt ...
ka ɲi a kanna. Il aime les vêtements légers. fɛlɛnin [ɛ́] Nom. moindre bruit, moindre propos,
He likes light clothes. Er mag leichte moindre chose; slightest noise, slightest word,
Kleidung. slightest thing; das kleinste Geräusch, das
fɛgɛnya [ɛ́-ɛ́-á] Jula: fɛgɛya. synonyme: fiɲɛya. kleinste Wort, die kleinste Sache. ... kabini e
1 • Nom. légèreté; lightness; Leichtigkeit.
tulo ma fɛlɛnin mɛn ka ban ... ... avant même
d'avoir eu vent de la moindre chose ...
2 • Verbe. affaiblir, alléger, fragiliser; weaken,
lighten; schwächen, leichter machen. Dɔ bɔ
...before even knowing the slightest thing...
...bevor ich auch nur das Geringste wußte...
doni na a ka fɛgɛnya. Retirer un peu de la
charge, pour l'alléger. Remove a little of the
fɛlɛwo [ɛ̀-ɛ̀] variante: filawo. Nom. 1 • fenêtre;
load, to lighten it. Nehmen Sie ein wenig von window; Fenster. synonyme: filantɛrɛ, fɔlɔ 3 ,
der Last ab, um sie zu erleichtern. finɛtiri, fiɲɛdonda.
3 • Verbe. humilier, dénigrer; humiliate, 2 • ouverture dans le mur pour l'écoulement
denigrate; demütigen, verunglimpfen. U ye des eaux sales; opening in the wall for the
Baatu fa fɛgɛnya. Ils ont humilié le père de drainage of dirty water; Öffnung in der Wand
Fatou. They humiliated Fatou's father. Sie für den Abfluß von Schmutzwasser.
demütigten Fatous Vater. fɛn [ɛ́] Jula: fɛɛn. variante: fɛɛn, fen, feen. Nom.
4 • Nom. dénigrement, humiliation,
1 • chose, élément, un être; thing, element,
affaiblissement; denigration, humiliation,
part, item,a being; Ding, Sache, Element, Teil,
weakening; Verunglimpfung, Demütigung,
Komponente, ein Wesen. O ye fɛn ye min ka
Schwächung.
gɛlɛn. C'est quelque chose de très difficile. It's
fɛkite Verbe. muter; mutate; mutieren.
something very difficult. Es ist etwas sehr
fɛko n.comp. sentiment, opinion point de vue, avis; Schwieriges. synonyme: fɛɛn.
feeling, opinion; Gefühl, Meinung, Ansicht. 2 • quelque chose, rien; something, nothing;
synonyme: fɛla. etwas, nichts. A ko fɛn tɛ n na. Il dit :«Je n'ai
rien». He said: “I have nothing”. Er sagte:
fɛla [ɛ]̀ Nom. point de vue, opinion, avis,
„Ich habe nichts“.
préoccupation; point of view, opinion,
fɛn min bɛ nɔgɔnɔgɔ expr. visqueux; viscous,
concern; Standpunkt, Meinung, Anliegen. A
slimy; zähflüssig, dickflüssig, schleimig.
y'a fɛla fɔ n ye. Il m'a donné son opinion. He
synonyme: nɔgɔnɔgɔ .
gave me his opinion. Er hat mir seine Meinung 1
mitgeteilt. Category: Think. synonyme: fɛko. fɛnburalaw Nom. décomposeurs; decomposers;
fɛlɛ [ɛ]́ variante: fɛlɛbɔ. Nom. chasse en battue, Zersetzer. Category: Small animals.
chasse collective, battue; driven hunting, fɛncisɛbɛ Nom. bordereau d'expédition; delivery slip;
collective hunting; Jagd, Sammeljagd. Versandschein.
Kɔfilɛbaliya de bɛ kɛlɛ kɛ fɛlɛ ye. C'est
fɛndɛrɛyɔrɔ Nom. serre-joint; clamp, screw clamp;
lorsqu'on ne regarde pas en arrière que le
Schraubzwinge. Category: Tool.
combat se transforme en battue (proverbe). It's
when you don't look back that the fight turns fɛndilanbaliw Nom. ressource naturelle; natural
into a hunting fight (proverb). Wenn man nicht resource; natürliche Ressource,
zurückblickt, wird der Kampf zur Jagt Naturressource, natürlicher Rohstoff.
(Sprichwort). Category: Hunt and fish.
29/01/2026 196

fɛndɔnbaliya fɛnmanaman
fɛndɔnbaliya [ɛ́] Jula: fɛnlɔnbaliya. Nom. 2 • chose, truc, machin (verbe ou nom utilisé en
remplacement de celui qu'on ne parvient pas à
ignorance, innocence; ignorance, innocence;
trouver); thing (verb or noun used to replace
Unwissenheit, Unschuld. ... jamana si tɛ se
the one we cannot find); Ding (Verb oder
ka yiriwa a cogo la fɛndɔnbaliya kɔnɔ. ... Substantiv, das verwendet wird, um das zu
aucun pays ne peut se développer ersetzen, was wir nicht finden können). A bɛ
normalement dans l'ignorance. ...no country
dila ni fɛnkɛ jumɛn ye ? Ça se fabrique avec
can develop normally in ignorance. ..kein
quelle chose ? What thing is it made with? Mit
Land kann sich in Unwissenheit normal
was für einem Ding wird es hergestellt?
entwickeln. Category: Think.
synonyme: ɲɛdɔnbaliya, fɛnlɔnbaliya, fɛnkɛbali [ɛ́] [ɛ́] Nom. fainéant, bon à rien, paresseux;
kodɔnbaliya. lazy, good for nothing; faul, zu nichts taugen.
fɛnkɛbali ka ca ... les fainéants sont
fɛngɛ variante: fɛnkɛ. Nom. truc; thing; Ding.
1 nombreux ... there are many lazy people... Es
fɛngɛ [ɛ]́ Verbe. éviter, manquer, rater; avoid, miss; gibt viele faule Leute... antonyme: fɛnkɛla;
2
vermeiden, verpassen, verfehlen. ... ka a tɔgɔ synonyme: fuyan.
fɛngɛ... ... éviter de dire le nom ... ...avoid fɛnkɛla [ɛ́] Nom. travailleur (par opposition à fainéant);
saying the name... ...vermeiden sie es, den
hard-working (as opposed to lazy); fleißig (im
Namen auszusprechen...
Gegensatz zu faul). Fɛnkɛla de ka ca... Ce
fɛngɛkan [ɛ́] Nom. euphémisme, litote, façon sont ceux qui travaillent qui sont nombreux ...
détournée de dire; euphemism, It is those who work who are numerous... Es
understatement, roundabout way of saying; sind diejenigen, die arbeiten, die zahlreich
Euphemismus, Untertreibung, umständliche sind... antonyme: fɛnkɛbali.
Redewendung. ... a bɛɛ ye jatigɛ fɛngɛkan
fɛnkɛminɛn [ɛ́] Nom. 1 • récipient; container; Gefäß,
ye. ... ce sont tous des euphémismes pour
Behälter. Fɛnkɛminɛn tun t'a bolo. Elle
parler de la peur. ...these are all euphemisms
n’avait aucun récipient. She had no container.
for fear. ...das sind alles Euphemismen für
Sie hatte keinen Behälter.
Angst. Category: Think.
2 • personne utile; useful person; nützlicher
fɛngɛɲɛ [ɛ́] variante: fɛngɛngɛ. Nom. 1 • fesse (terme
Mensch. Karisa tɛ fɛnkɛminɛn ye. Untel n'est
atténué); buttock (attenuated term); Gesäß pas quelqu'un d'utile. So-and-so is not a useful
(abgeschwächte Bezeichnung). A fɛngɛɲɛ tun person. Der und der ist kein nützlicher
ka kunba. Elle avait des fesses bien remplies. Mensch.
She had a full buttocks. Sie hatte ein volles fɛnkolotanw [ɛ́-ó-ó-á] Nom. mollusques; molluscs;
Gesäß. Category: Body. synonyme: bobara,
Weichtiere. Category: Small animals.
sigilanmugu, jukunan.
fɛnkɔrɔ [ɛ́] variante: fɛnkɔrɔba. Nom. vieille
2 • croupe, derrière; rump, behind; Hinterteil,
personne, un ancien; old person; alte Person.
hinten.
Ne fa ka kɔrɔ fɛnkɔrɔw bɛɛ ye. Mon père est
fɛngwansan Nom. chose de peu de valeur; thing with
plus âgé que tous les autres vieux. My father is
little worth; Ding mit geringem Wert. older than all the other old people. Mein Vater
fɛnjenidiman Nom. matières inflammables; ist älter als alle anderen alten Leute.
Category: Person.
inflammable materials; entzündbare
Materialien /Stoffe. Category: Sign, Symbol. fɛnkuru [ɛ́] Nom. chose, objet, chose entière; thing,
fɛnjiman [ɛ ́-í-ã́] Nom. solution; solution; Lösung. object, whole thing; Ding, Objekt, Ganzes,
Gegenstand. ... u bɛ fɛnkuru ta ɲɔgɔn kama.
fɛnkɛ [ɛ]́ Verbe. 1 • chose faire, choser, machiner; ... elles se lancent l'une contre l'autre des objets
thing to do; etwas zu tun, zu tun, zu bearbeiten, entiers. ...they throw whole objects at each
etwas machen. ... fo a bɛ cɛncɛn fɛnkɛ ka a other. ...sie bewerfen sich gegenseitig mit
bɔ yen ... ... jusqu'à «choser» tout le sable, le ganzen Gegenständen.
retirer ... ... until you "do" all the sand, remove fɛnlɔnbaliya bambara: fɛndɔnbaliya. Nom.
it... ... bis Sie den gesamten Sand "gemacht" ignorance, innocence; ignorance, lack of
haben, entfernen Sie ihn ... knowledge, unawareness, innocence;
Unwissenheit, Ignoranz, Unkenntnis,
Unwissen, Unschuld, Schuldlosigkeit.
synonyme: ɲɛdɔnbaliya, fɛndɔnbaliya.
fɛnmanaman [ɛ ́] Nom. matière plastique; plastic
material; Plastikmaterial.
29/01/2026 197

fɛnmayɛlɛma fɛnsɔrɔlaba
fɛnmayɛlɛma [ɛ́] Nom. monstre; monster; Monster. fɛnɲanama [ɛ́] Jula: fɛnɲanaman.
fɛnmisɛn [ɛ ́-í-ɛ ́] synonyme: ɲɔnin. variante: fɛnɲɛnaman, fɛnɲɛnɛma. Nom.
1
variante: fɛnmisɛnnin. Nom. rougeole;
insecte; insect; Insekt. Mɔgɔ tɛ fɛnɲanama ku
measles; Masern. Category: Disease.
ta ka bɔ tasuma na. On ne prend pas un
synonyme: ɲɔninsan. insecte par la queue pour le tirer du feu
(proverbe). You don't grab an insect by the tail
fɛnmisɛn 2 Nom. touche-à-tout; jack of all trades, to pull it out of the fire (proverb). Man packt
someone who can not leave the fingers from ein Insekt nicht am Schwanz, um es aus dem
touching everything; Alleskönner, einer, der es Feuer zu ziehen (Sprichwort).
nicht lassen kann alles zu berühren. Category: Insect. synonyme: fɛnmisɛnnin,
Tigasɛnɛbali tɛ nkɛlɛn dɔn fɛnmisɛn ye. ninmanfɛnmisɛn.
Celui qui n'a jamais cultivé de champ
fɛnɲanamandumulaw Nom. insectivores;
d'arachides ne sait pas que l'écureuil fouisseur
est un touche-à-tout (proverbe). Anyone who insectivorous; insektenfressend.
has never cultivated a peanut field does not Category: Food.
know that the burrowing squirrel is a jack of fɛnɲanamanfaganan
all trades (proverb). Wer noch nie ein
synonyme: dumunfɛfagafura. Nom. pesticide;
Erdnußfeld bestellt hat, weiß nicht, daß das
pesticide; Pestizid, Insektengift.
wühlende Eichhörnchen ein Alleskönner ist
(Sprichwort). fɛnɲɛnaman [ɛ ́-ɛ́-ɛ́-á] Morphemes: fɛn-ɲɛnama.
fɛnmisɛnnin Nom. insecte, petite bestiole; insect, synonyme: fɛnmisɛnnin, ninmanfɛnmisɛn.
critter; Insekt, Tierchen, kleine Bestie. variante: fɛnɲanama. Nom. insecte; insect;
Category: Insect. synonyme: fɛnɲanama. Insekt. Category: Insect.
fɛnnabonyalan [ɛ́] Nom. microscope; microscope; fɛnɲinisɛbɛ Nom. bon de commande; order sheet, call
Mikroskop. A tɛ se ka ye... fo card, request form; Bestellschein.
fɛnnabonyalan ... On ne peut pas le voir sans fɛnpɛrɛntaw Nom. matières explosives; explosive
microscope... You can't see it without a material; explosive Materialien / Substanzen.
microscope... Ohne Mikroskop kann man es Category: Sign, Symbol.
nicht sehen... synonyme: labonyalan, fɛnsansɛbɛ Nom. lettre de commande; letter to order,
boɲananba, bonyanan.
order letter; Bestellschreiben.
fɛnnabɔnɔ [ɛ́] variante: fɛnnabɔnɛ. Nom. 1 • chose fɛnsɛn [ɛ ̀-ɛ ̀] variante: fɛnsɛ. vt. épandre; spread;
1
ou personne qui déçoit, déception, regret; thing
ausbreiten, ausstreuen.
or person that disappoints, disappointment,
regret. Faatu den kɛra fɛnnabɔnɔ ye. Fatou a
fɛnsɛn
2
Jula: fɛnsɛ. variante: fɛnsɛn. vt. étendre, étaler,
été déçue par son enfant. Fatou was déployer; spread, display, deploy; ausbreiten,
disappointed by her child. Fatou war von ausstreuen, auslegen, entfalten. A y'a ka
ihrem Kind enttäuscht. kosonkalan fɛnsɛn. Elle a étendu sa
2 • sot, stupide, idiot; stupid, idiot; Dummkopf, couverture bariolée. She spread her colourful
Idiot. blanket. Sie breitete ihre bunte Decke aus.
fɛnnadila [ɛ́] Nom. 1 • rangement, arrangement; fɛnsɔrɔlaba Nom. personne qui gagne beaucoup;
storage, arrangement; Lagerung, Anordnung. person who earns a lot; Person, die viel
2 • récoltes; harvests; Ernten. Sɛnɛkɛbaliya ka verdient. Sani ka siran a faden fɛnsɔrɔlaba
fisa fɛnnadilabaliya ye. Mieux vaut ne pas ɲɛ, e ka siran a lasagonnaba ɲɛ. Crains plus
cultiver que ne pas récolter ce qu'on a cultivé. un rival très économe qu'un rival qui gagne
It is better not to cultivate than not to harvest beaucoup (proverbe). Fear a very economical
what you have cultivated. Es ist besser, nicht rival more than a rival who earns a lot
zu kultivieren, als nicht zu ernten, was man (proverb). Fürchte dich vor einem sehr
angebaut hat. sparsamen Rivalen mehr als vor einem
Rivalen, der viel verdient (Sprichwort).
fɛnnafaman Nom. élément nutritif; nutritional
element; Nahrungswert.
fɛnnandiya Nom. 1 • cupidité; greed, cupidity; Gier.
2 • attachement aux biens matériels;
attachment to material goods; Bindung an
materielle Güter.
29/01/2026 198

fɛntigi fɛrɛtɛtɛ
fɛntigi [ɛ]́ Morphemes: fɛn-tigi. Nom. riche, fɛrɛbaganci [ɛ́] Nom. 1 • personne libre, sans
possédant, propriétaire; rich person, owner; contrainte, à l'aise; free person, without
Reicher, Besitzer, Eigentümer. Bolokolon constraint, at ease; freier Mensch, ohne
sangaɲɔgɔn tɛ fɛntigi ye. Le pauvre ne se Zwang, entspannt.
mesure pas au riche (proverbe). The poor 2 • négligent, paresseux, oisif, nonchalante;
cannot be measured against the rich careless, lazy, idle, nonchalant; nachlässig,
(proverb). Die Armen können nicht mit den faul, untätig, lässig.
Reichen verglichen werden (Sprichwort). fɛrɛfɛrɛ [á-í-ɛ́] synonyme: fifalan. 1 • Nom. éventail;
1
fɛntigiya vt. 1 • être ou devenir riche; be rich or fan; Fächer. Category: Tool. synonyme: firifire,
become rich; reich sein oder reich werden. tafiyɛlan.
2 • richesse; wealth, riches, richness; 2 • Verbe. secouer, agiter, remuer; shake, toss
Reichtum. A y'a ka fɛntigiya de jira n na. Il and turn, stir; schütteln, rütteln, rühren.
m'a montré combien il est riche. He showed me Wulu... y'i tulo fɛrɛfɛrɛ ... Le chien ... secoua
how rich he is. Er hat mir gezeigt, wie reich er ses oreilles ... The dog... shook his ears... Der
ist. Hund... schüttelte die Ohren...
fɛntimiman [ɛ ́-í-í-ã́] Nom. glucide; carbohydrate; fɛrɛfɛrɛ [ɛ́] Verbe. écarter, étaler, trier; disperse,
2
Kohlenhydrat. spread out, sort; ausbreiten, sortieren. A bɛ
fɛntolibali Nom. déchet inerte; inert waste; jama fɛrɛfɛrɛ ... Il écarte la foule ... He pushes
Inertabfälle. the crowd aside... Er schiebt die Menge
fɛnw sɔngɔ jatiminasɛbɛ Jula: fɛɛnw sɔngɔ beiseite... ka ɲɔfɛrɛfɛrɛ étaler le mil pour le
trier. spread the millet to sort it. Verteilen Sie
jatiminasɛbɛ. expr. devis; estimate; Offerte,
die Hirse, um sie zu sortieren.
Preisangebot, Kostenvorschlag.
Category: Finance. fɛrɛfɛrɛli [ɛ́] Nom. liberté; freedom, liberty; Freiheit. ...
fɛnw tɔgɔ Jula: fɛɛnw tɔgɔ. Nom. désignation;
fɛrɛfɛrɛliw ni josariyaw ... ... les libertés et les
droits ... ... freedoms and rights... ...
designation, description; Bezeichnung.
Freiheiten und Rechte ...
fɛrɛ [ɛ-̀ ɛ́] Nom. place publique, espace ouvert;
1 fɛrɛkɛnɛ [ɛ̀-ɛ̀-ɛ́-ɛ́] Nom. place devant la maison, place
public square, open space; öffentlicher Platz,
publique; place in front of the house, public
offener Raum, Freiraum. Cɛ bɛɛ nana fɛrɛ la.
space; Platz vor dem Haus, öffentlicher Platz.
Tous les hommes vinrent sur la place publique.
Taa fɛrɛkɛnɛ na ... Va sur la place publique ...
All the men came to the public square. Alle
Go to the public square... Gehen Sie auf den
Männer kamen auf den öffentlichen Platz.
öffentlichen Platz...
fɛrɛ [ɛ-̀ ɛ́] Nom. grand indicateur; black-throated
2 fɛrɛmetiri Emprunt de : français. Nom. fermeture à
honey-guide; Vogelart. Category: Bird.
glissière; zip, zipper; Reissverschluss.
indicator indicator.
fɛrɛmɛ [ɛ́] Emprunt de : français. Nom. porte,
fɛrɛ [ɛ-́ ɛ́] Nom. 1 • être large, spacieux, être à l'aise,
3
cadenas, fermeture; door, padlock, closure;
être suffisant, être disponible; be large, wide,
Tür, Vorhängeschloß, Verschluß.
spacious, roomy, feel comfortable, be at
ease, be enough, available; breit sein, fɛrɛn Emprunt de : français. Nom. frein; brake;
geräumig, bequem behaglich, genug sein, Bremse.
erhältlich sein, verfügbar. I ka du fɛrɛlen don.
fɛrɛnjuru Nom. câble de frein (vélo); brake cable;
Ta concession est spacieux. Your compound is
Bremskabel.
spacious. Ihr Gehöft ist geräumig.
2 • aisance, sans contrainte, absence de fɛrɛnminayɔrɔ Nom. poignée de frein; brake lever,
contrainte, librement; ease, comfort, without brake handle; Bremshebel, Bremsgriff.
constraint, freely; Behagen, Bequemlichkeit,
fɛrɛtadɛbɛ Nom. arbre (espèce); tree sp; Baumart.
Ungezwungenheit, frei, locker, freiwillig ohne
Einschränkung, uneingeschränkt. An fɛrɛla to
Category: Bush, shrub. anthocleista
djalonensis.
ma. Nous avons eu du to à discrétion. We had
millet porridge at discretion. Wir hatten Hirse
fɛrɛtɛtɛ [ɛ́] Adverbe. 1 • méticuleusement,
Brei so viel wir wollten. scrupuleusement; meticulously, scrupulously;
fɛrɛ [ɛ]́ variante: fɛri. Verbe. coincer; stuck;
akribisch, gewissenhaft. Ka fɔlen bɛɛ bɔ a
4
sira fɛ fɛrɛtɛtɛ ! Et de suivre scrupuleusement
einklemmen. A ye da fɛrɛ n bolo kan. Il m'a
tout ce qui avait été dit ! And to scrupulously
coincé la main dans la porte. He stuck my hand
follow everything that had been said! Und
in the door. Er steckte meine Hand in die Tür.
alles Gesagte gewissenhaft zu befolgen!
29/01/2026 199

fɛriden filan
2 • clairement et dans le détail; clearly and in fila [ì-à] variante: fla. num. deux (2); two (2);
1
detail; klar und detailliert. A ɲɛfɔ a ye
zwei, 2. U fila bɛɛ. Tous les deux. Both of
fɛrɛtɛtɛ ! Explique-le lui très clairement !
them. Alle beide.
Explain it to him very clearly! Erkläre es ihm
ganz deutlich!
fila
2
Nom. peul, fulani; Fulani; Fulani Volksgruppe.
Category: Community. synonyme: mibi.
fɛriden Nom. fer à repasser; iron; Bügeleisen.
synonyme: finipaselan. fila bɛnbaliw Nom. parallèles; parallels;
Parallelismen.
fɛs interj. pas du tout, absolument pas; not at all,
absolutely not; überhaupt nicht, absolut nicht.
fila fila num. deux par deux, deux chacun; two by two,
N ma a ye fɛs ! Je ne l'ai pas vu du tout ! I two each; je zwei, zwei für jeden.
didn't see it at all! Ich habe es überhaupt nicht filabara [ì-à] Nom. testicules; testicles; Hoden. ... a
gesehen!
filabara de nana funun. ... ses testicules ont
fɛsɛfɛsɛ 1 [ɛ́-ɛ́-ɛ́-ɛ́] 1 • vt. enquêter, détailler, faire enflé. ...his testicles swelled. ...seine Hoden
minutieusement; investigate, describe in waren geschwollen. Category: Body.
detail, do carefully, thoroughly; untersuchen, synonyme: yɛrɛ , kiliden, fɔrɔkili, kaya , lɔɔrɛ,
3 2
erforschen, ermitteln, detaillieren, worokɔrɔla, naɲɔgɔn, bɛlɛfara.
spezifizieren, einzeln aufführen, gründlich
prüfen. ... o bɛɛ fɛsɛfɛsɛra jama ye. ... tout filaburu synonyme: bulu. feuille; leaf; Blatt.
cela a été exposé dans les moindres détails. synonyme: jiribulu, furabulu.
...all of this was exposed in great detail. ...das
filafeereyɔrɔ n.comp. pharmacie; pharmacy,
alles wurde sehr detailliert dargelegt.
chemist's shop; Apotheke, Drogerie.
2 • Nom. enquête, contrôle; survey, inquiry,
Category: Building. synonyme: furamarayɔrɔ.
investigation, control, check; Untersuchung,
Kontrolle. filakan Morphemes: fula-kan. Nom. langue fulfuldé;
fɛsɛfɛsɛ [ɛ́] Adverbe. catégoriquement, complètement Fulfulde language; Fulani Sprache.
2
(pour un refus); categorically, completely (for filakɛ [ì-à] Verbe. 1 • refaire; redo, remake;
a refusal); kategorisch, vollständig (für eine
wiederholen, nochmals machen. Baara ma
Ablehnung). A y'i ban fɛsɛfɛsɛ ! Il refusa
filakɛ. Le travail n'a pas été refait. The work
catégoriquement ! He categorically refused!
has not been redone. Die Arbeiten wurden
Er lehnte kategorisch ab!
nicht wiederholt.
fɛta [ɛ-̀ á] Nom. avis, opinion, point de vue; 2 • biner, faire le deuxième sarclage; to hoe, do
opinion; Meinung, Ansicht, Gesichtspunkt. k'i the second weeding; das zweite-mal Unkraut
fɛta fɔ. dire son avis. say your opinion. sagen jäten. U ye ɲɔforo filakɛ. Ils ont biné le champ
Sie Ihre Meinung. synonyme: kɔnɔta. de mil. They hoed the millet field for the
second time. Sie hacken das Hirsefeld zum
fɛtaaden [ɛ̀-à] Nom. servante de la nouvelle mariée; zweiten-mal. Category: Agriculture.
maid of the new bride; Dienerin der neuen
filan [í] variante: flan, filankɛ. Nom. membre de la
Braut.
1
même classe d'âge, promotionnaire,
fɛti Emprunt de : français. Nom. fête; party; Fest, compagnon d'âge, camarade, égal, pair;
Feier. member of the same age group, age
companion, comrade, equal, peer;
fifa [ì-á] vt. 1 • éventer, attiser (le feu); fan, kindle
Angehöriger der gleichen Altersgruppe,
(fire); fächern, anfachen, schüren (Feuer). ka Altersbegleiter, Kamerad, Gleichgestellter,
to fifa éventer le to pour le refroidir. fan the Gleichaltriger.
porridge to cool it. fächern um den Hirsebrei filan [í] variante: flan, fila. Nom. placenta;
abzukühlen.
2
placenta; Plazenta. Muso jiginna, nka filan
2 • écarter, chasser; dismiss, chase away;
abweisen, verjagen.
ma na. La femme a accouché, mais le placenta
n'est pas sorti. The woman gave birth, but the
fifalan [ì-à] Morphemes: fifa-lan. Nom. ventilateur,
placenta did not come out. Die Frau gebar,
éventail; fan: mechanical or hand-held; aber die Plazenta kam nicht heraus.
Fächer, Ventilator. Category: Tool. Category: Body.
synonyme: tafiyɛlan, tafiyɛlan.
fiisa [í] Verbe. pratiquer la divination; practice
divination; Wahrsagen praktizieren. fiisali
divination. divination. Weissagung.
29/01/2026 200

filanan filatigi
filanan Morphemes: fila-nan. adj. deuxième, second; filaninteriya Nom. amitié intime, jumelage; intimate
second; zweite. A filanan... Deuxièmement... friendship, twinning; innige Freundschaft,
Secondly... Zweitens... a denmuso filanan sa intime Freundschaft, Partnerschaft.
deuxième fille. his second daughter. seine
Filaninteriya b'u ni ɲɔgɔn cɛ. Il y a entre eux
zweite Tochter. une très grande amitié. There is a great
friendship between them. Zwischen ihnen
filananya [í] Nom. position de second, deuxième
besteht eine tolle Freundschaft.
place, état de seconde épouse; position of the
filankafo Morphemes: fila-kafo. Nom. 1 • celui qui
second, being the second wife; Stellung des
Zweiten, der zweite Rang, zweiter Platz. ... appartient à deux groupes ou à deux religions
en même temps (par exemple, un chrétien ou
nka u y'u wasa don filananya la. ... mais ils
un musulman qui continue à adorer les
se sont contentés de la deuxième place. ...but
fétiches) ; someone who belongs to two groups
they settled for second place. ...aber sie gaben
or religions at the same time (e.g. a Christian
sich mit dem zweiten Platz zufrieden.
or Muslim who continues to worship fetishes);
filanbolo [í] variante: flanbolo. Nom. classe d'âge, Christ oder Moslem der weiterhin Götzen
groupe d'âge, promotion; same age group; anbetet.
gleiche Altersgruppe. I ni mɔgɔ minnu ye 2 • hypocrite, personne pratiquant un double
filan ye, o de ye i ka filanbolo ye. Toi et les
jeu; hypocrite, two-faced attitude; Heuchler,
Doppelspiel. Filankafokuma man ɲi hɔrɔnjɛ
gens qui sont tes pairs, vous formez une même
classe d'âge. You and the people who are your la. Les paroles doubles ne conviennent pas à
peers form the same age group. Sie und Ihre une assemblée de nobles (proverbe).
Altersgenossen gehören derselben Hypocritical words are not suitable for an
Altersgruppe an. assembly of nobles (proverb).
Doppelzüngigkeit eignen sich nicht für eine
filanfilan [ì-à] Nom. indécision, hésitation; indecision,
Adligenversammlung (Sprichwort).
hesitation; Unentschlossenheit, Zögern. O ko
filankafoya Morphemes: filankafo-ya. Nom.
filanfilan bɛ n na. Je suis dans l'indécision
hypocrisie, fausseté, double jeu, duplicité,
pour cette affaire. I have hesitations about this
mauvaise volonté; hypocrisy, falseness,
matter. Ich bin in dieser Angelegenheit
duplicity, insincerity, bad will; Heuchelei,
unentschlossen.
Falschheit, Doppelspiel, böser Wille. A ye
filanfilantɔ [ì-à-ì-à] Nom. personne indécise,
filankafoyawale de kɛ min ye. Il y a là un
hésitante; undecided, hesitant person; comportement hypocrite. This is hypocritical
unentschlossener, zögerlicher Mensch. behaviour. Das ist heuchlerisches Verhalten.
Filanfilantɔ ye mɔgɔ min ye, n na a kɛ n t'a synonyme: jijukɔrɔsaya.
kɛ. L’indécis, c'est «je vais le faire, je ne vais
filankulu [í] variante: filantɔn. Nom. groupe d'âge,
pas le faire». Undecided is “I’m going to do it,
I’m not going to do it.” Unentschlossen ist: classe d'âge, promotion; age group, age class;
„Ich werde es tun, ich werde es nicht tun.“. Altersgruppe, Altersklasse.
synonyme: filansɛrɛ.
filanin [ì-à-í] variante: filaninma. Nom. 1 • jumeau,
jumelle; twin; Zwilling. I denw ye filaninw ye
filanma [í] Nom. membre de la même classe d'âge,
wa ? Est-ce que tes enfants sont des jumeaux ?
promotionnaire, compagnon d'âge; member of
the same age group; Mitglied der selben
Are your children twins? Sind deine Kinder
Altersstufe.
Zwillinge? filanin lakikaw les vrais jumeaux.
identical twins. eineiige Zwillinge. filansɛrɛ [í] variante: filantɔn. Nom. groupe d'âge,
synonyme: maafila. promotion; age group; Altersklasse. U fila bɛ
2 • couple; couple, pair; Paar. filansɛrɛ kelen ye. Ils sont de même classe
filaninbin [ì-à-ì] Jula: filaninben. Nom. match nul,
d'âge tous les deux. They are both of the same
age group. Sie gehören beide zur gleichen
jeu égal; drawn game, draw; Unentschieden.
Altersgruppe. synonyme: filankulu.
Filaninbin bɛ kɛ bilakorow ka baaritayɔrɔ
la. A la lutte, les gamins font souvent jeu égal. filantɛrɛ Nom. fenêtre; window; Fenster.
In wrestling, kids are often equal. Beim synonyme: finɛtiri, fɛlɛwo, fɔlɔ 3 , fiɲɛdonda.
Zweikampf bei Kindern ist der Spielausgang
filasi Emprunt de : français. Nom. flash électronique;
oft unentschieden.
electronic flash; Elektronenblitzgerät.
filaninladegi n.comp. paire minimale; minimal pair;
filatigi Variant: farafindɔgɔtɔrɔ. guérisseur; healer;
Minimalpaar.
Heiler, Medizinmann. Category: Person.
synonyme: banafurakɛla.
29/01/2026 201

file fili sariyatigɛla
file Jula: filen. variante: fle. Nom. 1 • sifflet; filɛkasɛbɛ variante: filɛkasɛbɛn. Nom. copie; copy;
whistle; Pfeife. filen fiyɛ siffler. whistle. Kopie.
pfeifen. filɛlan [í-ɛ́-á] Morphemes: filɛ-lan. Nom. tout
2 • flûte; flute; Flöte. ... a filenin kan ka di. ... instrument pour observer : miroir, lunettes,
sa flûte a un joli son. ...his flute has a lovely microscope, télévision; all devices for
sound. ...seine Flöte hat einen schönen Klang. observing: mirror, glasses, microscope,
Category: Musical instrument. television; alle Geräte des Schauens: Spiegel,
filefyɛ [ì-è] Jula: filenfiyɛ. Verbe. arbitrer; to Brillen, Mikroskop, Fernseher. Filɛlan
referee; Schiedsrichter sein.
ɲumanba de don. Ce sont des très bonnes
synonyme: aribitiri, filetigi. lunettes. These are very good glasses. Das sind
sehr gute Brillen.
filen [í-ẽ́] comparer: bara1. synonyme: fiyɛ.
filɛli [í-ɛ́-í] Morphemes: filɛ-li. Nom.
variante: file. Nom. calebasse, outre; calabash;
1 • divination; divination; Weissagung,
Kalebasse. N bamuso bi ɲɔ ko filen kɔnɔ.
Wahrsagen.
Ma mère lave le mil dans une calebasse. My
2 • observation; observation; Beobachtung.
mother washes the millet in a calabash. Meine
Mutter wascht die Hirse in einer Kalebasse. filɛli jafilɛ expr. bouton lecture; play button, playback
Category: Container. lagenaria siceraria. button; Wiedergabetaste, Play-Taste.
synonyme: fiyɛ 2 . filɛlikɛla Morphemes: filɛli-kɛ-la. Nom. devin; diviner,
filenjiri Jula: filenyiri. Nom. calebassier; calabash seer; Wahrsager. synonyme: donkibarubɔla.
tree; Kalebassenbaum. Category: Tree. filɛliminanw Nom. appareils de vision; vision devices;
Crescentia cujete. synonyme: filenyiri.
Sichtgeräte.
filenkandiman Nom. clarinette; clarinet; Klarinette.
filɛri Emprunt de : français. Nom. fleur; flower;
Category: Musical instrument.
Blume. Category: Parts of a plant.
filennin Morphemes: filen-nin. Nom. 1 • sifflet (pour
filɛwo Nom. hublot; window, porthole; Bullauge,
les enfants); whistle (for children); Pfeife.
Sichtfenster, Luke.
2 • piccolo; piccolo; Piccoloflöte.
Category: Musical instrument. fili 1 [í-í] vt. jeter, lancer, rejeter; throw, chuck,
discard, dispose of, reject; werfen, ablegen,
filenyiri bambara: filenjiri. Nom. calebassier; calabash
entlassen, abtun, entsorgen, verwerfen. X fili Y
tree; Kalebassenbaum. Category: Tree.
ma jeter X à Y. throw X at/to Y. X auf Y
Crescentia cujete. synonyme: filenjiri.
werfen. A y’i fili ka bɔ yiri sanfɛ. Il s’est jeté
filetigi Nom. arbitre; referee, umpire; Schiedsrichter.
de l’arbre. He threw himself from the tree. Er
synonyme: filefyɛ, jalatigɛbaga, aribitiri. ließ sich vom Baum fallen.
filetigifyɛ Verbe. se comporter en maître, jouir fili 2 [ì-í] comparer: jalaki. Verbe. 1 • se tromper,
pleinement, faire le fier; behave like a master, faire erreur; to be mistaken, get it wrong, make
enjoy fully, act proud; sich wie ein Meister an error, to err; sich täuschen, ein Fehler
benehmen, genießen in vollen Zügen, stolz machen, falsch machen, sich irren. N filila. Je
handeln. I kana i filetigifyɛ án ka so. Ne me suis trompé. J'ai fait une faute. I made a
viens pas faire le fier dans notre maison. Don't mistake. Ich habe mich geirrt. synonyme: lafili 1 .
come and act proud in our house. Benehmen 2 • erreur, faute; error, mistake; Fehler,
Sie sich in unserem Haus nicht stolz. Irrtum, Versehen. ... ni fili ma kɛ ... ...s'il n'y a
filɛ [í-ɛ́] vt. regarder, examiner, voir, considérer, pas d'erreur ... ...if there is no error... ...wenn
faire attention à, rendre visite; look, examine, kein Fehler vorliegt...
consider, visit, pay attention to; schauen, fili Nom. araignée rougeâtre de grande taille; big
3
ansehen, untersuchen, betrachten, beachten,
reddish spider; rötliche grosse Spinne.
besuchen, achtgeben auf. Wari filɛ ! Voici
Category: Spider.
l’argent ! Here’s the money! Schau, hier ist das
Geld. Ne filɛ ! Me voici ! Here I am! Hier bin
fili sariyatigɛla Nom. juge de touche; linesman;
ich! A filɛ ! Regarde ! Look! Schau! Sigilan
Linienrichter.
filɛ ! Voici une chaise ! Asseyez-vous ! Have a
seat! Hier ist ein Stuhl. sitzen sie ab. An b’a
filɛ. On verra. We will see. Wir werden sehen.
29/01/2026 202

filibaganci fin
filibaganci Nom. celui qui fait semblant de n'être au filiya Jula: firiya. Nom. viduité (période de), veuvage
courant de quelque chose, celui qui fait (les 40 jours qui suivent le décès du mari);
l'innocent, faux ingénu; the one who pretends widowhood (the 40 days following the death of
not to know something, the one who acts as if the husband); Witwenstand (die 40 Tage nach
he were innocent, false ingenuous; derjenige, dem Tod des Ehemanns). Muso bɛ filiya so
der vorgibt, etwas nicht zu wissen, derjenige, kɔnɔ. La femme reste recluse dans la maison.
der unschuldig, falsch und naiv handelt,
The woman remains a recluse in the house.
scheinheilig handeln. Tugubaganci ne
Die Frau bleibt eingeschlossen im Haus.
filibaganci ye jɛɲɔgɔnma ye. Celui qui fait synonyme: firiya.
exprès et celui qui fait l'innocent sont de bons
compères (proverbe). Wer es mit Absicht tut,
filiyatɔ Jula: firiyatɔ. Nom. veuve, femme en période
und wer scheinheilig handelt, sind gute de viduité; widow, woman in period of
Freunde (Sprichwort). widowhood; Witwe, Frau in der Zeit der
Witwenschaft. Filiyatɔ ka finin ye baga ye.
filibagatɔ Nom. personne qui se trompe; person
Les veuves s'habillent en bleu clair. Widows
making an error; Person, die sich täuscht,
dress in light blue. Die Witwen kleiden sich in
einen Fehler macht. Olu ye mɔgɔ filibagatɔw
hellblau. synonyme: firiyatɔ.
ye ... Ce sont des gens dans l'erreur ... These
are people who are wrong... Das sind Leute,
filiyɔrɔ Nom. erreur, faute; error, mistake; Irrtum,
die Unrecht haben... Fehler. ... k'i filiyɔrɔ ɲini... ... chercher ton
filibali Nom. infaillible; infallible; unfehlbar. Mɔgɔ erreur ... ...find your mistake... ...finde deinen
Fehler... synonyme: filimako.
filibali tɛ. Personne n'est infaillible
(proverbe). No one is infallible (proverb). fin 1 [ĩ̀] 1 • adj.pred. noir, sombre; black, dark;
Niemand ist unfehlbar (Sprichwort). schwarz, dunkel. O kɔni ye so fin ye ...
filifili [ì-í-ì-ì] Verbe. éparpiller, jeter ici et là, lancer Celui-là, c'est un cheval noir ... This one is a
1
dark horse... Das hier ist ein dunkles Pferd...
de main à main; scatter, hand to hand throw;
streuen, ausstreuen, Hand-zu-Hand-Wurf. ka
Category: colour. synonyme: biri
8
.
ɲɔkisɛ filifili syɛw kɔrɔ. disperser des grains 2 • vt. noircir, être sombre, être ou rendre noir;
de mil pour les poules. scatter grains of millet
blacken, be dark; schwärzen, schwarz werden,
for the chickens. Streuen von Hirsekörner für
dunkel. San finna. Sanji bi na. Le ciel a
die Hühner. noirci. Il va pleuvoir. The sky has got dark. It is
going to rain. Der Himmel ist schwarz
filifili
2
Adverbe. très fin, finement; very fine, finely;
geworden. Es wird regnen.
fein. ka bɔgɔ nɔɔni filifili gâcher le banco très 3 • Nom. obscurité; darkness; Dunkelheit. ...
finement. mix the plaster very finely. Mischen
fin bɛna don dɔɔnin ... ... l'obscurité va
Sie den Mörtel sehr fein.
commencer ... ...the darkness will begin...
filijɔ Morphemes: fili-jɔ. Nom. filet de jet; net for ...die Dunkelheit wird beginnen...
throwing; Netz zum Werfen. Category: Hunt 4 • très, tout à fait; very, utterly, quite,
and fish. completely; sehr, völlig, ganz. geren fin tout à
filimako [ì-ì-à-ó] Morphemes: fili-ma-ko. Nom. fait vert. completely green. völlig grün.
erreur, faute; error, mistake; Irrtum, Fehler. I 5 • pour rien, en vain; for nothing, in vain; für
nichts, zwecklos, erfolglos, vergebens.
ka filimako cayara án ka baara la. Tu as fait
Masakɛ y'i fin k'i jɛ ka kɛɲɛkɛ. Le roi usa de
beaucoup d'erreurs dans notre travail. You
tous les moyens possibles, mais en vain. The
made a lot of mistakes in our work. Sie haben
king used all possible means, but in vain. Der
bei unserer Arbeit viele Fehler gemacht.
König nutzte alle möglichen Mittel, aber
synonyme: filiyɔrɔ.
vergebens.
filimu comparer: foto1; jaa2. Emprunt de : français. fin [ì] Verbe. cuire à la vapeur; to steam; dampfen.
2
Nom. film; film, movie; Film. filimu bɔ
Ne ka fari ani karisa ka fari, u tɛ fin ɲintin
montrer un film. show a film. einen Film
kelen na. Ma pâte de haricots et celle d'une
zeigen.
autre personne ne se préparent pas dans le
filiɲini variante: filiw latilenni. Nom. correction; même couscoussier (proverbe). My bean paste
correction; Korrektur. Category: Language and that of another person are not prepared in
and thought. synonyme: latilenni. the same couscous steamer (proverb). Meine
Bohnenpaste und die einer anderen Person
filitiri Emprunt de : français. Nom. filtre; filter; Filter.
werden nicht im selben Couscous-Pfanne
synonyme: sɛɛnɛnan. zubereitet (Sprichwort).
29/01/2026 203

fin finin
fin [ì] adj. grave, excessif, grand; serious, fini See main entry: .[ì-í] bambara: finin.
3 1
excessive, large; ernst, übertrieben, groß, variante: fini. exemplar: vêtement, tissu,
schwerwiegend. nkalon fin mensonge grave. pagne, linge, habit, étoffe. Nom. vêtement,
serious lie. schwerwiegende Lüge. fangafin tissu, pagne, linge, habit, étoffe; cloth, clothes,
pouvoir dictatorial, tyrannie. dictatorial garment, fabric; Kleid, Stoff, Tuch. ka finin
power, tyranny. diktatorische Macht, ko faire la lessive. wash clothes. Kleider
Tyrannei. donso fin très grand chasseur. very
waschen. Category: Clothing. synonyme: finin.
2
great hunter. sehr toller Jäger.
fini Nom. espèce d'herbe, fonio; kind of grass,
finda Nom. partie noire, couleur noire; black part, 2
fonio; Grasart, Fonio. Category: Grass, herb,
black colour; schwarzer Teil, schwarze Farbe.
vine. eleusine indica. synonyme: foni .
Category: colour. 2
findonda [ì-ò] Nom. début du crépuscule, crépuscule finidulonnan Morphemes: fini-dulon-nan. Nom.
pince à linge; clothes peg; Wäsche-klammer.
(entre 18 heures et 18 h 30); early twilight,
Category: Tool.
twilight (between 6 p.m. and 6:30 p.m.); frühe
Dämmerung, Dämmerung (zwischen 18:00 finifana variante: fiinifaana. Verbe. flotter au vent,
und 18:30 Uhr). aller de droite et de gauche, pencher tantôt d'un
finɛtiri Emprunt de : français. Nom. fenêtre; window; côté tantôt de l'autre, faire tournoyer; float in
Fenster. Category: Building.
the wind, move from right to left, lean now to
synonyme: filantɛrɛ, fɛlɛwo.
one side and now to the other, twirl; Im Wind
schweben, sich von rechts nach links bewegen,
finfin [ì-í] Nom. charbon de bois; charcoal; Kohle, mal zur einen und mal zur anderen Seite
1
Holzkohle. Cɛkɔrɔba tɛ sɔsɔ, nka finfin bɛ neigen, wirbeln. Jɔnjɔn bɛ finifana nɛgɛbere
jira a la. On ne contredit pas un homme d'âge, kunna. Le drapeau flotte au sommet du mât
mais on lui montre du charbon de bois métallique. The flag flies at the top of the metal
(proverbe). You do not contradict a man of pole. Die Flagge weht oben auf der
age, but you show him charcoal (proverb). Metallstange.
Einem alten Mann widerspricht man nicht, finiko [ì-ì-ó] Nom. lavage, lessive, règles; washing,
sondern man zeigt ihm Kohle (Sprichwort).
laundry, menstruation; Waschen, Wäsche,
finfin [í-í] Verbe. noircir peu à peu; gradually Wäscherei , Menstruation. Category: Clothing.
2
blacken; stufenweise schwärzen. synonyme: fininko.
finfin [ì] Verbe. ballonner; bloat; aufblähen. A kɔnɔ finikobɔrɔsi comparer: sabarajɔsibɔrɔsi.
3
bɛ finfin. Il a des ballonnements. He has Morphemes: fìni-ko-bɔrɔsi. Nom. brosse pour
bloating. Category: Disease. laver les vêtements; brush for washing clothes;
finfinkala [ì-ì] Nom. crayon noir, plume, calame; Kleider Bürste. Category: Tool.
black pencil, feather; schwarzer Bleistift, finikola Nom. lessiveur; person washing clothes;
Feder. Kleiderwäscher.
finfinmugu [ì-ì] Nom. charbon de bois en poudre; finikomansin [ì-ì-ò-ã́-ĩ́] n.comp. lave-linge;
powdered charcoal; pulverisierte Holzkohle. washing machine; Waschmaschine.
finfinni [ì-ì] Nom. ballonnement (avec selles noires, finimugu bambara: fininmugu. Nom. bande de tissu
maladie des enfants); bloating (with black non-cousu, tissu, étoffe, pièce de tissu en
stools, children's illness); Blähungen (mit général; strip of not-sewn cloth, clothe, fabric;
schwarzem Stuhl, Kinderkrankheit). Finfinni Stoffstreifen, Stoff. synonyme: fininmugu.
ye den minɛ. L'enfant a eu des ballonnements. finin [í-í] Jula: fini. Nom. fonio, éleusine; fonio;
1
The child had bloating. Das Kind hatte
Foniohirse. Category: Food, Grass, herb,
Blähungen. Category: Disease.
vine. Base de couscous. A cereal crop used for
synonyme: kɔnɔfinfin.
making cous-cous. Digitaria exilis.
fingifɔngɔ [ì-ì] Verbe. essouffler; out of breath; außer synonyme: foni 2 .
Atem. Faatu ye nɛgɛso boli fo ka a finin [ì] Jula: fini. Nom. vêtement, tissu, pagne,
2
fingifɔngɔ. Fatou a roulé à bicyclettes jusqu'à linge, habit, étoffe; garment, fabric, loincloth,
en être essoufflée. Fatou rode her bicycle until linen, clothe; Kleidungsstück, Stoff,
she was out of breath. Fatou fuhr mit dem Lendenschurz, Leinen, Kutte, Stoff.
Fahrrad, bis sie außer Atem war. synonyme: fini.
1
29/01/2026 204

fininbugu fiɲɛ
fininbugu Morphemes: finin-bugu. Nom. tente; tent; fininta Morphemes: finin-ta. Nom. circoncision,
Zelt. synonyme: tantan, finiso. excision; circumcision, excision;
3
Beschneidung, Exzision. synonyme: finintali,
finindumukɔnɔnin Nom. chanteur d'Afrique; kind
sigili , soli, boloko, nɛgɛkɔrɔsigi, bolokoli.
of bird; Vogelart. Category: Bird. serinus
3 5
leucopygius. finintaden Nom. circoncis, excisée; circumcised,
finingori [í] variante: fininkɔri. Nom. plat de fonio; excised; beschnitten, ausgeschnitten.
fonio dish; Fonio-Gericht. Category: Types of finintali Nom. circoncision, excision; circumcision,
food. excision; Beschneidung, Exzision.
fininko [ì-ì] Nom. 1 • lavage, lessive; washing, synonyme: nɛgɛkɔrɔsigi, fininta.
laundry; Waschen, Wäsche. synonyme: finiko. finipasela Nom. blanchisseur; laundry worker,
2 • règles; menses, monthlies, period; Regeln, ironing worker, washer; Person die bügelt,
Monatsblutung. Fininko b'a la. Elle a ses Wäscher. Category: Person.
règles. She has her period. Sie hat ihre finipaselan variante: fininjɔsilan. Nom. fer à repasser;
Periode.
iron; Bügeleisen. Category: Tool.
fininkobaliya Jula: finikobaliya. Nom. aménorrhée, synonyme: fɛriden.
arrêt ou absence des règles; amenorrhoea,
finisɛgɛ [í] Nom. espèce de plante; kind of plant;
stopping or absence of menstruation;
Amenorrhö, keine oder aufhören der Pflanzenart. Category: Grass, herb, vine.
Menstruation. Category: Disease.
cephalo stigma perrottetii.
fininkobanbali Jula: finikobanbali. Nom. finiso Morphemes: fìni-so. synonyme: tanti, tantan.
polyménorrhée, menstruation prolongée ou Nom. tente; tent; Zelt. Category: Building.
continue; polymenorrhea, prolonged our synonyme: fininbugu.
continuing menstruation; Polymenorrhoe, finman [ì-ã́] adj. noir, sombre; black, dark; schwarz,
verlängerte oder andauernde Menstruation.
Category: Disease.
dunkel. Samara finmanw. Chaussures noires.
Black shoes. Schwarze Schuhe.
fininkojiri Jula: finikoyiri. n.comp. planche à linge,
Category: colour.
planche à laver; washboard, board for
finmanba [ì-à-á] variante: finkunba. Nom. pique;
washing clothes; Waschbrett. Category: Tool.
spade; Schaufel. synonyme: tofinba.
fininkolan Jula: finikolan. Nom. tout objet utilisé
finnin adj. noir; black; schwarz. Category: colour.
pour la lessive, savon, lessive; all objects used
for washing clothes; alle Gegenstände, die für synonyme: biri.
8
das Kleiderwaschen gebraucht werden.
finsan [í-á] Nom. 1 • pommier d'aki; ackee or akee;
fininkɔnɔ [ì-ì] Nom. bande de coton tissé; woven
Akee. Category: Tree. blighia sapida.
cotton strip; gewebter Baumwollstreifen.
2 • pomme d'acajou; cashew fruit; Cashew
fininkun [ì-ì] Nom. nœud du pagne, coin du pagne qu Frucht. Category: Food.
les femmes nouent et où elles resserrent leur finsankolo n.comp. noix de cajou; cashew nut;
argent; loincloth knot, corner of the loincloth
Cashewnuss. Category: Food.
that women tie and where they tighten their
money; Lendenschurzknoten, Ecke des finya [ì] Verbe. être ou devenir noir ou sombre; to be
Lendenschurzes, die Frauen binden und an der or become black or dark; schwarz oder dunkel
sie ihr Geld festziehen. Faatu y'a ka wari jate sein oder werden. A kunsigi bɛ finya... Ses
ka a siri a ka fininkun na. Fatou compta son cheveux sont noirs ... Her hair is black... Ihr
argent et le noua dans un coin de pagne. Fatou Haar ist schwarz...
counted her money and tied it in a corner of fiɲɛ [í-ɛ́] Nom. vent, air, souffle, gaz; wind, air,
1
her loincloth. Fatou zählte ihr Geld und band
breath, gas; Wind, Luft, Atem, Gas. Fiɲɛ bɛ.
es in eine Ecke ihres Lendenschurzes.
Il y a de l’air. There is a breeze. Es hat ein
fininmugu [ì-ì] Jula: finimugu. Nom. tissu, étoffe bisschen Luft. fiɲɛ barikama vent fort. strong
non cousue, pièce de tissu en général; fabric, wind. ein starker Wind. fiɲɛ kɛ gonfler.
unsewn fabric, piece of fabric in general;
inflate. aufblasen. Category: Weather.
Stoff, ungenähter Stoff, Stück Stoff im
synonyme: fiyɛn, fɔɲɔ.
Allgemeinen. synonyme: finimugu.
29/01/2026 205

fiɲɛ fiɲɛɲɛdimin
fiɲɛ synonyme: guli. variante: fɛgɛn. adj.pred. être fiɲɛjɛ [í] Jula: fɔɲɔgwɛ. Morphemes: fiɲɛ-jɛ. Nom.
2
léger, fragile, mince; to be light (weight), harmattan; harmattan wind, desert wind;
fragile, vulnerable, delicate, thin, tiny; leicht Harmattan Wind, Wüstenwind.
sein, zerbrechlich, empfindlich, fragil. Category: Weather. synonyme: foonɛnɛ ,
1
synonyme: fɛgɛ, fɛgɛfɛgɛ. fɔɲɔjɛ.
fiɲɛ 3 [ì-ɛ́] variante: siɲɛ. Nom. malformation, fiɲɛkɛlan 1 Morphemes: fiɲɛ-kɛ-lan. Nom. masque à
défaut, faute, marque, trace; malformation, gaz; gas mask; Gasmaske.
defect, fault, deficiency, mark, trace;
fiɲɛkɛlan [í] Morphemes: fiɲɛ-kɛ-lan. Nom. pompe
Mißbildung, Mangel, Fehler, Defekt, 2
Markierung. Mɔgɔ si kana mɔgɔ si fiɲɛ fɔ ... (à air), pompe à vélo; pump (air), bicycle
Que personne ne parle des défauts d'autrui ...
pump; Pumpe (Luft), Fahrradpumpe.
Let no one talk about the faults of others... synonyme: pɔnpe 2 , fiɲɛdonnan.
Niemand soll über die Fehler anderer reden ... fiɲɛkunbɛnnan
fiɲɛ 4 variante: fyɛn. Nom. jarre; jar; Krug. [í] Morphemes: fiɲɛ-kun-bɛn-nan.
Category: Container. variante: fiɲɛbɛnnan. Nom. 1 • coupe-vent,
fiɲɛ variante: fyɛn. Verbe. perdre son eau (en brise-vent; wind-breaker, windbreak, wind
5
protector; Windjacke, Windschutz. Saheli la,
séchant), demeurer humide; lose its water (by
drying), remain moist; verlieren ihr Wasser án bɛ jalamugu de kɛ fiɲɛkunbɛnnan ye. Au
(durch Austrocknung), bleiben feucht. nord, nous employons des turbans comme
Dugukolo fiɲɛna. Le sol est encore humide. coupe-vent. In the north, we use turbans as
The ground is still wet. Der Boden ist noch wind protectors. Im Norden verwenden wir
feucht. Turbane als Windschutz.
fiɲɛbana [í] Morphemes: fiɲɛ-bana. Nom. maladie 2 • haie d'arbres pour protéger du vent; hedge
of trees to protect from the wind; Hecke aus
contagieuse; contagious disease; ansteckende
Bäumen zum Schutz vor dem Wind.
Krankheit. Category: Disease.
fiɲɛma [í-ɛ́-ã́] Jula: fiɲɛman. synonyme: fɛgɛman.
fiɲɛbila Morphemes: fiɲɛ-bila. variante: [fyɛnbla].
adj. 1 • léger, fragile; light, fragile; leicht,
Nom. expiration d'air; expiration of air;
fragil.
ausatmen von Luft. fiɲɛsama ni fiɲɛbila
2 • anormal, défectueux, erroné; abnormal,
inspiration et expiration. inspiration and
unusual, defective, faulty; abnormal, abartig,
expiration. einatmen und ausatmen.
fehlerhaft, mangelhaft, defekt. mobili fiɲɛma
fiɲɛdigi [í] Morphemes: fiɲɛ-digi. Nom. pression voiture défectueuse. defective car. Defektes
atmosphérique; atmospheric pressure; Auto.
Luftdruck. Category: Weather. 3 • handicapé; disabled, handicapped;
synonyme: kunnafiɲɛ. behindert. Nabara ye mɔgɔ fiɲɛma ye. Le
fiɲɛdigisumalan Jula: fiɲɛdigisumanan.
paralytique est une personne handicapée. The
paralytic is a disabled person. Der Gelähmte
Morphemes: fiɲɛ-digi-suma-nan. Nom.
ist ein behinderter Mensch.
baromètre; barometer; Barometer, Wetterglas.
Category: Tool, Weather.
fiɲɛminɛ Emprunt de : fiɲɛ-minɛ. Nom. respiration,
inspiration, repos, récréation; respiration,
fiɲɛdilan Morphemes: fiɲɛ-di-lan.
breathing, rest, recreation; Atem, Atmung,
variante: fiɲɛfililan. Nom. ventilateur, ce qu einatmen, Pause, Ruhe, Erholung.
fournit de l'air; fan, ventilator; Lüfter, Fiɲɛminɛwagati ye kalanden dɔw ka
Ventilator. Category: Tool. darakudun ye. La récréation est le moment
fiɲɛdonda [í] Morphemes: fiɲɛ-don-da. Nom. pour certains élèves de prendre leur petit
fenêtre, ouverture pour l'air, valve de chambre déjeuner. Break time is the time for some
à air; window, air entrance; Fenster, students to have breakfast. In der Pause
Luftöffnung. synonyme: fɛlɛwo, filantɛrɛ.
frühstücken einige Schüler.
fiɲɛdonnan Morphemes: fiɲɛ-don-nan.
fiɲɛɲɛdimin [í] Morphemes: fiɲɛ-ɲɛ-dimin. Nom.
conjonctivite, maux des yeux dits «apollo»;
variante: fiɲɛkɛlan. Nom. pompe à air, pompe à
conjunctivitis; Konjunktivitis.
vélo; air pump; Luftpumpe. Category: Tool.
Category: Disease. synonyme: tereɲɛdimin.
synonyme: fiɲɛkɛlan.
2
29/01/2026 206

fiɲɛsama firikalankasa
fiɲɛsama [í] Nom. inspiration (d'air); inspiration (of 2 • s'abattre, se précipiter, s'écrouler; to fall, to
rush, to collapse; fallen, stürzen,
air); Inspiration (von Luft), Luft einatmen.
zusammenbrechen. Ntɔnw firila forow kan...
fiɲɛsama ni fiɲɛbila inspiration et expiration
Les criquets se sont abattus sur les champs ...
d'air. inhaling and exhaling air. Luft ein- und
The locusts descended on the fields... Die
ausatmen.
Heuschrecken fielen auf die Felder... So firila
fiɲɛtɛmɛwo Nom. trou d'aération; hole for fresh air;
La maison s'est écroulée. The house collapsed.
Luftzugang, Luftkanal, Luftöffnung, Das Haus stürzte ein.
Luftansaugung. Category: Household 3 • tout perdre, perdre sa situation, faire faillite;
equipment. lose everything, lose your situation, go
fiɲɛtɔ [ì-ɛ̀-ɔ́] Nom. infirme, handicapé, estropié; bankrupt; alles verlieren, deine Situation
verlieren, bankrott gehen. Musa firila. Moussa
infirm person, handicapped person, crippled;
verkrüppelte Person, behinderte Person. wulu a tout perdu. Moussa has lost everything.
Moussa hat alles verloren.
fiɲɛtɔ un chien estropié / boiteux. a
crippled/lame dog. ein verkrüppelter/lahmer
4 • se déverser, être nombreux, venir en
nombre; pour out, be numerous, come in
Hund.
numbers; ausströmen, zahlreich sein, zahlreich
fiɲɛtɔya [í-ɛ́-ɔ́-á] Nom. invalidité; disability; kommen. U firilen don dugu kɔnɔ. Ils sont
Invalidität. venus nombreux dans le village. Many of them
fiɲɛya comparer: lamaloya. 1 • Verbe. humilier, came to the village. Viele von ihnen kamen ins
1
Dorf.
dénigrer; humiliate, denigrate, depreciate;
demütigen, erniedrigen, abwerten, verachten, firifire [í] Verbe. agiter, secouer, hocher la tête (en
verunglimpfen. synonyme: mɔgɔsogoɲimi, signe de dénégation); shake, shake the head
madɔgɔya. (as a sign of denial); schütteln, den Kopf
schütteln (als Zeichen der Verleugnung). A y'a
2 • Nom. dénigrement, humiliation;
disparagement , belittling, humiliation; bolo cin ka a firifiri. Il se mordit la main et la
Herabwürdigung, Verunglimpfung, secoua (: signe de douleur, d'émotion intense).
Erniedrigung, Demütigung. He bit his hand and shook it (: sign of pain,
fiɲɛya [í-ɛ́-á] variante: fɛgɛya. 1 • Nom. légèreté,
intense emotion). Er biß sich in die Hand und
2 schüttelte sie (: Zeichen von Schmerz,
affaiblissement; lightness, weakening;
intensive Emotion). synonyme: firinfirin ,
Leichtigkeit, Abschwächung.
2
fɛrɛfɛrɛ .
1
2 • Verbe. affaiblir, alléger, fragiliser; weaken,
reduce, alleviate; schwächen, vermindern, firifiri [í] Verbe. retourner le sol à la charrue, labourer;
1
verringern, beeinträchtigen. turn the soil over with the plow, plough; den
firɛzi Emprunt de : français. Nom. fraise; strawberry; Boden mit dem Pflug umdrehen, pflügen. ka
Erdbeere. Category: Food. foro firifiri ka tiga dan. retourner un champ
firi [ì] variante: fiiri, lafiri, lefiri. Nom. couscous
et y semer de l'arachide. plough a field and sow
1 peanuts. Pflügen Sie ein Feld und säen Sie
de fonio; fonio couscous; Fonio-Couscous.
Erdnüsse. Category: Agriculture.
Category: Types of food.
firifiri [í] Nom. 1 • calebasse (qui sert à tirer l'eau du
firi variante: firin. Nom. épaisseur, texture; 2
2 puits); calabash (used to draw water from the
thickness, texture; Dicke, Textur. Sama, a well); Kalebasse (wird verwendet, um Wasser
wolo firi ka bon. L'éléphant a la peau épaisse. aus dem Brunnen zu schöpfen).
The elephant has thick skin. Der Elefant hat 2 • calebasse et sa corde; calabash and its
eine dicke Haut. rope; Kalebasse und ihr Seil.
firi [í] Verbe. 1 • retourner, renverser, chavirer; turn Category: Container.
3
over, overturn, capsize; umdrehen, umkippen, firigo [í] Emprunt de : français. Nom. réfrigérateur;
kentern. ka dugukolo firi retourner le sol. fridge, refrigerator; Kühlschrank.
turn over the ground. den Boden umdrehen. synonyme: firizidɛri.
synonyme: fiti .
1 firikalankasa Nom. espèce de plante; kind of plant;
Pflanzenart. Category: Grass, herb, vine.
loudetia togensis.
29/01/2026 207

firikiti fisamanci
firikiti [í] Adverbe. très résistant, ferme et élastique, firɔ [í] variante: firɛ. Nom. avorton, personne
collant (pour la consistance d'une pâte); very mal-bâtie et méchante; runt, ill-constructed
resistant, firm and elastic, sticky (for the and wicked person; Kümmerling, schlecht
consistency of a paste); sehr widerstandsfähig, gebauter und böser Mensch. mɔgɔ firɔ
fest und elastisch, klebrig (für die Konsistenz jugunin un sale petit avorton. a dirty little
einer Paste). ka to pasa firikiti battre le to
runt. ein dreckiger kleiner Kerl.
pour le rendre bien ferme. beat the millet
porridge to make it very firm. Rühren Sie den
fisa [ì-á] variante: fusa, kusa, pisa, shwa, swa,
Hirsebrei, um ihn sehr fest zu machen. wusa, [fsa]. adj.pred. 1 • meilleur, préférable,
firina [í] Emprunt de : arabe. Nom. 1 • guerre,
mieux, bien, bon; better, preferable, good,
well; besser, vorzüglich, gut. X ka fisa Y ye. X
expédition punitive; war, punitive expedition;
Krieg, Strafexpedition.
est meilleur que Y. X is better than Y. X ist
besser als Y. Banakunbɛn ka fisa banafurakɛ
2 • catastrophe, famine; disaster, famine;
Katastrophe, Hungersnot.
ye. Mieux prévenir que guérir. Prevention is
better than cure. Vorbeugen ist besser als
firinfirin [í] synonyme: virinvirin, virinvirinnin.
1 heilen. A ka fisa ka tɛmɛ fɔlɔ taa kan. C’est
variante: firinfirinnin, nfirinfirin. Nom.
mieux qu’avant. It’s better than before/at first.
1 • papillon; butterfly; Falter, Schmetterling, Es ist besser also vorher. Jumɛn ka fisa aw
Sommervogel. Category: Insect.
ma ? Lequel est le meilleur pour vous ? Which
synonyme: npɛrɛnpɛrɛ.
is better for you? Welcher ist besser für dich?
2 • insecte volant; flying insect; fliegendes
2 • assez bien, passable; fairly good, fair,
Insekt.
reasonable; nicht schlecht, ziemlich gut, geht
3 • chauve-souris; bat; Fledermaus. so, annehmbar, angemessen.
firinfirin 2 variante: firifiri. vt. s'agiter, secouer, hocher fisafasa [ì-à-á-á] 1 • Verbe. promener ça et là, être en
la tête (en signe de dénégation); shake; désordre, désordonné; out of any disorder, be
schütteln, rütteln. synonyme: firifire. in a mess, walk here and there, disorderly;
firinkan [í] comparer: firina. Nom. 1 • invasion;
unordentlich sein, ziellos herumgehen,
chaotisch. synonyme: fisifasa .
invasion; Invasion. ntɔnw ka firinkan une
1
2 • Nom. désordre, nonchalance, paresse;
invasion de criquets. an invasion of locusts.
disorder, nonchalance, casualness, idleness,
eine Heuschreckenplage.
laziness; Unordnung, Nonchalance,
2 • catastrophe soudaine; sudden disaster;
Lässigkeit, Gleichgültigkeit.
plötzliche Katastrophe. Firinkan jugu de tun
fisaman [ì-à-á] n adj. meilleur, bon, préférable;
b'a la. Il avait une très grave maladie. He had
a very serious illness. Er hatte eine sehr
better, good, preferable; besser, gut,
schwere Krankheit.
bevorzugt. A ka ko fisaman man ca. Il ne fait
pas beaucoup de bonnes actions. He doesn't do
firiti Emprunt de : français. Nom. frites; fries, chips;
many good deeds. Er tut nicht viele gute Taten.
Pommes frites. Category: Food.
fisamanci Nom. 1 • qui se croit meilleur, arrogant; who
firiya bambara: filiya. Nom. veuvage, viduité (40
thinks he is better, arrogant; wer denkt, er sei
jours qui suivent le décès du mari); being a besser, arrogant. Ko juguw la, fisamanci bɛ.
widow, widowhood; Witwenstand.
Il y a des malheurs plus supportables que
synonyme: filiya.
d'autres (proverbe). There are some
firiyamuso Nom. veuve; widow; Witwe. misfortunes more bearable than others
(proverb). Es gibt einige Unglücke, die
Category: Person.
erträglicher sind als andere (Sprichwort).
firiyamusota Nom. lévirat; levitate; das Levirat. 2 • qui pratique la discrimination; who
firiyatɔ bambara: filiyatɔ. Nom. veuve, femme en
discriminates; der diskriminiert.
3 • excellent; excellent; exzellent.
période de viduité (40 jours); widow, woman in
the period of widowhood; Witwe, Frau im der 4 • élite; elite, top; Elite.
Zeit der Witwenschaft. synonyme: filiyatɔ. 5 • en meilleure santé; healthier; gesünder.
firizidɛri Emprunt de : français. Nom. réfrigérateur;
refrigerator; Kühlschrank, Kühlgerät.
Category: Household equipment.
synonyme: firigo.
29/01/2026 208

fisamanciya fitinɛ
fisamanciya [ì-à-à-ì] Nom. discrimination, fisiki [ì-ì] Emprunt de : français : physique. Nom.
ségrégation; discrimination, segregation; 1 • force naturelle, force physique; natural
Diskriminierung, Segregation. O tun ye strength, physical strength; natürliche Stärke,
fisamanciyaba ye cɛ ni muso cɛ. C'était une körperliche Stärke. Fisiki b'a la. Il est fort. He
discrimination injuste entre hommes et is strong. Er ist stark.
femmes. It was unfair discrimination between 2 • malmener, exténuer; to mishandle, to
men and women. Es handelte sich um eine exhaust; falsch behandeln, erschöpfen.
ungerechtfertigte Diskriminierung zwischen
fisikifasaka [ì-ì-ì] Verbe. être mal fait (travail), être
Männern und Frauen.
1
bancal, être mal disposé (coiffure), être en
fisaya 1 [ì-à-á] 1 • vt. améliorer, être meilleur; désordre; to be poorly done (work), to be
improve, to be better, superior; verbessern, wobbly, to be badly arranged (hairstyle), to be
besser sein, überlegen sein. Diinɛ si ma siya untidy; schlecht erledigt sein (Arbeit),
fisaya siya ye. Dans aucune religion une race wackelig sein, schlecht arrangiert sein (Frisur),
n'est supérieure à une autre. In no religion is
unordentlich sein. A fisikifasakalen don !
one race superior to another. In keiner C'est mal fichu ! It’s poorly done! Es ist
Religion ist eine Rasse einer anderen schlecht gemacht! A ka finin bɛɛ
überlegen. fisikifasakalen bɛ. Tous ses vêtements sont
2 • vt. préférer; prefer; bevorzugen, lieber en désordre. All his clothes are in disarray.
haben. Usumani bi Ami fisaya Fanta ye. Alle seine Kleider sind durcheinander.
Ousmane préfère Ami à Fanta. Ousmane fisikifasaka [í] Verbe. résister, ne pas se laisser faire;
2
prefers Ami to Fanta. Ousmane bevorzugt
resist, not give in; Widerstand leisten, nicht
Ami und nicht Fanta.
nachgeben. A bɛ fisikifasaka ban bolo. Il
3 • Nom. amélioration; improvement,
résiste à la maladie. It is resistant to disease.
amelioration; Verbesserung.
Es ist resistent gegen Krankheiten.
fisaya [ì-à-á] Nom. amélioration; improvement;
2 fisirifasara [ì-ì-ì] variante: fitirifatara. Nom.
Verbesserung.
ingratitude caractérisée, ingrat; characterized
fisibulu Emprunt de : français. Nom. fusible; fuse, ingratitude, ungrateful; gekennzeichnet durch
fusible; Sicherung. Undankbarkeit, undankbar. E ye fitiriwale
fisifasa [ì-ì] 1 • Verbe. promener ça et là; walk here fisirifasara de ye. Tu es un ingrat, un ingrat
1
caractérisé. You are an ingrate, a
and there; hierhin und dorthin gehen.
characterized ingrate. Du bist ein
synonyme: fisafasa.
Undankbarer, ein charakterisierter
2 • Verbe. disperser, être en désordre, ne pas Undankbarer.
mettre à la même place; to scatter, to be in
fiti [í-í] variante: firi. Verbe. 1 • retourner,
disorder, not to put in the same place; 1
zerstreuen, in Unordnung sein, nicht an den renverser, chavirer ; knock over, turn upside
gleichen Ort bringen. down, spill, turn over; auf den Kopf stellen,
ausleeren, umkehren, umdrehen.
3 • Verbe. ne pas prendre soin de; not taking
care of; nicht kümmern. baara fisifasa travail synonyme: firi 3 .
bâclé. shoddy work. schlechte Arbeit. 2 • s'abattre, se précipiter, s'écrouler; hit on,
pounce on, rush, beat down on; einfallen auf,
4 • Verbe. être mou, nonchalant, paresseux,
stürzen auf, einstürzen.
apathique, désordonné; to be limp, nonchalant,
lazy, listless, disordered; schlaff, lässig, faul fiti [ì] Verbe. cuire à la braise, cuire à la vapeur;
2
sein, lustlos, ungeordnet. A fisifasalen don. Il braise, steam; schmoren, dämpfen. ka ku fiti
est désordonné. It's messy. Es ist chaotisch.
cuire de l’igname à la braise. cooking yams
5 • Nom. indiscipline, désordre, nonchalance, over the coals. Yamswurzeln über den Kohlen
paresse; indiscipline, disorder, nonchalance, kochen.
laziness; Disziplinlosigkeit, Unordnung,
fitinɛ [í-í-ɛ́] variante: fitnɛdaga. 1 • Nom. conflit,
Lässigkeit, Faulheit. 1
discorde, querelle, dispute, troubles; conflict,
fisifasa
2
[í] Adverbe. très abondant, à profusion; very
dispute, discord; Konflikt, Uneinigkeit, Streit.
abundant, in abundance; sehr reichlich, im Fitinɛ wulila o yɔrɔ la. Une querelle s'éleva à
Überfluß. ... a ye fɛn caman san fisifasa. ... il
ce ce propos. A quarrel arose over this.
a acheté énormément des choses. ...he bought Darüber kam es zum Streit.
a lot of things. ...er hat sehr viele Dinge
gekauft.
29/01/2026 209

fitinɛ fiyentɔya
2 • Verbe. se quereller, se fâcher, se mettre en fitiriwaleya [í] Nom. ingratitude, être ingrat;
colère; to quarrel, get angry, fall out with;
ingratitude, to be ungrateful; Undankbarkeit,
hadern, streiten, zanken, sich ärgern, erbosen.
undankbar sein. Diɲɛ sigira ni fitiriwaleya ye.
Fitinɛ donna u ni ɲɔgɔn cɛ. Ils se sont
Le monde est fondé sur l'ingratitude. The
querellés. They quarrelled. Sie haben sich
world is based on ingratitude. Die Welt basiert
gestritten.
auf Undankbarkeit.
fitinɛ [ì-ì-ɛ́] Emprunt de : arabe.
2 fiye synonyme: piyen. Nom. espèce de plante; kind
variante: fitinɛdaga. Nom. lampe à huile; oil
of plant; Pflanze (Art). Category: Grass, herb,
lamp; Öllampe. O bɛ taa ta bila fitinɛ la. Il va vine. asclepias lineolata.
allumer la lampe. He will light the lamp. Er
fiyen [ì-é] synonyme: fiyentɔya. variante: fiyenya,
wird die Lampe anzünden.
[fyen]. 1 • Nom. cécité, un aveugle; blindness,
fitinɛdaga variante: fitinɛ. Nom. 1 • lampe à huile; oil
blind person; Blindheit, ein Blinder. Sunɔgɔ
lamp; Öllampe. Category: Tool.
nana fiyen labɛnnen kɔrɔ sɔrɔ. Le sommeil a
2 • phare (d'un véhicule); headlight (of a
trouvé l'aveugle préparé depuis longtemps à
vehicle); Scheinwerfer (eines Fahrzeugs).
dormir (proverbe). Sleep has found the blind
fitinin [í] variante: [fiitinin, fitiinin]. adj. petit, un person, long prepared to sleep (proverb). Der
peu; small, a bit; klein, wenig. Muru fitinin lo. Schlaf hat den Blinden gefunden, der schon
C'est un petit couteau. It is a small knife. Es ist
lange zum Schlafen bereit ist (Sprichwort).
ein kleines Messer. denw fitinin des petits 2 • Verbe. devenir aveugle, être aveugle;
enfants. little children. kleine Kinder.
become blind, be blind; blind werden, blind
sein.
fitiri [ì] Emprunt de : arabe: fitr. Nom.
fiyenan [í-é-ã]́ Nom. champignon; mushroom; Pilz.
1 • crépuscule; dusk, twilight;
Abenddämmerung. Category: Weather.
Category: Moss, fungus, algae.
synonyme: nfyena.
2 • quatrième prière musulmane (au
crépuscule), prière du crépuscule; fourth fiyenan gwansan Nom. chanterelle commune;
Muslim prayer (at dusk); viertes Muslim
chanterelle; Eierschwammerl.
Gebet (bei Abenddämmerung). U ye fitiri seli.
fiyennibana [ì-è-ì] Nom. onchocercose, cécité;
Ils firent la prière du soir. They said evening
prayer. Sie sprachen das Abendgebet. blindness; Blindheit. Category: Disease.
Category: Religion. fiyentɔ [ì-è] Morphemes: fiyen-tɔ. Nom. un aveugle;
fitirida [ì-ì-ì] Nom. crépuscule, début du crépuscule; blind person; ein Blinder. Fiyentɔ ka kegun
twilight, beginning of twilight; Dämmerung, ɲɛdiminitɔ ye. L'aveugle est plus malin que le
Beginn der Dämmerung. Category: Weather. malvoyant (proverbe). The blind is smarter
fitirimagɛn [ì-ì-ì] Nom. soir (entre 18 et 19 heures); than the visually impaired (proverb). Der
Blinde ist schlauer als der Sehbehinderte
evening (between 6 and 7 p.m.); Abends
(Sprichwort). Category: Sick.
(zwischen 18 und 19 Uhr).
fiyentɔbere Morphemes: fiyen-tɔ-bere. Nom.
fitirinin [ì-ì-ì-í] Nom. petite chauve-souris
décision aveugle, mesure punitive sans
domestique (qui sort au crépuscule); small
discernement; blind decision, punitive
house bat (coming out at dusk); kleine
measure without distinction; blinde
Fledermaus, (kommt in der Abenddämmerung
Entscheidung, Strafmaßnamen ohne
heraus). Category: Mammal. synonyme: nbilen.
Unterscheidung. Fiyentɔbere ma ka
fitiriwale [í] Emprunt de : arabe. Nom. ingrat; baarakɛla si la. La mesure aveugle n'a
ungrateful person; undankbarer Mensch. épargné aucun travailleur. The indiscriminate
Fitiriwaleya sɔnfɛn ye finin ye, n'a farala, a measure spared no worker. Die wahllose
hakili bɛ jigin a dibaga la. Le cadeau à faire à Maßnahme verschonte keinen Arbeiter.
un ingrat, c'est un habit, cet habit une fois fiyentɔya Morphemes: fiyentɔ-ya. synonyme: fiyen.
déchiré, il se souvient du donateur (proverbe).
Nom. cécité; blindness; Blindheit. Fiyentɔya
The gift to give to an ungrateful person is a
ladege man go. Il n'est pas difficile d'imiter
coat, once this coat is torn, it remembers the
giver (proverb). Das Geschenk, das man einer
un aveugle (proverbe). It is not difficult to
imitate the blind person (proverb). Es ist nicht
undankbaren Person machen kann, ist ein
schwer, Blinde nachzuahmen (Sprichwort).
Mantel. Sobald dieser Mantel zerrissen ist,
erinnert er sich an den Geber (Sprichwort). Category: Disease.
synonyme: barajintan, ɲumandɔnbali,
ɲɛbatiɲɛ.
29/01/2026 210

fiyɛ fo
fiyɛ [í-ɛ́] vt. 1 • souffler, jouer (d'un instrument dans 2 • de telle sorte que, au point de, depuis; so
1
much, so that; bis, so daß. A siranna fo ka
lequel on souffle); blow, play an instrument;
blasen, ein Musikinstrument blasen. ka filen yɛrɛyɛrɛ. Il a eu si peur, il a tremblé. He was so
fiyɛ siffler. whistle. pfeifen.
afraid that he trembled. Er hatte so Angst, daß
er gezittert hat. Sanji cayara fo an ka so
2 • vanner; winnow; sichten, aussortieren. ɲɔ
binna. Il a tellement plu que notre maison a
fiyɛ vanner le mil. winnow the millet. Die
été détruite. It rained so much that our house
Hirse sichten. Category: Agriculture.
fell down. Es regnete so heftig das unser Haus
synonyme: kɛnkɛn
2
, tɛntɛn.
zusammenbrach.
fiyɛ [í-ɛ́] Nom. calebasse; calabash; Kalebasse. 3 • sauf, à part, excepté; except; außer. Ɲaman
2
Category: Container. synonyme: filen, fyɛ . bɛɛ bɛ toli fo mananin. Toutes les ordures
4
pourrissent sauf les sacs en plastique. All
fiyɛbaden bambara: fyɛbaden. Nom. espèce de
garbage rots except plastic bags. Bis auf
poisson; kind of fish; Fischart. Category: Fish. Plastiktüten verrottet jeder Müll.
petrocephalus sp..
4 • il faut que; it is necessary that; das ist
fiyɛdundun Nom. tam-tam calebasse; calabash drum; notwendig daß. U ko : «Fo i ka taa kulu la ka
Kalebassen Trommel. Category: Musical segin sini ?» Ils dirent : «Il faut que tu partes
instrument. dans la montagne et que tu reviennes
fiyɛlibara Nom. poire médicale; enema; demain ?». They said: “Do you have to go to
the mountain and come back tomorrow?” Sie
Klistierspritze. Category: Treat disease, Tool.
sagten: „Mußt du auf den Berg gehen und
fiyɛn Nom. vent; wind; Wind. Fiyɛn wulila. Le vent morgen wieder zurückkommen?“.
s'est levé. The wind started to blow. Der Wind fo [ò] variante: fon. Verbe. frôler, effleurer,
3
hat angefangen zu blasen. synonyme: fɔɲɔ,
atteindre (par mégarde); to brush sth., skim
fiɲɛ 1 . sth., hit without intention; streicheln,
fizibuluw Emprunt de : français. Nom. fusibles; fuses; vorüber-streifen, unabsichtlich treffen. Sa fora
Sicherungen. n na. Le serpent m'a frôle. The snake brushed
against me. Die Schlange streifte mich.
fo [ò] vt. 1 • saluer, rendre hommage; greet, pay
1
fo [ó] Verbe. 1 • évacuer, abandonner la place;
tribute to ; grüßen, Ehre erweisen, würdigen, 4
huldigen. K’an b’u fo ! U n’a mɛn ! Nous les evacuate, leave a place; räumen, verlassen.
saluons ! Ils l’entendront ! (pour dire au Kɛlɛ ye dugumɔgɔw fo. La guerre a fait fuir
revoir). We greet them! They will hear it! les villageois. The war caused the villagers to
(often said as a goodbye greeting). Wir grüßen flee. Der Krieg veranlaßte die Dorfbewohner
sie! Sie werden es hören! I ka somɔgɔw bɛɛ zur Flucht.
fo ! Saluez toute la famille ! Greet all you 2 • cesser, mettre fin à; stop doing, put an end
family! Grüße deine ganze Familie! U b’i fo.
to; aufhören, Schluß machen. San fora. La
Ils te saluent. They greet you. Sie grüßen dich.
pluie a avorté. The rain stopped. Der Regen
N bi taga dugutigi fo. Je vais saluer le chef
hörte auf.
du village. I am going to greet the village fo 5 [ó] Verbe. se précipiter, se ruer, s'emparer,
chief. Ich gehe um den Dorfchef zu grüßen. rafler; precipitate, hasten, speed up, to get hold
2 • remercier; thank; danken. N b'aw fo of, seize, to swipe; eilen, sich beeilen, sich
kosɛbɛ aw ka dɛmɛni kosɔn. Merci
stürzen auf, sich bemächtigen,
zusammenraffen. Ni totigi ye to fo,
beaucoup pour votre aide. Thank you very
much for your help. Danke für diene Hilfe. todunnaw bɛ nadingɛ fara. Si le maître de
maison rafle le tô, les invités brisent le trou à
fo [ó] variante: fɔ. prepos. 1 • jusqu’à (ce que);
2 sauce (proverbe»). If the master of the house
until; bis. A tagara fo Bobo a seen na. Il est snatches the millet porridge, the guests break
allé jusqu’à Bobo à pied. He went all the way the sauce hole (proverb). Wenn der Hausherr
to Bobo on foot. Er ist bis Bobo zu Fuss den Hirse Brei schnappt, brechen die Gäste das
gegangen. I bi taga fo ka se sirafaran wɛrɛ Soßenloch auf (Sprichwort).
ma. Tu continues jusqu’à ce que tu arrives au
prochain carrefour. You go on until you reach
the next turning. Du gehst bis zur nächsten
Kreuzung. .
29/01/2026 211

fo foli
fo [ó] Nom. terrier, trou (du rat, de l’oryctérope fogofogo [ò-ò] Verbe. croître trop rapidement; grow
6
...); burrow, hole (of the rat, of the aardvark, too quickly; zu schnell wachsen. Ni ɲɔ
etc.); Bau, Loch (der Ratte, des Erdferkels fogofogora, a tɛ den kosɛbɛ. Si le mil
usw.) Don bɛɛ tɛ nkɛlɛn sɔrɔ foda la. On ne
pousse trop vite, il ne fructifie pas bien. If
trouve pas tous les jours le rat palmiste devant millet grows too quickly, it does not fruit well.
son trou (proverbe). You don't find the palm rat Wächst die Hirse zu schnell, trägt sie keine
in front of its hole every day (proverb). Die guten Früchte.
Palmratte findet man nicht alle Tage vor ihrem
fogon [ó-ó] Verbe. flotter, surnager; float; schweben,
Loch (Sprichwort). synonyme: sɔjigi, wo ,
2
falan, ɲaga .
schwimmen, treiben, floaten, sich über Wasser
1 2
halten. Ni i ye filenin fogonnen ye ji kan, n'a
fo 7 [ó] Nom. saison froide; cold season; kalte ju sɔgɔlen tɛ, a da cilen. Quand on voit une
Jahreszeit. ... fo bɔlen bɛ. ... la saison froide petite calebasse flotter sur l'eau, si elle n'est pas
est arrivée. ...the cold season has arrived. ...die percée, c'est qu'elle est ébréchée (proverbe).
kalte Jahreszeit ist da. Category: Weather. When you see a small gourd floating on the
synonyme: fobɔnda, foonɛnɛ . water, if it is not pierced, it is because it is
2
chipped (proverb). Wenn Sie einen kleinen
fobɔnda [ɔ́] Nom. 1 • saison froide; cold season; kalte
Kürbis-Behälter auf dem Wasser schwimmen
Jahreszeit. synonyme: fo 7 , foonɛnɛ 2 . sehen und er nicht durchbohrt ist, liegt das
2 • commencement de la saison froide daran, daß er angeschlagen ist (Sprichwort).
(novembre-décembre); start of the cold season fogonfogon
1
(November-December); Beginn der kalten
[ó-ó-ò-ó] synonyme: ponponpogolon.
Jahreszeit (November-Dezember).
Category: Weather.
Nom. arbre à soie, pomme de Sodome (arbre et
fruit); kind of tree, silk tree; Baumart,
fofo 1 [ò-ó] vi. ramper, traîner, tirer sur le sol; crawl, Fettblattbaum. Category: Bush, shrub.
creep, drag; kriechen, schleppen, . Foroko siri calotropis procera.
foroko la, dɔ ju bɛ dugu fofo. Quand on synonyme: nponponpogolon.
attache un sac à un sac, l'un des deux traînera fogonfogon [ó-ó-ò-ó] Nom. poumon; lung; Lunge.
2
sur le sol (proverbe). When you attach a bag to
Category: Body. synonyme: fɔgɔfɔgɔ.
a bag, one of the two will drag on the ground
(proverb). Wenn man eine Tasche an einer fogonfogonbana [ó] Nom. tuberculose;
Tasche befestigt, schleift einer der beiden auf tuberculosis; Tuberkulose. Category: Disease.
dem Boden (Sprichwort).
synonyme: fɔgɔfɔgɔbana, sɔgɔsɔgɔjɛ.
fofo
2
[ò] Nom. balle, glume (pour le riz); husk (for
fogonfogondimin [ó] Nom. affection pulmonaire;
rice), chaff; Schale (für Reis), Spreu. Kɔnɔw
lung disease; Lungenerkrankung.
bɛ kisɛ dun ka fofo to yen. Les oiseaux Category: Disease.
mangent la graine et laissent la balle. The birds
fokadigi [ó] Morphemes: fo-ka-digi. Nom.
eat the seed and leave the chaff. Die Vögel
fressen die Samen und hinterlassen die Spreu.
bousculade, empressement, précipitation;
Category: Parts of a plant. synonyme: fɔn .
jostling, crush, rush, eagerness, haste;
2
Drängeln, Gedränge, Geschäftigkeit, Hetze,
fofo 3 [ò] Nom. endroit où l'on fait pâturer le bétail Hast. Bɛɛ bɛ fokadigi la jara ka banafura
pendant l'hivernage; place where livestock are ɲinini na ... Tous se précipitent pour trouver
grazed during rainy season; Ort, an dem das
un remède contre la maladie du lion ...
Vieh während der Regenzeit weidet. U taara Everyone rushes to find a cure for the lion's
ni baw ye fofo la. Ils ont emmené les chèvres disease... Alle beeilen sich, ein Heilmittel für
au pâturage. They took the goats to pasture. die Löwenkrankheit zu finden ...
Sie brachten die Ziegen auf die Weide. foli [ò-í] Morphemes: fo-li. Nom. 1 • salutation,
1
Category: Animal husbandry, Land.
salut; greeting; Gruß. I ni cɛ foli la. Merci
fofofɛn [ò-ò] Morphemes: fofo-fɛn. Nom. reptile, pour les salutations. Thanks for the greetings.
serpent; reptile, serpent, snake; Reptil, Danke für die Grüße.
Kriechtier, Schlange. Category: Reptile. 2 • remerciement; thanks; Danksagung, Dank.
fofolensiya variante: fololensi. Nom. espèce de Foli b’a ye. Il est à remercier. He is to be
reptile; reptile species; Reptilien. thanked. Man muß ihm danken. An bi foli di
Category: Reptile. Ala ma. Nous rendons grâce à Dieu. We give
thanks to God. Wir danken Gott.
29/01/2026 212

foli folonkoto
foli [ó-í] jusqu'à; till; bis. A taara foli Pari. Il est folokofalaka [ò-ò-ò] Verbe. aller en tous sens,
2
allé jusqu'à Paris. He went till Paris. Er ist bis s'agiter légèrement; move in all directions,
Paris gegangen. move slightly, haphazardly; in alle Richtungen
folikan Morphemes: fòli-kan. Nom. salutation; bewegen, leicht bewegen, willkürlich. Baara
greeting; Gruss, Begrüssung.
sɛbɛ ka fisa a folokofalaka ye. Travailler
sérieusement vaut mieux que travailler
folo [ó] Verbe. 1 • ne pas être maître de sa bouche
n'importe comment. Working seriously is
(nourriture, paroles), dire n'importe quoi; not better than working haphazardly. Ernsthaftes
being master of your mouth (food, words), say Arbeiten ist besser als willkürliches Arbeiten.
anything, talking nonsense; nicht Herr über
folokoto [ò-ò-ò] Verbe. salir, dégrader, gaspiller,
deinen Mund sein (Essen, Worte), irgend
etwas sagen, Unsinn reden; . Kana a ka kuma maltraiter; dirty, degrade, waste, mistreat;
beschmutzen, entwürdigen, verschwenden,
jate, a bɛ ka folo. Ne tiens pas compte de ce
mißhandeln. Kana i ka saga folokoto ! Ne
qu'il dit, il raconte n'importe quoi. Don't take
maltraite pas ton mouton ! Don't mistreat your
into account what he says, he's talking
sheep! Mißhandeln Sie Ihre Schafe nicht!
nonsense. Berücksichtigen Sie nicht, was er
sagt, er redet Unsinn. folon [ò-ó] vt. piler pour enlever le son; pound to
1
2 • être avide de quelque chose; to be hungry remove the chaff; stampfen, zerstoßen, um die
for something; hungrig nach etwas sein. A bɛ Kleie zu entfernen. ka saɲɔ folon. piler le
folo dumuni (wari, muso...) nɔfɛ. Il est avide petit mil. pound the millet. Die Hirse
de nourriture (d'argent, de femmes...). He is zerstoßen.
hungry for food (money, women...). Er ist folon [ó-ṍ] Nom. ravin, vallée, lit d'un cours d'eau,
2
hungrig nach Essen (Geld, Frauen...).
rigole; ravine, riverbed, valley, channel;
3 • s'empresser, se précipiter sur; to hurry, to
Schlucht, Tal, Bachbett, Flußbett, Kanal. Ji tɛ
rush; sich beeilen, stürzen auf. Ni sotama
a woyofolon to. L'eau n’abandonne pas le lit
jɔra, donitalaw bɛ folo doni nɔfɛ. Quand les
du fleuve (proverbe). The water does not
taxis collectifs s'arrêtent, les porteurs se
abandon the riverbed (proverb). Das Wasser
précipitent sur les bagages. When the shared
verläßt das Flußbett nicht (Sprichwort).
taxis stop, the porters rush to the luggage.
Category: Land.
Wenn die Sammeltaxis halten, eilen die Träger
zum Gepäck.
folon
3
[ò-ó] Nom. trace de pas, sentier battu, trace de
passage; trace of steps, foot trail, trace of
folofolo [ò-ò] Nom. glume, balle (de mil); husk (of
1 passage; Spuren von Fußabtritten,
millet); Hüllspelze, Schale (von Hirse). ɲɔ festgestampfter Fußweg. Donsokɛ ye minan
folofolo, malo folofolo balle de mil, balle de folon bɔ ... Le chasseur a suivi les traces de
riz. millet husk, rice husk. Hirseschale,
l'antilope... The hunter followed the antelope's
Reisschale. synonyme: fɔn 2 . tracks... Der Jäger folgte den Spuren der
folofolo [ò-ò] variante: folonfolon. Verbe. Antilope...
2
1 • abandonner, égarer, négliger, ne pas veiller folonfolonba [ó-ó-ò-ò-á] Nom. fourmi de grande
sur; abandon, mislead, neglect, fail to watch taille, friande de sucre; large ant, fond of
over; verlassen, sich verirren, vernachlässigen, sugar; große Ameise, hat gern Zucker.
nicht wachen. A y'a ka mɔnturu folofolo a Category: Insect.
kɔ. Il a égaré sa montre. He lost his watch. Er folon-ka-kɛ-ta-la Nom. plat de mil (préparé avec
hat seine Uhr verloren.
du poisson séché); millet dish (prepared with
2 • errer, divaguer; wander, stroll; wandern, dried fish); Hirsegericht (zubereitet mit
streunen. bagan folofololen bétail errant. getrocknetem Fisch). Bi, sifana tun ye
stray cattle. streunendes Vieh. folon-ka-kɛ-ta-la ye. Le repas de ce soir,
foloka [ò-ò] Nom. figuier élégant; kind of fig tree; c'était du mil au poisson séché. Tonight's meal
Feigenbaum (Art). Category: Tree. ficus polita. was millet with dried fish. Das heutige
Abendessen bestand aus Hirse mit
getrocknetem Fisch. Category: Types of food.
folonkoto Verbe. 1 • se ruer, s'engouffrer; rush; eilig.
U folonkotora bamanan kun sa ... Ils se
ruèrent sur les Bambara ... They rushed on the
Bambara... Sie stürmten auf die Bambara...
29/01/2026 213

fondo foni
2 • faire grand bruit, faire du vacarme; make a foni [ó-í] vt. 1 • détacher, dénouer, délier; untie;
1
big noise, make a racket; einen großen Lärm
aufbinden, aufknoten, aufschnüren, lösen,
machen.
losbinden. Ni midi sera, n bi misiw foni ka ji
3 • labourer; plow, to plough; pflügen. Kungo
di u ma. Quand il sera midi, je détacherai les
folonkoto, ka a fereketeyɛlɛma ... Labourer
vaches et leur donnerai de l’eau. When it’s
la brousse et la retourner totalement ... Plough
noon, I will untie the cows and give them
the bush and turn it over completely... Pflügen
water. Am Mittag werde ich die Kühe
Sie den Busch um und drehen Sie ihn
losbinden und ihnen Wasser gebe.
vollständig um...
2 • dérouler, déplier, défaire, délivrer; unwrap,
4 • tornade, vacarme; tornado, noise; Tornado, unroll, liberate; auspacken, aufwickeln,
Lärm. folonkotoba cyclone. cyclone. Zyklon. auswickeln, abrollen, ausrollen, befreien,
Category: Weather. freilassen. Ala k'áw garijɛgɛ foni ! Que Dieu
fondo [ò] Nom. sentier battu; beaten path; vous accorde la chance ! May God grant you
ausgetretener Pfad. A farala fondo fɛ ka taa.
luck! Möge Gott Ihnen Glück schenken! A
Il obliqua sur un chemin. He turned down a
hakili fonina. Il a l'esprit ouvert. He has an
path. Er bog in einen Weg ab. open mind. Er ist aufgeschlossen.
Category: Travel. foni [ó-í] fonio; fonio; Fonio. Category: Grass,
2
fondon [ó] Verbe. pourchasser, débusquer (un animal), herb, vine. digitaria exilis. synonyme: finin ,
1
faire sortir de sa cache; chase, flush out (an fini .
2
animal), bring out of its hiding place; (ein
foni Nom. sorte de couscous, préparée avec le fonio;
Tier) jagen, aufscheuchen, aus seinem 3
Versteck holen. U ye lɛw fondon ka taa. Ils sort of couscous, made from fonio; Art Kuskus
ont débusqué et pourchassé les phacochères. mit Fonio zubereitet. Category: Food.
They flushed out and chased the warthogs. Sie foni [ó-í] Verbe. germer; germinate, sprout;
4
scheuchten die Warzenschweine auf und
spriessen, keimen. Ɲɔ fonina. Le mil a germé.
jagten sie. Category: Hunt and fish.
The millet has sprouted. Die Hirse ist gekeimt.
fonɛnɛ [ó] Nom. saison froide, hiver; cold season,
foni [ó] Verbe. 1 • fuir à l'approche de l'ennemi; flee
winter; kalte Jahreszeit, Winter.
5
when the enemy approaches; fliehen, wenn
Category: Weather. synonyme: foonɛnɛ .
2 sich der Feind nähert.
fonɛnɛmakɔnɔ [ó] Nom. automne, période qui 2 • fuite, exode; flight, exodus; Flucht, Exodus.
précède la saison froide; autumn, fall; Herbst. Dugu fonina kɛlɛ ɲɛ. Le village a fuit devant
Category: Weather. synonyme: kawule, la guerre. The village fled before the war. Das
foonɛnɛmakɔnɔ. Dorf floh vor dem Krieg.
fonfon [ò] Nom. 1 • sillage, séquelles; wake, trail, foni 6 [ó] variante: fo ni. conj. à moins que, à moins
after-effects; Spur, Nachwirkungen.
de, sauf si, sinon pour, jusqu'à ce que; unless,
otherwise for, until; es sei denn, sonst für, bis,
2 • traces de pas, sentier battu; footprints,
außer wenn. An filɛ yɔrɔ min na, jenikun tɛ
beaten path; Fußspuren, ausgetretene Pfade.
Ni i taara mɔgɔyɛlɛmawara fonfon nɔ... Si kungo la bilen fon'a kɛra tiɲɛni ye. A
tu pars sur les traces de l'homme-panthère ... If
présent, il n'y a plus de raison de faire des feux
de brousse, sinon pour faire des dégâts. Now,
you follow in the footsteps of the panther
man... Wenn Sie in die Fußstapfen des
there is no longer any reason to start
Panthermannes treten ...
bushfires, other than to cause damage. Jetzt
gibt es keinen Grund mehr, Buschbrände zu
3 • rang; rank, row; Rang. ɲɔfonfon ensemble
entfachen, außer um Schaden anzurichten. Ne
de trois rangs contigus de mil récolté. set of
three contiguous rows of harvested millet.
tɛ goniya n ka foolo ma, foni a ye n kan
Einheit aus drei zusammenhängenden Reihen lamini. Je ne suis pas pressé pour soigner mon
geernteter Hirse. goitre, j’attends qu'il ait fait le tour de mon cou
(proverbe). I'm not in a hurry to treat my
fongwɛ bambara: fonjɛ. Nom. espèce de serpent,
goiter, I'm waiting until it has gone around my
couleuvre-chat, serpent-chat; African tiger neck (proverb). Ich habe es nicht eilig, meinen
snake, tiger snake, tiger cat snake, or striped
Kropf zu behandeln, ich warte, bis er mir um
cat snake; Schlangenart, Katzennatter.
den Hals hängt (Sprichwort).
Category: Reptile. telescopus sp.
synonyme: nfonjɛ.
29/01/2026 214

fonisire fora
fonisire [ó] Emprunt de : arabe. Nom. généreux, foonɛnɛ variante: fonɛnɛ. Nom. saison froide,
2
magnanime, libéral, large; generous, décembre et janvier; cold season, December to
magnanimous, liberal, broad; großmütig, January; kalte Jahreszeit, Winter (Dezember
liberal. Ala, i ka n kɛ cɛ farin ye, i ka n kɛ und Februar), Winter. Category: Weather.
fonisire ye. Dieu, rends-moi brave et synonyme: fo 7 , fonɛnɛ, fobɔnda.
généreux. God, make me brave and generous. foonɛnɛkalo [ó] synonyme: feviriyekalo. Nom. mois
Gott, mach mich mutig und großzügig.
du froid d'harmattan, février; month of cold
fonisireya 1 • Nom. générosité, largesse, libéralité; and wind, February; Monat der Kälte und des
generosity, largesse, liberality; Windes, Februar.
Großzügigkeit, Liberalität. Faantan tɛ se ka foonɛnɛmakɔnɔ Nom. automne, période qui précède
fonisireya kɛ. Le pauvre ne peux être la saison froide; autumn, fall, time before the
généreux. The poor cannot be generous. Die cold season; Herbst, Zeitabschnitt vor der
Armen können nicht großzügig sein. kalten Jahreszeit. Category: Weather.
2 • Verbe. être ou devenir généreux; be or synonyme: fonɛnɛmakɔnɔ.
become generous; großzügig sein oder
foonɛnɛwagati [ó] Nom. saison sèche froide; cold
werden.
dry season; kalte Trockenzeit.
foɲɛ Nom. gyps de Ruppel, espèce de vautour; kind
Category: Weather.
of vulture; Geier (Art). Category: Bird. gyps
foori [ò] variante: foosi. Verbe. retirer, ôter,
ruppellii. 1
extirper, sortir, faire sortir, extraire, dégainer,
foolo [ò] variante: foola. Nom. 1 • peau de mue,
1 tirer; withdraw, remove, extirpate, take out,
mue; shedding skin, molt; Haut abwerfen, bring out, extract, draw; zurückziehen,
häuten. Sa bɛ bɔ foolo la. Le serpent sort de sa entfernen, ausrotten, herausnehmen,
mue. The snake comes out of its molt. Die herausbringen, herausziehen, ziehen. ... k'a ka
Schlange kommt aus ihrer Häutung. muru dadumannin foori ka bɔ a tan na. ... et
2 • squame, parcelles d'épiderme; scale, sortit de son fourreau son couteau bien affûté.
patches of epidermis; Schuppen, Flecken der ...and took out his sharp knife from its sheath.
Epidermis. ...und holte sein scharfes Messer aus der
foolo [ò] variante: folo. Nom. goitre; goitre; Kropf. Scheide.
2
Foolo b'a kan na. Elle a un goitre. She has a foori 2 [ò] Verbe. 1 • être abondant; to be abundant;
goiter. Sie hat einen Kropf. Category: Disease. reichlich vorhanden sein. Samiyɛ diyara. Ji
synonyme: fɔɔlɔn, kanforoko. foorila, bɛɛ ye ɲɔ sɔrɔ ... La saison des pluies
foolo [ó] Nom. lacet, piège pour les oiseaux et petits a été favorable. La pluie a été abondante,
3
chacun a récolté du mil. The rainy season was
rongeurs); lace, trap for birds and small
favorable. The rain was abundant, everyone
rodents); Falle für Vögel und kleine
harvested millet. Die Regenzeit war günstig.
Nagetiere). A ye kɔnɔ minɛ a ka foolo la. Il a
Der Regen war reichlich, alle ernteten Hirse.
pris un oiseau à son piège. He caught a bird in
2 • durer, se prolonger; to last, to continue;
his trap. Er hat einen Vogel in seiner Falle
andauern, weitermachen. A sunɔgɔla ka
gefangen.
foori. Il a dormi longuement. He slept a long
fooloma [ò-ò] Nom. goitreux, personne atteinte de
time. Er hat lange geschlafen.
goitre; goitrous, person suffering from goiter;
3 • aller jusqu’au bout; go all the way; den
Kropf, Person, die an Kropf leidet. Hakilima
ganzen Weg gehen. I ɲɔn ka foori. Respire à
ka ɲi fooloma ka dɔlɔkikan ciyɔrɔ la. Il faut fond. Take a deep breath. Atmen Sie tief ein.
un homme avisé pour tailler l'encolure d'un
foori [ó] Nom. anneau (bijou); ring (jewel); Ring
habit de goitreux (proverbe). It takes a wise 3
man to cut the neckline of a goitrous man's suit (Schmuck). tulolafoori anneau d'oreille. ear
(proverb). Es braucht einen klugen Mann, um ring. Ohrring. Category: Adornment.
einem Mann mit Kropf den Ausschnitt im
fora [ó] variante: foora. Nom. matinée de travail
Anzug aufzuschneiden (Sprichwort).
1
agricole; morning of agricultural work;
foonɛnɛ 1 [ó-ɛ́-ɛ́] synonyme: fɔɲɔgwɛ. Morgen der landwirtschaftlichen Arbeit. Aw
variante: fonɛnɛ. Nom. Harmattan (vent de ka fora kelen ye joli ye ? Combien
sable et poussière); Harmattan wind, desert demandez-vous pour une matinée de travail ?
wind; Harmattan Wind, Wüstenwind, How much do you charge for a morning's
Sandwind, Staubwind. Category: Sky. work? Wie viel Geld berechnen Sie für die
synonyme: fiɲɛjɛ. Arbeit am Vormittag? Category: Agriculture.
29/01/2026 215

fora forobanafolo
fora [ó] Adverbe. très mûr (pour les tubercules); very forobabana [ò-ò-à] Nom. 1 • maladie contagieuse;
2
ripe (for tubers); sehr reif (für Knollen). A contagious disease; ansteckende Krankheit.
mɔna fora. C'est bien mûr ! It's very ripe! Es Category: Disease.
ist sehr reif! 2 • maladie commune (qui touche tout le
monde sans discrimination de sexe ou d’âge);
foro [ò-ó] Nom. champ; field; Feld. ka foro danbɔ
common disease (which affects everyone
délimiter un champ. delimit a field. ein Feld regardless of sex or age); Volkskrankheit (die
abgrenzen. Category: Agriculture, Land. jeden betrifft, unabhängig von Geschlecht oder
foroba [ò-ò-á] Morphemes: fòro-ba. 1 • Nom. Alter).
quelque chose qui est public, qui appartient à forobaboli Morphemes: foroba-boli. Nom. fétiche qui
toute la communauté; something publicly appartient à tout un village; fetish belonging to
owned, belonging to all the community; a whole village; Götze, der dem ganzen Dorf
öffentlich, beliebt, gemeinsam. Kibaru ma kɛ gehört. synonyme: forobajo.
foroba ye ban. La nouvelle n'est pas encore
forobafanga
publique. The news is not yet public. Die
Nachricht ist noch nicht öffentlich.
[ò-ò-à-á-á] Morphemes: foroba-fanga.
synonyme: kɛnɛkisɛjɛ. synonyme: demokarasi. n.comp. démocratie
populaire; democracy; Demokratie.
2 • Nom. champ vaste, champ collectif; large
Category: Government.
field, public/collective field; gemeinsames
Feld. N bi taga sɛnɛ kɛ foroba la. Je vais forobafangawale synonyme: forobafangako,
cultiver au champ public. I am going to farm in forobafangasira. Nom. démocratique;
the collective field. Ich gehe aufs gemeinsame democratic; demokratisch.
Feld arbeiten.
forobafɛn [ó-ó-á-ɛ ́] synonyme: forobanafolo.
3 • Adverbe. collectivement, publiquement;
collectively, publicly; gemeinschaftlich, Nom. bien public; public welfare, common
öffentlich. Don fɔlɔ min foroba fɔra
property; Allgemeingut.
jamanadenw na ... La première date qui a été forobajo Morphemes: foroba-jǒ. Nom. fétiche qui
donnée publiquement aux citoyens ... The first appartient à tout un village; fetish belonging to
date that was publicly given to citizens... Das a whole village; Götze, der dem ganzen Dorf
erste Datum, das den Bürgern öffentlich gehört. synonyme: forobaboli.
bekannt gegeben wurde...
forobajuru [ò-ò-à-ú-ú] synonyme: jamana
forobaarada [ò-ò-à] comparer: guvɛrɛnɛman ka
kannajuru. Nom. dette publique; national
baarada. Nom. secteur public, service public; debt; Staatsschulden. Category: Finance.
public sector; öffentliche Hand, Staats...,
forobakɛsu Nom. caisses de l'état; money in the
öffentliche Dienstleistung. Opamu ye
government's cash box, State coffers;
forobabaarada ye. L'OPAM est une
Staatskasse, Staatsfinanzen.
entreprise d'état. OPAM is a state enterprise.
Category: Finance, Government.
OPAM ist ein staatliches Unternehmen.
Category: Government. forobako [ò-ò-à-ó] synonyme: jama sago,
forobabaara Morphemes: foroba-baara. Nom. travail demokarasiko. adj. démocratique;
democratic; demokratisch.
dans le secteur public; public sector work;
Category: Government.
Arbeit im öffentlichen Dienst, öffentliche
Dienstleistung, Staatsdienst. forobalabilali expr. liberté collective; collective
Category: Government. freedom; kollektive Freiheit.
forobabaara nafamanw expr. travaux d'intérêt forobalakɔli Morphemes: foroba-lakɔli. Nom. école
commun; projects of common interest, publique; public school, state school;
activities of common interest, common work;
Staatsschule. Category: Learn.
gemeinnützige Arbeit, Gemeinschaftsarbeit.
Category: Work and occupation.
forobamɔni Nom. pêche collective; collective
fishing; kollektives Fischen.
forobabaarakɛla
forobanafolo
[ò-ò-à] Morphemes: foroba-baara-kɛ-la.
Nom. fonctionnaire, agent des services publics; [ò-ò-à-á-ó-ó] synonyme: forobafɛn. Nom.
civil servant, public sector worker, bien commun, finance publique; shared goods,
government official; Beamter, common property, public finance;
Staatsangestellter. Category: Government. Gemeinschaftsgut, Allgemeingut, öffentliche
Finanzwirtschaft, Staatshaushalt.
Category: Finance.
29/01/2026 216

forobanafolo kunkansariya foron
forobanafolo kunkansariya expr. loi des forokiya [ò-ò-ì-á] Nom. boubou long, avec les
finances; Finance Law; Finanzgesetz. manches longues, cafetan; long "boubou"
Category: Finance. (garment) with long sleeves, caftan; Langes
forobatɔgɔ Morphemes: foroba-tɔgɔ. Nom. nom
Herrenkleid mit langen Ärmeln, Kaftan.
Category: Clothing.
commun, nom générique, terme général;
common noun; Nomen, Substantiv, Dingwort. foroko [ó-ó-ó] Nom. 1 • sac en peau, outre; bag,
Category: Grammar. container, goatskin; Sack, Tasche, Gefäss,
forobawari Nom. finance publique, fond publique; Behälter. Category: Container.
synonyme: npalan.
public finance; öffentliche Finanzwirtschaft.
Category: Finance. 2 • fourreau, étui, poche; scabbard, sheathe,
case, pocket; Futteral, Scheide (Messer), Etui.
forobaya [ò-ò-à] Verbe. généraliser, rendre public;
lɛtɛrɛforoko enveloppe. envelope of a letter.
generalize, make public; verallgemeinern, Umschlag eines Briefes.
öffentlich machen. Sida y'a to mananin
forokoba [ò-ò-ò] variante: folokoba. Nom. pélican
forobayara. Le SIDA a fait se généraliser
gris; grey pelican; grauer Pelikan.
l'usage du préservatif. AIDS has made the use
Category: Bird. pelicanus rufescens.
of condoms widespread. AIDS hat die
Verwendung von Kondomen weit verbreitet.
synonyme: kɔnɔbɔrɔtigi, konkɔnɔ,
kɔsɔgɔkɔnɔ, kulanjan.
forobayali Nom. nationalisation; nationalization;
Verstaatlichung.
forokofaraka [ò-ò-ò] Nom. vipère (espèce de); viper
(kind of); Viper (Art). Category: Snake. causus
forobayɔrɔ Nom. lieu public; public place;
rhombeatus, cerastes vipera.
öffentlicher Platz.
forokonin [ò-ò-ò-í] Nom. épervier shikra; Shikra;
foroforo [ò-ò] Verbe. 1 • boursoufler, cloquer, se 1
Schikrasperber. Category: Bird. accipiter
soulever; blister, rise; Blase bilden,
badius.
aufstiegen. Ji goni bɔnna n sen kan ka a
forokonin [ó] Nom. vêtement masculin enfilé par le
foroforo. J'ai reçu de l'eau brûlante sur le pied, 2
haut, à manches longues, qui descend à la
ça a produit une cloque. I got hot water on my
taille, chemise; male garment worn from the
foot and it caused a blister. Ich bekam heißes
top, with long sleeves, which falls to the waist,
Wasser auf meinen Fuß und es verursachte
shirt; männliches Kleidungsstück, das von
eine Blase.
oben angezogen wird, mit langen Ärmeln, das
2 • boursouflure, ampoule, cloque; blister;
bis zur Taille reicht, Hemd.
Blase.
Category: Clothing.
forokɛnɛ [ò-ò-ɛ́-ɛ́] Nom. surface agricole, surface foromanyan [ò-ò] Nom. 1 • champ en jachère; fallow
cultivée; agricultural surface;
field; brachliegendes Feld. A ye foromanyan
Landwirtschaft-Fläche. Category: Agriculture.
bila. Il a laissé le champ en jachère. He left the
foroki
1
Verbe. enlever, détacher, arracher, écorcher
field fallow. Er ließ das Feld brach liegen.
(supposant une idée de résistance); remove, Category: Agriculture, Land.
detach, tear off, flay (presuming an idea of
2 • ancienne amante; former lover; ehemaliger
resistance); entfernen, ablösen, abreißen,
Liebhaber.
abhäuten (eine Vorstellung von Widerstand
vorausgesetzt). A bolo golo forokira. La peau
foromazi Emprunt de : français. Nom. fromage;
de sa main s'est détachée. The skin on his hand cheese; Käse. Category: Food.
came off. Die Haut an seiner Hand löste sich. foromugu [ò-ò] Nom. champ qui vient d'être labouré;
foroki [ó] Verbe. 1 • pétrir, fouler, piétiner, écraser, field that has just been plowed; Feld, das
2
broyer; knead, tread, trample, crush, grind; gerade gepflügt wurde. Category: Agriculture,
kneten, treten, trampeln, zerdrücken, mahlen. I
Land.
kana n sen foroki ! Ne m'écrase pas le pied ! foron 1 [ò-ó] Verbe. aspirer, prendre un liquide en
Don't step on my foot! Treten Sie mir nicht auf faisant un bruit de succion, humer, priser
den Fuß! (tabac), renifler; suck up; sniff, take snuff,
2 • battre, frapper, rosser; beat, strike, thrash; snort; saugen, einsaugen, schlürfen,
schlagen, verprügeln. A ye a sɛbɛkɔrɔ foroki. schnupfen, schnüffeln. ka dute foron aspirer
Il l'a sévèrement rossé. He beat him severely. le thé. suck the tea.
Er schlug ihn heftig.
29/01/2026 217

foron foyifoyi
foron [ò] Verbe. faire de temps en temps; do from fosi [ò-ì] Verbe. 1 • retirer (d'un étui); take off, take
2 2
time to time; von Zeit zu Zeit tun, ab und zu. out, remove; herausnehmen, herausziehen. a
Hali i tɛ foron ka na bɔ n ye ! Tu ne viens ye muru fosi
même pas me voir de temps en temps ! You
2 • se tirer (d'affaire); get oneself out of
don't even come see me from time to time! Du
trouble; sich aus dem Staub machen, sich
kommst nicht einmal ab und zu zu mir!
herausreden. a fosira ko nin na
foron [ò] Verbe. se passer en absence de, être absent à
3 foto Emprunt de : français. Nom. photo; photo; Foto,
1
une réunion, absenter; to happen in the
Bild. foto ta prendre une photo. take a picture.
absence of, to be absent at a meeting, to be
absent; in Abwesenheit geschehen, bei einer foto ko développer une photo. develop a
Besprechung abwesend sein. Sibiri tɔnsigi picture.
foronna n kɔ. J'ai manqué la réunion de foto Nom. photographie; Photography, photograph,
2
samedi. I missed Saturday's meeting. Ich habe picture, image; Bild, Photo, Foto.
das Treffen am Samstag verpasst.
foto [ò] Nom. couscous à gros grains (non
3
foron [ó] variante: folon. Verbe. 1 • crever, éclater
4 accompagné de sauce); large grain couscous
après avoir reçu un coup; burst after receiving (not accompanied by sauce); grobkörniges
a blow; platzen, platzen nach einem Schlag. Couscous (ohne Sauce). Foto basi don, nka a
Jebaranin foronna. La courge a crevé. The
ji de bɛ caya. Le foto, c'est comme du
squash burst. Der Kürbis ist geplatzt.
couscous, mais c'est plus liquide. «Foto» is
2 • craquer, crevasser; crack; knacken. like couscous, but it's more liquid. Das Foto
3 • claquer, frapper; slam, hit; zuschlagen, ähnelt Couscous, ist aber flüssiger.
schlagen. Category: Types of food.
foronto comparer: kɛlɛkɛlɛ 1 .[ò-õ̀-ó] Nom. piment de fotota Nom. photographie; photography;
Cayenne; chilli pepper; Pfeffer. Suruku tɛ Photographie.
forontomugu dɔn dunfɛn ye. L'hyène ne sait fototala [ò-ò-à] Morphemes: fòto-ta-la. Nom.
pas que le piment en poudre se mange
photographe; photographer; Fotograf.
(proverbe). The hyena does not know that chili
synonyme: jatala.
powder can be eaten (proverb). Die Hyäne
weiß nicht, daß Chilipulver gegessen werden fototalan [ò-ò-à] Morphemes: foto-ta-lan. Nom.
kann (Sprichwort). Category: Food, Grass, appareil photo; camera; Kamera.
herb, vine. capsicum frutescens. Category: Machine.
synonyme: dagannan, musokɛni.
fototanan Nom. appareil photographique; photo
forontobanin n.comp. gros piment ; hot pepper; camera; Fotoapparat.
grosser Pfeffer, Paprika. capsicum annuum.
foyi [ó-ì] Déterminant. rien, aucun, aucune; nothing,
forontoma [ò-ò-ò] Nom. pimenté; spicy; scharf, not any; nichts, keiner, keine, keines. N ma
würzig. jɛgɛ wusu forontoma. du poisson foyi san sugu la. Je n’ai rien acheté au
fumé pimenté. spicy smoked fish. würziger marché. I didn’t buy anything at the market.
geräucherter Fisch. Category: Food. Ich habe nichts gekauft. N ɲa ti foyi la. Je ne
forontomugu synonyme: kɛlɛkɛlɛmugu. Nom. vois rien. I don’t see anything. Ich sehe nichts.
piment en poudre; pepper powder; synonyme: fosi 1 .
Pfefferpulver. foyifoyi [ó-í-ó-í] absolument rien, absolument
fosa [ò] Nom. riz (variété à grains rouges et à longs aucun; absolutely nothing; absolut nichts. A
poils à l'extrémité des épis) ; rice (variety ma foyifoyi dun. Il n'a absolument rien
with red grains and long hairs at the end of the
mangé. He ate absolutely nothing. Er hat
ears); Reis (Sorte mit roten Körnern und
absolut nichts gegessen.
langen Haaren am Ende der Ähren).
Category: Types of food.
fosi [ó-ì] synonyme: foyi. Déterminant. rien, aucun;
1
nothing, not any; nichts, kein. Fosi sababutan
tɛ. Rien ne se passe sans cause. Nothing
happens without a reason. Nichts geschieht
ohne Ursache. synonyme: foyi.
29/01/2026 218

fɔ fɔgɛ
fɔ [ɔ]́ vt. 1 • dire, prononcer, articuler, parler, fɔ [ɔ́] variante: fɔn. Verbe. 1 • manquer, rater;
1 3
avouer, énoncer; say, articulate, speak, miss, fail; verfehlen, verpassen. Sennateli ka
pronounce, state; sagen, aussprechen, reden, sennateliya b'a bolo fɔ a kɔ don dɔ. La
sprechen, ankündigen. I ye mun fɔ ? Qu’est-ce
rapidité du rapide un jour va le perdre
que tu as dit ? What did you say? Was hast du (proverbe). The speed of the fast person will
gesagt? A y’a fɔ u ye ko : "..." Il leur a dit : « ... one day ruin him (proverb). Die
». He said to them, "..." Er hat ihnen gesagt: Geschwindigkeit des schnellen Menschen
«...». I bi mun fɔ o la ? Qu’en dis-tu ? What do wird ihn eines Tages ruinieren (Sprichwort).
you say about that? Was sagst du dazu? A fɔ n 2 • venir après, venir en l'absence de, succéder;
ye. Dis-le moi. Tell me. Sag es mir. A fɔ a ye come after, come in the absence of, succeed;
nachher kommen, in der Abwesenheit von ...
ko a ka ne dɛmɛ ! Dis-lui de m’aider ! Tell
kommen, nachfolgen. N nana fɔ e kɔ. Je suis
him to help me! Sag ihm er solle mir helfen. N
venu en ton absence. I came in your absence.
y’a fɔ u ye ko u ka taa sugu la ka kɔgɔ san.
Ich bin in deiner Abwesenheit gekommen.
Je leur ai demandé d’aller au marché pour
acheter du sel. I asked them to go to the market
fɔ
4
[ɔ́] variante: fo. prepos. jusqu'à; till, until; bis.
to buy some salt. I bat sie auf den Markt zu A tagara fɔ Bobo. Il est allé jusqu'à bobo. He
gehen um mir Salz zu kaufen. went till Bobo. Er ging bis nach Bobo.
2 • parler (langue); speak; sprechen. a bi fɔ ka bɛn vt. convenir; agree, admit, acknowledge;
tubabukan fɔ übereinkommen, gestehen.
3 • jouer (avec la main d’un instrument de fɔ ka yira bambara: fɔ ka jira. expr. décrire, expliquer;
musique); play (instrument); ein
describe, explain; beschreiben, erklären.
Musikinstrument spielen. balan fɔ jouer du
balafon. play the balaphone. Balaphon fɔ nin loon nin na expr. jusqu'à ce jour; up to this
spielen. jenbe fɔ battre le tambour. play the day; bis heute, bis zu diesem Tag.
drum. Trommeln, auf der Trommel spielen. fɔbaga [ɔ́] Nom. locuteur; speaker; Sprecher. ... kan
4 • parler (une langue); speak (a language);
dɔw fɔbaga ka ca ka tɛmɛ kan dɔw fɔbaga
reden. N b’a fɛ ka julakan fɔ. Je veux parler le
kan. ... il y a des langues qui ont plus de
dioula. I want to speak Dioula. Ich will Dioula
locuteurs que d'autres. ...there are languages
reden. Angilɛkan bi fɔ jamana caman na. On
that have more speakers than others. ...es gibt
parle l’anglais dans beaucoup de pays. English
Sprachen, die mehr Sprecher haben als andere.
is spoken in a lot of countries. In vielen
Ländern spricht man Englisch.
fɔcogo [ɔ́-ó-ó] Morphemes: fɔ-cogo.
fɔ variante: fɔɔ, fo, foo, foni. prepos. 1 • sauf;
synonyme: tuguda, tugucogo. Nom.
2
prononciation, articulation, expression;
except; außer. A ma sɔn mɔgɔ si ka taga n'a
pronunciation, expression, articulation;
ye fɔ Amidu. Il ne voulait pas que d’autres Aussprache, Ausdrucksweise.
personnes aillent avec lui sauf Amidou. He Category: Grammar.
didn’t want anyone to go with him except
fɔcogokelen comparer: yɛlɛmabali. n.comp.
Amidou. ER wollte nicht, daß jemand anders
mit ihm gehe außer Amidou. Kira bi bonya
monotone; monotone; Einerlei, Eintönigkeit.
yɔrɔ bɛɛ, fɔ a yɛrɛ ka dugu kɔnɔ. Un fɔfɔ Verbe. se suivre, succéder (pour plusieurs
prophète est accueilli partout sauf dans son personnes, plusieurs cultures...); follow one
propre village. A prophet is welcomed another, succeed (for several people, several
everywhere except in his home village. Note: agricultural events, etc.); einander folgen
Bible: Marka 6.4 (für mehrere Menschen, mehrere Kulturen
2 • sauf si, à moins que; unless; außer wenn. A usw.) ... Ngolosiw fɔfɔra ɲɔgɔn kɔ fanga na.
ti na fɔ ni mɔgɔ taara a weele. Il ne viendra ... les descendants de Ngolo se succèdent au
pas à moins que quelqu’un aille l’appeler. He
pouvoir. ...the descendants of Ngolo succeed
one another in power. ...die Nachkommen von
will not come unless someone goes and calls
him. Er wird nicht kommen außer wenn
Ngolo folgen einander an der Macht.
jemand ihn ruft. fɔgɛ [ɔ̀] Verbe. 1 • dégonfler; deflate; entleeren, Luft
3 • jusqu’à (ce que); until, to the point; bis, daß rauslassen, schrumpfen. synonyme: fɔgɔbɛ.
sogar. Ala ye diɲɛ kanu haali, fɔ a y'a Den
2 • essouffler; out of breath; außer Atem sein.
kelenpe ci mɔgɔw ma. Dieu a tant aimé le A fɔgɛra boli fɛ. Il est essoufflé par la course.
monde, jusqu'à donner son Fils unique. God so
He is out of breath from running. Er ist außer
loved the world, to the point that he gave his
Atem vom Laufen.
only son. So sehr hat Gott die Welt geliebt, daß
er sogar seine einzigen Sohn gab.
29/01/2026 219

fɔgɔ fɔlen
fɔgɔ [ɔ]́ variante: fogon. Nom. espace limité par fɔgɔtigi [ɔ́] Nom. taureau de tête; leading bull;
1
une foule; space limited by a crowd; durch leitender Stier. U ka nɔɔrɛba de y'u ka
Menschenmenge begrenzter Raum. ka fɔgɔ fɔgɔtigi ye. C'est leur taureau aux flancs noirs
koori dɔnkɛlaw la. faire cercle autour des qui est le chef de leur troupeau. It is their
danseurs. make a circle around the dancers. black-sided bull who is the leader of their
Machen Sie einen Kreis um die Tänzer. herd. Es ist ihr schwarzseitiger Bulle, der der
fɔgɔ [ɔ]́ Nom. troupeau; herd, flock, fold; Herde. Anführer ihrer Herde ist. Category: Animal
2
husbandry.
misifɔgɔba un grand troupeau de vaches. a
fɔkabɛn [ɔ́] Nom. 1 • entente verbale, concorde, union;
large herd of cows. eine große Herde Kühe.
Category: Animal husbandry. verbal agreement, agreement; mündliche
Übereinkunft, Übereinkunft, Einheit,
fɔgɔbɛ [ɔ-̀ ɔ̀] Verbe. dégonfler, essouffler; deflate, out
Abkommen. ... u ka se k'u dugu kunkow bɛɛ
of breath; Luft ablassen, außer Atem. Mobili
ɲɛnabɔ jɛkafɔ ni fɔkabɛn na. ... qu'il puisse
sen fɔgɔbɛlen don. La roue de la voiture est
régler tous les problèmes de leur village dans
dégonflée. The car wheel is deflated. Das la concertation et la concorde. ...that he can
Autorad hat keine Luft mehr. synonyme: fɔgɛ. resolve all the problems of their village
through consultation and harmony. ...daß er
fɔgɔbɛfɔgɔbɛ [ɔ́] variante: sɔgɔbɛsɔgɔbɛ. Verbe.
alle Probleme ihres Dorfes durch Beratung und
s'insinuer, se faufiler, se glisser; to insinuate,
Harmonie lösen kann.
to creep, sneak; unterstellen, kriechen,
2 • conciliation; conciliation; Versöhnung.
einschleichen. I kana fɔgɔbɛfɔgɔbɛ misiw ni
3 • négociation; negotiation; Verhandlung.
ɲɔgɔn cɛ dɛ ! Ne te faufile pas parmi les
vaches ! Don't sneak among the cows!
fɔkabɛnna [ɔ́] Nom. modérateur, facilitateur d'un
Schleichen Sie sich nicht zwischen die Kühe! accord; moderator, facilitator of an
agreement; Moderator, Vermittler einer
fɔgɔfɔgɔ variante: fogofogo. Nom. poumon; lung;
Vereinbarung.
Lunge. Category: Body.
synonyme: fogonfogon.
fɔkabila comparer: koɲɛsigi. n.comp. prévision;
2
forecasting, anticipation; Prognose,
fɔgɔfɔgɔ jolijɛnsɛsira Nom. artère pulmonaire; Vorhersage.
pulmonary artery; Lungenarterie.
fɔkan [ɔ́-á] Morphemes: fɔ-kan. Nom. parole; word,
Category: Body.
speech; Wort, Sprache, Rede. Fɔkan ninnu
fɔgɔfɔgɔ jolijɛnsɛsira datugunan Nom. valve
tora a hakili la ... Ces paroles lui restèrent à
du tronc pulmonaire; semi-lunar valve;
l'esprit ... These words stuck in his mind...
Pulmonarklappe.
Diese Worte blieben ihm im Gedächtnis...
fɔgɔfɔgɔ jolitɛmɛsirakunba Nom. bronche
fɔkasurunya Morphemes: fɔ-ka-surunya. Nom.
droite; right main bronchus; rechte Luftröhre.
abrégé; summary, abbreviated form, short
Category: Body.
form; Kürzung, Kurzform, Abkürzung.
fɔgɔfɔgɔ jukɔrɔso Nom. lobe inférieure; lower lobe;
fɔko [ɔ́] Nom. façon de parler; way of speaking;
unterer Lungenlappen. Category: Body.
Sprechweise. Bɛɛ ni i ta fɔko don. A chacun
fɔgɔfɔgɔ kalaw [ɔ̀-ɔ̀-ɔ́-ɔ́ à-á] Nom. bronches; sa façon de dire. Everyone has their own way
bronchus; Bronchien. Category: Body. of saying it. Jeder hat seine eigene Art, es
fɔgɔfɔgɔ sanfɛso Nom. lobe supérieure; upper lobe;
auszudrücken.
oberer Lungen-lappe. Category: Body. fɔkumasen [ɔ́] Nom. énoncé affirmatif; affirmative
fɔgɔfɔgɔbana Nom. tuberculose; tuberculosis;
statement; positive Aussage.
Category: Grammar.
Tuberkulose. Category: Disease.
synonyme: fogonfogonbana, sɔgɔsɔgɔjɛ. fɔladegi Nom. interprétation musicale, répétition
orale; musical interpretation; Auslegung,
fɔgɔfɔgɔkalabana synonyme: fɔgɔfɔgɔbana,
Auswertung, Deutung, Interpretation eines
fɔgɔfɔgɔdimi. Nom. bronchites; bronchitis; Musikstückes.
Bronchitis. Category: Disease. fɔlen Nom. dit, dires, paroles; said, sayings, words;
fɔgɔlɔn [ɔ́] Adverbe. très léger; very light; sehr leicht. A gesagt, Sprüche, Worte. Fɔlen sɔrɔla. On a
ka fɛgɛn fɔgɔlɔn ! C'est très léger ! It's very trouvé ce qui avait été dit. We found out what
light! Es ist sehr leicht! synonyme: fɛgɛfɛgɛ, was said. Wir haben herausgefunden, was
ɲɔgɔlɔn. gesagt wurde.
2
29/01/2026 220

fɔli fɔlɔfɔlɔso
fɔli [ó-í] Nom. musique, fête (avec musique); fɔlisen Emprunt de : fɔli-sen. Nom. air de musique,
music, celebration (with music); Musik, Fest morceau, rythme; music style, piece of music,
(mit Musik). Fɔli bɛ yɛlɛma masakɛ ye, nka rhythm; Musikart, Musikstück, Rhythmus.
dɔgɔ tɛ yɛlɛma masakɛ ye. On change de fɔlɔ [ɔ́-ɔ́] 1 • adj. premier, être le premier,
1
musique pour le roi, mais on ne change pas le commencer; first, to be the first, begin; erste,
jour du marché pour le roi (proverbe). You erster, der erste sein, anfangen. N ye den fɔlɔ
change the music for the king, but you don't
ye. Je suis l’aîné. I am the first-born. Ich bin
change the market day for the king (proverb).
der Erstgeborene. ka tɛmɛ fɔlɔ taa kan plus
Du änderst die Musik für den König, aber du
änderst nicht den Markttag für den König qu’avant. more than before. Mehr als vorher.
(Sprichwort). synonyme: gale.
fɔlifɛn Morphemes: fɔli-fɛn. Nom. instrument de 2 • Adverbe. d’abord, déjà, désormais; firstly,
already, from now on, henceforth; zuerst,
musique; musical instrument;
Musikinstrument. Sedu bi fɔlifɛn dɔ fɔ.
bereits, nunmehr, von nun an, fortan. Na yan
Seidou joue d’un instrument de musique.
fɔlɔ ! Viens ici d'abord ! Come here first!
Seidou plays a musical instrument. Seidu Komm zuerst hierher!
spielt ein Musikinstrument. Category: Musical 3 • Adverbe. pas encore (avec négation); not yet
instrument. (with negation); noch, noch nicht (mit
fɔlifɛn fiyɛta Nom. instrument à vent; wind Verneinung). N m’a dɔn fɔlɔ. Je ne sais pas
encore. I don’t know yet. Ich weiß es noch
instrument; Blasinstrument, Blechinstrument.
nicht. A furunin tɛ fɔlɔ. Elle n’est pas encore
Category: Musical instrument.
mariée. She is not married yet. Sie ist noch
fɔlifɛn gosita Nom. instrument à percussion;
nicht verheiratet. A ma na fɔlɔ. Il n'est pas
percussion instrument; Schlaginstrument. encore là. He is not there yet. Er ist noch nicht
Category: Musical instrument. dort.
fɔlifɛn juruman Nom. instrument à cordes; string fɔlɔ [ɔ́-ɔ́] Adverbe. jadis, avant, autrefois,
2
instrument; Saiteninstrument.
auparavant; former, long ago, of the past; vor
Category: Musical instrument. langer Zeit, früher, vorher, damals. Fɔlɔ
fɔlijɛkulu [ɔ́] Nom. orchestre, ensemble musical; denmisɛnw ni bi ta ... Les gens d'autrefois et
orchestra, musical ensemble; Orchester, ceux d'aujourd'hui ... People of the past and
Musikensemble. those of today... Menschen von damals und
fɔlikalaw Nom. mailloches; beaters, mallet; Schläger,
von heute...
Filzschlegel. Category: Musical instrument. fɔlɔ 3 [ɔ̀-ɔ́] variante: filawo, fɔlɔwo, fɛlɛwo. Nom.
fɔlikɛla See main entry: .[ɔ́] Morphemes: fɔli-kɛ-la.
fenêtre, lucarne, ouverture; window, opening;
Fenster, Luke. donda kelen ani fɔlɔ saba.
Nom. musicien; musician; Musikant, Musiker.
une seule porte d’entrée, et trois fenêtres. a
Category: Person. synonyme: fɔlila.
single entrance door, and three windows. eine
fɔlikɛnan jurumanw Nom. instruments à cordes; einzige Eingangstür und drei Fenster.
string instruments; Saiteninstrumente. synonyme: filantɛrɛ, fɛlɛwo.
fɔlikɛyɔrɔ Nom. clavier (musique); keyboard; fɔlɔfɔlɔ Morphemes: fɔlɔ-fɔlɔ. variante: fɔlɔ fɔlɔ.
Tastatur, Keyboard, Tasten. Category: Musical 1 • Nom. jadis, tout-premier, au
instrument. commencement, initial, autrefois, jadis, être le
tout premier; first of all, in the beginning, in
fɔlila Nom. musicien; musician; Musiker.
the past, before, initially, formerly, to be the
Category: Person. synonyme: fɔlikɛla. very first one; zu aller erst, am Anfang,
fɔliminan jurumanw Nom. instruments à cordes; anfänglich. Fɔlɔ fɔlɔ Ala ye sankolo ni
string instruments; Saiteninstrument. dugukolo da. Au commencement, Dieu créa
Category: Musical instrument. le ciel et la terre. In the beginning, God created
heaven and earth. Am Anfang schuf Gott
fɔliminanw Nom. instruments à percussion;
Himmel und Erde. Note: Bible: Jenɛse 1.1
percussion instruments; Schlaginstrumente.
synonyme: galegale.
Category: Musical instrument.
2 • Adverbe. autrefois; formerly, in the past,
fɔliminaw Nom. instruments à percussion; percussion long ago, in days gone by; einst, früher, in der
instruments; Schlaginstrument, Vergangenheit, vor langer Zeit, damals.
Perkussionsinstrument. Category: Musical fɔlɔfɔlɔso Nom. maisons traditionnelles; traditional
instrument.
houses; traditionelle Häuser.
29/01/2026 221

fɔlɔkɔ fɔnɔra
fɔlɔkɔ [ɔ-̀ ɔ̀-ɔ́] Nom. nuage de poussier; cloud of dust; fɔn [ɔ̀] Nom. 1 • glume, balle (du mil); husk (of
2
Staubwolke. Bamanandunun tɛ dɔn fɔlɔkɔ millet); Hüllspelze, Schale (von Hirse).
kɔ. On ne danse pas au rythme du tambour synonyme: folofolo 1 , fofo 2 .
bambara sans faire de poussière (proverbe). 2 • son (du riz); bran (rice); Kleie (Reis).
You cannot dance to the rhythm of the synonyme: maloɲaga.
Bambara drum without making dust (proverb).
3 • enveloppe de certains fruits
Man kann nicht zum Rhythmus der
(pomme-cannelle...); skin of certain fruits
Bambara-Trommel tanzen, ohne Staub zu
(apple-cinnamon, etc.); Schale bestimmter
erzeugen (Sprichwort).
Früchte (Apfel-Zimt usw.)
fɔlɔmɔgɔ [ɔ́] Morphemes: fɔlɔ-mɔgɔ. Nom. fɔn [ɔ́] Nom. cicatrice; scar; Narbe. nsɔnfɔn
3
1 • homme d'autrefois, naïf; man of the past,
cicatrice due à la variole. scar from smallpox.
naive; Mann der Vergangenheit, naiv.
Narbe von Pocken. synonyme: jolifɔn.
synonyme: kunjɛ .
2
fɔn [ɔ́] variante: fɔnfilen. Nom. 1 • front, devant
2 • rétrograde; retrograde, backward; 4
rückläufig, rückfällig. du crâne; forehead, front of the skull; Stirn,
Vorderseite des Schädels. A bɛ ka a fɔn biri.
fɔlɔn [ɔ]̀ Verbe. faner, flétrir, dépérir; wither, wilt;
1 Elle se fait un tatouage sur le front. She gets a
verdorren, welken. Jintanya de y'u fɔlɔn. Le
tattoo on her forehead. Sie läßt sich auf die
manque d'eau les a fait faner. The lack of water Stirn tätowieren. Category: Body.
caused them to wilt. Der Wassermangel ließ synonyme: fɔnkun.
sie welken. synonyme: fɔsɔn.
2 • fontanelle; fontanel; Fontanelle.
fɔlɔn [ɔ]́ variante: folon. Verbe. courir à vive allure, synonyme: lebeke.
2
filer; run at high speed; mit hoher fɔnfɔn Nom. flotteur, bouchon (à la pêche); floater,
Geschwindigkeit laufen. I fɔlɔn sa ! Cours
stopper (fishing); Stopper (Angeln).
vite ! Run quickly! Lauf schnell!
Category: Hunt and fish.
fɔlɔn 3 [ɔ]́ Verbe. 1 • changer de direction, bifurquer; fɔnfɔnnin [ɔ́-ɔ ́-ĩ]́ variante: fɔnfɔn, fɔnfɔnni. Nom.
change direction, branch off; Richtung
vipère; viper; Viper. Category: Snake. causus
ändern, abzweigen.
rhombeatus.
2 • incliner, pencher, dévier; incline, lean,
deviate; neigen, abweichen.
fɔnkɔ [ɔ́-ɔ́] Morphemes: fɔ-n-kɔ.
synonyme: fɔranɲɛna, fɔnɲɛnakuma. Nom.
fɔlɔya [ɔ]́ Nom. priorité, droit d'aînesse, préséance;
médisance, racontar, on-dit, cancan; malicious
priority, birthright, precedence; Priorität,
gossip, idle gossip, back-biting; Lästerung,
Geburtsrecht, Vorrang. A y'a ka fɔlɔya jira
böses Gerede über, Geschwätz, Verleumdung.
tɔw la. Il a montré sa préséance sur les autres. Fɔnkɔkuma bɛ dugu ci. La médisance ruine
He showed his precedence over others. Er le village (proverbe). Backbiting ruins the
zeigte seinen Vorrang vor anderen. village (proverb). Verleumdung ruiniert das
fɔlɔyɔrɔ [ɔ́-ɔ́-ɔ́-ɔ́] Morphemes: fɔlɔ-yɔrɔ. Nom. Dorf (Sprichwort). synonyme: fɔranɲɛna.
source, origine; source, spring, origin; Quelle, fɔnkun [ɔ́] Nom. front; forehead; Stirn. Jeli tɛ malo,
Ursprung, Herkunft. Mɔgɔ tɛ a fɔlɔyɔrɔ ye.
nka a fɔnkun bɛ wɔsi. Le griot n'a pas honte
L'homme n'est pas sa propre origine. Man is
mais son front est plein de sueur (proverbe).
not his own origin. Der Mensch ist nicht sein
The griot is not ashamed but his forehead is
eigener Ursprung.
full of sweat (proverb). Der Griot schämt sich
fɔn [ɔ] ́ variante: fɔ. Verbe. manquer, absenter, nicht, aber seine Stirn ist voller Schweiß
1
rater; be missing, be lacking, be absent; fehlen, (Sprichwort). synonyme: tenbara, fɔn 4 , tenda 1 ,
nicht da sein, verfehlen, verpassen. Sa bi teen 1 , ten 2 .
duguma seen bi duguma, o ti fɔn ɲɔgɔn kɔ. fɔnɲɔgɔnkɔkanseleke Nom. angles alternes
Le serpent est à terre le pied est à terre, ils ne
externes; alternating external angles;
maqueront pas de se rencontreront. (proverbe).
alternierende aussen winkel.
The snake is on the soil, the foot is on the soil,
Category: Mathematics.
they wont fail to meet each other (one day).
(Proverb). Die Schlange ist am Boden, der fɔnɔ [ɔ̀-ɔ́] n.pro. branche des Numu dans la région
Fuss ist am Boden, sie werden es nicht des Cascades; name of a river; Name eines
verfehlen sich eines Tages zu kreuzen. Flusses.
(Sprichwort).
fɔnɔra n.pro. quartier des Fono à Blédougou; name of
the Fono people in Bledougou; Name der Fono
in Bledougou.
29/01/2026 222

fɔnɔw ka jiminminan fɔrɔnun
fɔnɔw ka jiminminan expr. abreuvoirs pour fɔŋɔ ka tiɲɛni Nom. pollution de l'air; air pollution;
volaille; drinking-trough for poultry; Tränke Luftverschmutzung. Category: Sky.
für Geflügel. Category: Animal husbandry. fɔŋɔsira datugunan Nom. épiglotte; epiglottis;
fɔnsila [ɔ]́ Nom. bien dit, à bon escient, comme il faut; Kehldeckel, Halszäpfchen. Category: Body.
well said, wisely, as it should be; gut gesagt,
fɔɔ bambara: fɔ. prepos. 1 • très loin, jusqu’à; very
weise, wie es sein sollte. Nin ye fɔnsila ye.
far, until; sehr weit, bis. A tagara fɔɔ bobo. Il
C'est bien dit. That's well said. Das ist gut
gesagt.
est allé jusqu’à Bobo. He went till Bobo. Er
ging bis Bobo.
fɔɲɔ [ɔ-́ ɔ́] synonyme: fiɲɛ. Nom. vent, air , souffle,
2 • sauf; except; außer. Bɛɛ nana fɔɔ Ali. Tous
gaz; wind, air, breath, gas; Wind, Luft, Atem,
sont venus sauf Ali. All have come except Ali.
Gas. Category: Weather. synonyme: fiyɛn, fiɲɛ
1
.
Alle sind gekommen außer Ali.
fɔɲɔ barika expr. énergie éolienne; wind energy, wind fɔɔlɔn [ɔ̀-ɔ ́] variante: fɔlɔn. Nom. goitre; goitre;
power; Windenergie, Windkraftenergie. Kropf. Category: Disease. synonyme: foolo ,
2
fɔɲɔ tɛmɛsira Nom. trachée; windpipe, trachea; kanforoko.
Luftröhre. Category: Body. fɔɔnɔ [ɔ́-ɔ́] variante: fɔnɔ. 1 • vi. vomir; vomit;
1
fɔɲɔbila Nom. expiration; expiry, exhalation; erbrechen, kotzen. I bɛ yɛrɛyɛrɛ ani ka fɔɔnɔ.
Ausatmen, Ausatmung. Tu trembles et tu vomis. You're shaking and
fɔɲɔbɔfɔlikɛnanw Nom. instruments à vent; wind vomiting. Du zitterst und erbrichst.
instruments; Blasinstrumente. 2 • Nom. vomissement, vomi; vomiting;
Category: Musical instrument.
Erbrochene.
fɔɲɔdinan Nom. ventilateur; fan, ventilator; fɔɔnɔ 2 [ɔ̀] Nom. poisson (espèce de); fish (kind of);
Ventilator. Fisch (Art). Category: Fish. alestes dentex
sethente.
fɔɲɔdon [ɔ́-ɔ́-ɔ ́] variante: fiɲɛdon. Nom. aération;
fɔranɲɛna [ɔ́] Nom. médisance, racontar, ragot, on-dit,
ventilation; Ventilation, Belüftung.
synonyme: kɛnɛdon.
cancan; back-biting, hearsay, gossip;
Verleumdung, Klatsch, Hörensagen.
fɔɲɔdontiyo Nom. tuyau d’aération; air pipe; synonyme: fanaya, fɔnkɔ, ŋunanfakiya.
Luftrohr.
fɔrɔ comparer: wulu.[ɔ́-ɔ́] variante: fɔrɔkala.
1
fɔɲɔgɔnkɔ [ɔ́] Nom. discorde, différend, malentendu, Nom. sexe masculin, pénis, verge; male sex,
litige, mésentente, conflit; discord, difference, penis; männliches Geschlechtsteil, Penis.
misunderstanding, litigation, disagreement, Category: Body. synonyme: bere, cɔlɔnin,
3
conflict; Zwietracht, Differenz, cɛminɛn.
Mißverständnis, Rechtsstreit,
Meinungsverschiedenheit, Konflikt. fɔrɔdaburu [ɔ́] Morphemes: fɔrɔ-da-buru.
Fɔɲɔgɔnkɔ ɲɛnabɔbaga Commissaire aux variante: fɔrɔdabulu. Nom. prépuce; foreskin;
conflits, médiateur. Conflict commissioner, Vorhaut. Category: Body.
mediator. Konfliktbeauftragter, Mediator. synonyme: wuludaforoko, sogonindaburu,
fɔɲɔjɛ Jula: fɔɲɔgwɛ. synonyme: foonɛnɛ, fonɛnɛ. fɔrɔwolo.
variante: fiɲɛgwɛ. Nom. Harmattan (vent de fɔrɔji [ɔ́-ɔ́-í] synonyme: lawaji, cɛ kɔji. Nom.
sable); desert wind, sand wind, Harmattan
sperme; sperm; Sperma, Samenflüssigkeit.
wind; Wüstenwind, Sandwind, Harmattan
Category: Body. synonyme: nɔgɔji, jarabiji,
Wind. Category: Sky. synonyme: fiɲɛjɛ.
lawaji, maniyu.
fɔɲɔmansin Nom. moulin à vent; windmill;
fɔrɔkala [ɔ́-ɔ́-á-á] Morphemes: fɔrɔ-kala.
Windmühle.
variante: fɔrɔ. Nom. pénis; penis; Penis.
fɔɲɔnɔgɔ [ɔ́-ɔ́-ɔ́-ɔ́] Nom. pollution atmosphérique; Category: Body. synonyme: bere, cɔlɔnin,
3
atmospheric pollution; Luftverschmutzung. cɛminɛn.
Category: Sky.
fɔrɔkili [ɔ́] Morphemes: fɔrɔ-kili. Nom. testicules;
fɔɲɔsama Nom. inspiration; breath, inhalation;
testicle; Hoden. Category: Body.
Einatmen. Category: Body.
synonyme: filabara, kiliden, worokɔrɔla, yɛrɛ ,
3
fɔɲɔsumayahakɛ Nom. humidité de l'air; humidity kaya , lɔɔrɛ, naɲɔgɔn.
2
of the air; Luftfeuchtigkeit.
fɔrɔnun Morphemes: fɔrɔ-nun. Nom. gland (de la
verge); glans; Eichel. Category: Body.
29/01/2026 223

fɔrɔwolo fufu
fɔrɔwolo Nom. prépuce; foreskin, prepuce; Vorhaut. fɔyɔ [ɔ̀-ɔ́] Nom. plat de couscous de «fonio»; dish of
synonyme: sogonindaburu, fɔrɔdaburu, «fonio» couscous; Gericht aus «Fonio»
wuludaforoko. Kuskus. Category: Food.
fɔrɔwuli Morphemes: fɔrɔ-wuli. Nom. érection; fɔyɔyɔ Nom. plat de couscous fonio en sauce; dish of
erection; Erektion. Category: Body.
couscous fonio in sauce; Gericht mit
synonyme: wuluwuli.
Couscous-Fonio in Soße. Category: Types of
food.
fɔsen [ɔ-́ ẽ́] n.comp. énoncé; statement; Aussage. framansi Emprunt de : français. Nom. pharmacie;
Category: Grammar, Language and thought.
chemist's, drug store, dispensary, pharmacy;
fɔsifati Emprunt de : français. Nom. phosphate Drogerie, Apotheke. Category: Sign, Symbol.
d'ammoniaque; ammonium phosphates; fu [ú] variante: fuu. num. zéro, nul, rien, gratis;
1
Ammoniumphosphat. Category: Agriculture.
zero, nought, nothing, for free; die Null, 0,
fɔsɔkɔfɔsɔkɔ [ɔ́] Verbe. 1 • chétif et mal dans sa peau, nichts, umsonst. O kɛra bɔ fu sa fu ye. C'est
peu épanoui; sickly and uncomfortable in one's comme si tu étais né et mort pour rien
skin, unfulfilled; kränklich und unangenehm in (proverbe). It's as if you were born and died
der Haut, unerfüllt. for nothing (proverb). Es ist, als ob man für
2 • maigrichon; skinny; schlank, mager. ... nichts geboren und gestorben wäre
(Sprichwort). Category: Mathematics.
cɛnin fɔsɔkɔfɔsɔkɔlen in ... ... ce petit
maigrichon ... ...this little skinny guy... ...dieser fu 2 [ú] 1 • Adverbe. en vain; in vain; vergebens,
kleine dünne Kerl... vergeblich, umsonst.
3 • peu dynamique (démarche); not very 2 • adj. inutile, sans valeur; freely, for free;
dynamic (gait); nicht sehr dynamisch (Gang). anstandslos, nutzlos, sinnlos, unbrauchbar,
... a bɛ fɔsɔkɔfɔsɔkɔ ka taa ... ... elle marche unnütz. Ni Ala tɛ, fɛɛn bɛɛ ye fu ye. Sans
en traînant ... ...she walks shuffling... ...sie geht Dieu, tout est sans valeur. Without God,
schlurfend... everything is worthless. Ohne Gott ist alles
fɔsɔn [ɔ-̀ ɔ́] variante: fɔlɔn, pɔsɔn. Nom. faner,
sinnlos.
flétrir, dépérir; wither, fade away, wilt, decay; fu 3 [ù] Jula: fuu. Nom. éponge végétale, fibre,
welken, verwelken, verblühen. filasse; sponge, fibre; Schwamm, Faser.
synonyme: fɔlɔn . sebefu fibre de rônier. palm fibre. Palmfaser.
1
fɔsɔnfɔsɔn synonyme: pɔsɔnpɔsɔn. vi. flétrir, faner; Category: Tool. luffa aegyptiaca.
wither, fade; ausdörren, vertrocknen, fu 4 [ú] Emprunt de : français. Verbe. aller, ficher
verdorren, vergehen, verwelken, verblassen. le camp (populaire); go, leave (popular);
fɔsɔnli [ɔ-̀ ɔ̀-í] Nom. flétrissement (plante); fading (of gehen (Volksmund). A ye fu ta. An ka fu ! Il
a plant); Verdürrung (von Pflanzen).
est parti. Allons-y ! He left. Let's go! Er ging.
Laß uns gehen!
fɔta [ɔ]́ part. dicible, ce qui peut être dit, parole à
fufafu [ú-à-ú] comparer: tulomasama. n.comp.
dire, bonne à dire; sayable, what can be said,
arrière petit-enfant, arrière petit-fils, arrière
word to say, good to tell; sagbar, was gesagt
grand-père; grand-grandchild,
werden kann, Wort zu sagen, gut zu sagen.
great-grandfather; Ur-Uhrenkel,
Tiɲɛ bɛɛ tɛ fɔta. Toute vérité n'est pas bonne à
Urgrossvater. ... án denw ... án fufafuw ... ...
dire (proverbe). Not every truth is good to tell
nos enfants, nos petits-enfants ... ...our
(proverb). Nicht jede Wahrheit ist gut zu sagen
children, our grandchildren... ...unsere
(Sprichwort).
Kinder, unsere Enkel... Category: Kinship.
fɔti [ɔ]́ Verbe. 1 • bouillir, cuire; boil, cook; kochen.
fufilenbara Nom. arbre (espèce); tree sp; Baumart.
synonyme: wuli , barabara , wiliwilila,
2 1 Category: Tree. strychnos spinosa.
balabala .
1
fufu [ù-ú] Nom. purée d'igname; yam mush; Yams
2 • grésiller; sizzle, crackle; brutzeln. Tulu bɛ
1
Mus. Category: Food.
fɔti. L'huile grésille. The oil sizzles.
fufu [ú] Nom. noyau d'un fruit (généralement partie
2
fɔtifɔti [ɔ]́ Verbe. trembler (de colère, de chagrin, de
centrale de la mangue) qui sert de cible au jeu
douleur); tremble (with anger, sorrow, pain); de fudonni; pit of a fruit (usually central part
zittern (vor Wut, Trauer, Schmerz). A dusu of the mango) which serves as a target for the
bɔra fo a bɛ fɔtifɔti. Il se mit en colère au game of fudonni; Kern einer Frucht
point d'en trembler. He became angry to the (normalerweise zentraler Teil der Mango), das
point of shaking. Er wurde so wütend, daß er als Ziel für das Fudonni-Spiel dient.
zitterte.
29/01/2026 224

fufu fugufugu
fufu [ú] Nom. panier pour les colas; basket for cola fugari [ù-à] variante: fugaru. Nom. vaurien, bon à
3
nuts; Korb für Cola Nüsse. worofufunin rien; rascal, good for nothing; Schlingel, zu
panier de colas. basket for cola nuts. Korb für nichts taugen, Taugenichts. Malo tɛ fugari la.
Cola Nüsse. Category: Container. Le vaurien n'a jamais honte (proverbe). The
fuga [ù] variante: fugan. Verbe. faire rapidement,
rascal is never ashamed (proverb). Der
1 Taugenichts schämt sich nie (Sprichwort).
rapidement; do quickly, quickly; schnell,
synonyme: fuyan.
schnell machen. A fugara ka taa. Il est parti
rapidement. He left quickly. Er ging schnell fugaridaganin Morphemes: fugari-daga-nin. Nom.
fort. théière; tea-pot; Teekanne. ka fugaridaganin
fuga [ú] Nom. clairière latéritique, endroit plat sans sigi faire le thé. make tea. Tee kochen.
2
végétation arborée; lateritic clearing, flat Category: Container. synonyme: miliyɔndaga,
place without tree vegetation; lateritische tebara, baradaa.
Lichtung, flacher Platz ohne Baumbewuchs.
fugu [ú-ú] Nom. taon noir; horsefly; Bremse.
Hakilima bɛɛ ye kulu kuncɛmala dɔn fuga 1
ye. Tous les gens intelligents savent que le
Category: Insect. synonyme: npoko, lɛn
3
,
nfugu.
sommet d'une colline est une clairière inculte
(proverbe). All intelligent people know that the fugu [ú] variante: fufu, fugutigɛ. Nom. salve
2
top of a hill is an uncultivated clearing
d'honneur; salute of honour; Ehrengruß.
(proverb). Alle intelligenten Menschen
Donsow bɛ fugutigɛ la. Les chasseurs tirent
wissen, dass die Spitze eines Hügels eine
unbebaute Lichtung ist (Sprichwort).
des salves d'honneur. The hunters fire salutes.
Die Jäger feuern Salutschüsse ab.
fugakɛnɛ [ú] Jula: fugankɛnɛ. n.comp. plateau,
fugubɛfugubɛ [ú] variante: fugubefugube.
clairière latéritique, endroit plat sans
Adverbe. délicieux, en se régalant; delicious,
végétation arborée; plateau, flat place without
trees; Plateau, Hochebene, baumlose Ebene. enjoying; köstlich, genießend. Den ye sogo
Category: Land. dun fugubɛfugubɛ ! L'enfant a mangé la
fugalakɔnɔnin [ú] Nom. alouette-moineau; kind of viande en se régalant. The child ate the meat
and enjoyed it. Das Kind aß das Fleisch und
bird; Vogelart. Category: Bird. eremopterix
genoß es.
leucotis.
fugufugu Nom. soufflet; bellow; Blasebalg.
fugan [ú-á] variante: fuga. vt. tresser, par exemple 1
1
synonyme: fanwolo.
cordes fines ensemble; plait, e.g. thinner ropes
together; flechten, verflechten. ka jurukisɛ fugufugu [ú] Verbe. 1 • gaspiller, disperser; waste,
2
fugan tresser une corde. braid a rope. ein Seil disperse; verschwenden, zerstreuen. A ye wari
flechten. in bɛɛ fugufugu. Il a gaspillé tout cet argent.
fugan [ú-á] variante: fuga. Nom. plateau, clairière He wasted all that money. Er hat das ganze
2
Geld verschwendet.
latéritique, endroit plat sans végétation
arborée; plateau, flat place without trees; 2 • s'effriter, s'effilocher, se corrompre, partir
Hochebene, Hochplateau, baumlose Ebene. en poussière, pulvériser; to crumble, to fray, to
Category: Land. corrupt, to dust, to pulverize; zerfallen,
ausfransen, verderben, zu Staub zerfallen,
fugan
3
[ù-á] Nom. aluminium, étain; aluminium, tin;
pulverisieren.
Aluminium, Zinn. Fugan bɛ kɛ bololanɛgɛ
3 • ébouriffer; dishevel; zerzausen. A kunsigi
ye, a bɛ kɛ barama ye. L'aluminium, on en
fugufugura. Elle a les cheveux ébouriffés.
fait des bracelets, on en fait des marmites. We
Her hair is dishevelled. Ihr Haar ist zerzaust.
make bracelets out of aluminum, we make pots
out of it. Wir stellen Armbänder aus
Aluminium her, wir stellen Töpfe daraus her.
fugantola [ú] Nom. espèce de plante; kind of plant;
Pflanze (Art). Category: Grass, herb, vine.
kyllinga debilis / pycereus demangei.
29/01/2026 225

fugulan fulufulu
fugulan [ú] variante: fugula, banfula. Nom. fulabana [ú] variante: fulabananin, fulagan
chapeau, bonnet; hat; Hut, Mütze, Kappe. [flagwan]. Nom. anémie, avitaminose; anemia,
Baba kun jɛlen, o ye tiɲɛ ye, nka a kɛlɛn vitamin deficiency; Anämie, Vitaminmangel.
keyekeye, fugula de dɛ a kun na. Dire que Category: Disease.
papa a les cheveux blancs, d’accord, mais dire fulabin [ú] Nom. espèce d'herbe; kind of grass;
qu'il les a tout blancs, là c'est signe qu'il n'a as
Grasart. Category: Grass, herb, vine.
de bonnet sur la tête (proverbe). Saying that
microchloa indica.
dad has white hair is fine, but saying that he
has it all white is a sign that he doesn't have a fulafuru [ú] variante: furuku, furunin. Nom.
hat on his head (proverb). Zu sagen, daß Papa caillette, feuillette; abomasum; Labmagen.
weißes Haar hat, ist in Ordnung, aber zu sagen, fulafuru kɛlɛkɛlɛji du feuillet de bœuf à la
daß er alles weiß hat, ist ein Zeichen dafür, daß sauce bien pimentée. the beef slice with a
er keinen Hut auf dem Kopf hat (Sprichwort). well-seasoned sauce. Rindsstreifen mit
Category: Clothing. synonyme: banfula. scharfer Sauce. Category: Parts of an animal.
fugulanafama [ú] Nom. préservatif; condom; synonyme: furudennin.
Kondom, Pariser. synonyme: latanganan. fulakɛ Jula: fulacɛ . variante: [flakɛ]. Nom. homme
1
fuguri [ú] Verbe. 1 • gratter, griffer le sol (animaux); peul; Fulani man; Fulani Mann.
Category: Community.
scratch, claw the ground (animals); den
Boden kratzen, zerkratzen (Tiere). Tinba bɛ fulama [ú] variante: fuulama. Nom. gratuit, pour
dugu fuguri. L'oryctérope gratte le sol. The rien, en grande nombre (et donc sans grande
aardvark scratches the ground. Das Erdferkel
valeur), en pagaille; free, for nothing, in large
kratzt am Boden.
numbers (and therefore without much value),
in a mess; kostenlos, umsonst, in großer Zahl
2 • s'émietter, s'abîmer, partir en poussière, se
(und daher ohne großen Wert), in einem
détériorer; crumble, become damaged, turn to
Chaos. Fura fulama tɛ yen. Il n'y a pas des
dust, deteriorate; zerbröckeln, beschädigt
werden, zu Staub werden, verderben.
médicaments pour rien. There are no drugs for
Bananku bɛ fuguri. Le manioc s'abîme. The
nothing. Es gibt keine Medikamente umsonst.
cassava spoils. Der Maniok verdirbt.
finin fulama des tissus en pagaille. fabric in a
mess or large quantity. Stoffe in Unordnung
fugutigɛ Nom. salves en l'honneur des chasseurs
oder großen Mengen.
défunts; gunshots in honour of deceased
fulamuso Nom. femme peule, peule, poulotte; Fulani
hunters; Schüsse zu Ehren verstorbener Jäger.
woman; Fulani Frau. Category: Community.
fujeni [ú] 1 • Verbe. se fâcher, s'emporter; get angry,
fulangarinin [ú] Nom. espèce de poisson; kind of fish;
lose your temper; werde wütend, verliere die
Beherrschung. A fujeninen don ne kɔrɔ. Il
Fischart. Category: Fish. schilbe mystus.
est fâché contre moi. He is angry with me. Er fulasolo [ú-á-ó-ó] synonyme: solokujan. Nom.
ist wütend auf mich. perruche à collier; long-tailed parakeet;
2 • Verbe. être énervé, être soucieux, être de Wellensittich, Sittich. Category: Bird.
mauvais humeur; to be upset, to be worried, psittacula krameri.
to be in a bad mood; verärgert sein, sich
fulawɛrɛ Nom. village peul, campement peul; Fulani
Sorgen machen, schlechte Laune haben.
village, Fulani camp; Fulani Dorf.
3 • Nom. emportement, colère; anger; Wut. O
Category: Community.
kuma y'a fujeni. Cette parole l'a mis en
fulaya [ú-á-á] Nom. manière d'être du Peul, caractère
colère. This word made him angry. Dieses
Wort machte ihn wütend.
peul; being of the Fulani, character of a Fulani
person; das Fulani Sein, Fulani Charakter. I
fula [ú-á] Nom. peul (Peulh); Fulani person; Fulbe
miiri fulaya danbe la ! Pense à l'honneur
Person. Ni i mago bɛ fula la, i b'a sɛgɛrɛ a ka
peul ! Think of Fulani honor! Denken Sie an
wɛrɛ la. Si tua as besoin du Peul, tu vas le die Ehre der Fulani! Category: Community.
trouver dans son parc à vaches (proverbe). If
fulufɛlɛ [ú] Adverbe. très froid; very cold; sehr kalt. Ji
you need the Fulani, you will find him in his
cow pen (proverb). Wenn Sie den Fulani sumalen don fulufɛlɛ ! L'eau est très froide !
brauchen, finden Sie ihn in seinem Kuhstall The water is very cold! Das Wasser ist sehr
(Sprichwort). Category: Community. kalt! synonyme: tɔyi, tɔn 3 , tɔn tɔn, tɛtɛ 2 ,
synonyme: mibi. welewele .
2
fulufulu [ú] Nom. 1 • flamme; flame; Flamme.
1
synonyme: tamana.
29/01/2026 226

fulufulu funtenimaragazi
2 • grandes flammes de feu, ampleur prise par funfun [ṹ-ṹ] Verbe. arroser, asperger, saupoudrer,
1
le feu; large flames of fire, scale taken by the
verser; water, sprinkle, pour; bewässern,
fire; Feuerflammen, vom Feuer genommenes
spritzen, anspritzen, bestäuben, bestreuen,
Ausmaß.
gießen. synonyme: fusufusu.
3 • cendres noires au-dessus du feu; black
ashes above the fire; Schwarze Asche über funfun Verbe. flamber, passer à la flamme; to flame,
2
dem Feuer. Ni ŋunan bɔra, tasuma fulufulu pass over the flame; flambieren. Fɛn bɛɛ bɛ
bɛ yɛlɛn sanfɛ. Quand il y a un feu de brousse, funfun, n'a ye ntori jɛ. Toute chose peut être
les cendres noires s'élèvent dans les airs flambée, excepté le crapaud (proverbe).
(proverbe). When there is a bush fire, the black Anything can be flambéed, except the toad
ashes rise into the air (proverb). Bei einem (proverb). Alles kann flambiert werden, außer
Buschfeuer steigt die schwarze Asche in die die Kröte (Sprichwort).
Luft (Sprichwort).
funteni [ù-é-í] comparer: nɛnɛ. synonyme: gwaniya.
fulufulu [ú] Verbe. s'achever (pour une maladie: le
2 1 • Nom. chaleur, vapeur chaude; heat, hot
malade est encore convalescent); come to an steam; Hitze, heißer Dampf. Ni funteni ka
end (for an illness: the patient is still
bon... Si la chaleur est forte... If the heat is
convalescent); zu Ende gehen (bei einer
Krankheit: der Patient ist noch am genesen).
strong... Wenn die Hitze stark ist... funteni
Bana fulufulula. La maladie s'achève. The wagati la saison chaude. hot season. Die
illness ends. Die Krankheit endet. heisse Jahreszeit. Category: Weather.
2 • Verbe. chauffer, être chaud; to heat, to be
fuluka [ú] 1 • Verbe. courbaturer; ache; schmerzen.
hot; wärmen, heizten, heiss sein.
2 • Adverbe. tout courbaturé, ramolli; all sore, 3 • Verbe. s'emporter, s'échauffer; lose one's
limp; alles wund, schlaff. Sɛnɛ ye n fari bɛɛ temper, flare; wütend werden, die Geduld
fuluka. Cultiver m'a tout courbaturé. verlieren, sich gehen lassen und zornig
Cultivating made me sore. Die Kultivierung werden. A funtenina a kɔrɔkɛ fɛ. Il s'est
machte mich wund. emporté contre son frère aîné. He lost his
fulumɛ variante: furumɛ. Nom. marteau; hammer; temper with his older brother. Er verlor die
Beherrschung gegenüber seinem älteren
Hammer. Category: Tool. synonyme: marito,
Bruder.
gɛnnan, nɛgɛgwɛsinnan, mantaraka.
4 • Nom. calorie; calorie; Kalorie.
fumafɛn [ù-à-ɛ́] Morphemes: fu-ma-fɛn. Nom. synonyme: farikolo makoyafɛn.
produit à fibres; fiber product; Faserprodukt. funtenibakalo synonyme: avirikalo. Nom. mois de la
fun [ú] 1 • Verbe. moisir; mould, mold; schimmeln. grande chaleur, avril; month of the big heat,
A funna. C'est moisi. It's musty. Es ist muffig. April; Monat der grossen Hitze, April.
Fun wulila buru la. Le pain a moisi. The funtenibara Nom. chaudière; boiler, heater; Boiler.
bread is mouldy. Das Brot ist schimmelig.
funtenibarikakuran Nom. énergie thermique;
synonyme: bugun.
1
thermal energy, heat energy; Wärmeenergie,
2 • Nom. moisissure; mold, mould; Schimmel. thermische Energie.
funankɛ [ú] Jula: funancɛ. variante: funanke. Nom. funtenibarikakurandilanni Nom. production
jeune homme, adolescent, jeune célibataire; d’électricité par énergie thermique; thermal
young man, teenager, young single person; electricity production; thermale
junger Mann, Teenager, junge alleinstehende Stromerzeugung.
Person. An hakili funancɛninw na... Nous
funtenikalo Nom. mois de la chaleur, mars; month of
portons une grande attention aux problèmes
des jeunes... We pay great attention to the heat, March; Monat der Hitze, März.
problems of young people... Wir widmen den Category: Weather. synonyme: marisikalo.
Problemen junger Menschen große funtenikuru synonyme: gɛnɛgɛnɛ. Nom. ganglion;
Aufmerksamkeit...
lymph node; Lymphknoten, Nervenknoten,
funda [ú] variante: funtan. Verbe. se mettre en Lymphdrüse. Category: Disease.
colère; to get angry; wütend werden. A y'i funtenima [ù-è-ì-á] Nom. chaud; hot; heiss. Soo
funda n kɔrɔ. Il s'est fâché contre moi. He got
funtenima. Une maison chaude. A hot house.
mad at me. Er wurde sauer auf mich.
Ein heisses Haus.
funtenimaragazi Nom. gaz à effet de serre;
greenhouse gas; Treibhausgase.
Category: Sky.
29/01/2026 227

funteninji furaburu
funteninji Nom. fluide caloporteur; heat transfer fura [ú-á] Nom. 1 • feuille, feuillage; leaf; Blatt.
1
fluid; Wärmeträgerflüssigkeit, Fura bɛ bin ji la don min, a tɛ toli o don. Les
Wärmeübertragungsflüssigkeit. feuilles ne pourrissent pas le jour où elles
funti [ú] Verbe. sortir brusquement, se fâcher, tombent dans l'eau (proverbe). Leaves do not
rot the day they fall into water (proverb).
s'emporter; to come out abruptly, to get angry,
Blätter verfaulen nicht an dem Tag, an dem sie
to get carried away; abrupt herauskommen,
ins Wasser fallen (Sprichwort).
wütend werden, sich mitreißen lassen. A
synonyme: jiribulu, furabulu.
funtira n kɔrɔ. Il s'est emporté contre moi. He
got mad at me. Er wurde sauer auf mich.
2 • médicament, remède à base de plantes;
medicine, remedy made of plants;
funtun [ù-ú] variante: fondon. Nom. petit panier à Medikament, pflanzliches Heilmittel.
coton; small cotton basket; kleiner Baumwolle Banabagatɔ jigi ye fura ye, tiɲɛ tɛ ? L'espoir
Korb. Category: Container. du malade c'est le remède, non ? The hope of
funubali Morphemes: funu-bali. adj. sans levain; the sick is the cure, right? Die Hoffnung der
Kranken ist die Heilung, oder? Category: Treat
unleavened; ungesäuert. buru funubali pain
disease.
sans levain. unleavened bread.
3 • solution; solution; Lösung. A fura ye mun
funufunu [ú-ú-ú-ú] variante: fununfunun. Nom. ye ? Quelle est la solution ? What is the
1 • tourbillon de vent, cyclone; whirlwind, solution? Was ist die Lösung?
cyclone; Wirbelwind, Zyklon.
Category: Weather.
fura
2
[ù-á] Nom. grande fête de fin de circoncision
(ou excision); great celebration at the end of
2 • dispute, querelle; dispute, quarrel ,
circumcision (or excision); grosses Fest nach
argument, fight; Streit, Auseinandersetzung,
Zerwürfnis. U tora fununfunun na ... Ils
der Beschneidung (oder Exzision).
Category: Religion.
restèrent à se quereller ... They remained
quarreling... Sie stritten weiter... fura 3 [ù] Nom. 1 • distance, intervalle; distance,
funun [ú-ú] variante: funu. 1 • vt. gonfler, enfler; interval; Distanz, Intervall. Gawo ni Segu
fura ka jan dɛ ! Gao est très éloigné de
inflate, blow up, bloat, rise, swell;
auf-schwellen, anschwellen. A fununin lo. Ségou ! Gao is very far from Ségou! Gao ist
C'est enfle. It is swollen. Es ist geschwollen.
sehr weit von Ségou entfernt!
synonyme: nɛnfunu, nɛnbɔ. 2 • laps de temps, période; period of time,
period; Zeitraum.
2 • vt. énerver, se fâcher; annoy, upset, excite;
aufregen, nerven. cɛ fununa fura kuna variante: fura ta. Verbe. absorber; absorb;
synonyme: kumun . aufnehmen, aufsaugen.
2
3 • Nom. œdème, enflure, tumeur, abcès; fura ladege Nom. faux médicaments; fake medicines,
swelling, tumor, abscess; Schwellung, Tumor, falsified medicines, fake drugs; gefälschte
Abszess. Category: Disease. Medikamente, gefälschte Arzneimitteln.
4 • Nom. colère; anger; Wut. Dɔɔnin, a bɛ cɛci furabanin Nom. espèce de plante; kind of plant;
funun fɛ. Pour un peu, il aurait éclaté de
Pflanzenart. Category: Grass, herb, vine.
colère. He almost burst into anger. Er brach datura innoxia.
fast in Wut aus.
furabɔla [ú] synonyme: farafindɔgɔtɔrɔ.
fununbana [ú] variante: funubana. Nom. toute
variante: filabɔla . Nom. guérisseur, infirmier,
espèce d'abcès; all kinds of abscesses; alle
infirmière; healer, male nurse, nurse; Heiler,
Arten von Abszessen, Geschwür.
Medizinmann, Krankenpfleger.
Category: Disease.
Category: Worker, occupation.
fununnan Morphemes: funun-nan. synonyme: banafurakɛla.
variante: fununan. Nom. levure; yeast; furabulu [ú] Nom. feuille, feuille fraîche; leaf, fresh
Sauerteig, Hefe. synonyme: biri
6
.
leaf; Blatt, frisches Blatt. synonyme: filaburu,
fununso Morphemes: funu-so. variante: funuso. Nom. yirifuraburu, jiribulu, fura , buru .
1 3
cerf-volant; stag beetle; Hirsch-Käfer.
furaburu [ú-a-ú-ú] synonyme: buru.
Category: Insect. synonyme: sɛgɛlɛnkaman,
variante: furabulu, furabu. Nom. feuille,
nawali.
limbe; leaf, limb; Blatt. Yiri furaburu. La
feuille de l'arbre. The leaf of the tree. Das Blatt
des Baumes. Category: Parts of a plant.
29/01/2026 228

furaburu camancɛci furamugu
furaburu camancɛci synonyme: furakɔkolo. Nom. furakɛbali [ú] synonyme: banabanbali,
nervure principale, nervure centrale; midrib; nagasilibana. adj. incurable; incurable;
Mittelnerv, Mittelader. Category: Parts of a unheilbar. Category: Treat disease.
plant.
furakɛla Morphemes: furakɛ-la. Nom. infirmier,
furaburu cimisɛn Nom. nervure secondaire; veins;
infirmière, docteur, médecin, guérisseur,
Seitennerven, Seitenadern. Category: Parts of soigner; nurse, doctor, healer; Arzt,
a plant. Krankenschwester, Krankenpfleger,
furaburuju synonyme: furaku. Nom. pétiole; petiole; Medizinmann, Heiler. Category: Treat
Blattstiel. Category: Parts of a plant.
disease, Worker, occupation.
furakɛlaw Nom. personnel de santé; medical
furaburujukun Nom. gaine; sheath; Blattgrund.
personnel, health personnel; medizinisches
Category: Parts of a plant.
Personal, Gesundheitspersonal.
furaburutu Nom. feuillage; foliage, leaves; Category: Worker, occupation.
Blattwerk, Laub, Laubwerk. Category: Parts of synonyme: dɔgɔtɔrɔw.
a plant. synonyme: jirifura.
furakɛli [ú-á-ɛ́-í] Morphemes: furakɛ-li. Nom.
furaburutu tilancɛ Nom. houppier; crown of a tree, traitement, soins médicaux, désinfecter, action
treetop; Baumkrone. Category: Parts of a thérapeutique; treatment, disinfect;
plant. Behandlung, desinfizieren. Category: Treat
disease.
furabuwati Nom. trousse de secours; doctor's bag,
first aid kit; Reiseapotheke.
furakɛso Morphemes: furakɛ-so. variante: furakɛliso.
furadama [ù-à] 1 • de tout temps; at all times; zu
Nom. dispensaire, centre de soins; dispensary,
health-centre; Apotheke, Drogerie,
jeder Zeit, aller Zeiten. Silamɛw, u furadama, Krankenstation. Category: Treat disease,
u ma dɔlɔfɛn min ... Les musulmans, de Building.
tout temps, n'ont jamais bu l'alcool ... Muslims, furakɛyɔrɔ Morphemes: furakɛ-yɔrɔ.
throughout time, have never drunk alcohol...
variante: furakɛliyɔrɔ, furakɛliso. Nom.
Muslime haben im Laufe der Zeit nie Alkohol
getrunken...
dispensaire, centre de soins; dispensary,
health-centre; Krankenstation. Category: Treat
2 • depuis; since; seitdem, seit. Musa sa
disease.
furadama ... Depuis la mort de Moussa...
furakisɛ [ú-á-í-ɛ́] synonyme: pilili. Nom. comprimé,
Since Moussa's death... Seit Moussas Tod...
pilule, drogue; pill, tablet, drug; Tablette,
furafeerela Morphemes: fura-feere-la. Nom.
Pille, Arzneimittel. Category: Treat disease.
pharmacien; pharmacist, chemist;
furakuna variante: furakunan. Nom. espèce de plante;
Pharmazeut. Category: Treat disease.
kind of plant; Pflanzenart. Category: Grass,
furafeereso Morphemes: fura-feere-so. Nom.
herb, vine. chrysanthellum americanum;
pharmacie; pharmacy; Apotheke, Drogerie. mimosa pigra.
Category: Treat disease, Building.
furalan Jula: furanan. Morphemes: fura-lan.
synonyme: furamarayɔrɔ.
synonyme: siranan. variante: furannan,
furafeereyɔrɔ Morphemes: fura-feere-yɔrɔ.
siralan. Nom. balai; broom; Besen.
synonyme: furamarayɔrɔ. Nom. pharmacie; Category: Tool. schoenefeldia gracilis; sida
pharmacy; Apotheke, Drogerie. carpinifolia.
Category: Treat disease.
furamarayɔrɔ [ú] Nom. pharmacie; pharmacy,
synonyme: furamarayɔrɔ.
drugstore, dispensary; Apotheke, Drogerie.
furaji Morphemes: fura-ji. Nom. médicament Category: Treat disease, Building.
(liquide), potion; liquid medicine, potion; synonyme: furafeereyɔrɔ, furafeereso,
Zaubertrank, Sirup, flüssiges Medikament. filafeereyɔrɔ, faramansi.
Category: Treat disease.
furamugu Nom. médicament sous forme de poudre;
furakɛ [ù-à-ɛ̀] vt. soigner, traiter; treat; pflegen,
medicament in powder from; Medikament in
behandeln. Dɔkɔtɔrɔw y'a sen in furakɛ ... Pulverform.
Les médecins ont soigné son pied ... The
doctors treated his foot... Die Ärzte
behandelten seinen Fuß... Category: Treat
disease.
29/01/2026 229

furan furu
furan [ú-ã́] variante: fura. vt. 1 • balayer; sweep; furasi [ù-à-í] Nom. 1 • cérémonie de
fegen, kehren, wischen. ... i ka dukɔnɔna circoncision/excision; circumcision ceremony;
furan. ... balayer l’intérieur de la maison. ... Beschneidung-Zeremonie,
Exzision-Zeremonie. Une grande fête au
sweep the inside of the house. ... das Innere
village, qui peut durer une semaine. Garçons et
des Hauses fegen.
filles, âgés de 8 à 10 ans, sont excisées. Il y a
2 • gifler; to slap; ohrfeigen, klapsen. Ne
beaucoup à manger, et on danse la nuit. De
diminnen ye a furan a tulo kɔrɔ. Je l'ai giflé plus en plus, parents dans les villes emmènent
de colère. I slapped him in anger. Ich schlug leurs garçons à l’hôpital pour les faire
ihn wütend. circoncire. A large-scale ceremony in the
furancɛ [ù-à-ɛ́] Nom. 1 • espace entre deux choses,
village, which can last a week, where groups of
1 boys and girls are excised, typically aged 8-10.
intervalle; gap, space between two things,
There is plenty of food, and dancing continues
distance, difference, interval (time or place);
throughout the night. Parents living in the
Loch, Riss, Kluft, Lücke, Abstand, Intervall
town may take their boys to the hospital to be
(Zeit oder Ort), Distanz, Unterschied. ... o
circumcised instead.
furancɛ tɛ tɛmɛ sibiri ɲɛ kelen kan... ... la 2 • veillée avant la circoncision ou l'excision;
distance ne dépasse pas 25 cm ... ... the gathering before circumcision or excision;
distance does not exceed 25 cm ... ... der Abendveranstaltung vor der Beschneidung
Abstand 25 cm nicht überschreitet ... oder Exzision.
Category: Mathematics.
furatu Nom. bosquet, buisson; grove, bush, shrub; ;
2 • parcours, milieu; middle; Mitte.
Gehölz, Hain, Hecke, Busch, Strauch.
3 • coin; corner; Ecke. U bɛ taa u dogo bɔlɔn
Category: Bush, shrub. synonyme: jiritu.
furancɛw la. Ils vont se cacher dans les coins
de rues. They will hide on street corners. Sie
fure [ù] Nom. 1 • défunt, cadavre, mort; deceased,
werden sich an Straßenecken verstecken. corpse, death; Verstorbener, Leiche, Toter.
Fɛn o fɛn tun ka surun fure la... Tous ceux
furancɛ Nom. cloison; septum; Nasenscheidewand.
2
qui étaient des proches du défunt ... All those
Category: Body.
who were close to the deceased... Alle, die
furancɛbilanan Nom. barre d'espacement; spacer dem Verstorbenen nahe standen...
bar, space-bar; Leertaste. 2 • revenant, fantôme, mânes; ghost, manes;
furancɛta synonyme: jatimisɛn. variante: furancɛda.
Geist, Totenerscheinung. Category: Religion.
Nom. intermédiaire; go-between, middleman; furofugo Nom. arbre (espèce); tree sp; Baumart,
Vermittler, Mittelsmann. Sodomapfel. Category: Bush, shrub.
synonyme: cɛtagamabaga. calotropis procera.
furannandenin Nom. balai à poignée; traditional furu 1 [ú-ú] 1 • Nom. mariage; marriage; Heirat. furu
broom; Handbesen. Category: Tool. se marier (le sujet du verbe est l’homme). get
married (subject of verb is the man). heiraten.
furanni comparer: fura. Morphemes: furan-ni.
N dɔgɔcɛ ma furu fɔlɔ. Mon frère n’a pas
variante: furannin. Nom. balayage; sweeping; encore marié. My brother is not married yet.
das Kehren, das Fegen. Mein Bruder ist noch nicht verheiratet. furu
furasansɛbɛ Morphemes: fura-san-sɛbɛ. Nom. sariyasun code du mariage. marriage code.
ordonnance; prescription; Arztrezept. das Heiratsgesetz.
Category: Treat disease. 2 • vt. se marier, épouser, donner en mariage;
marry; heiraten. X ye Y furu. X (homme) s’est
marié avec Y (femme). X (man) married Y
(woman). Cɛw bi muso furu k’u sii to san 18
na. Les hommes se marient à l’âge de 18 ans.
Men marry at the age of 18.
furu [ù-ú] Nom. panse, estomac, estomac des
2
animaux (vache, mouton, chèvre...); rumen,
first stomach, stomach, stomach of an animal;
Pansen, Magen von Tieren. Category: Body,
Parts of an animal.
29/01/2026 230

furu furujatigi
furu [ú] Verbe. projeter un liquide par la bouche, 2 • conjoint; spouse; Ehepartner. ... bi, furu
3
asperger; project a liquid through the mouth, donni bɛ furuden fila dɔrɔn bolo. ... de nos
sprinkle; Eine Flüssigkeit durch den Mund jours, le mariage ne dépend que des deux seuls
spritzen, versprühen. Ala ka ji k'án da don o conjoints. ...nowadays, marriage depends only
don, n'án bɛ a furu kɛlɛ kan. Que Dieu nous
on the two spouses. ...heutzutage hängt die Ehe
nur noch von den beiden Ehegatten ab.
donne chaque jour assez d'eau dans la bouche
pour en asperger la guerre. May God give us furudennin [ù-ù-è-í] variante: furuku, furunin.
enough water in our mouths every day to Nom. bonnet, feuillette du ruminant, caillette;
sprinkle the war with it. Möge Gott uns jeden reticulum, rennet bag, omasum; Netzmagen,
Tag genug Wasser in den Mund geben, um den Blättermagen. Category: Parts of an animal.
Krieg damit zu bespritzen. synonyme: nuguba , fulafuru.
1
furu ni nuguden furancɛ Nom. duodénum; furudimin [ù-ù] Jula: furudimi. Nom. gastrite,
duodenum; Zwölffingerdarm. Category: Body.
ulcère d'estomac; gastritis, stomach ulcer;
furu tana [ú-á à-á] Nom. contre-indication, effets Gastritis, Magengeschwür. Category: Disease.
secondaires; contraindication, side-effects; furufara [ù-ú-à-á] Morphemes: furu-fara. Verbe.
Gegenanzeige, Kontraindikation,
1 • nuire, se déchirer; to harm, ; schaden,
Nebenwirkungen. Category: Disease.
beeinträchtigen, ausreißen, zerreißen.
furuba [ù-ù-á] Nom. panse; paunch; Pansen. 2 • difficulté, tension, souffrance; difficulty,
Category: Parts of an animal. tension, suffering; Schwierigkeiten,
Spannungen, Leiden. Furu ye ti.nɛ, nka
furubaliya Morphemes: furu-bali-ya. Nom. célibat;
furufara, ne t'o la. Mariage, d'accord ! Mais
celibacy, single-hood, bachelorhood; Zölibat,
Ehelosigkeit. Furu kolonnin ka fisa
des tensions continuelles entre les belles
familles, pas pour moi ! Marriage, okay! But
furubaliya ye. Mieux vaut un mauvais
continual tensions between in-laws, not for
mariage que pas de mariage du tout (proverbe).
me! Heirat, okay! Aber ständige Spannungen
A bad marriage is better than no marriage at zwischen den Schwiegereltern sind nichts für
all (proverb). Eine schlechte Ehe ist besser als mich!
gar keine Ehe (Sprichwort). synonyme: ganaya.
furufɛn [ú] comparer: furunafolo. Nom. dot; dowry,
furuboloma [ú] Nom. intermédiaire pour le mariage,
bride price; Brautpreis, Mitgift, Aussteuer.
entremetteur, marieur; marriage intermediary, Furufɛn dira ka ban. La dot a déjà été donnée.
matchmaker; Heiratsvermittler, Ehestifter. Ni The dowry has already been given. Die Mitgift
muso tiɲɛna, o tɛ furuboloma nɔ ye. Si la wurde bereits gegeben. synonyme: furunafolo.
femme a mal tourné, ce n'est pas la faute du
furufuru variante: furu. Nom. galette ou beignet (de
marieur (proverbe). If the wife has gone bad, it 1
is not the matchmaker's fault (proverb). Wenn
mil, de haricots); small fried cake, savoury or
sweet, often sold in the market; Hirse
es der Frau schlecht herauskommt, ist es nicht
die Schuld des Heiratsvermittlers Küchlein. Category: Food. synonyme: furumɛ.
(Sprichwort). synonyme: furusentigi. furufuru [ù-ù] Verbe. 1 • être en ébullition, bouillir; to
2
furuburuda Nom. bord (de feuille); margin of leaf; be boiling, to boil; kochen. Ji furufurula.
Blattrand. Category: Parts of a plant. L'eau est en ébullition. The water is boiling.
Das Wasser kocht.
furuburuju tulo Nom. stipule; stipule; Stipel,
2 • fermenter; ferment, brew; fermentieren,
Nebenblatt. Category: Parts of a plant.
gären. Dɔlɔ bɛ furufuru. La bière de mil
furuburununkun Nom. pointe (de feuille); apex (of pétille en fermentant. Millet beer fizzes as it
leaf); Blattspitze. ferments. Bier sprudelt während der Gärung.
furucɛ [ú-ú-ɛ́] Morphemes: furu-cɛ. furufuru Verbe. asperger; sprinkle, squirt, spray;
3
variante: furukɛ. Nom. mari, époux; husband; streuen. ... ka ji furufuru so kɛrɛfɛlaw la ... ...
Ehemann, Mann. asperger d'eau les abords de la maison ...
furuden [ú-ú-é] Nom. 1 • enfant légitime; legitimate
...sprinkle water around the house... ...um
das Haus herum mit Wasser besprengen...
child; eheliches Kind. synonyme: halaladen.
furujatigi [ú] Nom. 1 • intermédiaire du mariage;
marriage broker; Heiratsvermittler.
29/01/2026 231

furuku furusanin
2 • personne à qui est confiée la nouvelle furunin Morphemes: furu-nin. mariée (femme);
épouse, une fois le mariage accompli; person
married (woman); verheiratet (Frau). Awa
to whom the new wife is entrusted, once the
marriage is complete; Person, der nach furunin lo. Awa est mariée. Awa is married.
Vollendung der Ehe die neue Ehefrau Awa ist verheiratet. N dɔgɔmuso furunin tɛ
anvertraut wird. fɔlɔ. Ma sœur n’est pas encore mariée. My
furuku [ù-ù-ú] variante: furukufuruku. Verbe. sister is not married yet. Meine Schwester ist
1
noch nicht verheiratet.
1 • se fâcher, se mettre en colère; get angry
with, upset; sich ärgern, auf die Palme gehen. furuno Emprunt de : français. Nom. fourneau
A y'i furuku n kɔrɔ. Il s'est fâché contre moi. malgache; stove; Ofen. Category: Household
He got angry with me. Er wurde wütend auf equipment.
mich.
furuɲabila Nom. les démarcheurs pour un mariage;
2 • être triste, abattu; to be sad, discouraged;
steps to take for a marriage arrangement;
traurig sein, niedergeschlagen sein. Joliba
Hochzeitsvorbereitungen, das Vorgehen um
mana i furuku, bɛɛ y'i furuku. Quand le zu heiraten.
Djoliba est triste, tout le mande est triste. When
furuɲɛbila n.comp. facilitateur en mariage; facilitator
Djoliba is sad, everyone is sad. Wenn Djoliba
traurig ist, sind alle traurig. for weddings; Vermittler für Hochzeiten.
furuku [ù-ù] Nom. 1 • autre côté, face, envers; other furuɲɔgɔn [ú] Nom. 1 • conjoint; spouse; Ehepartner.
2
side, face, reverse; andere Seite, Gesicht, 2 • allié (par le mariage); ally (by marriage);
Rückseite. ka dɔlɔki furuku yɛlɛma. Verbündeter (durch Heirat).
retourner un vêtement. return an item of furuɲɔgɔn cɛman Nom. conjoint; spouse; Ehegatte,
clothing inside-out. ein Kleidungsstück
Ehemann, Gatte.
umkehren. synonyme: ferekete.
furuɲɔgɔn musoman [ù-ù-ɔ́-ɔ ́ ù-ó-ã]́ Nom.
2 • bon ou mauvais côté (d'un sac, d'un
conjointe; spouse; Ehefrau, Gattin.
vêtement, des intestins); good or bad side (of a
bag, clothing, intestines); gute oder schlechte furuɲɔgɔnma Nom. conjoint, personnes qui peuvent
Seite (einer Tasche, Kleidung, Eingeweide).
se marier l'une avec l'autre; spouse, persons
furulaada [ú] Nom. dépenses du mariage (en argent et who can marry each other; Ehegatte,
Personen, die einander heiraten können.
en biens : chèvres, grain ...); wedding expenses
(in money and goods: goats, grain, etc.); fururu [ú] Adverbe. longtemps, un long moment; a
Hochzeitskosten (in Geld und Gütern: Ziegen,
long time; eine lange Zeit. U ni donsokɛ tora
Getreide usw.)
ɲɔgɔn fɛ fururu ... Elles restèrent ainsi avec le
furumɛ [ù-ù] Nom. galette; pancake; Pfannkuchen.
chasseur très longtemps ... They stayed like
Category: Types of food. synonyme: ŋɔmi , this with the hunter for a very long time... So
1
furufuru, takula. blieben sie sehr lange beim Jäger...
1
furumuso [ú] Morphemes: furu-muso. furusa [ú-ú-á] synonyme: furuwuli. 1 • Nom.
synonyme: muso. Nom. épouse; wife; Ehefrau,
divorce, répudiation; divorce, repudiation;
Ehescheidung, Scheidung, Trennung,
Frau. Cɛ tɛ hɔrɔnya n'a furumuso tɛ.
Verstossung des Ehegatten. Mɔgɔ sɛbɛ ka ci
L'homme sans épouse n'a pas de dignité
tɛ furusa ye. Le divorce, ce n'est pas un bonne
(proverbe). A man without a wife has no
dignity (proverb). Ein Mann ohne Frau hat
action pour un homme sérieux. Divorce is not
keine Würde (Sprichwort). Category: Person.
a good action for a serious man. Für einen
ernsthaften Mann ist eine Scheidung keine
furunafolo [ú] comparer: furufɛn. gute Tat. synonyme: furuwuli.
Morphemes: furu-nafolo. Nom. dot; dowry,
2 • Verbe. divorcer, répudier, rompre le
bride price; Brautpreis, Mitgift. A denmuso mariage; to divorce, repudiate; sich scheiden
furunafolo ... La dot de sa fille ... His lassen, jemanden verstossen. Ne tɛ n muso
daughter's dowry... Die Mitgift seiner furusa. Je ne répudierai pas ma femme. I will
Tochter... synonyme: furufɛn. not divorce my wife. Ich werde mich nicht von
furunafolo di synonyme: fɛɛn di. expr. doter; give the
meiner Frau scheiden lassen.
dowry; den Brautpreis geben. furusanin [ú] Morphemes: furu-sa-nin. adj.
divorcé; divorced; geschieden. Ali furusanin
lo. Ali est divorcé. Ali is divorced. Ali ist
geschieden.
29/01/2026 232

furusaratisɛbɛ fuu
furusaratisɛbɛ [ú] Nom. contrat de mariage; fuse [ú] variante: fure. Nom. bicolore (pour un
marriage contract; Heiratsvertrag. animal); two-tone (for an animal); zweifarbig
furusasɛbɛ [ú] Morphemes: furu-sa-sɛbɛ. Nom. (für ein Tier). Ba kɛrɛ jɛ den ye fuse ye. Le
petit d'une chèvre aux flancs blancs est aussi
certificat de divorce; divorce certificate;
bicolore (proverbe). The baby of a white-sided
Scheidungsurkunde.
goat is also tow-coloured (proverb). Das Baby
furusentigi [ú] Morphemes: furu-sen-tigi. Nom. einer weiß-seitigen Ziege ist ebenfalls
intermédiaire de mariage, entremetteur pour zweifarbig (Sprichwort).
un mariage; marriage intermediary; fusufusu [ú] variante: fusunfusun. vt. arroser,
Heiratsvermittler. synonyme: furuboloma.
asperger; sprinkle, water, spray with; gießen,
furusɛbɛ Morphemes: furu-sɛbɛ. Nom. acte de begießen, bewässern, anspritzen. N bi taga ji
mariage; marriage certificate; fusufusu n ka nakɔ la. Je vais arroser mon
Heiratsurkunde. jardin. I am going to water my garden. Ich
furusɛti [ù-ù-ɛ́-í] Emprunt de : français. Nom. gehe meine Garten giessen. Sufɛ, sanji dɔɔnin
fourchette; fork; Gabel. Category: Tool. fusufusula. Pendant la nuit, on a eu quelques
gouttes de pluie. Yesterday night, there was a
furusiratagama n.comp. démarcheur de mariage;
sprinkling of rain. Gestern Nacht hatte es ein
matchmaker; Heiratsvermittler. paar Regentropfen. synonyme: funfun.
1
furusiri comparer: kɔɲɔ. Morphemes: furu-sìri.
fusufusunin [ú] Nom. 1 • petite bruine fine; light
1 • Nom. cérémonie de mariage; wedding;
drizzle; leichter Nieselregen. Category: Water,
Heirat, Hochzeit, Hochzeitsfest. N tagara
Weather.
furusiri la. Je suis allé à un mariage. I went to
2 • menue monnaie, argent de poche; small
a wedding. Ich ging an eine Hochzeitsfest. change, pocket money; Kleingeld,
2 • Verbe. épouser, marier, donner (une femme) Taschengeld. Hali fusufusunin tɛ n bolo. Je
en mariage; to marry; heiraten. n'ai même pas de menue monnaie. I don't even
furusiriworo n.comp. cola pour célébrer le mariage have any loose change. Ich habe nicht einmal
Kleingeld. Category: Finance.
religieux; cola-nut for celebrating a wedding;
Kolanuss um für die Heiratsfeier. fusuku [ú] Nom. petit cadeau, petite partie de quelque
1
furuso [ú] Nom. domicile conjugal; marital home; chose donné en cadeau; small gift, small part
of something given as a gift; kleines Geschenk,
eheliches Zuhause. ... a banna ka to furuso
kleiner Teil von etwas, das geschenkt wird.
la. ... elle refusa de rester au domicile
warifusuku petit cadeau d'argent. small gift of
conjugal. ...she refused to stay at the marital
money. kleines Geldgeschenk. fusukunin
home. ...sie weigerte sich, im Eheheim zu
argent liquide. cash. Bargeld.
bleiben. synonyme: cɛla , cɛlasigi.
1
fusuku [ú] variante: fɛsɛkɛ. Verbe. 1 • détruire,
furutaama [ú] Jula: furutagama. Nom. démarches 2
gaspiller, dilapider; destroy, waste, squander;
pour l'arrangement d'un mariage; steps to
zerstören, verschwenden. Dɔw bɛ kɔɔriden
arrange a wedding; Etappen, um eine Heirat
zu organisieren.
geren ɲimi k'o fusuku. Certains vers
détruisent les fruits du coton avant maturité.
furututu [ú] Verbe. 1 • bien haut (parler), «sur tous les
Some worms destroy cotton fruits before
toits» clamer; very loud (speak), “on all the maturity. Einige Würmer zerstören
rooftops” proclaim; sehr laut (sprechen), „auf Baumwollfrüchte vor der Reife.
allen Dächern“ verkünden. ... ne b'o fɔ 2 • faner, plisser; fade, wrinkle; verblassen,
furututu ! ... je le clamerai bien haut ! ...I will falten, verschrumpeln.
proclaim it loudly! ...ich werde es laut 3 • chiffonner, triturer, salir, déchiqueter;
verkünden! crumple, crush, dirty, shred; zerknittern,
2 • longuement; at length, long time; zerdrücken, schmutzig machen, zerfetzen,
ausführlich, lange Zeit. Faatu y'i jɔ k'u lajɛ verschmutzen.
furututu. Fatou s'arrêta et les regarda futaana [ú] Nom. le Très-Haut (titre donné à Dieu); the
longuement. Fatou stopped and looked at them Most High (title given to God); der
for a long time. Fatou blieb stehen und sah sie Allerhöchste (Gott verliehener Titel).
lange an. Category: Religion.
furuwuli Verbe. divorce; divorce; Scheidung, fuu [ùú] Nom. éponge, filet (pour se laver); sponge,
1
Ehescheidung, Trennung. synonyme: furusa. net (for washing); Schwamm, Netz (um sich
zu waschen). Category: Tool.
29/01/2026 233

fuu fyɛ
fuu [ùú] Nom. 1 • fibre; fiber; Faser, Ballaststoff. fyeku [é] Verbe. 1 • éviter; avoid; vermeiden. ka
2 1
2 • éponge végétale; kind of sponge of a plant; faamaw ka sira fyeku. éviter la route où sont
Schwamm von einer Pflanze. Category: Grass, postés les policiers. avoid the road where the
herb, vine. luffa aegyptiaca. police are stationed. Vermeiden Sie die
fuyan [ú] Nom. 1 • personne paresseuse; lazy person;
Straße, auf der die Polizei stationiert ist.
fauler Mensch.
2 • bifurquer; bifurcate, branch off;
verzweigen. A tora a ka diinɛ la, a ma deli ka
2 • bon à rien, traîne-savate; good for nothing,
dragging your shoes. synonyme: baarabali,
fyeku. Il est demeuré fidèle à sa religion, il n'a
jamais bifurqué. He remained faithful to his
nantan , bannyɛrɛye, fagonbagatɔ, fugari,
1 religion, he never wavered. Er blieb seiner
fɛnkɛbali.
Religion treu, er ist nie abgewichen.
fuyanya [ú] Nom. paresse, oisiveté; laziness, idleness; fyeku [é] Verbe. agiter, remuer, faire tourner,
2
Faulheit, Müßiggang. tournoyer (un fouet...); shake, stir, swirl, twirl
fwa [á] Adverbe. 1 • très blanc, immaculé, délavé; (a whisk...), twist; schütteln, rühren, wirbeln,
drehen (ein Schneebesen...) Janfajuru fyeku
very white, immaculate, faded; sehr weiß,
makellos, verblaßt. Kɔɔri in jɛlen fwa ! Ce kojugu bɛ bila i yɛrɛ kan na. A trop faire
coton est très blanc ! This cotton is very white!
tournoyer la corde de la trahison,on finit par se
Diese Baumwolle ist sehr weiß! synonyme: po.
la mettre autour du cou (proverbe). If you twist
3
the rope of betrayal too much, you end up
2 • très rouge; very red; sehr rot. A ɲɛkisɛ bɛ putting it around your neck (proverb). Wenn
bilen, k'o bilen fwa ! Elle a les yeux qui man den Strick des Verrats zu sehr verdreht,
deviennent rouges, très rouges ! Her eyes are hängt man ihn sich am Ende um den Hals
turning red, very red! Ihre Augen werden rot, (Sprichwort).
sehr rot!
fyelu Verbe. voler bas, en rase-mottes; fly low; tief
fwan [á] Adverbe. bruit de déchirure; tearing noise; fliegen. Kɔnɔninw y'u fyelu duguda fɛ ka
reißendes Geräusch. A den ye a ka gafe taa. Les oiseaux volent en rase-motte. The
furaw fara fwan ! Son enfant a déchiré les birds fly low. Die Vögel fliegen tief.
pages de son livre. Her child tore the pages of
fyɛ [ɛ̀] Nom. 1 • étendue, superficie, surface, place;
her book. Ihr Kind zerriß die Seiten ihres
1
Buches.
extent, surface, area, place; Ausdehnung,
Fläche, Gebiet, Ort. Mali ye jamana ye, min
fwawu [á] variante: fwanwu. Adverbe. soudainement
fyɛ ka bon fo ka taa a fɔ. Le Mali est un pays
(retirer entièrement, rafler, prendre
dont la superficie est extrêmement grande.
violemment); suddenly (withdraw entirely,
Mali is a country with an extremely large
snatch, take violently); plötzlich (ganz
surface area. Mali ist ein Land mit einer
zurückziehen, schnappen, gewaltsam
extrem großen Fläche.
ergreifen). Sɛgɛ ye syɛden ta fwawu !
2 • largeur; width; Breite. Sira fyɛ ye mɛtiri
L'épervier a raflé le poussin. The hawk
snatched up the chick. Der Falke schnappte
tan ye. La largeur de la route est de 10 m. The
sich das Küken. width of the road is 10 m. Die Breite der Straße
beträgt 10 m. synonyme: jɔsurun.
fye [é] Nom. bile, fiel, vésicule biliaire; bile, gall,
gallbladder; Galle, Gallenblase. ba fye de la
fyɛ
2
[ɛ́] Jula: fiyɛ. Verbe. 1 • souffler, jouer (d'un
bile de chèvre. goat bile. Ziegengalle. instrument dans lequel on souffle), siffler; to
Category: Body, Parts of an animal. blow, to play (an instrument into which one
synonyme: kaliyakuru, nkunankunanji.
blows), to whistle; blasen, puste, spielen (ein
Instrument, in das man bläst), pfeifen. A' ye
fyefye [é] variante: fyenfyen. Verbe. 1 • affoler,
hɔn ka a fyɛ ... Tenez, prenez-la et soufflez
paniquer, mettre en déroute, effrayer; panic,
dessus ... Here, take it and blow on it... Hier,
rout, frighten; in Panik versetzen, in die Flucht
nimm es und puste drauf... synonyme: fyɛfyɛ.
schlagen, erschrecken. A ka baganw
2 • attiser; fan; anfachen. tafyɛnan éventail
fyefyelen don. Ses bêtes sont affolées. His
pour attiser le feu. a fan to fan the fire. Fächer,
animals are panicked. Seine Tiere geraten in
um das Feuer anzufachen.
Panik. synonyme: jasiran.
2 • désemparer; distraught; verstört.
29/01/2026 234

fyɛ gaalamugu
3 • gonfler (d'air); inflate (with air); aufblasen fyɛ [ɛ́] Nom. calebasse; calabash; Kalebasse.
4
(mit Luft), aufpumpen. ... nɛgɛso dɔ
Category: Container. synonyme: fiyɛ .
2
fiɲɛdonnan kɛ k'u fyɛ. ... utiliser une pompe à
vélo pour les gonfler d'air. ...use a bicycle
fyɛfyɛ [ɛ́] Verbe. vaporiser, pulvériser; spray; sprühen,
pump to inflate them with air. ...benutze eine versprühen. A ye parfɛn in fyɛfyɛ sokɔnɔna
Fahrradpumpe, um sie mit Luft aufzupumpen. fan bɛɛ la ... Elle a vaporisé de ce parfum dans
4 • vanner; winnow; worfeln (Korn). ka ɲɔ fyɛ toute la chambre. She sprayed this perfume all
ni lɛfɛ ye vanner du mil. winnowing millet. die over the room. Sie versprühte dieses Parfüm
Hirse worfeln. im ganzen Raum. synonyme: fyɛ 2 .
5 • vaporiser, pulvériser; spray; sprühen, fyɛkan [ɛ́] Nom. souffle, halètement; breath, panting;
besprühen. Kɔɔri fyɛtuma sera. C'est le
Atem, Keuchen. ... a fyɛkan goyara ... ... son
moment de pulvériser le coton. It's time to
souffle est devenu rauque ... ...his breathing
spray the cotton. Es ist Zeit, die Baumwolle zu
became harsh... ...sein Atem wurde schwer...
besprühen.
6 • purger; purge; säubern, Einlauf machen. ka
fyɛrufyɛru [ɛ́] Adverbe. peu à peu, par petites
denmisɛnnin fyɛ purger un enfant. purge a
quantités; little by little, in small quantities;
nach und nach, in kleinen Mengen. Fyɛrufyɛru
child. einem Kind einen Darmeinlauf machen.
tɛ tɔ to seriba la. A force de prendre par
fyɛ [ɛ]́ Verbe. fondre sur; swoop; sich stürzen auf.
3 petites quantités, on ne laisse rien dans la
Sɛgɛ y'i fyɛ syɛden kan. L'épervier a fondu grande calebasse de bouillie (proverbe). By
sur le poussin. The hawk swooped down on the taking small quantities, we leave nothing in the
chick. Der Falke stürzte sich auf das Küken. large gourd of porridge (proverb). Durch die
Einnahme kleiner Mengen bleibt nichts in der
großen Brei Schüssel übrig (Sprichwort).
G - g
ga [à] Nom. chenal (d'une rivière); channel (of a ga [á] Jula: gwaa. Nom. 1 • hangar; shed,
1 3
river); Kanal (eines Flusses). Ni i bɛ to ba la, i hangar; Unterstand, Schuppen. U b'u ni saha
ka to ga la. Soi tu te noies dans le fleuve, ga kɔrɔ. Ils se reposent sous le hangar. They
moie-toi dans le chenal (proverbe). You drown are resting under the shed. Sie ruhen unter
in the river, you drown in the channel dem Schuppen. Category: Building.
(proverb). Du ertrinkst im Fluß, du ertrinkst im synonyme: gwaa .
2
Kanal (Sprichwort).
2 • véranda, auvent, appendis, abri; veranda,
ga [à] Jula: gwaa. Nom. 1 • famille, lignage; awning, outbuildings, shelter; Veranda,
2
family, lineage; Familie, Abstammung. An bɛ
Markise, Nebengebäude, Unterstand.
ga kelen na. Nous sommes de la même gaala 1 [á] Jula: gwaala. Nom. 1 • huître, chaux
famille. We are from the same family. Wir obtenue par calcination des huître; oyster, lime
stammen aus derselben Familie. obtained by calcination of oysters; Auster,
Category: Kinship. synonyme: gwaa . durch Kalzinierung von Austern gewonnener
1
Kalk. synonyme: kaabɔ, witiri, gwaala.
2 • ensemble de gens rattachés au même
ancêtre fondateur; set of people linked to the 2 • talc obtenu à partir de coquillage; talc
same founding ancestor; Gruppe von obtained from shellfish; aus Schalentieren
Personen, die mit demselben gewonnener Talk.
Gründungsvorfahren verbunden sind. 3 • craie, calcaire; chalk, limestone; Kreide,
3 • cuisine, foyer, feu; kitchen, hearth, fire; Kalkstein. gaalaɲɛma craie de couleur.
Küche, Herd, Feuer. Jɛgɛ binna a ka ɲari wo coloured chalk. farbige Kreide.
fɛ ga kɔnɔ. Le poisson est tombé dans le foyer synonyme: lakɛrɛ, kabasu, farasu.
par les trous de la grille à fumer. The fish fell
gaala [á] variante: [gwaala]. Nom. disette, famine;
into the fire hearth through the holes in the 2
smoking grate. Der Fisch fiel durch die Löcher
scarcity, famine; Lebensmittelknappheit,
im Räucherrost in den Feuerraum.
Hungersnot. Category: Food.
gaalamugu [á] Morphemes: gaala-mugu. Nom.
chaux, craie en poudre; lime, powdered chalk;
Kalk, Kreidepulver.
29/01/2026 235

gaan gadonmuso
gaan [ã]́ bambara: gan. variante: gwaan, gan. gada [à] Nom. servante, captive qui s'occupe des
1 1
Nom. gombo; okra; Okra. Category: Food. travaux domestiques, cuisinière; servant,
synonyme: gan, dagan. captive who takes care of domestic work, cook;
6
Dienerin, Gefangene, die sich um die
gaan
2
[á] Adverbe. bruit sec, sonore et violent; sharp,
Hausarbeit kümmert, Köchin.
sonorous and violent noise; scharfer, sonorer synonyme: gwadonla.
und heftiger Lärm. A ye nɛgɛkuru gosi gaan !
Il a frappé le morceau de métal, bang ! He hit
gada
2
[à] Morphemes: ga-da. Nom. cuisine; kitchen;
the piece of metal, bang! Er hat das Stück Küche. synonyme: gaso 3 , gabugu, tobili,
Metall getroffen, peng! gwada.
gaari 1 [à-í] Nom. couscous séché de manioc, plat à gada 3 [á] variante: gana. Nom. traverse de la
base de semoule de manioc; dry manioc pirogue qui sert de siège; crosspiece of the
couscous; trockener Maniok Couscous. canoe which serves as a seat; Querträger des
Category: Food. Kanus, der als Sitz dient.
gaari 2 [á-í] variante: gwaari, gwari. Nom. fil, fil à gadawu [á] Adverbe. prestement, par surprise, à
coudre ou à tisser; string, thread; Faden, l'improviste, d'un seul coup; quickly, by
Schnur. Kalaligaari fil à coudre. sewing surprise, unexpectedly, suddenly; schnell,
thread. Nähgarn. gesedagaari fil à tisser. überraschend, unerwartet, plötzlich. A bolila
weaving thread. Webfaden. gadawu. Il est parti prestement. He left
gaari Emprunt de : français. Nom. gare; station; quickly. Er ging schnell weg.
3
Busbahnhof, Autobahnhof, Bahnhof. gaden [à] variante: [gwaden]. Nom. commensal,
Category: Travel. membre de la famille (partageant le même
gaban [à] Emprunt de : arabe. Nom. 1 • chapeau repas); table companion, member of the family
(sharing the same meal); Familienmitglied
conique en paille, en feuilles de rônier; conical
(das die gleiche Mahlzeit teilt). An ye gaden
straw hat, made of palm tree leaves; Konischer
Strohhut aus Palmenblättern. kelen ye. Nous sommes du même foyer. We
synonyme: gabandennin. are from the same household. Wir stammen
aus demselben Haushalt.
2 • idiot, imbécile, sot, bêta; idiot, imbecile,
fool, stupid; Idiot, Dummkopf. ... e bɛ kɛ gadɛmɛ [à] Jula: gwadɛmɛ. Nom. nourriture,
gaban dɔ ye. ... tu es pris pour un idiot. ...you subsistance; food, sustenance, livelihood;
are taken for an idiot. ...man hält dich für Nahrung, Lebensgrundlage, Lebensunterhalt.
einen Idioten. Gadɛmɛ, i bɛ min kɛ k'i balo. La subsistance,
gabandennin Nom. chapeau de paille; straw hat;
c'est ce qui sert pour vivre. Subsistence is what
is used to live. Der Lebensunterhalt ist das,
Strohhut. Category: Clothing.
was zum Leben dient. synonyme: gwadɛmɛ.
synonyme: gaban.
gadi [à] Nom. copain, copine (populaire); boyfriend,
gabigabi [á] variante: gobogobo. Adverbe. large et
girlfriend (popular); Freund, Freundin
plat; wide and flat; breit und flach. A ka
(beliebt). N ka gadi fa ... Le père de ma
sirafura bɛ gabigabi ! Ses feuilles de tabac
copine ... My girlfriend's father... Der Vater
sont larges et plates ! Its tobacco leaves are meiner Freundin...
wide and flat! Seine Tabakblätter sind breit
und flach!
gadonkalan [à-ò] Morphemes: ga-don-kalan.
Nom. enseignement ménager; housekeeping
Gabɔn Nom. Gabon; Gabon; Gabun.
teaching; Hauswirtschaft Lehre.
Category: Country. Category: Teach.
gabugu [à] Nom. cuisine; kitchen; Küche. Gabugu ka gadonmuso [à-ò] Jula: gwadonmuso.
kɔrɔ misiri ye. La cuisine est antérieur à la Morphemes: ga-do-nmuso. Nom. ménagère,
mosquée (proverbe). The kitchen is before the cuisinière, femme au foyer; housewife, cook;
mosque (proverb). Die Küche ist vor der Hausfrau, Köchin. synonyme: gwadonmuso,
Moschee (Sprichwort). Category: Building.
gadonna.
synonyme: gada , gwada, tobili, gaso ,
2 3
gwabugu.
29/01/2026 236

gadonna gala
gadonna [à] Jula: gwadonla. gafo [à] variante: gafu. Verbe. 1 • retirer
Morphemes: ga-don-na. Nom. cuisinière; brusquement, enlever; remove abruptly,
cook; Köchin. Gadonna bololandi, mɔgɔ b'a remove; abrupt entfernen, entfernen.
fo. On complimente la bonne cuisinière 2 • arracher, renverser avec violence; tear off,
overthrow with violence; abreißen, umwerfen.
(proverbe). We compliment the good cook
(proverb). Wir loben die gute Köchin
Misi ye juru gafo fo ka a tigɛ. La vache a tiré
(Sprichwort). synonyme: gwadonla,
sur la corde et l'a rompue. The cow pulled on
the rope and broke it. Die Kuh zog am Seil und
gadonmuso.
zerriss es.
gadumandonna
gafu [à] variante: gafa. Nom. lunettes ordinaires;
[à-ù-à-ò] Morphemes: ga-duman-don-na.
ordinary glasses; gewöhnliche Brille.
Nom. bonne cuisinière; good cook; gute
gajaba [à-à-á] Nom. gros mil, variété de sorgho
Köchin. Muso gadumandonna den tɛ bin. 1
rouge; kind of red sorghum; rote Sorghum Art.
La femme qui est une bonne cuisinière a un
enfant qui réussit (proverbe). The woman who
Category: Grass, herb, vine. Sorghum
guineense.
is a good cook has a successful child
(proverb). Die Frau, die eine gute Köchin ist, gajaba [á] Verbe. brusquer, déranger, secouer; abrupt,
2
hat ein erfolgreiches Kind (Sprichwort). disturb, shake; abrupt, stören, erschüttern,
gafe comparer: livuru, liburu.[á-é] Nom. livre, schütteln. Taa dɔɔnidɔɔni, kana án gajaba !
brochure, cahier, livret; book, booklet, Va doucement, ne nous brusque pas ! Go
magazine; Buch, Heft, Broschüre. slowly, don't rush us! Gehen Sie langsam,
kalanjɛgafe livre de lecture. reading book. hetzen Sie uns nicht!
Lesebuch. Category: Learn. synonyme: liburu. gajagi [á] Adverbe. 1 • fort, costaud; strong, sturdy;
gafedilanyɔrɔ Etym: gáfédílã́yɔ́rɔ́ɔ̀. stark, robust. Karisa bɛ gajagi ! Untel est
costaud ! So-and-so is tough! So und so ist
Morphemes: gafe-dilan-yɔrɔ. Nom.
robust!
imprimerie; printers; Druckerei.
2 • avec force, brusquement; forcefully,
gafefeereyɔrɔ Morphemes: gafe-feere-yɔrɔ. Nom. abruptly; kraftvoll, abrupt. A y'i jɔ gajagi ! Il
librairie; bookshop, book-store; Buchladen, s'est arrêté net ! ( : brusquement et fortement).
Buchhandlung. He stopped dead! (: abruptly and strongly). Er
gafefura Morphemes: gafe-fura. Nom. page; page; blieb wie angewurzelt stehen! (: abrupt und
stark).
Seite.
gakuru [à] Jula: gwakuru. variante: gakulu. Nom.
gafekalan Morphemes: gafe-kàlan. Nom. lecture;
pierres du foyer, foyer; hearth stones, hearth;
reading; Lesung, Lektüre.
Herdsteine, Herd. ... u b'o daga sigi gakuru
gafekalanyɔrɔ Morphemes: gafe-kalan-yɔrɔ.
kan ... ... ils mettent cette marmite sur les
synonyme: gafelasagoso. Nom. bibliothèque; pierres du foyer ... ...they put this pot on the
library; Bibliothek, Bücherei. hearth stones... ...sie stellten diesen Topf auf
synonyme: gafemarayɔrɔ, liburumarayɔrɔ. die Herdsteine... synonyme: gwakuru.
gafekɔnɔbaabu Morphemes: gafe-kɔnɔ-baabu. gala [à-á] Nom. 1 • teinture, indigo; dye, stain,
1
Nom. sommaire; summary; Zusammenfassung. indigo; Farbstoff, Färbung. Ni i b'a fɛ ka finin
gafelasagonna Jula: gafelasagola. Nom. don gala la ... Si tu veux teindre un tissu à
bibliothécaire; librarian; Bibliothekar. l'indigo ... If you want to dye a fabric with
Category: Worker, occupation. indigo... Wenn Sie einen Stoff mit Indigo
färben möchten...
gafemaralan [á] Nom. bibliothèque ( : le meuble);
2 • espèce de plant; kind of plant; Pflanzenart.
bookcase (: furniture), bookshelf; Bücherregal
Category: Grass, herb, vine. indigofera
(: Möbel). synonyme: liburumarayɔrɔ. tinctoria.
gafemarayɔrɔ variante: gafelasagonso. Nom.
bibliothèque; library; Bibliothek.
synonyme: sɛbɛbondo, liburumarayɔrɔ,
gafekalanyɔrɔ, sɛbɛmarabon.
gafenin Nom. livret; booklet; Büchlein.
Category: Learn.
29/01/2026 237

gala galakakolow
gala [à] Verbe. être sans acquéreur, ne pas trouver galabuntan [á] Nom. sans ressort, sans force morale,
2
preneur, être sans mari (pour une femme); to sans énergie, mou, apathique, amorphe, sans
be without a buyer, not to find a buyer, to be vitalité; without moral strength, without
without a husband (for a woman); ohne Käufer energy, limp, apathetic, amorphous, without
sein, keinen Käufer finden, ohne Ehemann (für vitality; ohne moralische Stärke, ohne Energie,
eine Frau) sein. Jagofɛn ɲuman tɛ gala. La schlaff, apathisch, amorph, ohne Vitalität.
bonne marchandise ne reste pas sans Dɔlɔminna bɛ kɛ galabuntan ye.
acquéreur. Good merchandise does not remain L'alcoolique devient un être apathique. The
without a buyer. Gute Ware bleibt nicht ohne alcoholic becomes an apathetic being. Der
Käufer. Muso galala. La femme n'a pas trouvé Alkoholiker wird zu einem apathischen
de mari. The woman has not found a husband. Wesen.
Die Frau hat keinen Ehemann gefunden. galadonla Morphemes: gala-don-la.
galabagalaba [à-à-à] variante: garabagaraba, variante: galadonna. Nom. teinturière,
golokogoloko. 1 • Verbe. bâcler, faire quelque teinturier; dyer, person who dyes cloth; Färber.
chose vite et mal; to rush, to do something Category: Person. synonyme: galadonmuso.
quickly and badly; sich beeilen, etwas schnell
galadonmuso [à-à-ò] Nom. teinturière; dyer;
und schlecht erledigen, voreilig sein. Ni i bɛ
Färberin. Galadonmuso ye o ye, a bolo
galabagalaba kɛ, dɔ sabali na ta. Si tu es
finnin don. Chaque fois que tu vois la
trop précipité, tu vas prendre une bête qui n'est
pas encore morte (proverbe). If you are too
teinturière, elle a les mains noires (proverbe).
Every time you see the dyer, she has black
hasty, you will take an animal that is not yet
dead (proverb). Wer zu voreilig ist, nimmt ein
hands (proverb). Immer wenn man die
Tier, das noch nicht tot ist (Sprichwort).
Färberin sieht, hat sie schwarze Hände
(Sprichwort). Category: Worker, occupation.
2 • Adverbe. à la va-vite, n'importe comment; in
synonyme: galadonla.
a hurry, no matter how, hasty; in Eile, egal
wie. galafin [à-à] Nom. indigo noir, teinture indigo; dye,
galabu [á] Emprunt de : arabe. Nom. 1 • condition stain, indigo; Farbstoff, Indigo.
physique, forme, nature physique; physical galaji [à-à] Morphemes: gala-ji. Nom. teinture à
condition, form, physical nature; körperliche
l’indigo, bain d'indigo; indigo dye;
Verfassung, Form, körperliche
Indigofarben.
Beschaffenheit. A galabu ka kɛnɛ. Il est vif,
galajiri [à-à] Jula: galayiri. variante: galasun. Nom.
prompte à agir. He is lively, quick to act. Er ist
lebhaft und handlungsschnell.
indigotier; indigo plant; Indigo Pflanze.
Category: Bush, shrub. indigofera tinctoria.
2 • dynamisme, vitalité, énergie; dynamism,
vitality, energy; Dynamik, Vitalität, Energie.
synonyme: galayiri
1
.
Sɛgɛn tɛnɛ ye galabu ye. Le dynamisme est galajɔ variante: alajɔ. Nom. liane chevelue; kind of
l'ennemi de la pauvreté. Dynamism is the liana; Liane (Art). Category: Grass, herb,
enemy of poverty. Dynamik ist der Feind der vine. cassytha filiformis.
Armut.
galaka [á] Nom. côte, côté; rib, side; Rippe, Seite. Su
3 • confiance que l'on a dans ses capacités;
confidence in one's abilities; Vertrauen in die salen dingɛ kɔnɔ tile saba ko a galaka jalen
eigenen Fähigkeiten. A galabu t'a sɔsɔ. Il est bɛ. Le mort couché dans sa fosse depuis
sûr de soi. He is sure of himself. Er ist sich seulement trois jours dit que ses côtes lui font
seiner selbst sicher. mal (proverbe). The dead man lying in his
grave for only three days says that his ribs hurt
galabukɛnɛya [á] 1 • Verbe. être dynamique,
(proverb). Der Tote, der nur drei Tage in
dynamiser; be dynamic, energize; dynamisch seinem Grab liegt, sagt, daß ihm die Rippen
sein, geben Sie Energie. An ka án wehtaten (Sprichwort). Category: Body.
galabukɛnɛya án ka baara la. Soyons
galakakolo [á] variante: galaka. Nom. 1 • côte; rib;
dynamiques dans notre travail. Let's be
Rippe. ... a ko ale galakakolo jalen. ... il dit
dynamic in our work. Seien wir dynamisch in
unserer Arbeit. qu'il a mal aux côtes. Category: Body.
2 • Nom. dynamisme; dynamism, momentum, 2 • nervure secondaire d'une feuille; nervure of
energy; Dynamik. leaf; Blatt Nerven. Category: Parts of a plant.
galakakolow Nom. côtes; ribs; Rippen.
Category: Body.
29/01/2026 238

galalafani galodugu
galalafani bambara: galalafinin. Nom. tissu teint à gale [á-é] variante: galen. Adverbe. avant, début,
l'indigo; indigo dye clothe; Indigo gefärbter commencement, premier, encore, d'abord,
Stoff. synonyme: galalafinin. jadis; before, beginning, first, in bygone days,
formerly; bevor, Beginn, Anfang, zuerst,
galalafinin [à-à-à-ì-í] Jula: galalafani. Nom. tissu
früher, vor langer Zeit. Ala ye min da gale ...
teint à l'indigo; indigo dyed fabric.
Ce que Dieu créa en premier ... What God
synonyme: galalafani.
Created First... Was Gott zuerst erschuf...
galalama [à-à-à] Nom. bleu foncé, teint à l'indigo; synonyme: fɔlɔ 1 .
dark blue; dunkelblau. dɔlɔki galalama une galegale [á] Nom. jadis, autrefois, tout premier;
chemise bleu foncé. a dark blue shirt. ein formerly, in the past, very first; dazumal, vor
dunkelblaues Hemd. Category: colour. langer Zeit. Galegale, mɔgɔw tun bɛ
galamajiri [à-à-à] Jula: galamayiri. ɲɔgɔngasi fɛngɛ ... Autrefois, les gens
Morphemes: galama-jiri. Nom. calebassier; évitaient de se porter tort ... In the past, people
calabash tree; Kalebassen Baum. avoided harming each other... In der
Category: Bush, shrub. lagenaria siceraria. Vergangenheit haben die Menschen es
vermieden, sich gegenseitig zu verletzen ...
galaman
1
[à-à-á] Nom. louche, la moitié d’une
synonyme: fɔlɔfɔlɔ.
gourde; ladle, made from half a gourd;
Schöpflöffel. Daga bɛɛ n'a galama don. A
galenminan synonyme: fɔlɔ fɔlɔ minan.
chaque marmite sa petite louche (proverbe). variante: galeminan. Nom. objet historique;
Each pot has its own little ladle (proverb). historic object, artefact; historischer
Jeder Topf hat seine eigene kleine Schöpfkelle Gegenstand, historisches Objekt.
(Sprichwort. Category: Tool. lagenaria galensigiyɔrɔ variante: galesigiyɔrɔ. Nom. habitat
siceraria.
traditionnel; traditional housing; traditionelles
galaman 2 variante: galama. Nom. 1 • arbre (espèce), Wohnen. Category: Building.
bouleau d'Afrique; tree sp; Baumart. galiya [à-ì-á] variante: gariya, gɛya. Nom. poisson
Category: Tree. anogeissus leiocarpus.
(espèce); fish sp; Fisch (Art). Category: Fish.
synonyme: ngalama.
distichodus rostratus.
2 • couleur ocre, marron; ochre color,
brownish; ockergelb, bräunlich.
galo
1
[à-ó] variante: gale. Nom. ce qui (chose ou
Category: colour. acte) attire le malheur, porte-malheur,
mévente, funeste, malheur; drop in sales,
galaɲɔ [à-à] Nom. espèce de plante; kind of plant;
fateful, bad luck; Unglücksbringer,
Pflanze (Art). Category: Grass, herb, vine. Verkaufsrückgang. Daankunna woro bilen
uraria picta.
kelen, yebaga ka galo, tɔmɔnbaga ka
galasi Emprunt de : français. variante: gilasi. Nom. nimisa. L'unique cola rouge offerte au
glace; ice; Eis. synonyme: jikuru. carrefour est porte-malheur pour celui qui la
voit, et motif de regret pour celui qui la
galasigɛn Nom. soude caustique; caustic soda;
ramasse (proverbe). The single red cola nut
Ätznatron.
offered at the crossroads brings bad luck to
galasikuru Morphemes: galasi-kuru. Nom. neige; those who see it, and cause for regret for those
snow; Schnee. Category: Water, Land,
who pick it up (proverb). Die einzelne rote
Weather.
Cola Nuß, die an der Kreuzung gelegt wird,
bringt Unglück für diejenigen, die sie sehen,
galasina [à-à] Nom. espèce de plante, indigo sauvage; und löst bei denen Reue aus, die sie in die
kind of plant, wild indigo; Pflanze (Art), Hand nehmen (Sprichwort).
wildes Indigo. Category: Grass, herb, vine. Category: Religion.
indigofera bracteolata.
galo [à-ó] Nom. 1 • marché quotidien d'un grand
2
galayiri 1 bambara: galajiri. variante: galasun. Nom. centre; daily market of a large centre;
espèce de plante, indigotier; kind of plant; täglicher Markt eines grossen Ortes.
Pflanze (Art). Category: Grass, herb, vine. 2 • zone urbaine; urban area; Stadtgebiet.
indigofera tinctoria. synonyme: galajiri.
3 • centre ville; city center; Stadtzentrum.
galayiri variante: kalayiri. Nom. espèce d'arbre; kind of 4 • lieu de rassemblement, lieu favori;
2
tree; Baumart. Category: Tree. pterocarpus
gathering place, favorite place; Treffpunkt,
lucens. synonyme: nkalajiri.
Lieblingsort.
galodugu [à-ò] Nom. grande ville, ville principale,
capitale; large town; Grossstadt.
Category: City.
29/01/2026 239

galoduguba gan
galoduguba [à-ò] Nom. grande ville, ville principale, gamankolo Nom. omoplate; shoulder blade;
capitale; large town, capital town; Grossstadt, Schulterblatt. Category: Body.
Hauptstadt. Category: City. synonyme: kamanfyɛfyɛ.
galomajira [à-ò-à] Jula: galomayira. n.comp. gamankɔrɔ [à-ã̀-ɔ́-ɔ́] Nom. aisselle; armpit;
porte-malheur, signe de mauvaise augure; jinx, Achselhöhle. Category: Body.
fateful sign, bad luck charm; Unglücksbringer, synonyme: kamankɔrɔla.
Unglückszeichen. Jakuma fin ye galomajira
ye. Le chat noir est un porte-malheur. The
gamankɔrɔla Nom. aisselle; armpit; Achselhöhle.
black cat is a bad luck charm. Die schwarze Category: Body. synonyme: kamankɔrɔla.
Katze ist ein Unglücksbringer. gamankɔrɔsi Nom. poils d'aisselle; armpit hair;
galomuso [à-ò-ú-ó] Nom. femme non préférée, Achselhaar. Category: Body.
mal-aimée; not preferred woman, not loved synonyme: kamankɔrɔsii.
wife; nicht bevorzugte Frau.
gamankɔrɔwo Nom. creux de l'aisselle; Achselhöhle.
galon 1 [à-õ̀] bambara: nkalon. Category: Body.
comparer: dagwɛlɛya. synonyme: dalakolonya, gamankun [à-à-ú] variante: gaman, gamankuru.
faniɲa. Nom. mensonge, calomnie; lie,
Nom. 1 • épaule, omoplate; shoulder, shoulder
defamation, calumny, malignancy; Lüge,
blade, scapula; Schulter, Schulterblatt.
Verleumdung. Galon lo. C’est un mensonge. Category: Body. synonyme: kamankun,
Ce n’est pas vrai. It’s a lie. It’s not true. Das ist
kamanfyɛfyɛ.
eine Lüge. Es ist nicht wahr. galon tigɛ
2 • costaud; strong; stark, robust.
mentir. tell a lie. lügen. Tiɲɛ wa galon ? Vrai
ou faux ? True or false? Wahr oder falsch?
gamanmafɛn Morphemes: gaman-ma-fɛn. Nom.
synonyme: komayɛlɛma , nporo, nkalon, créature pourvue d'ailes, créature ailée, oiseau,
1
faniya.
volatile, volaille; winged creature; Wesen mit
Flügel. synonyme: kamanmafɛn.
galon [á] Verbe. 1 • détacher brusquement; suddenly
2 gamansi Nom. plume de l'aile; feather of the wing;
detach; sich plötzlich lösen.
Flügelfeder. Category: Parts of an animal.
2 • arrache d'un geste sec; tear off with a sharp
gesture; mit einer scharfen Geste abreißen.
synonyme: kamansii.
3 • insulter, frapper; insult, hit; beleidigen, gamiya Nom. micocoulier; kind of tree; Baumart.
schlagen. A ye fali galon a dabara la. Il a Category: Tree. celtis integrifolia.
frappé l'âne à la gueule. He hit the donkey in
gan [à] variante: [gwan]. Nom. association secrète
the mouth. Er schlug dem Esel ins Maul. 1
traditionnelle; traditional secret association;
4 • bondir; jump, leap; springen.
traditioneller Geheimbund. A birila gan kɔrɔ.
galonkɔtigɛ [à-õ̀-ɔ́-í-ɛ́] Nom. démenti; denial, Il a été initié au «gouan». He was introduced to
disclaimer; Widerruf, Ablehnungshinweis. “gouan”. Er wurde mit „Gouan“ bekannt
galontigɛla Morphemes: galon-tigɛ-la. Nom. gemacht. Category: Religion.
menteur, menteuse; liar; Lügner. gan 2 [à] Jula: gwan. Verbe. 1 • chaud, être chaud,
synonyme: faniɲatigɛla, nkalontigɛla. chauffer, réchauffer; hot, to be hot, to heat, to
reheat; heiß, heiß sein, erhitzen, aufwärmen.
galontigiya Verbe. accuser de mensonge, reconnaître
Tile ka gan bi. Le soleil est chaud aujourd'hui.
comme faux; accuse to be a lie, recognize to be
The sun is hot today. Die Sonne ist heute heiß.
wrong / false; als Lüge bezeichnen,
synonyme: gwan.
anerkennen, dass es unwahr ist.
1
synonyme: nkalontigiya. 2 • activer, être intense, s'intensifier; activate,
be intense, intensify; aktivieren, intensiv sein,
gaman [à-á] Nom. 1 • épaule; shoulder; Schulter. intensivieren. synonyme: gwan .
2
Category: Body. synonyme: kaman 1 , 3 • être ou devenir difficile, pénible, tenailler,
kamankun. inquiéter; to be or become difficult, painful,
2 • aile; wing; Flügel. Category: Parts of an
nagging, worrying; schwierig, schmerzhaft,
animal.
quälend, besorgniserregend sein oder werden.
Ni ko gannen b'i la don min ... Le jour où
gamanagwan variante: kamanagwan. n.comp.
quelque chose t'inquiétera ... The day
angoisse, inquiétude, préoccupation, tracasse; something worries you... Der Tag, an dem dich
anxiety, anguish, concern, worry; etwas beunruhigt...
Ängstlichkeit, Besorgnis, Sorge, Unruhe,
Angst.
29/01/2026 240

gan gangan
4 • fièvre, maladie; fever, illness; Fieber, 2 • adj. rasé, chauve, taillé; shaved, bald,
Krankheit. Ala ye wolo o wolo da, gandon trimmed; rasiert, kahl, getrimmt. Ni cɛlasigi
b'a la, sumadon b'a la. Toute chair que Dieu diyara muso kun gana la, a bɛ taa a bakɔrɔ
a créée connaît tantôt la fièvre, tantôt la santé nɔfɛ. Quand une femme à la tête rasée se
(proverbe). All flesh that God has created trouve bien dans son foyer, elle parte à la
sometimes experiences fever, sometimes health recherche de sa vieille maman pour l'amener
(proverb). Alle Geschöpfe, das Gott chez elle (proverbe). When a woman with a
geschaffen hat, erlebt manchmal Fieber, shaved head is happy at home, she goes
manchmal Gesundheit (Sprichwort). looking for her old mother to bring her home
Category: Disease. (proverb). Wenn eine Frau mit rasiertem Kopf
gan [à] variante: [gwan], ganso. Nom. zu Hause glücklich ist, macht sie sich auf die
3
Suche nach ihrer alten Mutter, um sie nach
haut-fourneau; blast furnace; Hochofen.
Hause zu bringen (Sprichwort).
gan [à] variante: [gwan]. Nom. reste des tiges de
4 gana [á] variante: ganagana, ganama. Nom.
2
mil; remaining millet stalks; restliche
Hirsestiele. ka gan cɛ. Ramasser les restes des
mi-mûr; semi-ripe; halbreif. mangoro gana.
mangue ni mûre ni verte. mango neither ripe
tiges de mil dans le champ. Collect the
nor green. Mango weder reif noch grün.
remains of millet stalks in the field. Sammeln
Sie die Reste der Hirsestengel auf dem Feld Gana n.pro. Ghana; Ghana; Ghana.
ein.
ganan [á] Jula: gwanan. Nom. 1 • célibataire, qui n'a
1
gan [á] Verbe. 1 • sauter, dépasser, démancher, faire
5 pas trouvé preneur; single, who has not found a
sortir, faire sauter; to jump, to overtake, to buyer. synonyme: gwanan.
dismantle, to bring out, to blow up; springen,
2 • incomplet; incomplete; unvollständig.
überholen, demontieren, herausbringen, in die
Luft jagen. k'i gan kogo kunna. sauter 3 • sans son partenaire; without his partner;
pardessus le mur. jump over the wall. über die
ohne seinen Partner. muru ganan couteau
Mauer springen. sans sa gaine. knife without its sheath. Messer
ohne Scheide.
2 • s'enfuir brusquement; run away abruptly;
schlagartig weglaufen. Muso fɔlɔ ganna ka 4 • simple; simple; einfach. daɲɛ ganan, daɲɛ
taa a faso la. La première femme s'est enfuie dorokolen mot simple, mot complexe. simple
brusquement chez son père. The first woman word, complex word. einfaches Wort,
suddenly fled with her father. Die erste Frau komplexes Wort.
floh plötzlich mit ihrem Vater. ganan [á] Nom. pièce de monnaie; coin of money;
2
3 • voltiger, sautiller; flutter, hop; flattern, Münze. Category: Finance.
hüpfen. synonyme: ɲɛnkɛɲɛnkɛ. synonyme: warimisɛn.
gan 6 [á] Nom. gombo; okra; Okra. Gan tɛ janya a ganaya [á] Jula: gwanaya. Nom. célibat; celibacy,
karibaga ma habada ! Jamais le gombo est bachelorhood; Zölibat. synonyme: gwanaya,
plus grand que celui qui vient le cueillir furubaliya.
(proverbe). The okra is never bigger than the
one who comes to pick it (proverb). Die Okra ganbagatɔ [à-à-à] Jula: gwanbagatɔ. Nom.
ist nie größer als derjenige, der sie pflückt personne fiévreuse; feverish person;
(Sprichwort). synonyme: dagan, gwan 3 , fiebernder Mensch. synonyme: gwanbagatɔ.
gwaan, gaan
1
.
Ganbi Nom. Gambie; Gambia; Gambia.
gana 1 [á] Jula: gwana. 1 • Verbe. raser, tondre, Category: Country.
tailler (arbre); shave, mow, shear, prune, trim ganela Nom. plante (espèce), thé de Gambie; plant sp;
(tree); rasieren, mähen, scheren, beschneiden
Pflanzenart. Category: Grass, herb, vine.
(Baum). ka jiri gana tailler un arbre. trim a
lippia chevalieri. synonyme: nkaaninba.
tree. einen Baum trimmen. synonyme: li,
1
gwana, di.
ganfa [à] Emprunt de : arabe. variante: gafan. Nom.
5
musette qu'on suspend, sac, sacoche portée en
bandoulière; hanging bag, bag, bag worn over
the shoulder; Hängetasche, Tasche, über der
Schulter getragene Tasche.
gangan [à-á] Nom. crabe; crab; Krabbe.
1
Category: Small animals.
synonyme: kɛrɛkelen.
29/01/2026 241

gangan gansilisɛbɛ
gangan [à] Nom. tambour à deux faces, frappé avec gansan [á] Jula: gwansan. 1 • Nom. simple, sans
2
des baguettes; two-sided drum, struck with importance, sans valeur, de rien, inutile,
sticks; zweiseitige Trommel, mit Stöcken gratuit; simple, unimportant, worthless,
geschlagen. Category: Musical instrument. nothing, useless, free; einfach, unwichtig,
gangangan [á] Nom. profération de paroles de colère,
wertlos, nichts, nutzlos, kostenlos.
synonyme: gwansan.
vocifération; uttering angry words,
vociferation; wütende Worte äußern, 2 • Nom. sans rien, à vide, démuni, sans
lautstarkes Geschrei. A bɛ gangangan na
protection; without anything, empty, destitute,
without protection; ohne irgend-etwas, leer,
yen. Il est en train de déverser des flots de
mittellos, ohne Schutz, schutzlos. Mɔgɔ jugu
paroles là-bas. He is pouring out streams of
words over there. Er schüttet dort drüben
ka fisa i gansan ye. Mieux vaut vivre avec
Wortströme aus. Category: Language. quelqu'un de méchant que de rester tout seul
(proverbe). It is better to live with a bad person
gangodala [á] Morphemes: gango-da-la. Nom.
than to be alone (proverb). Es ist besser, mit
crieur public, héraut; public crier, herald; einem schlechten Menschen
öffentlicher Ausrufer, Herold. Gangodala ka zusammenzuleben, als allein zu sein
ntamannin mana fara, a da na a tɔ bɛɛ ɲɛ. (Sprichwort).
Si le tambour d'aisselle du crieur public se 3 • Adverbe. inutilement, pour rien; uselessly,
déchire, sa bouche fera le reste (proverbe). If for nothing; nutzlos, umsonst. A tɛ kɛ
the town crier's armpit drum is torn, his mouth gansan ! Cela ne se fait pas pour rien ! This
will do the rest (proverb). Wenn dem doesn't happen for nothing! Das passiert nicht
Stadtausrufer die Achseltrommel gerissen ist, umsonst!
erledigt sein Mund den Rest (Sprichwort).
synonyme: weeleweeledala.
gansi
1
[à-í] variante: ganci, ganse. vt. publier, faire
savoir, annoncer, faire de la publicité; publish,
ganja [à] Nom. cannabis, chanvre indien, drogue; make known, announce; publizieren,
cannabis, Indian hemp, drug; Cannabis, veröffentlichen, bekannt geben. ka furusiri
Indischer Hanf, Droge. ganjaminna drogué. a gansi annoncer un mariage. announce a
drug addict. ein Drogenabhängiger. marriage. eine Heirat bekannt geben.
gankekɔnɔdimin [á] Nom. dysménorrhée, maux de gansi [á] Verbe. réserver, mettre de côté; reserve, set
2
ventre consécutifs aux règles douloureuses;
aside; reservieren, beiseite legen. Mɔgɔ man
dysmenorrhea, stomach aches following
kan ka fɛn gansi ka bila n'a wari t'i bolo. On
painful periods; Unterleibschmerzen,
ne doit pas réserver quelque chose si on n'a pas
Bauchschmerzen nach schmerzhaften
Perioden. Category: Disease.
l'argent pour l'acheter. You shouldn't reserve
something if you don't have the money to buy
gankekuru [á] Nom. 1 • kyste de l'ovaire; ovarian it. Sie sollten nichts reservieren, wenn Sie
cyst; Eierstockzyste. Category: Disease. nicht das Geld haben, es zu kaufen.
2 • tumeur de l'utérus; uterine tumor; gansili [ã̀-ì-í] Morphemes: gansi-li. Nom. publicité;
Gebärmuttertumor.
publicity, advertising; Werbung, Reklame,
gankoroba variante: gankoro, gankoromuso. Nom. Propaganda.
espèce d'arbre, oranger de brousse; kind of gansilikɛla variante: gansilila. Nom. crieur public,
tree, wild orange tree; Baumart.
diffuseur; public announcer, broadcaster;
Category: Tree. strychnos spinosa.
Verbreiter, Ansager.
synonyme: nkankoro.
synonyme: weeleweeledala.
ganna [á] Jula: gwannan. Nom. sauce gombo; okra
gansilisɛbɛ [ã̀-ì-ì-ɛ́-ɛ́] Morphemes: gansili-sɛbɛ.
sauce; Okrasauce. Category: Types of food.
Nom. publicité, affiche publicitaire; publicity,
synonyme: gwannan.
advertisement; Werbung, Werbeplakat.
ganntɔnna Nom. galago du Sénégal; Senegal
Bush-baby; Senegal-Galago.
Category: Mammal. galago senegalensis.
synonyme: ntɔrɔ, gwantɔnna, tɔrɔ .
1
29/01/2026 242

gantɔ garibu
gantɔ [à] variante: [gwantɔ]. Nom. un malade; a sick garaka [à-à] Verbe. corriger; to correct; korrigieren,
person; ein kranker Mensch. Gantɔ zurechtweisen. ka denmisɛn garaka, a ka ko
senlasamayɔrɔ tɛ sɛlɛdo ye. Le cimetière kolon dabila. corriger un enfant afin qu'il
n'est pas un bon endroit pour le malade pour cesse de mal faire. correct a child so that he
allonger ses jambes (proverbe). The cemetery stops doing wrong. ein Kind korrigieren, damit
is not a good place for the sick to stretch out es aufhört, Unrecht zu tun.
his legs (proverb). Der Friedhof ist kein guter
garamu Emprunt de : français. Nom. gramme; gram,
Ort für einen Kranken, um seine Beine
auszustrecken (Sprichwort). Category: Sick.
gramme; Gramm. Kilo 1 ye garamu 1000 ye.
synonyme: farigwantɔ, jangaratɔ, 1 kg est 1000 g. 1 kg is 1000 g. 1 kg ist 1000 g.
banabagatɔ, dimibagatɔ. garan [á] Nom. 1 • entrave (pour les animaux);
gantugunɛgɛ [à-ù-ù] Jula: gwantugunɛgɛ. Nom. hindrance (for animals), hamper; Hindernis
(für Tiere), behindern. Ni garan ye so minɛ,
minerai de fer; iron ore; Eisenerz.
synonyme: gwantugunɛgɛ.
falininkuru b'a dan. Quand le cheval est
entravé, le petit âne le dépasse (proverbe).
gara 1 [à-á] Nom. indigo; indigo; Indigo. When the horse is hampered, the little donkey
gara [à] Verbe. donner un coup avec le dos de la
overtakes it (proverb). Wenn das Pferd
2 behindert ist, überholt es der kleine Esel
main; strike with the back of the hand; mit dem
(Sprichwort).
Handrücken schlagen. A y'a tɛgɛ gara a kun.
2 • ceinture ou lien de cuir; leather belt or tie;
Il lui a donné un coup avec le dos de la main.
Ledergürtel, Lederband.
He hit her with the back of his hand. Er schlug
sie mit dem Handrücken. garanga Nom. pou de corps, vermine; body louse,
garabali comparer: bagansugu.[á-á-á-í] Nom. vermin; Laus, Ungeziefer. Category: Insect.
synonyme: nkaranga.
1 • marché de bétail, enclos surveillé pour le
bétail; cattle market; Viehmarkt. Garabali garanke comparer: ɲamakala, jeli.[á-á-é] Nom.
saga, a bɛ yaala fan bɛɛ. Le mouton du cordonnier, artisan de cuir; cobbler,
marché aux bestiaux se balade partout shoemaker, leather worker; Schuhmacher,
(proverbe). The sheep from the livestock Leder Verarbeiter. Category: Person.
market wanders everywhere (proverb). Die garasi Emprunt de : français. Nom. garage; garage;
Schafe vom Viehmarkt wandern überall umher
Garage, Autogarage.
(Sprichwort).
2 • bordel, maison de passe; brothel; Bordell. A
garasiso [á] Nom. bordel, maison de passe; brothel;
muso ye so in kɛ garabali ye. Sa femme a Bordell. synonyme: garabali.
transformé cette maison en bordel. His wife garawu [á] Adverbe. avec violence et soudaineté,
turned this house into a brothel. Seine Frau
violemment; with violence and suddenness,
verwandelte dieses Haus in ein Bordell.
violently; mit Gewalt und Plötzlichkeit, heftig.
synonyme: garasiso. A ye nɛgɛbere fili dugu ma garawu ! Il a jeté
garadabu Emprunt de : français. Nom. garde boue; la barre de fer par terre violemment ! He threw
the iron bar to the ground violently! Er warf
mudguard, fender, splash guard; Kotflügel,
Schutzblech.
die Eisenstange heftig zu Boden!
garadi Emprunt de : français. Nom. grade; grade, gari [á-í] Emprunt de : français. Nom. gare; bus
degree; Grad. Category: Mathematics.
station; Busstation, Busbahnhof.
Category: Travel.
garagara [à-à] variante: [gwaragwara],
1 garibu [ù-ì-ú] Nom. 1 • élève coranique, jeune
gaaragaara, garogaro. Nom. civière; a
mendiant; beggar, Koran pupil; Bettler,
stretcher; eine Trage. U y'a ta garagara la ka
Koranschüler. Garibuw bɛ hidaya ɲini. Les
na n'a ye so. Ils l'ont mené chez lui sur une
jeunes élèves coraniques pratiquent la
civière. They took him home on a stretcher. Sie mendicité. Young Koranic students practice
brachten ihn auf einer Trage nach Hause. begging. Junge Koranstudenten betteln.
garagara [à-á-à-á] Jula: gwaragwara. 2 • élève-marabout; boy in the care of a
2
synonyme: balakawuli. Nom. ganga de Gambie; marabout; Schüler eines Kornlehrers.
four-banded sand-grouse; Birkhuhn.
Category: Bird. pterocles quadricinctus /
pterocles exustus / senegallus.
29/01/2026 243

garibugongon gaso
garibugongon variante: garibugongo. Nom. grosse gasi [à-í] Nom. 1 • tort, offense; wrong, offence;
boite de tomate servant au mendiant de Unrecht, Ungerechtigkeit, Vergehen,
récipient pour récolter la nourriture; big tin Ärgernis, Anstoß, Verstoß. Da ye gasi ye,
serving as container for a beggar to collect mantɔ fana man ɲi. La bouche porte tort,
food; große Blechbüchse für Bettler für das
mais se taire aussi est mauvais (proverbe). The
Essen. Category: Container.
mouth is bad, but to be silent is also bad
garibuya Morphemes: garibu-ya. Nom. mendicité, (proverb). Der Mund ist schlecht, aber auch
action de mendier; begging; Betteln. Garibuya Schweigen ist schlecht (Sprichwort). Da ye
ka fisa soɲɛni ye. Mieux vaut la mendicité gasi ye, kɔnɔ tɛ kuma. La bouche offense
que le vol. Better to beg than to steal. Besser mais le ventre ne parle pas (proverbe). The
betteln als stehlen. synonyme: hidaya. mouth offends but the stomach does not speak
(proverb). Der Mund beleidigt, aber der
garisɛgɛ [à-ì-í-ɛ́] Emprunt de : arabe. Magen spricht nicht (Sprichwort).
Jula: garisigɛ. variante: garijɛgɛ, garisɛjɛ. 2 • égard, considération; consideration,
Nom. 1 • chance, fortune; luck, fortune; Glück, regard; Ansehen, Berücksichtigung. N b'a
Zufall, Glücksfall. Jɔn bɛɛ la jɛrɛlen ni i gasi sigi. J'ai des égards pour lui. I have
garisɛgɛ don. A chacun sa bonne fortune respect for him. Ich habe Respekt vor ihm.
(proverbe). To each his own good fortune gasilako [à-ì-à-ó] Nom. inconvénient, préjudice;
(proverb). Jedem sein Glück (Sprichwort).
disadvantage, inconvenience, prejudice, harm,
2 • progéniture, grossesse; offspring, progeny,
loss, damage; Nachteil, Unannehmlichkeit,
pregnancy; Nachwuchs, Nachkommenschaft,
Schaden. ... ɲininikɛlaw ye gasilako wɛrɛw
Schwangerschaft. A muso ye garisɛgɛ sɔrɔ.
ye balimafuru la ... ... les chercheurs ont
Sa femme a conçu. His wife conceived. Seine
trouvé d'autres inconvénients au mariage entre
Frau wurde schwanger.
parents ... ...researchers have found other
3 • avoir de la chance, concevoir (un enfant); to
disadvantages to marriage between relatives
be lucky, to conceive (a child); Glück haben,
... ...Forscher haben weitere Nachteile der
schwanger werden.
Ehe zwischen Verwandten festgestellt ...
garisɛgɛma [à-ì-ì-ɛ̀-á] Jula: garisigɛma. Nom. gasima [à-ì-á] Nom. offensant, blessant, qui porte
chanceux, à la bonne fortune, enceinte; lucky,
tort, qui lèse; offensive, abusive; verletzend,
fortunate, pregnant; glücklich, vom Glück
beleidigend, anstössig. A ma gasimakuma fɔ.
begünstigt, schwanger. Yali ka a fɔ Ala ka n
Il n'a rien dit d'offensant. He didn't say
sɔn den na, ko Ala ka n sɔn a garisɛgɛma
anything offensive. Er sagte nichts
na. Plutôt que de demander à Dieu un enfant, il Beleidigendes.
vaut mieux demander un enfant chanceux
gasitanya [à-ì-à] Nom. manque d'égards, effronterie,
(proverbe). Rather than asking God for a
impudence; lack of respect, gall, effrontery,
child, it is better to ask for a lucky child
(proverb). Anstatt Gott um ein Kind zu bitten,
impudence; Respektlosigkeit, Frechheit,
Unverschämtheit, Schamlosigkeit,
ist es besser, um ein glückliches Kind zu bitten
(Sprichwort).
Unverfrorenheit. O ye gasitanyakuma de ye.
C'est une parole impudente. It's an impudent
garisɛgɛtigi [à-ì-ì-ɛ̀-í-í] Jula: garisigɛtigi. Nom.
word. Es ist ein unverschämtes Wort.
1 • personne qui a eu de la chance; lucky
person; Glückspilz.
gaso
1
[à] Jula: gwaso. variante: gason. Verbe.
fermer, boucher; close, plug a hole; schließen,
2 • femme enceinte; pregnant woman;
schwangere Frau. ein Loch stopfen. A ye da gaso. Il a fermé la
porte brutalement. He closed the door
garisigɛcɛn n.comp. malédiction; curse; Fluch.
abruptly. Er schloß abrupt die Tür.
garisigɛdiman n.comp. bonne chance; good luck; gut synonyme: gwaso 2 .
Glück. gaso Jula: gwaso. variante: gaso. Nom. espèce de
2
garisigɛgo n.comp. malchanceux; bad luck, poisson; kind of fish; Fischart. Category: Fish.
misfortune; Missgeschick, Unglück. gnathonemus senegalensis.
gaso [à] Jula: gwaso. Nom. cuisine; kitchen;
3
Küche. Category: Building. synonyme: gwaso ,
1
gada , gabugu, tobili.
2
29/01/2026 244

gatigi gelu
gatigi [à] Nom. chef de famille; head of family; gedegede [é] variante: gelegele. Adverbe. très serré,
Familienoberhaupt. Gatigi ɲɔntan ni dunan solidement (attaché); tight, securely (tied);
tɛ bɛn. Un chef de famille sans mil ne peut fest, sicher (gebunden). U ye nson siri
s'entendre avec celui qui lui demande gedegede ! Ils ont solidement attaché le
l'hospitalité (proverbe). A head of family voleur ! They tied up the thief securely! Sie
without millet cannot get along with the one haben den Dieb sicher gefesselt!
who asks him for hospitality (proverb). Ein
gedewu [é] Adverbe. bruit (d'un objet lourd qui
Familienoberhaupt kommt ohne Hirse nicht
tombe); sound (of a heavy object falling);
mit dem aus, der ihn um Gastfreundschaft
bittet (Sprichwort). synonyme: gwatigi, dutigi,
Geräusch (von einem schweren fallenden
Gegenstand). A ye jirikuru fili dugu ma,
lutigi, sotigi .
1
gedewu ! Il a jeté la bûche sur le sol, vlan ! He
gato [à-ó] Emprunt de : français. Nom. gâteau; threw the log on the ground, wham! Er warf
cake; Kuchen. Category: Food. den Baumstamm auf den Boden, pumm!
gawa [à] Nom. imbécile, niais, idiot, naïf, con; gejegeje [é] Adverbe. 1 • bien mûr; very ripe; sehr reif.
imbecile, simpleton, idiot, naive, stupid; An ka ɲɔ bɛ gejegeje. Notre mil est bien mûr.
Einfaltspinsel, Idiot, Naiv, Dummkopf. Our millet is very ripe. Unsere Hirse ist sehr
gawamuso, gawacɛ fille naïve, garçon naïf. reif. synonyme: lɔbɔlɔbɔ.
naive girl, naive boy. naives Mädchen, naiver
2 • très solide, en forme; very solid, in good
Junge. synonyme: kunjɛ
2
, susunjula.
shape; sehr solide, in gutem Zustand. A nana
gawali [à-à] variante: gawale, gawɔli, gawulen. kɛnɛya dɔgɔkun, filanan dafa, a kɛra
Nom. francisque, lance, javelot; lance, javelin; gejegeje. Après deux semaines de
Lanze, Speer. gawalifili lancer du javelot. convalescence, if ut de nouveau en pleine
javelin throw. Speerwurf. forme. After two weeks of convalescence, he is
back in great shape. Nach zweiwöchiger
gawulɔ [á] variante: gawula, gawulɛ, gawulo. Nom.
Genesung ist er wieder in Topform.
caste peule située en bas de l'échelle sociale;
3 • bien portant; well, healthy; bei guter
Fulani caste located at the bottom of the social
Gesundheit.
scale; Die Fulani-Kaste befindet sich am
unteren Ende der sozialen Skala. geji [è] variante: geju. Nom. mer; sea; Meer.
Category: Community. Category: Water, Land. synonyme: kɔgɔji.
gazi [á-í] Emprunt de : français. Nom. gaz; gas; gejuma [è] Emprunt de : arabe. Nom. vendredi;
Gas.
Friday; Freitag. synonyme: wojuma, jumadon,
gazibarika makɛɲanan Nom. réglage du gaz; gas juma.
regulator; Gas Einstellknopf, Gasregulierung.
gele [é] Jula: gwele. variante: geren. Nom. faux
gazibirike Nom. briquet à gaz; gas lighter; Gas
ébénier; fake ebony tree; Ebenholzbaum.
Anzünder. Category: Tree. prosopis africana.
gazigwa Nom. cuisinière à gaz; gas cooker, gas stove; synonyme: gwele, nbilensen.
Gas Kochherd. Category: Household gelekala [è-é-à-á] Jula: gwelekala. Nom. aigle
equipment.
couronné; Crowned Eagle; Kronenadler.
gazima Nom. gazeux; gaseous, carbonated; Category: Bird. stephanoaetus coronatus.
gasförmig, gasartig. minfɛn gazimaw gelekɛ [è-è] Nom. homme stérile; barren man;
boissons gazeuses. soft drinks. alkoholfreie unfruchtbarer Mann.
Getränke.
geletali [é] Nom. tali des savanes (petit); kind of tree;
gazɔli [á-ɔ́-í] Emprunt de : français. Nom. gazole,
Baumart. Category: Tree. erythrophleum
gazole, gas-oil, diesel; diesel; Diesel. aficanum.
gazɔlitɛrɛnkun Nom. locomotive diesel; diesel gelu [ě-ǔ] variante: gwelu, ngelu. Nom. petit duc
1
locomotive; Diesellokomotive. africain, hibou; Scops Owl; Eule, Uhu, Kauz
Category: Travel. (Art). Category: Bird. otus scops.
ge [è] Jula: gwe. variante: [gwe]. Nom. liane à gelu [è] variante: pelu. Verbe. couper, trancher;
2
latex; latex vine. Category: Tree. landolphia cut, slice; schneiden, in Scheiben schneiden.
heudelotii. synonyme: gwe. ka sogo gelu couper de la viande. cut meat.
Fleisch schneiden.
29/01/2026 245

gelugelu gerema
gelugelu [è-ú-è-ú] variante: [gwelugwelu]. Verbe. gengen [é] Jula: gwengwen. Verbe. clouer,
2
couper en petits morceaux; cut into small enfoncer par force, planter, ficher, fixer,
pieces; in kleine Stücke schneiden. A ye jiri ancrer; nail, force in, plant, pin, fix, anchor;
bolo bɛɛ gelugelu. Il a coupé toute la branche nageln, eintreiben, pflanzen, feststecken,
en petits morceaux. He cut the whole branch
befestigen, verankern. Jiri gengennen bɛ
into small pieces. Er schnitt den ganzen Zweig dugukolo la n'a diliw ye. L'arbre est ancré
in kleine Stücke. dans le sol par ses racines. The tree is
gen [è] variante: [gwen]. Verbe. ficher, planter,
anchored in the ground by its roots. Der Baum
ist mit seinen Wurzeln im Boden verankert.
coincer; get stuck; stecken. A ye jele gen jiri
synonyme: gwengwen.
la. Il a planté la hache dans le bois. He stuck
gengerenin variante: gingerenin. Nom. autour gabar,
the axe into the wood. Er steckte die Axt ins
Holz. petite rapace; Gabar Goshawk; Gabarhabicht.
Category: Bird. melierax gabar.
gende [è] variante: [gwende]. Verbe. serrer, bien
1
genin [è] variante: [gwenin], gonin. Nom. santal
serrer, être trop étroit (pour un vêtement); to
tighten well, to be too tight (for clothing); d'Afrique; tree (kind of); Baumart.
anziehen, gut anziehen, zu eng sein (für Category: Tree. pterocarpus lanceolatus.
Kleidung). ka da gende bien fermer la porte. geninkunan [é] variante: [gweninkunan]. Nom.
close the door tightly. Schließen Sie die Tür
sorte d'encens; kind of incense; Art
fest. Weihrauch. rhizomes.
gende 2 [è] Nom. aire de battage de grain; grain gere 1 [é-é] variante: gele. Nom. terre ferme (par
threshing floor; Getreide-Dreschboden, opposition à l'eau); dry land (as opposed to
Tenne. Ɲɔ ɲuman bɛɛ tɛ gende sɔrɔ. Tous water); Festland, trockenes Land (im
les bons mils n'arrivent pas sur l'aire de battage Unterschied zum Festland).
(proverbe). Not all good millet makes it to the synonyme: gengelen, geren .
2
threshing floor (proverb). Nicht jede gute
Hirse schafft es auf die Tenne (Sprichwort).
gere
2
[é] Jula: gwere. Verbe. damer (le sol), tasser;
Category: Agriculture. tamper (the ground), compact; Boden
stampfen, kompakt schlagen, verdichten. ka
genekalan Nom. aigle martial; martial eagle;
dugukolo gere damer le sol. tamper the
Kampfadler. Category: Bird. polemaetus
bellicosus.
ground. den Boden fest-stampfen (oder
verdichten). synonyme: gwere .
gengele [é] variante: gangalan, gɛngɛlɛn. Adverbe.
1
gereburu [é] Nom. trompe, corne (instrument); horn
fort et stridente (crier), dur; loud and shrill
(scream), harsh; laut und schrill (Schrei), hart. (instrument); Horn (Instrument). A kulela
A kulela gengele ! Il hurla d'une façon gereburu ba dɛbɛ ni tan na. Il corna dans
stridente ! He screamed shrilly! Er schrie cinquante trompes. He sounded fifty horns. Er
schrill! ließ fünfzig Hörner erklingen.
gengelen [é] Nom. terre ferme; dry land; trockenes Category: Musical instrument.
Land. Kalenni farati ka bon gengelen kan. gerefe [è-è] Emprunt de : français. Nom. être greffé,
Le saut périlleux est dangereux sur la terre manguier greffé; to be grafted, grafted mango
ferme. Somersaulting is dangerous on dry tree, graft; pfropfen, gepfropft sein,
land. Auf dem Trockenen ist ein Salto gepfropfter Mangobaum, veredeln. A ma
gefährlich. synonyme: gere 1 , geren 2 . gerefe sɔrɔ. Il n'a pas récolté de mangues
gengen [é] variante: [gwengwen]. Nom. en plein
greffées, He did not harvest any grafted
1
mangoes, Er hat keine veredelten Mangos
(pour une période : jour, nuit midi ...); in full
geerntet,
(for a period: day, night noon, etc.), in the
middle of ; vollständig (für einen Zeitraum: gerekete variante: [gwerekete]. Nom. nu; bare,
Tag, Nacht Mittag usw.), mitten am. tilegan naked; nackt. dugukolo gerekete sol nu.
gengen. en plein midi. in the middle of the bare ground. nackter Boden. A gerekete
noon. mitten am Mittag. sɔgɔma gengen en bɔra. Il est sorti nu. He came out naked. Er
pleine matinée. in the middle of the morning. kam nackt heraus.
mitten am Morgen.
gerema [é] variante: [gwerema]. Nom. cornu, à
cornes; horned; gehörnt.
29/01/2026 246

geren gɛlɛden
geren [è-ẽ́] Nom. 1 • fruit vert, non mûr, jeune; getura [è] variante: jetura. Nom. taureau; bull; Stier.
1
green/unripe fruit; unreife Frucht. mangoro Misisinsan bɛɛ n'a getura don. A chaque
geren mangue verte. unripe mango. unreife enclos son taureau (proverbe). Each enclosure
Mango. has its own bull (proverb). Jedes Gehege hat
2 • vierge; virgin; unberührt, jungfräulich.
seinen eigenen Stier (Sprichwort).
sungurun geren jeune fille vierge. virgin girl.
synonyme: jentura, tura, tora.
jungfräuliches Mädchen. geyi [è-í] synonyme: goyin. Nom. 1 • espèce
3 • non fermenté (bière de mil); not fermented d'arbre, liane caoutchouc; kind of tree, rubber
(millet beer); ungegärt (Hirsebier). Dɔlɔ dɔ liana; Baumart, Gummirebe. Category: Tree.
biri bɛ kɛ ka dɔ geren kasi. La levure d'une landolphia heudeloti.
bière sert pour faire lever une autre bière 2 • caoutchouc, latex, gomme; rubber, latex,
(proverbe). The yeast from one beer is used to gum; Latex, Gummi.
leaven another beer (proverb). Die Hefe eines gɛdɛgɛdɛ [ɛ̀-ɛ̀] variante: [gwɛdɛgwɛdɛ]. Verbe.
1
Bieres wird zum Aufgehen eines anderen
Bieres verwendet (Sprichwort).
durcir; harden; härten, verhärten. Sanji bɛ
dugukolo fari dakɛɲɛ, tile b'a gɛdɛgɛdɛ. La
geren [é] variante: gele. Nom. terre ferme (par
2 pluie tasse et aplanit le terrain, le soleil le
opposition à l'eau); dry land (as opposed to durcit. The rain packs and flattens the ground,
water); trockenes Land (im Gegensatz zu
the sun hardens it. Der Regen verdichtet und
Wasser). Kolonkolonli dan ye geren ye. La glättet den Boden, die Sonne verhärtet ihn.
limite pour rouler, c'est le bout de la terre
gɛdɛgɛdɛ [ɛ̀-ɛ̀] Verbe. tonner (au loin); thunder (in
ferme (proverbe). The limit for riding is the 2
end of dry land (proverb). Die Grenze zum the distance); donnern (in der Ferne). San bɛ
Reiten ist das Ende des trockenen Landes gɛdɛgɛdɛ. Ça tonne dans le lointain. It
(Sprichwort). synonyme: gere 1 , gengelen. thunders in the distance. In der Ferne donnert
geren [é] Jula: gwere. Verbe. 1 • boucher, combler,
es. Category: Weather.
3
gɛɛru [ɛ́] Adverbe. tout près, très près; very close;
obstruer; block, fill, obstruct, plug; blockieren,
füllen, behindern. ka dingɛ geren boucher un ganz nah. kana tɛmɛ a kɔrɔ gɛɛru ! Ne passe
trou. plug a hole. ein Loch stopfen. pas si près ! Don't pass so close! Gehen Sie
synonyme: gwere . nicht so nah vorbei!
2
2 • entraver, gêner; hinder; behindern. ka gɛlɛ 1 [ɛ̀] Emprunt de : arabe. variante: [gwɛlɛ]. Nom.
nafasɔrɔsira geren entraver le canon; cannon; Kanone. synonyme: kanun 1 ,
développement. hinder development. die tawutawu, gwɛlɛ .
3
Entwicklung behindern.
gɛlɛ [ɛ́] variante: gala, [gwɛlɛ]. Nom. plate-forme,
synonyme: lafilibagatɔ. 2
estrade publique; platform, public stage;
gerenadi Emprunt de : français. Nom. grenade; Plattform, öffentliche Bühne. Kala cɛ bɛɛ
pomegranate; Granatapfel. Category: Food. kɛlen bɛka gɛlɛba fa. Tous les hommes de
gese [è-é] Nom. fil de chaîne; thread, warp thread; Kala remplirent l'estrade. All the men of Kala
Faden, Kettfaden. gese dan tisser le fil. weave
filled the platform. Alle Männer von Kala
füllten die Bühne.
thread. den Faden weben. Fale ni gese bɛ da,
u bɛ bɛn ka kɛ fininmugu ye. On tisse le fil gɛlɛ 3 [ɛ́] Jula: gwɛlɛ. variante: [gwɛlɛ], gɛlɛn. Nom.
de trame avec le fil de chaîne, c'est ensemble 1 • défense (de certains animaux), dent
qu'ils forment l’étoffe (proverbe). We weave protubérante; tusk (of certain animals),
the weft thread with the warp thread, together protruding tooth; Stoßzahn (bestimmter
they form the fabric (proverb). Wir verweben Tiere), hervorstehender Zahn. samagɛlɛ,
den Schußfaden mit dem Kettfaden, jɛgɛlɛ défense d’éléphant, défense de
zusammen bilden sie den Stoff (Sprichwort). phacochère. elephant tusk, warthog tusk.
gesedala [è-è-ã̀-á] Jula: gesedanla. Elefantenstoßzahn, Warzenschwein Stoßzahn.
synonyme: gwɛlɛ .
variante: jesedala, gesedanna. Nom. 1
tisserand; weaver; Weber. Category: Person. 2 • canine; canine; Eckzahn.
gesekolo [è-è-ó-ó] Nom. rouleau de tissu; roll of gɛlɛden [ɛ̀-ɛ̀] Jula: gwɛlɛden. Nom. boulet de canon,
cloth, roll of fabric; Stoffband, Stoffrolle.
obus; cannonball, shell; Kanonenkugel,
Granate. synonyme: gwɛlɛden.
gesenbe [é-é-é] synonyme: sifilɛyirinin. Nom.
pied-de-chèvre; kind of tree; Baumart.
Category: Tree. bauhinia rufescens.
29/01/2026 247

gɛlɛkɛ gɛn
gɛlɛkɛ [ɛ]́ variante: [gwɛlɛkɛ]. Verbe. 1 • se gɛlɛya [ɛ̀-ɛ̀] 1 • Verbe. être ou devenir dur, être rare,
développer, grandir; develop, grow; être résistante, être pénible, être cher; to be or
entwickeln, wachsen. I ka den gɛlɛkɛra ne become hard, to be rare, to be resistant, to be
kɔfɛ. Ton enfant s'est bien développé en mon painful, to be expensive; hart sein oder werden,
selten sein, widerstandsfähig sein, schmerzhaft
absence. Your child has developed well in my
absence. Ihr Kind hat sich in meiner
sein, teuer sein. Jurudon gɛlɛyara. Il est
Abwesenheit gut entwickelt. difficile d'obtenir un crédit. It is difficult to
obtain credit. Es ist schwierig, einen Kredit zu
2 • devenir puissant, reprendre des forces;
erhalten. Dɔkɔtɔrɔfura gɛlɛyalen bɛ. Les
become powerful, regain strength; mächtig
werden, wieder zu Kräften kommen. médicaments sont chers. Medicines are
Banabagatɔ gɛlɛkɛra. Le malade a repris des expensive. Medikamente sind teuer.
forces. The patient regained his strength. Der 2 • Verbe. insister, s'efforcer, se débrouiller,
Patient kam wieder zu Kräften. faire en sorte que, s'arranger; insist, strive,
manage, make sure, arrange; darauf bestehen,
gɛlɛn [ɛ]̀ variante: [gwɛlɛn]. adj. 1 • fort, dur, solide,
1 sich bemühen, verwalten, sicherstellen,
résistant; strong, hard, solid, resistant; stark, arrangieren. A' bɛ áw gɛlɛya ... k'a hakili to o
hart, solide, widerstandsfähig. Taji ... a kasa
la. Vous vous efforcerez de bien faire attention
ka gɛlɛn. Le pétrole a une odeur forte. Oil has
à cela. You will do your best to pay close
a strong odor. Öl hat einen starken Geruch. attention to this. Sie werden Ihr Möglichstes
synonyme: gwɛlɛ 4 . tun, dies sorgfältig zu beachten.
2 • difficile, délicat, désagréable, pénible; 3 • Nom. difficulté, problème; difficulty,
difficult, delicate, unpleasant, painful; problem; Schwierigkeit, Problem. ... ka a da
schwierig, heikel, unangenehm, schmerzhaft. gɛlɛyaw kan. ... à cause des difficultés.
... o ye ko ye sa, min ka gɛlɛn ! ... c'est une ...because of the difficulties. ...wegen der
chose qui est très difficile ! ...this is something Schwierigkeiten.
that is very difficult! ...das ist etwas, das sehr
4 • Nom. solidité, dureté; solidity, hardness;
schwierig ist!
Festigkeit, Härte.
3 • puissant, grave, important; powerful, 5 • Nom. résistance; resistance, resilience;
serious, important; kraftvoll, ernst, wichtig.
Widerstand.
Kanɛmɛya ka gɛlɛn dɛ ! Les relations de
6 • Nom. effort; effort, endeavour; Bemühung.
cousinage, c'est très important ! Cousin
relationships are very important! gɛlɛyalan [ɛ̀-ɛ̀-à] variante: [gwɛlɛyalan]. Nom. clef
Cousinenbeziehungen sind sehr wichtig! (pour serrer); spanner (to tighten), wrench;
gɛlɛn [ɛ]̀ variante: [gwɛlɛn], gɛnɛn. Nom. tibia;
Schlüssel (zum Anziehen). Category: Tool.
2 synonyme: konɲin.
shin-bone; Schienbein. Soso bɛ dɔn na, a
hakili b'a gɛlɛn na. Le moustique est en train
gɛn [ɛ́] Jula: gwɛn. Verbe. 1 • chasser, renvoyer,
de danser, mais il fait attention à ses pattes répudier; expel, dismiss, repudiate;
(proverbe). The mosquito is dancing, but it is
ausschließen, entlassen, ablehnen,
careful with its legs (proverb). Die Mücke wegschicken. A y'a gɛn ka taa. Il l'a fait
tanzt, aber sie geht vorsichtig mit ihren Beinen partir. He made her leave. Er schickte sie fort.
um (Sprichwort). synonyme: gɛnɛnkala. ka muso gɛn. renvoyer une femme. dismiss a
gɛlɛnman Jula: gwɛlɛman. variante: [gwɛlɛnman].
woman. eine Frau entlassen. synonyme: gwɛn
2
.
2 • pousser devant soi, garder (le bétail); to
Nom. difficile, dur, important, grave; difficult,
push in front of you, to guard (livestock); vor
hard, important, serious; schwierig, schwer,
wichtig, ernst. ...hadamaden haju bɛɛ la
sich her schieben, (Vieh) bewachen.
gɛlɛnman ye balo de ye. ... le problème le
3 • pourchasser, poursuivre; chase, pursue;
jagen, verfolgen. Kungowulunin bɛ
plus important pour l'homme, c'est de se
nourrir. ...the most important problem for man ntɔnminɛ gɛn ka a minɛ, o tɛ a ka ntɔnminɛ
is to feed himself. ...das wichtigste Problem des bali. Le chien sauvage attrape les lièvres, ça ne
Menschen besteht darin, sich selbst zu l’empêche pas d'attraper des criquets
ernähren. synonyme: gwɛlɛman. (proverbe). The wild dog catches hares, that
doesn't stop him from catching locusts
(proverb). Der wilde Hund fängt Hasen, das
hält ihn aber nicht davon ab, Heuschrecken zu
fangen (Sprichwort).
29/01/2026 248

gɛnɛgɛnɛ gɛrɛfɛmɔgɔ
gɛnɛgɛnɛ [ɛ̀-ɛ̀-ɛ́-ɛ́] bambara: gɛnɛngɛnɛn. gɛɲɛ [ɛ́] Verbe. 1 • fouetter; whip, flog, lash;
2
synonyme: funtenikuru, ngɛnɛngɛnɛ. Nom. peitschen, auspeitschen. N b'i gɛɲɛ sisan. Je
ganglion dû à une plaie; lymph node due to a vais te fouetter toute de suite. I'm going to
wound; Lymphknoten aufgrund einer Wunde. whip you right now. Ich werde dich jetzt
Category: Disease. auspeitschen.
gɛnɛnkala [ɛ̀-ɛ̀] variante: gɛlɛnkala. Nom. 1 • tibia; 2 • fouet, chicote, coup de fouet; whip,
whiplash; Peitsche.
shin-bone, shin, tibia; Schienbein, Wade. Ni i
gɛrɛ [ɛ̀] Jula: gwɛrɛ. variante: gara. Verbe.
ko : «Sogo tɛ n tɔɲɔgɔn gɛnɛkala la», i yɛrɛ
ta dogidogi. Si tu prétends que le tibia de ton approcher; approach, come closer; nähern. I
camarade n'est pas musclé, tâte un peu le tien gɛrɛ n na ! Approche-toi de moi ! Come closer
(proverbe). If you claim that your friend's shin to me! Komm näher zu mir!
is not muscular, feel yours a little (proverb). synonyme: delenkete, gwɛrɛ, madon, magɛrɛ,
Wenn Sie behaupten, daß das Schienbein Ihres sɔdon.
Freundes nicht muskulös ist, berühren Sie
Ihres ein wenig (Sprichwort). Category: Body. gɛrɛbaliya [ɛ̀-ɛ̀-à-ì] Nom. 1 • absence de relations,
synonyme: gɛlɛn, gwɛnɛkolonin, sannakolo, absence de contact; lack of relationships, lack
2
gwɛnɛkala, pelenpelen. of contact; Mangel an Beziehungen, Mangel
an Kontakt, Fehlen von Beziehungen. O
2 • patte (d'un oiseau); leg (of a bird); Bein
(eines Vogels). Category: Parts of an animal.
yɛrɛlabila dun sababu tɛ dɔwɛrɛ ye
denmisɛnw gɛrɛbaliya kɔ mɔgɔkɔrɔbaw la.
gɛnɛnkalajɛ [ɛ̀-ɛ̀-à-à] comparer: tɛgɛjɛ. Nom.
La cause de ce laisser-aller n'est rien d'autre
personne sans importance, moins que rien,
que l'absence de relations entre les jeunes et les
jean-foutre; unimportant person, less than
vieux. Die Ursache dieser Vernachlässigung
nothing; unwichtige Person, weniger als
ist nichts anderes als das Fehlen von
nichts.
Beziehungen zwischen Jung und Alt.
gɛngɛn [ɛ́] Verbe. faire paître, garder (les moutons, synonyme: gwɛrɛbaliya.
chèvres); graze, herd (sheep, goats); grasen 2 • distance; distance; Distanz, Abstand.
lassen, Herde hüten (Schafe, Ziegen). I tɛ se Denmisɛnw ka gɛrɛbaliya tun ye jatigɛ ye.
ka sagadenw gɛngɛn ! Tu ne sais même pas La distance qu’observaient les enfants était
faire paître des agneaux (proverbe). You don't due à leur crainte. The distance the children
even know how to shepherd lambs (proverb). observed was due to their fear. Die Distanz,
Du weißt nicht einmal, wie man Lämmer hütet die die Kinder einhielten, war auf ihre Angst
(Sprichwort). Category: Animal husbandry. zurückzuführen.
synonyme: gwɛngwɛn. gɛrɛfɛ [ɛ̀-ɛ́-ɛ̀] variante: kɛrɛfɛ. postp. 1 • à côté de,
gɛnnan [ɛ]́ variante: [gwɛnnan]. Nom. marteau; sur le côte; beside, at the side of; neben,
hammer; Hammer. synonyme: fulumɛ, beiseite, an der Seite von. Mɔgɔ bi tabali
nɛgɛgwɛsinnan, marito, mantaraka. gɛrɛfɛ. Quelqu'un est à côté de la table.
Somebody is beside the table. Jemand ist
gɛnni [ɛ]́ Nom. renvoi; dismissal; Entlassung.
neben dem Tisch. synonyme: kɛrɛfɛ.
gɛnnikɛla [ɛ́] Nom. pasteur, berger; shepherd; Hirte. 2 • en cachette; in hiding; versteckt.
Category: Animal husbandry. gɛrɛfɛbila n.comp. marginalisation; marginalization;
synonyme: bagangwɛnla.
Marginalisierung.
gɛɲɛ 1 [ɛ]̀ variante: [gwɛɲɛ], gɛnyɛ. Nom. presser, se gɛrɛfɛfɛn n adj. marginal; marginal; am Rande,
presser, brusquer; to hurry, to rush; sich marginal.
beeilen. Gɛɲɛ Ala ma bɛ na ni gajɔ ye, n'o tɛ
gɛrɛfɛla Nom. alentours, abords, proximité;
tile bɛ bin. C'est parce que tu es pressé que tu
surroundings, vicinity, outskirts, proximity;
te construis un auvent, mais de toute façon le
Umgebung, Umkreis, Gegend, Nähe.
soleil va se coucher (proverbe). It's because
synonyme: kɛrɛfɛla.
you're in a hurry that you build yourself a
canopy, but the sun is going to set anyway gɛrɛfɛmɔgɔ n.comp. marginalisé; marginalized;
(proverb). Weil man es eilig hat, baut man sich
marginalisiert.
eine Vordach, aber die Sonne geht sowieso
unter (Sprichwort).
29/01/2026 249

gɛrɛgɛrɛ gɛrɛntɛ
gɛrɛgɛrɛ [ɛ̀-ɛ́-ɛ̀-ɛ́] Nom. sans mélange, pur; unmixed, gɛrɛnbɔ Nom. écart, imprévu, détournement;
1
pure; unvermischt, rein. ɲɔ gɛrɛgɛrɛ mil sans deviation, diversion; Abweichung,
impuretés. millet without impurities. Hirse Missbrauch, Veruntreuung.
ohne Verunreinigungen. sogobu gɛrɛgɛrɛ gɛrɛngɛrɛn [ɛ̀-ɛ̀] variante: [gwɛrɛngwɛrɛn]. Verbe.
dɔrɔn rien que la viande pure. nothing but 1 • dessécher, sécher, durcir, figer, attacher; to
pure meat. nichts als reines Fleisch. dry out, to dry, to harden, to freeze, to attach;
synonyme: gwɛrɛgwɛrɛ. austrocknen, aushärten, einfrieren, anhaften.
1
Malo gɛrɛngɛrɛnna daga kɔnɔ. Le riz s'est
gɛrɛgɛrɛ [ɛ́] Nom. 1 • catastrophe, malheur (contre
2
désséché dans la marmite. The rice has dried
lequel on ne peut rien); catastrophe,
out in the pot. Der Reis ist im Topf
misfortune (against which we can do nothing);
ausgetrocknet.
Katastrophe, Unglück (gegen das wir nichts
tun können). Gɛrɛgɛrɛ cunna n kan. Une
2 • tarir, s'évaporer; dry up, evaporate;
austrocknen, verdunsten, verdampften. I bɛ
catastrophe est tombée sur moi. A disaster has
befallen me. Mir ist eine Katastrophe
sogo to a ka tobi fo a ji ka gɛrɛngɛrɛn. Tu
widerfahren. synonyme: gwɛrɛgwɛrɛ . laisses la viande cuire jusqu'à ce que l'eau s'est
2
évaporée. You let the meat cook until the water
2 • injustice, occasion qui provoque un
has evaporated. Sie lassen das Fleisch kochen,
malheur inattendu; injustice, occasion which
bis das Wasser verdampft ist.
causes unexpected misfortune;
Ungerechtigkeit, Anlaß, der unerwartetes gɛrɛngɛrɛnnin synonyme: sifilɛyirinin. Nom.
Unglück verursacht. An tora gɛrɛgɛrɛko la. cœurs-volants; kind of tree; Baumart.
Nous avons été punis pour les autres. We were Category: Tree. hymenocardia acida.
punished for the others. Wir wurden für die gɛrɛnin synonyme: kɛɛrɛn. variante: ngɛrɛnin. Nom.
anderen bestraft.
grillon; cricket; Grille. Category: Insect.
gɛrɛn 1 [ɛ-̀ ɛ́] variante: gɛrɛ, kɛrɛ. Nom. 1 • contour, synonyme: nkɛɛrɛn.
côté, flanc, arrête, latéral; edge, contour,
gɛrɛnnadarapo Nom. drapeau de coin; corner flag;
lateral; Umriss, Kante, Seite, seitlich.
Category: Mathematics. synonyme: kɛrɛ,
Eckflagge.
dakɔrɔla, lamini. gɛrɛnnajufa Nom. poche latérale; side pocket;
2 • flanc; flank, side; Flanke. Category: Parts Seitentasche. Category: Clothing.
of an animal. gɛrɛnnin synonyme: kɛlɛn. variante: gɛlɛnnin,
1
gɛrɛn [ɛ-̀ ɛ́] Nom. écureuil; squirrel; Eichhörnchen, gwɛlɛnnin. Nom. écureuil fouisseur, rat
2
Sonnenhörnchen. Category: Mammal. palmiste; striped ground squirrel;
gɛrɛn [ɛ-̀ ɛ́] Nom. triangle; triangle; Dreieck.
Sonnenhörnchen. Category: Mammal. xerus
3 erythropus.
Category: Mathematics. synonyme: kɛrɛsaba.
gɛrɛnnin Nom. condensation; condensation;
2
gɛrɛn
4
[ɛ]̀ variante: [gwɛrɛn]. Verbe. tarir, évaporer,
Kondensation, Verdichtung.
se dessécher, rendre solide; evaporate, dry up,
gɛrɛnsaba Morphemes: gkɛrɛn-saba. Nom. triangle;
make solid; verdunsten, austrocknen, fest
machen. Kɔji gɛrɛnna. L'eau du fleuve a tari. triangle; Dreieck. Category: Mathematics.
The water in the river has dried up. Das
synonyme: kɛrɛsaba, selekesaba.
Wasser im Fluß ist ausgetrocknet. Dɛgɛrɛ 0 gɛrɛntɛ [ɛ̀-ɛ̀] variante: [gwɛrɛntɛ]. 1 • Verbe. serrer,
hakɛ de bɛ ji gɛrɛn ka a kɛ gilasi. A 0 degré, presser, coincer; squeeze, jam, stuck; drücken,
l'eau devient de la glace. At 0 degrees, water einklemmen. ... ka a wisi gɛrɛntɛ. ... et serrer
becomes ice. Bei 0 Grad wird Wasser zu Eis. la vis. ...and tighten the screw.
gɛrɛn [ɛ]́ variante: [gwɛrɛn]. Verbe. 1 • teindre en synonyme: ferun.
5
ocre; dye ocher; Ocker färben. Finin donna 2 • Verbe. ennuyer, mettre dans l'embarras; to
gɛrɛn la. Le tissu a été teint à l'ocre. The fabric
annoy, to embarrass; ärgern, in Verlegenheit
bringen. Sagokɛla fila tɛ gɛrɛntɛ. Deux
has been dyed with ocher. Der Stoff wurde mit
Ocker gefärbt.
personnes qui s'entendent ne sont jamais un
gêne l'une pour l'autre (proverbe). Two people
2 • couleur ocre; ochre colour; ockerfarbene
who get along are never a nuisance to each
Farbe. Category: colour.
other (proverb). Zwei Menschen, die
gɛrɛn na See main entry: . postp. près de, à côté de; next miteinander auskommen, sind einander nie ein
to, close to; neben, an der Seite von. Ärgernis (Sprichwort).
3 • Verbe. angoisser; to worry; Sorgen machen,
besorgt sein.
29/01/2026 250

gɛrɛntɛgɛ girigara
4 • Nom. difficultés, ennuis, pression, obstacle; giliki comparer: bagigwɛ. variante: giliki. Nom.
difficulties, troubles, pressure, obstacle;
acacia des ouds, arbre (espèce); tree sp;
Schwierigkeiten, Probleme, Druck, Hindernis.
Baumart. Category: Tree. acacia sieberiana.
... o gɛrɛntɛw bɛ Afriki kan ... ... ces
synonyme: nsajɛba.
difficultés pèsent sur l’Afrique ... ...these
difficulties weigh on Africa... ...diese Ginɛbiso Nom. Guinée Bissau; Guinea Bissau; Guinea
Schwierigkeiten lasten auf Afrika... Bissau. Category: Country.
gɛrɛntɛgɛ [ɛ̀-ɛ̀] variante: [gwɛrɛntɛgɛ]. Verbe. gingin [ĩ̀-ĩ́] comparer: gelu. variante: gwingwin.
1 • terrasser violemment, renverser Nom. chouette, hibou, rapace nocturne; owl,
violemment, culbuter; to overthrow violently, nocturnal bird of prey; Eule, Kauz,
to overturn; gewaltsam stürzen, stürzen. A nachtaktiver Greifvogel. Subaga seere tɛ
tirintira bɔgɔ la ka a gɛrɛntɛgɛ dugu ma. Il gingin ye. Le hibou ne peut pas témoigner en
glissa dans la boue et culbuta sur le sol. He faveur du sorcier (proverbe). The owl cannot
slipped in the mud and fell to the ground. Er testify in favor of the sorcerer (proverb). Die
rutschte im Schlamm aus und fiel zu Boden. Eule kann nicht zugunsten des Zauberers
2 • gauler (des fruits); get down fruits from a aussagen (Sprichwort). Category: Bird.
tree; vom Baum herunterschütten (Frucht).
gingɔn [ì] variante: jingɔn. Verbe. tomber de
gɛrɛntilannan Nom. médiane; middle line; sommeil, sommeiller, s'assoupir; fall asleep,
Mittellinie. Category: Mathematics. doze off; einschlafen. A bɛ gingɔn baroda la.
synonyme: camancɛci, cɛmata. Il s'assoupit pendant la causerie. He dozed off
during the talk. Während des Gesprächs
gɛsɛ [ɛ]̀ variante: gese. Verbe. passer (pour une
1 schlief er ein.
couleur), déteindre; pass (for a colour), fade;
blaß werde (für eine Farbe), verblassen. A ɲɛ
ginigini [í] Verbe. trembler; tremble, shake, shiver;
gɛsɛra. La couleur a passé. The colour has zittern. Ni dɔn bɛ kɛ, dugukolo bɛ ginigini.
faded. Die Farbe ist verblaßt. Quand on danse, le sol tremble. When we
dance, the ground shakes. Wenn wir tanzen,
gɛsɛ
2
[ɛ]́ variante: [gwɛsɛ]. Nom. brosse à dents,
bebt der Boden.
frotte-dents; toothbrush; Zahnbürste. Gɛsɛ tɛ
gintan variante: ginda. Nom. 1 • réjouissance, fête;
wulu fɛ, nka a ɲin jɛlen bɛ. Le chien n'a pas
rejoicing, gladness, celebration, feast; Freude,
de brosse à dents, pourtant ses dent sont
Fest, Feier, Feierlichkeit. Ala kana jeli to
blanches. (proverbe). The dog doesn't have a
gintan na, gintan dun tɛ fɔ a kɔ. Que Dieu
toothbrush, but his teeth are white.
(proverb). Der Hund hat keine Zahnbürste,
ne fasse périr le griot pendant la fête, car pas de
aber seine Zähne sind weiß. (Sprichwort). fête sans griot (proverbe). May God not cause
fatɔ gɛsɛ cigarette (littéralement : «brosse à
the griot to perish during the festival, because
no festival without a griot (proverb). Möge
dents du fou»). cigarette (literally: “fool’s
Gott den Griot Sänger während des Festes
toothbrush”). Zigarette (wörtlich:
nicht sterben lassen, denn kein Fest ohne Griot
„Narrenzahnbürste“). synonyme: gwɛsɛ ,
2 Sänger (Sprichwort).
ɲinjɔsilan.
2 • grande foule; big crowd; große
gɛyin variante: goyin. Nom. liane-caoutchouc; kind of Menschenmenge.
liana; Liane (Art). Category: Grass, herb, gintanba variante: gintan. Nom. grande fête,
vine. landolphia heudelotii.
cérémonie; celebration, festival, ceremony, big
gidigidi [í-í-í-í] variante: girigiri. Adverbe. 1 • bruit event; Fest, Feier, Zelebrierung, Zeremonie,
de pas rapide; noise of quick steps; Lärm von grosser Anlass. Bolokoli ye gintanba ye
schnellen Schritten. dugu kɔnɔ. La circoncision est une grande
2 • bruit de course; running noise; fête dans le village. Circumcision is a big
Laufgeräusch. A bɛ boli gidigidi ! Il court à ceremony in the village. Die Beschneidung ist
toute allure ! He's running at full speed! Er
eine grosse Zeremonie im Dorf.
läuft auf Hochtouren! girigara [ì-ì] 1 • Verbe. se précipiter dans toutes les
3 • bruit sec et répété; sharp and repeated directions sous le coup de l’affolement;
noise; scharfes und wiederholtes Geräusch. rushing in all directions in panic; in Panik in
gidɔrɔn Etym: français. Emprunt de : français. Nom. alle Richtungen rennen. A y'i girigara k'i kɛ
bitume; tarmac, asphalt; Teer, Asphalt. Adama kan. Il se jeta, affolé, sur Adama. He
threw himself, panicked, at Adama. Er warf
gilasiyɛri Emprunt de : français. Nom. glacière;
sich panisch auf Adama.
cool-box, cooler, ice chest; Kühlbox.
Category: Container.
29/01/2026 251

girin gitari
2 • Verbe. effectuer des gestes violents non 3 • activité; activity, action; Aktivität. ... ka
contrôles; carrying out uncontrolled violent tile girinkajɔ daminɛ ... ... démarrer les
actions; Durchführung unkontrollierter
activités de la journée ... ...start the day's
Gewalttaten.
activities... ...beginnen Sie mit den
3 • Verbe. se bagarrer; to fight; kämpfen. Aktivitäten des Tages...
4 • Nom. problème compliqué, turbulences,
girinman [í] Nom. lourd, solide, important; heavy,
troubles, agitation; complicated problem,
turbulence, unrest, agitation; kompliziertes solid, important; schwer, solide, robust, stark,
Problem, Turbulenzen, Unruhe, Aufregung. wichtig. Doni girinman. Une charge lourde. A
Diɲɛnatigɛ n'a girigarakow la vie et ses heavy burden. Eine schwere Last.
problèmes. life and its problems. das Leben girinti 1 • Verbe. éructer, roter, provoquer des rots;
und seine Probleme.
belch, burp; rülpsen. A ye nɔnɔ di faama ma,
girin 1 [í-í] variante: giringirin. 1 • vi. se dépêcher, a y'a min, a girintira. Il donna le lait au roi,
se précipiter, galoper, accélérer, presser; rush, celui-ci le but, et rota. He gave the milk to the
accelerate; beeilen, hetzen, beschleunigen. A king, who drank it and burped. Er gab die
girinna ka taga fɔ mɔgɔw ye ko a kɔrɔcɛ Milch dem König, der sie trank und rülpste.
sara. Il s’est dépêché de dire aux gens que son synonyme: girindi.
frère aîné était mort. He rushed to tell people 2 • Nom. rot; the burp; das Rülpsen.
that his brother had died. Er hat sich beeilt um girinya [í-í-á] 1 • Verbe. être lourd, devenir lourd,
den Leuten zu sagen, dass sein Bruder
peser; be or become heavy, weigh, weigh up;
gestorben ist. synonyme: wurawura .
1 schwer sein, wiegen. Ni o girinyara ni n ye ...
2 • Nom. précipitation, fuite, ruée;
Si c'est plus lourd que moi ... If it's heavier
precipitation, rush, haste, escape; Eile,
than me... Wenn es schwerer ist als ich...
Ansturm, Flucht. Girin dabɔra dɛ ! La fuite
2 • Verbe. avoir de la valeur, avoir des
éperdue commença ! The frantic flight began!
connaissances; have value, have knowledge;
Die hektische Flucht begann!
großen Wert haben, große Kenntnisse haben.
girin [í-í] adj. lourd, important, grave, épais; heavy, N'a ma girinya ne ma, ne tɛ girinya a ma.
2
important, serious, thick; schwer, wichtig, S'il n'a pas plus de connaissances que moi, il
ernsthaft, dick. Dannaya doni ka girin. La n'en a pas moins. If he doesn't have more
knowledge than me, he doesn't have less.
confiance est une charge lourde à porter
(proverbe). Trust is a heavy load to carry
Wenn er nicht mehr Wissen hat als ich, hat er
(proverb). Vertrauen ist eine schwere Last
nicht weniger.
(Sprichwort). birifinin girin une couverture 3 • Nom. poids, lourdeur; weight, heaviness;
épaisse. a thick blanket. eine dicke Decke. Gewicht, Schwere. Mɔgɔ min girinya ye kilo
72 ye ... Un homme dont le poids est de 72
girindi [ì-ì-í] Verbe. 1 • roter, éructer; belch, burp;
kilos ... A man whose weight is 72 kilos... Ein
rülpsen. synonyme: girinti.
Mann, der 72 Kilo wiegt...
2 • rôt (action), rot; burp; Rülpsen, Rülps, giriwu [í] Adverbe. chute violent; violent fall; heftiger
Rülpser, Aufstossen.
Sturz. Sanji ye so bin giriwu ! La pluie a fait
giringirin [í] Verbe. 1 • se précipiter, s'enfuir; rush, do
s'écrouler la maison ! The rain made the house
hastily, run away; eilen, weglaufen, überstürzt collapse! Der Regen ließ das Haus einstürzen!
macht. ... mɔgɔ ka kan ka i cogo dɔn a ko
gita [ì-á] variante: gitafilen. Nom. calebasse pour
giringirin la. ... il faut faire attention à ne pas 1
musique; calabash used for music;
faire cela à la hâte. ...you have to be careful
Musik-Kalebasse. U tun bɛ danbe fɔ a la, ni
not to do this hastily. ...man muß aufpassen,
daß man das nicht überstürzt macht. ka laban ka gita fɔ... Ils chantèrent son
courage, puis ils jouèrent de la calebasse ...
2 • fuite, précipitation, agitation; flight,
They sang of his courage, then they played the
precipitation, agitation; Flucht, Hektik,
Aufregung, Eile. Furuko tɛ giringirin koyi !
calabash... Sie besangen seinen Mut, dann
spielten sie die Kalebasse ... Category: Musical
On ne se marie pas dans la précipitation ! We
instrument.
don't get married in a hurry! Wir heiraten
nicht in Eile! gita [ì-á] Nom. castagnettes calebasse; calabash
2
girinkajɔ [í] Nom. 1 • émeute, insurrection; riot, castanets; Kastagnette aus Kalebasse.
Category: Musical instrument.
insurrection; Aufruhr, Aufstand.
2 • manifestation; demonstration; gitari Emprunt de : français. Nom. guitare; guitar;
Demonstration. Gitarre. Category: Musical instrument.
29/01/2026 252

gitarijatan golo
gitarijatan Nom. guitare acoustique; acoustic guitar; godo [ó] variante: godon. Adverbe. gros et rond,
2
akustische Gitarre. Category: Musical globuleux, exorbité (yeux); large and round,
instrument. bulging (eyes); groß und rund, kugelig,
giwu Adverbe. très fort (cri), strident; very loud hervortretend (Augen). A ɲɛ ka kunba godo !
Il a des yeux globuleux ! He has bulging eyes!
(scream), shrill; sehr laut (schreien). O kulela
Er hat große Augen!
giwu ! Il cria très fort ! He shouted very
loudly! Er schrie sehr laut!
godogodo [ò-ò] Verbe. faire un bruit métallique
(bicyclette, charrette); make a metallic noise
go [ó] variante: ko. adj.pred. désagréable,
1 (bicycle, cart); ein metallisches Geräusch
mauvais, difficile, rare; unpleasant, difficult, machen (Fahrrad, Karren). A godogodokan
bad, rare; unangenehm, schwierig, übel,
bɛ mɔgɔ tɔɔrɔ. Le bruit métallique que cela
schlecht, böse, selten. A hakili ka go. Il est
fait dérange les gens. The metallic noise it
stupide. Il n’est pas intelligent. He is stupid.
makes bothers people. Das metallische
He is not intelligent. Er ist dumm. Er ist nicht
Geräusch, das es verursacht, stört die
intelligent. a kɛ ka go c'est difficile à faire.
Menschen.
it's difficult to do. es ist schwierig zu tun. ...
gofɛrɛnɛman bambara: gɔfɛrɛnaman. Emprunt de
baara min ka gɛlɛn, n'a kɛ ka go ... ... un
: français. Nom. gouvernement; government;
travail qui est difficile à faire ... ...a job that is
difficult to do... ...eine Arbeit, die schwierig zu
Regierung. Category: Government.
erledigen ist... daga kasa go un canari à
synonyme: guvɛrɛnɛman.
l'odeur désagréable. a container with an gogoro [ó-ó-ó] Nom. 1 • cadenas; padlock;
unpleasant odour. ein Topf mit einem Vorhängeschloss, Schloss.
unangenehmen Geruch.
2 • clef (au sens figuré); key (figuratively);
go 2 Nom. plante (espèce), pois sabre; plant sp; Schlüssel (im übertragenen Sinne). ... jamana
Pflanzenart. Category: Grass, herb, vine. in kodɔngogoro bɛ olu de bolo. ... c'est entre
canavalia ensiformis. leur mains que se trouvent les clefs du savoir
go [ò] Jula: goo. variante: goo, gona. Nom. de ce pays. ... it is in their hands that the keys
3
to knowledge of this country are found. ... in
petit(e) ami(e), copain, copine, jeune homme
ihren Händen liegen die Schlüssel zum Wissen
ou jeune fille séduisant(e); girlfriend,
über dieses Land.
boyfriend, school-friend; Freund oder
Freundin, Kumpan, Kumpel. synonyme: gona. gojogojo [ó] Nom. 1 • être en très bonne forme, bien
go [ó] variante: gogo, gogowu. Adverbe. avec
portant, en bonne santé, robuste, solide, bien
4 dur; be in very good form, solid, well; in sehr
un bruit sec; with a sharp noise; mit einem
guter Form sein, in guter Verfassung. I bi
scharfen Geräusch. ka da tugu go ! fermer
gojogojo wa ? Tu es en bonne forme ? Are
une porte, vlan ! close a door, wham! Mach
you in good form? Are you in good shape? Bist
eine Tür zu, wham!
du in guter Verfassung? A ɲin bɛ gojogojo ! Il
goba [ó-á] Nom. singe vert; green Monkey; grüner
a de bonnes dents ! He has good teeth! Er hat
Affe. Category: Mammal. gute Zähne!
synonyme: ngobanin. 2 • bien mûr; very ripe; sehr reif. A kɔgɔlen
gobi Nom. module; module, unit; Bauelement, don gojogojo ! C'est bien mûr ! It's very ripe!
Modul. Es ist sehr reif!
godo variante: godon. Verbe. activer, mettre en goko [ò] Nom. espèce d'herbe; kind of grass,
1
émoi; enable, activate, to stir up; aktivieren, switch-grass; Rispengras, Rutenhirse.
entfachen, aufrütteln. ka mobili godo faire Category: Grass, herb, vine. panicum
filer une voiture. make a car spin; have a car
anabaptismus.
run at full speed. ein Auto auf Hochtouren goli Emprunt de : français. Nom. goal (football);
treiben. Dɔgɔ jalan, fura jalan, bin jalan, án goal (football); Tor (Fussball). synonyme: celi.
y'a sogolon ɲɔgɔn kan ka tasuma godo.
goliye Emprunt de : anglais. Nom. gardien de but;
Nous avons entassé du bois, des branches et de
goalkeeper; Torwart, Torhüter.
l'herbe, le tout bien sec, et nous avons activé le
feu dessous. We piled up wood, branches and synonyme: jɔlakanana, jɔkɔlɔsibaga.
grass, all dry, and lit the fire underneath. Wir golo [ò-ó] Nom. 1 • peau d’une personne ou d’un
1
stapelten Holz, Äste und Gras, alles trocken,
animal; skin of human or animal; Haut (von
und zündeten darunter das Feuer an.
Mensch oder Tier). Category: Body.
synonyme: wolo .
4
29/01/2026 253

golo gomiji
2 • cuir; leather; Leder. gologala [ó] Nom. à toute allure; at full speed,
golo Nom. plante (espèce), herbe à chevaux; plant top-speed; auf Hochtouren, mit voller
2
sp; Pflanzenart. Category: Grass, herb, vine. Geschwindigkeit. Donsokɛ n'a ka npalan ni
pennisetum pedicellatum. marifa, a bɛ taa gologala. Le chasseur
golo sanfɛla Nom. épiderme; skin epidermis; malgré sa besace et son fusil, il allait à toute
Oberhaut. Category: Body.
allure. The hunter, despite his bag and his
rifle, went at full speed. Der Jäger, trotz seiner
goloba variante: golobasa, galabasa. 1 • Verbe. se Tasche und seines Gewehrs, ging er mit voller
précipiter, se presser, faire vivement; to push Geschwindigkeit.
off, throw; hinunterstürzen. Mɔgɔ golobara golojukɔrɔla Nom. derme; dermis; Dermis.
k'a n'a den kunbɛn. Les gens se précipitèrent
Category: Body.
pour l'accueillir, elle et son enfant. People
rushed to welcome her and her child. Die
golokami synonyme: gɛɲɛ. Nom. fouet; whip; Peitsche.
Leute strömten herbei, um sie und ihr Kind golokoto [ó] Adverbe. gros et rond (pour un bouton,
willkommen zu heißen.
par exemple); big and round (for a button, for
2 • Verbe. s'animer, donner un rythme vif; come example); groß und rund (zum Beispiel für
alive, give a lively rhythm; lebhaft gestalten,
einen Knopf). Kuru b'a sen la golokoto. / A
einen lebendigen Rhythmus geben. Ɲɛnajɛ
sen kurula golokoto. Il a un gros bouton sur
golobara, dunun golobara. Les
le pied. He has a big pimple on his foot. Er hat
réjouissances se sont animées, le tambour s'est
ein großes Pickel am Fuß..
animé. The celebrations became lively, the
drums came alive. Die Feierlichkeiten wurden goloma [ò-ò] Nom. en cuir; made of leather; ledern,
lebhaft, die Trommeln erklangen. aus Leder. Samara golomaw Chaussures en
3 • Nom. agitation; agitation; Aufregung. O cuir. Leather shoes. Lederschuhe.
goloba bɛ sen na. C'est cette agitation golomuso Nom. espèce d'arbre; kind of tree;
actuelle qui nous occupe. It is this current Baumart. Category: Tree. albizia
agitation that concerns us. Es ist diese aktuelle malacophylla.
Aufregung, die uns beunruhigt.
golonugunin Nom. amphibien; amphibian;
golobaara Nom. cordonnerie; shoemaking, cobbler;
Amphibie. Category: Amphibian.
Schuhmacherei. Category: Worker,
occupation.
golosira Nom. voie cutanée; penetrating the skin,
transdermal; durch die Haut eindringen.
golobe variante: ngolobe. Nom. arbre (espèce),
1
kinkéliba; tree sp; Baumart. Category: Tree.
golotigi n.comp. porteur d'uniforme (militaire ou
combretum micrathum. paramilitaire); person wearing an uniform
(e.g. military); Uniformierter.
golobe Nom. arbre (espèce); tree sp; Baumart.
2 synonyme: golo-bɛ-n-sen-na.
Category: Tree.
goman [ó-á] Nom. mauvais, désagréable, difficile, très
golo-bɛ-n-sen-na Nom. toute personne portant un
forte odeur; bad, bad smell, unpleasant;
uniforme : policier, soldat, douanier, milicien
schlecht, unangenehm. Kɔngɔtɔ tɛ dumini
... (populaire); any person wearing a
goman dɔn. Il n'est pas de mauvaise
uniform: policeman, soldier, customs officer,
militiaman... (popular); jede Person, die eine nourriture pour l'affamé (proverbe). There is
Uniform trägt: Polizist, Soldat, Zollbeamter... no bad food for the hungry (proverb). Für
(beliebt). Category: Government, Worker, Hungrige gibt es kein schlechtes Essen
occupation. synonyme: golotigi. (Sprichwort). kasa goman mauvaise odeur.
bad smell. schlechter Geruch.
golobolikabin synonyme: ŋolokunba.
gomi [ó-í] [ó] Emprunt de : français. Nom.
variante: golokunba. Nom. Œdicnème du
Sénégal; Senegal thick-knee; Senegaltriel.
1 • amidon, empois; starch; Stärke, Tauchbad.
Category: Bird. burhinus senegalensis.
gomiji bain d'empois où est plongé le tissu.
The bath in which the fabric is immersed.
golocɛ [ò-ò-ɛ́] Nom. espèce d'arbre; kind of tree;
Tauchbad, in das der Stoff eingetaucht wird.
Baumart. Category: Tree. albizia chevalieri.
2 • gomme (pour l'encens); gum (for incense);
Gummi (für Weihrauch).
gomiji variante: gomi. n.comp. rosée; dew; Tau.
Category: Water. synonyme: ngomi.
29/01/2026 254

gona goro
gona [ó] variante: gonash. Nom. petite amie, goninjɛ Jula: goningwɛ. Morphemes: gonin-jɛ. Nom.
copine, fille (populaire); girlfriend; Freundin, espèce de poisson; kind of fish; Fischart.
Mädchen (beliebt). Gona fosi tɛ n bolo sisan. Category: Fish. synodontis clarias.
Je n'ai aucune copine en ce moment. I don't gonitalan [ò-ì-à] Nom. thermomètre; thermometer;
have any girlfriends at the moment. Ich habe
Thermometer. Gonitalan bɛ fɛnw goniya jira.
im Moment keine Freundinnen. synonyme: go.
3
Le thermomètre mesure la chaleur des choses.
gonbo [ò] variante: gunbo. Nom. ventouse; suction The thermometer measures the heat of things.
cup, sucker; Saugnapf. Ka cinnida joli bɔ, k'a Das Thermometer mißt die Wärme von
Dingen. synonyme: gwaniyatalan,
lasama ni lasamanan ye, i na a fɔ hawusaw
ka gonbo. Aspirer le sang de la morsure avec
degɛrɛsumalan.
une ventouse, comme par exemple les goniya [ò-ì] 1 • Verbe. être ou devenir chaud, chauffer;
ventouses des Haoussa. Suction the blood to be or become hot, to heat; heiß sein oder
from the bite with a suction cup, such as the werden, erhitzen. Musokɔrɔnin ye ji goniya.
Hausa suction cups. Saugen Sie das Blut mit
La petite vieille fit chauffer l'eau. The little old
einem Saugnapf, beispielsweise den
woman heated the water. Die kleine alte Frau
Hausa-Saugnäpfen, aus der Bißstelle ab.
erhitzte das Wasser.
Category: Treat disease.
synonyme: lasamanan.
2 • Verbe. hâter, accélérer, se presser; hasten,
speed up; beeilen, beschleunigen. Fɛn min bɛ
gongan 1 [ò-á] Nom. cloche; bell; Glocke. mɔgɔ senta goniya, o b'i data goniya. Ce
synonyme: talan 2 . qui fait se hâter le pied fait aussi hâter la
gongan [ò-á] variante: gangan, gɔngan, gɔngɔn.
bouche (proverbe). What makes the foot hasten
2 also makes the mouth hasten (proverb). Was
Nom. zébu; zebu; Zebu. Category: Animal
den Fuß zur Eile bringt, läßt auch den Mund
husbandry. synonyme: tɛmɛ 3 . zur Eile werden (Sprichwort).
gongolima variante: gongoloma, konkolima. Verbe. 3 • Nom. chaleur, empressement; warmth,
eagerness; Wärme, Eifer. goniyahakɛ
1 • haut, élevé, surélevé; high, lifted up; hoch,
erhöht, erhoben. A ka so jɔyɔrɔ, a température. temperature. Temperatur.
gongolimalen don. Sa maison est placée sur goniyahakɛtanan Nom. thermomètre médicale;
un endroit élevé. His house is placed on a high clinical thermometer; Fieberthermometer.
place. Sein Haus steht auf einer Anhöhe. Category: Treat disease, Tool.
2 • grosseur, protubérance; lump, synonyme: degɛrɛsumalan.
protuberance; Beule, Ausstülpung. A sen
gontan [ó] Verbe. meugler, beugler, faire du bruit
fununa fo ka a gongolima wuli. Son pied est
(machines); to low, to moo, make noise
enflé au point de faire une protubérance. His
(machine); brüllen, muhen, lärmen
foot is swollen to the point of protrusion. Sein
(Maschine). nturaw gontankan. Le
Fuß ist so stark geschwollen, daß er
meuglement des bœufs. The lowing of the
hervorsteht. Category: Disease.
cows. Das Brüllen der Kühe. mansinw
gongon [ó] Nom. bidon, seau, touque, récipient
gontankan le bruit des machines. the noise of
métallique; can, bucket, metal container;
the machines. der Lärm der Maschinen.
Dose, Eimer, Metallbehälter.
Category: Container. goolo Nom. espèce d'herbe; kind of grass; Grasart.
goni [ò] 1 • adj. chaud, brûlant, ardent; hot, burning,
Category: Grass, herb, vine. setaria pallidi
fusca.
fiery; heiß, brennend, feurig. Tile ka goni ...
goro [ò] variante: goron. vi. 1 • frotter, essuyer;
Le soleil est brûlant ... The sun is burning... 1
Die Sonne brennt... synonyme: gwan. rub, scrub, to dry; reiben, frottieren, trocknen,
1
schrubben. ka finin goro frotter du linge.
2 • adj. rapide; fast. rapid, quick; schnell.
scrub laundry. Wäsche schrubben.
taama goni une marche rapide. a brisk walk.
ein schneller Gang.
2 • éduquer sévèrement; educate severely;
streng zurechtweisen. U y'a goro bi dɛ ! Ils
3 • Nom. braises, feu; embers, fire; Glut, Feuer.
l'ont sévèrement corrigé aujourd'hui. They
A ba taara goni ci. Sa mère est parti allumer
corrected him severely today. Sie haben ihn
du feu. His mother went to light a fire. Seine
heute stark zurechtgewiesen.
Mutter ging, um ein Feuer anzuzünden.
synonyme: lakuru.
3
goniman [ò-ì] Nom. chaud, brûlant; hot, burning;
heiß, brennend. ji goniman eau chaude. hot
water. heißes Wasser. synonyme: gwanniman.
29/01/2026 255

goro gosinan
3 • frapper, rosser, se ruer sur; to strike, to 2 • vt. confectionner (des briques), construire;
thrash, to rush; schlagen, sich stürzen auf. U to make bricks, build, construct; Ziegelsteine
y'u toron a kan goro. Ils se sont rués sur lui anfertigen, bauen. U ye nbɛri gosi dugu
avec force. They rushed at him with force. Sie donda la. Ils ont construit un mur contre la
stürzten sich mit Gewalt auf ihn. crue à l'entrée du village. They built a flood
goro [ó] Nom. 1 • bouton (sur la peau); pimple (on
barrier at the entrance of the village. Sie
2 haben eine Flutmauer am Eingang des Dorfes
the skin); Pickel (auf der Haut). Goro b'a fari
gebaut.
la. Il a des boutons sur la peau. He has pimples 3 • vt. couvrir (une femelle); cover (a female);
on his skin. Er hat Pickel auf der Haut. ein Weibchen decken. A ka ntura ye n ka
2 • eczéma; eczema; Ekzem. misimuso gosi ... Son taureau a couvert ma
Category: Disease.
vache ... His bull covered my cow ... Sein Stier
gorobinɛ [ò-ò-ɔ́-ɛ́] Emprunt de : français : gros hat meine Kuh gedeckt ...
bonnet. synonyme: kiriki. variante: gorobinɛ, 4 • vt. castrer; castrate; kastrieren. Ntura in
gorominɛ. Nom. grande dame, personne très gosilen don. Ce taureau est castré. This bull is
haute placée (dont la position sociale se castrated. Der Stier ist kastriert.
montre par l'élégance de la tenue); important synonyme: kɔgosi.
lady, person with very high status; große
5 • Nom. coup; blow; Schlag. O ka gosi a bɛ
Dame, Person mit sehr hohem Status.
mɔgɔ fila faga. A chacun de ses coups, il tue
gorobinɛ ni fayida à la grande dame
deux hommes. At each of his blows, he kills
l'élégance. to the great lady elegance. Der
two men. Bei jedem Schlag tötet er zwei
großen Dame die Eleganz.
Männer.
gorogara [ó] variante: girigara. Adverbe. en grand
gosi variante: gɔsi. vt. secouer; shake; schütteln,
2
nombre (pour des boutons); in large number
rütteln. Ni mɔgɔ ma tuu gosi i t'a kɔnɔna ko
(for pimples); in großer Zahl (für Pickel). Kuru
dɔn. Proverbe: Si tu ne secoues pas le buisson,
bɔra a ɲɛda la gorogara ! Il lui est sorti des
tu ne sais pas ce qu'il y a à l'intérieur. Proverb:
boutons très nombreux sur le visage ! He has
If you don't shake the bush, you don't know
many pimples on his face! Er hat sehr viele
what is in it. Sprichwort: Wenn du den Strauch
Pickel im Gesicht!
nicht rüttelst, weisst du nicht was darin ist.
gorogoro Nom. espèce d'arbre; kind of tree; Baumart.
gosi variante: gɔsi. Verbe. battre; beat, thresh;
3
Category: Tree. acacia polyacantha.
schlagen, dreschen.
goron [ó] Verbe. presser, tasser, écraser; squeeze,
gosibere Nom. fléau; flail; Dreschflegel. Gosiberew
pack, crush; drücken, quetschen,
bɛ gende la. Les fléaux sont sur l'aire de
zerquetschen, zerdrücken. Kana n goron sa !
battage. The flails are on the threshing floor.
Ne m'écrase donc pas ! So don't crush me!
Die Dreschflegel sind auf dem Dreschen-platz.
Also zerquetsche mich nicht!
Category: Agricultural tool.
gorongo [ò-ò-ó] variante: sagorongo, goroŋo.
gosigosi [ò-í-ò-í] Verbe. 1 • tapoter, frapper a petits
Nom. naja, cobra cracheur, serpent cracheur;
coups; tap, pat; klopfen, leicht schlagen.
spitting cobra; Kobra Schlange.
Category: Reptile. synonyme: nkorongo .
2 • coup, battement; hit, beat, blow; Schlag. Ni
2
i y'i bolo da mɔgɔ dusu kan, i bɛ dusukun
gorongobilen Nom. serpent cracheur, naja haje, naja
gosigosi mankan mɛn ... Si l'on place la
rouge; red spitting cobra; Schlangenart, Kobra
main à l'endroit du cœur, on entend ses
Schlange, Giftnatter. Category: Reptile. naja
battements... If I place my hand over the heart,
haje. synonyme: nkorongo
2
.
we can hear its beating... Wenn ich die Hand
gosi [ò-ì] variante: gɔsi. 1 • vt. battre, frapper, an der Stelle des Herzens plaziere, spüre ich
1
die Schläge ...
jouer (du tambour), picorer; beat, thresh, peck;
schlagen, dreschen, picken. ka dunun gosi gosilan [ò-ì] Nom. 1 • battoir; beater; Schläger.
jouer du tambour. play the drum. trommeln. Category: Tool.
ka ɲɔ gosi battre le mil. thresh the millet. 2 • fléau; flail; Dreschflegel.
Hirse dreschen.
gosilanba [ò-ì-à] Nom. planche à repasser; ironing
board; Bügelbrett.
gosinan Nom. fouet; whisk; Schneebesen,
Handrührgerät, Schwingbesen. Category: Tool.
29/01/2026 256

gosonbara gɔngɔn
gosonbara variante: gɔsɔnbara, gɔsɔkɔ. Nom. sistre gɔlɔn [ɔ̀-ɔ ̀] variante: gɔngɔlɔ, ngɔlɔn. vt. se tordre,
/crécelle fait de morceaux de calebasse ; déformer, défoncer; bend, deform; biegen,
sistrum / rattle made of calabash pieces on a neigen, krümmen, verformen, entstellen,
stick; Handrassel. Category: Musical verdrehen. A ma gɔlɔn, a tilennen don ... Il
instrument. synonyme: nkosonbara. n'est pas tordu, il est bien droit ... It’s not
goya [ó-á] Verbe. 1 • être désagréable, mauvais,
crooked, it’s straight ... Er ist nicht verdreht,
sondern gerade ... ka da gɔlɔn défoncer la
défavorable, difficile; to be unpleasant, bad,
porte. break down the door. die Tür
difficult; unangenehm sein, schlecht sein,
schwierig sein. Ni i yedu duman denw ye
einschlagen. synonyme: gɔnti.
ɲɔgɔnkɔrɔfɔ la, o ye du duman goyalen ye. gɔmɛ 1 [ɔ̀] Nom. petit tabouret très bas des femmes;
Lorsque les enfants d'une bonne maison se small stool for women; niedriger Hocker der
querellent, c'est signe que cette bonne maison Frauen. A ye gɔmɛ ta k'i sigi o kan. Elle prit
est en train de devenir mauvaise (proverbe). le tabouret et s'assit dessus. She took the stool
When the children of a good house quarrel, it and sat on it. Sie nahm den Hocker und setzte
is a sign that this good house is becoming bad sich darauf. synonyme: kurun .
1
(proverb). Wenn die Kinder eines guten
Hauses streiten, ist das ein Zeichen dafür, daß gɔmɛ 2 [ɔ̀] Verbe. donner un petit coup brusque; give a
dieses gute Haus schlecht wird (Sprichwort). little sudden blow; gib einen kleinen,
2 • déplaire, se gâter, gâcher; displease, spoil, plötzlichen Schlag geben. Sagajigi y'a gɔmɛ.
ruin; mißfallen, verderben, ruinieren. O Le bélier lui a donné un coup de corne. The
goyara filanan ye ... Cela déplut au second ... ram gave him a blow with its horn. Der
This displeased the second... Das mißfiel
Widder versetzte ihm einen Schlag mit seinem
dem zweiten... O de ye ne ka dugutaa goya.
Horn.
C'est ce qui a gâché mon voyage. This is what gɔmu Emprunt de : français. Nom. gomme; eraser,
ruined my trip. Das hat meine Reise ruiniert. rubber; Radiergummi. Category: Tool, Learn.
goyanye [ó] Nom. qui déplaît, antipathique; gɔn variante: gɔɔn. Nom. babouin; baboon; Pavian.
1
unpleasant; unangenehm, unsympathisch. Category: Mammal. papio papio.
goyanyemɔgɔ personne antipathique. synonyme: gɔngɔrɔ , ngɔn.
2 1
unfriendly person; disagreeable person.
gɔn variante: gɔɔn. Nom. corne; horn; Horn.
unfreundliche Person; unsympathische Person. 2
Category: Parts of an animal.
gɔbigɔbi [ɔ́] Adverbe. très vieux, sénile; very old,
gɔnbɛlɛ comparer: yefege, yefugu, yepege. Nom.
senile; sehr alt, senil. A kɔrɔla ka a kɛ
albinos, rouquin, personne au teint rouge et
gɔbigɔbi ! Il est devenu complètement sénile.
aux cheveux roux; albino, redhead; Albino,
He has become completely senile. Er ist völlig
Rotschopf. Category: Person.
senil geworden. synonyme: kɔrɔkɔrɔman, gɔjɔ,
synonyme: yepege.
kɔtɔkɔtɔ.
gɔnfasa [ɔ̀] Nom. tendon d'Achille; Achilles tendon;
gɔbilen synonyme: gɔgwɛ. Nom. espèce de plante; kind
Achilles-sehne. Category: Body, Parts of an
of plant; Pflanze (Art). Category: Grass, herb, animal. synonyme: fasaba.
vine. canavalia ensiformis.
gɔngɔlima [ɔ̀-ɔ̀-ì] variante: gɔngɔyi. Verbe. tordre,
gɔfɛ [ɔ]̀ variante: [gwɔfɛ], gɛfɛ. Nom. sorte de
déformer; twist, deform; verdrehen,
daba, houe; sort of hoe; Art von Hacke. I ni
verformen. U bɛ sɔrɔ k'u bolo dimintɔ
gɔfɛ ! Salutation. greeting. Gruß, Begrüßung.
nimma gɔngɔlima ... Alors ils déforment
Category: Agricultural tool.
leurs bras douloureux.... So they distort their
gɔjɔ [ɔ]́ Adverbe. très vieux; very old; sehr alt. A ka painful arms.... Also verdrehen sie ihre
kɔrɔ gɔjɔ ! Il est très vieux ! He’s very old! Er schmerzenden Arme ... synonyme: gɔnti.
ist sehr alt! synonyme: kɔrɔkɔrɔman, gɔbigɔbi. gɔngɔn [ɔ́-ɔ́] synonyme: gwangwan, gangan. Nom.
gɔli [ɔ-̀ í] synonyme: kɔyi. Nom. ergot; spur; Sporn. poussière dans l'air; dust in the air; Staub in
der Luft. Ɲɛdimin bɛ sɔrɔ gɔngɔn fɛ. Les
Category: Parts of an animal. synonyme: kɔli .
1
maux oculaires s'attrapent par la poussière.
Eye problems are caused by dust.
Augenprobleme werden durch Staub
verursacht. Category: Sky.
29/01/2026 257

gɔngɔrɔ gɔrɔndɔ
gɔngɔrɔ [ɔ ̀-ɔ̀-ɔ̀] variante: gɔlɔn. vt. tordre, courber; gɔɔn variante: gɔn. Nom. babouin doguera,
1 2
bend, deform; biegen, verformen, krümmen, cynocéphale; baboon; Pavian.
entstellen. Category: Mammal. papio papio.
gɔngɔrɔ [ɔ̀] Nom. gros babouin; big baboon; Pavian. synonyme: gɔngɔrɔ 2 .
2
Category: Mammal. synonyme: gɔnjigi, gɔn 1 , gɔɔn 3 variante: gɔn. Nom. espèce d'herbe; kind of
gɔɔn, ngɔn . grass; Grasart. Category: Grass, herb, vine.
2 1
panicum anabaptistum.
gɔngɔrɔ [ɔ́] Nom. caillou, pierre, motte de terre sèche;
3
gɔɔnɔ [ɔ̀-ɔ́] Nom. gorge, œsophage; throat,
pebble, stone, clod of dry earth; Kieselstein,
Stein, Klumpen trockener Erde. Ni oesophagus; Kehle, Gurgel, Speiseröhre.
gɔngɔrɔbɔra sanfɛ, bɛɛ bolo b'i kuncɛ la. Si
Category: Body. synonyme: ngɔɔnɔ, kanfyele.
un caillou tombe du ciel, chacun met la main gɔɔnɔ baranin Nom. amygdale; tonsil; Mandel,
sur la tête (proverbe). If a stone falls from the Gaumenmandel. Category: Body.
sky, everyone puts their hand on their head
(proverb). Fällt ein Stein vom Himmel, legt
gɔɔnɔju variante: gɔɔntulo. Nom. luette; uvula;
sich jeder die Hand auf den Kopf (Sprichwort). Halszäpfchen. Category: Body.
synonyme: nɛnɛkirisira datugugolo,
gɔngɔrɔn [ɔ́] Verbe. enivrer; get drunk; berauschen.
ngɔɔnɔju.
sich betrinken. Dɔlɔ y'a gɔngɔrɔn. L'alcool l'a
enivré. The alcohol made him drunk. Der gɔrɔ [ɔ̀] Verbe. s'asseoir (populaire), bruit de
Alkohol machte ihn betrunken. quelque chose qui se pose; to sit (popular),
gɔni Nom. violon, luth, guitare; violin, lute, guitar; sound of something settling; sitzen
(Volksmund), Geräusch von etwas, das sich
Violine, Laute, Gitarre. Category: Musical
setzt. I gɔrɔ ! Assieds-toi ! Sit down!
instrument. synonyme: nkɔnin.
Hinsetzen! Setzen Sie sich! synonyme: sigi.
1
gɔnibara Nom. luth (en calebasse); lute (made f
gɔrɔjigɛni [ɔ́] Emprunt de : wolof.
calabash); Laute. Category: Musical
instrument. synonyme: nkɔninbara.
variante: gɔrɔjɛgɛni. Nom. homosexuel; a
homosexual; Homosexueller. Gɔrɔjigɛni
gɔnin [ɔ-̀ í] Nom. guitare africaine; African guitar;
bɔlen don da la. L'homosexuel n'est pas bien
Gitarre. Category: Musical instrument.
considéré. Homosexuals are not well
gɔnjigi variante: gɔnfin. Nom. babouin mâle; male regarded. Homosexuelle genießen kein hohes
baboon; Pavian Männchen. Ansehen.
Category: Mammal. synonyme: gɔngɔrɔ 2 . gɔrɔkɔ [ɔ̀-ɔ̀] Nom. emprunt, usure, prêt à usure, prêt à
gɔnkun [ɔ̀] Nom. queue d'un fruit, pédoncule; stem of a intérêt; loan, usury, usury loan, interest loan;
Darlehen, Wucher, Wucherdarlehen,
fruit, peduncle; Stiel einer Frucht, Stiel. Ni i ye
Zinsdarlehen. A ye ɲɔ ta gɔrɔkɔ la. Il a pris un
kunatɔ kɛlɛtɔ je barako la, i b'a sɔrɔ a
sac à crédit ( : un sac emprunté, deux sacs
gɔnkun tora a la. Si tu vois un lépreux se rendus). He took a bag on credit (: one bag
quereller au sujet d'une courge, c'est qu'on lui a borrowed, two bags returned). Er hat einen
laissé la queue (proverbe). If you see a leper Sack auf Kredit genommen (ein Sack geliehen,
quarrelling over a squash, it is because he has zwei Säcke zurückgegeben).
been left with his peduncle (proverb). Wenn Category: Finance.
Sie einen Aussätzigen sehen, der sich um einen
gɔrɔkɔjurutala [ɔ̀-ɔ̀] Nom. emprunteur; borrower;
Kürbis streitet, liegt das daran, daß er mit
seinem Stiel zurückbleibt (Sprichwort). Kreditnehmer.
synonyme: kɔnɔkala. gɔrɔndɔ variante: gɔrɔntɔ. vi. 1 • ronfler (sommeil);
gɔnti [ɔ]̀ Verbe. tordre, courber; twist, bend; drehen, snore; schnarchen. A bɛ sunɔgɔ fo a bɛ
biegen. I kana n bolodenkɔni gɔnti. Ne me gɔrɔndɔ. Il dort au point de ronfler. He sleeps
tords pas le doigt. Don't twist my finger. to the point of snoring. Er schläft bis zum
Verdreh mir nicht den Finger. Schnarchen. synonyme: kɔrɔntɔ.
synonyme: tɔnɔtɔnɔ, gɔngɔlima, gɔlɔn. 2 • rugir; roar; brüllen. Waraba y'a kunkolo
gɔɔn [ɔɔ ̀ ́] variante: gɔn. Nom. 1 • corne; horn; kɔrɔta ka tila ka gɔrɔndɔ tugun. Le lion leva
1
Horn. Category: Parts of an animal. la tête et se mit a rugir à nouveau. The lion
raised his head and began to roar again. Der
2 • boucle; buckle; Schleife.
Löwe hob seinen Kopf und begann erneut zu
brüllen.
3 • gronder; scold; schimpfen.
29/01/2026 258

gɔsi gunban
gɔsi vt. battre; beat, thresh; schlagen, dreschen. ɲɔ guliya [ú-í-á] variante: gwiliya. Nom. lourdeur;
1
gɔsi battre le mil. thresh the millet. die Hirse heaviness; Schwere, Schwerfälligkeit.
dreschen. biriki gɔsi fabriquer des briques. guliya variante: gwiliya. Nom. 1 • poids; weight;
2
make bricks. Backsteine anfertigen. buru gɔsi Gewicht.
faire du pain. make bread. Brot machen. 2 • solidité; solidity, strength; Festigkeit.
buru gosi
guman [ù-ã́] variante: gumankuna. Nom. grue
gɔtɛ [ɔ-̀ ɛ́] variante: gɔɔtɔ, gɔtɔ. Nom. lutin, génie couronnée; crowned crane; Kronenkranich.
nain; goblin, sprite, elf; Kobold, Wichtel, Elfe. Category: Bird. balearica pavonina.
Gɔtɛ ka yaala man ca. Les génies lutins se synonyme: nkuman.
promènent peu. The elf genies don't wander
gun [ú] variante: gu. Verbe. 1 • joindre, rejoindre,
around much. Die Elfengeister wandern 1
nicht viel herum. Category: Religion.
s'adosser à, se coller contre; join, rejoin, catch
synonyme: masafɛn.
up with, lean against, to stick against;
beitreten, einholen, anlehnen, dagegenhalten,
gɔyɔ [ɔ-̀ ɔ́] Nom. aubergine africaine, tomate amère; angrenzen. A ka so gunnen don n ta la. Sa
aubergine, eggplant, local tomato; Aubergine, maison est contiguë à la mienne. His house is
Tomatenart, einheimische Tomate. adjacent to mine. Sein Haus grenzt an meins.
Category: Food. solanum aethiopicum. 2 • aller jusqu'au bout; go all the way, go to the
synonyme: jagaro, kɔyɔ, nkɔyɔ. end; gehen bis zum Ende, vollständig. O ye
gu [ú] variante: gun. Verbe. pousser en donnant fan kelen sɛrɛntɛ ka taa o gun. Elle
un coup, frapper; push by giving a blow, beat, retrancha d'un côté la chair jusqu'au bout.
hit; schlagend stoßen. A y'i bolo kɛka a gu. Il
She cut off the flesh all the way on one side. Sie
schnitt das Fleisch auf einer Seite vollständig
le frappe de la main. He hits him with his hand.
ab.
Er schlägt ihn mit der Hand.
3 • corrompre, faire un cadeau; bribe, give a
gudɔrɔn Emprunt de : français. Nom. goudron; tarmac
gift; bestechen, ein Geschenk machen. ka
road; Teerstrasse, Teer. A ka butiki bi polisikɛ gun corrompre un policier. bribe a
gudɔrɔn da la. Sa boutique est sur le goudron. police officer. einen Polizisten bestechen.
His shop is on the paved road. Sein Laden ist
gun [ú] synonyme: gunkun. variante: guun. Nom.
an der Teerstrasse. gudɔrɔn tigɛ traverser le 2
1 • banc de sable, île, berge, rive, continent;
goudron. cross the road. überquere die
sandbank, isle, island, riverbank; Sandbank,
Teerstrasse.
Insel, Ufer.
gudɔrɔnfin Nom. asphalte; asphalt, tarmac; Asphalt,
2 • continent; continent; Kontinent. Diɲɛ gun
Teer.
duuru les cinq continents. the five continents.
gudu [ú] Verbe. gronder (pour le ciel); rumble; gunbandie fünf Kontinente.
grollen. ... san finna, kaba dudura. ... le ciel gunan variante: ngunan, kuna, kunan. Nom. prunier
s'assombrit et gronda. ...the sky darkened and cornu; plumb tree; Baumart. Category: Tree.
rumbled. ...der Himmel verdunkelte sich und sclerocarya birrea. synonyme: nkunan.
grollte. Category: Sky, Weather.
gunangwɛ Nom. aigrette garzette; little egret;
gufa [ù-á] variante: gufan, gupa. Verbe. arracher,
Seidenreiher. Category: Bird. egretta garzetta.
retirer brusquement, renverser avec violence;
synonyme: nkunanjɛ, bosonkunanjɛ.
wrench, pull abruptly, push violently to the
ground; wegreissen, gewaltsam umstossen. gunangwɛwoloso Nom. héron cendré; Grey heron;
Fali ye n bin ka n gufa. L'âne m'a flanqué par grauer Fischreiher. Category: Bird. ardea
terre. The donkey knocked me to the ground. cinerea. synonyme: nkunanjɛwoloso.
Der Esel warf mich zu Boden.
gunanningwɛ Nom. héron garde-bœuf; cattle egret;
guli [ú-í] variante: gwili. adj.pred. lourd; heavy;
Kuhreiher. Category: Bird. ardeola ibis.
schwer. Doni ka guli ne ma. La charge est
gunban variante: gonban, gunman. Verbe. s'appuyer
trop lourde pour moi. The load is too heavy for
me. Die Last ist mir zu schwer.
sur les coudes, s'accouder; lean on the elbows;
sich auf die Ellenbogen stützen. A y'i gunban
guliman [ú-í-ã́] variante: gwiliman. adj. lourd;
bilali kan. Elle s'est accoudée sur la natte. She
heavy; schwer. dulɔki guliman vêtement
leaned on the mat. Sie lehnte sich auf die
lourd. heavy or thick piece of clothing. ein
Matte.
schweres Kleid von dickem Stoff.
29/01/2026 259

gundo gwaala
gundo [ũ-̀ ó] variante: gindo, gindoma. Nom. guvɛrɛnɛman ka baaradabaw expr. institution
secret, mystère, connaissance secrète; secret, républicaine; republican institutions,
mystery, secret knowledge; Geheimnis, Rätsel, institutions of the Republic; republikanische
geheimes Wissen. gundo mara garder/tenir Institutionen, Institutionen der Republik.
secret. keep a secret. ein Geheimnis bewahren. Category: Government.
gundo la en secret. in secret. im Geheimen. guvɛrɛnɛman ka baarakɛnafolo Nom. budget
Gundo lo. C’est un secret. It’s a secret. Es ist de l'État; state budget; Staatsbudget.
ein Geheimnis. I kana i gundo fɔ a ye ... Ne Category: Finance.
lui dis pas ton secret ... Don't tell him your guvɛrɛnɛman ka baarakunda Nom. fonction
secret... Verrate ihm nicht dein Geheimnis...
publique; civil service, government service;
kuma dundoma parole secrète. secret word.
öffentlicher Dienst, Staatsdienst,
geheimes Wort.
Beamtenschaft.
gundolaɲɔgɔnye Nom. huis-clos; closed hearing; guvɛrɛnɛman ɲɛmɔgɔba
Ausschluss der Öffentlichkeit.
synonyme: guvɛrɛnɛman kuntigiba. Nom. chef
gundomajira Jula: gundomayira. du gouvernement; head of government, prime
Morphemes: gundo-ma-yira. Nom. apparition, minister; Regierungsvorsitzender, Kanzler.
Category: Government.
révélation, vision; appearance, revelation,
disclosure, vision; Erscheinung, Offenbarung, guvɛrɛnɛmanbaarakɛla Nom. fonctionnaire;
Enthüllung, Vision. official, officer, civil servant, functionary,
gungurun [ù] Nom. souche; stump; Stumpf, Stummel, public official; Beamter, Funktionär,
Baumstumpf . N sen sɔgɔra gungurun fɛ. Je
Staatsbeamte. Category: Worker, occupation.
me suis blessé le pied à une souche. I injured guvɛrɛnɛri Emprunt de : français. variante: guvɛrinɛri.
my foot on a stump. Ich habe meinen Fuß an Nom. gouverneur; governor; Gouverneur.
einem Baumstumpf verletzt. Category: Parts Category: Government, Worker, occupation.
of a plant.
gwa [à] bambara: ga. variante: gwaa. Nom.
gungurunma [ù-ù-ù] Verbe. 1 • s'incliner avec
1 • foyer, cuisine, feu; fire place, cooking
respect; bow respectfully; respektvoll place, kitchen; Herd, Kochherd, Küche.
verneigen. A y'i gungurunma a burankɛ ye. 2 • famille, lignage; family, lineage; Familie,
Il s'est incliné respectueusement devant son Geschlecht, Stammbaum, Abstammung.
beau-père. He bowed respectfully to his synonyme: juruya.
father-in-law. Er verneigte sich respektvoll
vor seinem Schwiegervater.
gwaa
1
[à] bambara: ga. synonyme: gwaso.
2 • être immobile, être arrêté comme une variante: gwa, ga. Nom. 1 • famille, lignage;
souche; to be immobile, to be stopped like a family, lineage; Zuhause, Familie, Geschlecht,
stump; unbeweglich sein, wie ein Baumstumpf Stammbaum, Abstammung. synonyme: ga 2 .
stehen bleiben. A y'i gungurunma dugu ma. 2 • cuisine, foyer, feu; kitchen, fire place,
Il s'immobilisa, agenouillé par terre. He cooking place; Küche, Herd, Kochherd.
stopped, kneeling on the ground. Er blieb
gwaa [á] variante: gwa. Nom. hangar, échafaudage,
stehen und kniete auf dem Boden. 2
véranda; shed, hangar, shelter, scaffolding,
gunkulu [ú] Nom. archipel; archipelago; Archipel.
veranda; Hangar, Halle, Hallenbau,
Category: Water, Land. Baugerüst, Vordach. Category: Building.
gurubabɛgɛn nugu Nom. estomac d'un ruminant; synonyme: ga 3 .
stomach of a ruminant; Magen eines gwaa kɔnɔ variante: gwa kɔnɔ. expr. dans la famille;
Wiederkäuers. Category: Parts of an animal. in the family; in der Familie.
guun [ṹũ̀] variante: gun. Nom. île; island; Insel. gwaa kɔnɔ baaraw variante: gwakɔnɔbaaraw.
Category: Land. expr. le ménage; housework, housekeeping;
guvɛrɛnɛman Emprunt de : français. Hausarbeit, den Haushalt machen.
synonyme: govɛrɛnɛman. gwaala [á-á] synonyme: kaabɔ. variante: gaala. Nom.
variante: goronaman, gɔfɛrɛnaman. Nom. huître; oyster; Auster. Category: Small
gouvernement; government; Regierung. animals. synonyme: gaala 1 .
synonyme: gofɛrɛnɛman.
29/01/2026 260

gwaan gwanbagatɔ
gwaan comparer: farigan .[á] variante: gaan, gwan. gwakuru bambara: gakuru. n.comp. pierre de foyer,
1
Nom. gombo; okra; Okra. Category: Food. On foyer; stone of cooking place; Stein am
l’utilise dans la préparation d’une sauce pour Kochherd. synonyme: gakuru.
le « to ». Used for preparing sauce for "to".
hibiscus esculentus. synonyme: gan, dagan.
gwaminan [à-í-ã́] Nom. vaisselle; dishes, tableware;
6
Geschirr. Category: Household equipment.
gwaba variante: gaba, taba. Nom. arbre (espèce); tree synonyme: gwakɛminanw.
sp; Baumart. Category: Tree. ficus platyphylla.
gwan [á] bambara: gan. comparer: kaliya. 1 • adj.
1
gwabɛrɛ Nom. support de foyer; fireplace stone;
chaud, être chaud, ardent, brûlant; hot, to be
Feuerstelle Steine. hot, burning; heiß, heiß sein, brennend. Tile
gwabugu [à-ú-ú] variante: gabugu, gbabugu. ka ganin bi. Le soleil tape aujourd’hui. The
Nom. cuisine; kitchen; Küche. sun is hot today. Die Sonne ist heute heiß.
Category: Building. synonyme: gabugu. Dute ka gwan. Le thé est chaud. The tea is
gwabugukɔnɔja Nom. balance de cuisine; kitchen hot. Der Tee ist heiß. synonyme: gan 2 , goni.
scales; Küchenwaage. 2 • Verbe. chauffer, réchauffer; heat; heizen,
wärmen. N'a ma gwan, a ti suma. Si ça ne
gwada [à-á] Morphemes: gwa-da. Nom. cuisine;
chauffe pas, ça ne se refroidit pas. (Proverbe).
kitchen; Küche. synonyme: gabugu, gada 2 . If it doesn't heat, it doesn't cool down.
gwaden [à-é] Nom. commensal; table companion;
(proverb). Wenn es nicht heiß wird, kühlt es
auch nicht ab. (Sprichwort).
Mitesser.
3 • Verbe. rapide; fast, quick; schnell.
gwadɛmɛ [à-ɛ́-ɛ́] bambara: gadɛmɛ. Nom.
gwan comparer: gwannin.[á] bambara: gan. Verbe.
2
nourriture, subsistance; food, livelihood,
1 • activer, être intense, s'intensifier; activate,
subsistence; Lebensmittel, Esswaren,
to be intense, intensify; aktivieren, intensiv
Lebensunterhalt. synonyme: gadɛmɛ.
sein. synonyme: gan .
2
gwadonla [à-õ̀-á] variante: gwadonna. n.comp.
2 • être ou devenir difficile, pénible, inquiéter;
femme au foyer, cuisinière, servante to be or to become difficult, painful, to worry,
domestique; Woman cooking food, cook; Frau bother, trouble; schwierig sein oder schwierig
am Kochherd, Köchin. synonyme: gada 1 , werden, schmerzhaft sein, beunruhigen.
gadonna. gwan [á] bambara: gan. variante: gaan, gwaan.
3
gwadonmuso bambara: gadonmuso. Nom. Nom. gombo; okra; Okra. Category: Food.
ménagère, cuisinière, femme au foyer, femme synonyme: dagan, gan 6 .
de ménage; housewife, domestic helper, gwana [à-à] comparer: li1. variante: gana. vt.
household helper; Hausfrau, Haushaltshilfe.
Category: Worker, occupation.
1 • raser; shave; rasieren. N b’a fɛ ka kunkolo
synonyme: gadonmuso. n gwana. Je veux me faire raser la tête. I want
to shave my head. Ich will meinen Kopf
gwakɛlɔgɔ Nom. bois de chauffe; firewood;
rasieren. A kun gannin don. Sa tête est rasée.
Brennholz.
His head is shaved. Sein Kopf ist rasiert.
gwakɛminan Nom. ustensile; utensil; Gerät, synonyme: di 5 , gana 1 .
Gebrauchsgegenstand, Küchengerät. 2 • tailler, tondre; prune, trim; trimmen,
Category: Tool. schneiden.
gwakɛminanw Nom. vaisselle; dishes, tableware; gwanan [á-ã]́ bambara: ganan.
Geschirr. synonyme: gwaminan. comparer: cɛgwanan, musogwanan. Nom.
gwakɔrɔ Nom. foyer traditionnel; traditional fireplace 1 • célibataire; single, bachelor; unverheiratet,
ledig. synonyme: ganan .
for cooking; traditionelle Feuerstelle zum 1
Kochen. Category: Household equipment. 2 • qui n'a pas trouvé preneur; who has not
been taken; das nicht genommen wurde.
gwakura [à-ú-á] Nom. foyer amélioré; improved
3 • incomplet; incomplete; unvollständig.
fireplace for cooking; Energiesparende
Feuerkochstelle. gwanaya [á-á-á] Nom. célibat; single status,
gwakura nɛgɛman Nom. foyer amélioré en métal;
celibacy; Ehelosigkeit. synonyme: ganaya.
metal iron hearth; metallartiger Herd, gwanbagatɔ bambara: ganbagatɔ. variante: gwantɔ.
Kochstelle. Category: Household equipment. Nom. personne fiévreuse; person who has
fever; Person, die Fieber hat , fiebrige Person.
Category: Disease. synonyme: ganbagatɔ.
29/01/2026 261

gwanforo gwengeyiri
gwanforo [ã́-ó-ó] Nom. champ de gombo; okra field; 3 • Adverbe. pour rien, de rien, inutile; for
nothing, useless; für nichts, vergebens,
Okrafeld.
nutzlos. A nana gwansan. Il est venu pour
gwangwan
rien. He came for nothing. Er kam für nichts.
comparer: buguri
1
.[ã́-ã́] synonyme: gɔngɔn.
gwantɔnna variante: pantɔnna. Nom. galago du
Nom. poussière (dans l’air); dust (in the air);
Sénégal; Senegal Bush-baby; Senegal Galago.
Staub (in der Luft). Gwangwan caman bi sira
Category: Mammal. synonyme: ganntɔnna,
kan. Il y a beaucoup de poussière sur la route.
ntɔrɔ.
There is a lot of dust on the road. Es hat viel
Staub auf dieser Strasse. gwantugunɛgɛ bambara: gantugunɛgɛ. Nom.
gwaniya [à-ì-á] comparer: funteni. minerai de fer; iron ore; Eisenerz.
variante: gwanniya. Nom. chaleur; heat; Hitze.
Category: Land. synonyme: gantugunɛgɛ.
gwaran [á-ã́] Nom. 1 • entrave pour les animaux;
gwaniyakɛlɛbu synonyme: gɔniyakɛlɛbu.
hindrance for animals, restriction; Hindernis
variante: gwanniyakɛlɛbu. Nom. calorie;
für Tiere, Behinderung.
calorie; Kalorie. synonyme: farikolo
2 • ceinture ou lien en cuir; belt, leather strap;
makoyafɛn. Gurt, Lederstreifen.
gwaniyasumanan Nom. mesure de température; gwaranan Nom. pince; pliers, tongs; Zange.
measure of temperature; Temperatur
gwasɛbɛ [à-ɛ́-ɛ́] synonyme: denbayasɛbɛ. Nom.
Messung.
livret de famille; family booklet;
gwaniyatalan variante: gwanniyatalan,
Familienbuch.
gwaniyatanan. Nom. thermomètre;
gwaso [à-ó] bambara: gaso. n.comp. foyer, cuisine,
thermometer; Thermometer. Category: Tool.
1
famille; family, kitchen, family; Familie,
synonyme: degɛrɛsumalan, gonitalan.
Küche, Familie. synonyme: gaso .
3
gwannan bambara: ganna. synonyme: gannan. Nom.
gwaso [à-ó] bambara: gaso. Verbe. fermer, boucher;
sauce de gombo; okra sauce; Okrasauce.
2
close, clog, plug; schliessen, stopfen,
Category: Food. synonyme: ganna.
verstopfen. synonyme: gaso .
1
gwanniman adj. chaud, brûlant; hot, burning; heiß,
gwata variante: gbata, gata. Nom. hangar, abri; shed,
brennend. ji gwanniman l’eau chaude. hot
shelter; Hangar, Schutzdach, Schuppen.
water. heißes Wasser. synonyme: goniman. Category: Building.
gwannin comparer: gwan 2 . adj.pred. chaud; hot; heiß. gwatigi [à-í] Nom. chef de famille; head of the
Ji gwannin. L’eau chaude. hot water. heisses household; Familienoberhaupt.
Wasser. synonyme: gatigi.
gwanniya 1 • Nom. chaleur, empressement; heat, gwe [è] bambara: ge. variante: gwee. Nom. espèce
haste; Hitze, Eile. de liane à latex; kind of liana; Liane Art.
2 • vt. chauffer, être ou devenir chaud; heat; Category: Tree. landolphia heudelotii.
heizen, wärmen, erhitzen. synonyme: ge.
3 • vt. hâter, accélérer, se presser; rush, gween synonyme: sisan, tinsa, toon. Nom. épi; ear;
accelerate, go fast; sich beeilen,
beschleunigen.
Ähre. Category: Agriculture.
gwanniyahakɛ [à-ì-à-á-ɛ́] Nom. température; gwele bambara: gele. variante: gɛlɛ, gele. Nom. faux
temperature; Temperatur. Category: Weather.
ébénier, arbre (espèce); tree sp; Baumart.
Category: Tree. prosopis africana.
gwansan [ã́-á] bambara: gansan. 1 • adj. ordinaire, synonyme: gele, nbilensen.
simple, peu de valeur, sans importance, sans
gwende [ẽ́-é] synonyme: bananku. Nom. manioc;
protection; ordinary, simple, plain,
unimportant, without protection; manioc; Maniok. Category: Food.
ungewöhnlich, einfach, unwichtig, schutzlos. synonyme: bananku, nanaku.
don gwansan jour ordinaire. ordinary day. gwenge Verbe. clouer; to nail; nageln, annageln.
ein gewöhnlicher Tag. fani kalan gwansan,
i kan'a borode synonyme: gansan.
gwengeyiri [ẽ́-ẽ́-í-í] Nom. croix; cross; Kreuz.
2 • Adverbe. gratuitement; freely; gratis,
vergebens, umsonst.
29/01/2026 262

gwengwen gwɛlɛya
gwengwen [é-é] bambara: gengen. Verbe. clouer, 2 • difficile, délicat, pénible, désagréable;
difficult, delicate, painful, unpleasant,
enfoncer par force, ficher, fixer, ancrer; to nail,
disagreeable; schwierig, heikel, delikat,
drive in, fix, anchor sth., root sth., peg sth;
mühsam, schmerzhaft, widerwärtig.
nageln, annageln, fixieren, verankern.
Angilɛkan ka gwɛlɛ nne ma. L’anglais est
synonyme: gengen .
2
difficile pour moi. English is difficult for me.
gweni [è-í] variante: geni, genin, goni. Nom. ven Englisch ist für mich schwierig.
(petit arbre), santal d'Afrique; African 3 • cher; expensive; teuer. A daa ka gwɛlɛ.
Rosewood; Schmetterlingsblütler. C’est cher. It’s expensive. Es ist teuer.
Category: Bush, shrub. pteocarpus erinaceus.
4 • puissant, grave, important; powerful,
gwere [é-é] bambara: gere. Verbe. damer (le sol), serious, important; mächtig, schwierig,
1
tasser; pack down, hit the ground for packing ernsthaft, wichtig.
it, press down, tamp down; verdichten, gwɛlɛden bambara: gɛlɛden. Nom. boulet de canon,
stampfen um zu verdichten. synonyme: gere .
2 obus; cannonball, shellfire; Kanonenkugel,
gwere [é-é] bambara: geren. Verbe. boucher, Granate, Geschoß. synonyme: gɛlɛden.
2
obstruer, entraver, gêner, combler; plug, clog, gwɛlɛman [ɛ̀-ɛ̀-ã]́ synonyme: kogwɛlɛ. n adj. dur,
hinder, impede, hamper, fill in; verstopfen,
difficile, important, grave; hard, difficult,
behindern, hemmen, füllen, stopfen.
important, serious; hart, schwierig, wichtig,
synonyme: geren
3
.
ernsthaft. Fɛɛn gwɛlɛman lo. C’est quelque
gwese [é-é] Nom. gésier; gizzard; Kaumagen, chose de difficile. It’s a hard thing. Es ist eine
Geflügelmagen. Category: Parts of an animal. schwierige Sache. synonyme: gɛlɛnman.
synonyme: ncɔki. gwɛlɛnnin [ɛ̀-ɛ̀-ĩ́] synonyme: gɛrɛnnin.
gwɛ 1 • adj.pred. blanc, clair; white, clear, light; variante: gwɛlɛ, gɛlɛnnin. Nom. écureuil
weiß, hell. Category: Mathematics. fouisseur, rat palmiste; stripped ground
synonyme: jɛ , jɛman. squirrel; Sonnenhörnchen. Category: Mammal.
5
xerus erythropus.
2 • vt. propre, pur, chaste; clean, pure, chaste;
sauber, rein, keusch. gwɛlɛya [ɛ̀-ɛ̀-à] 1 • vt. durcir, être ou devenir dur;
1
3 • vt. blanchir, rendre clair; whiten, make harden; härten, er-härten. Siman ma gwɛlɛya
clear; weiß machen, aufhellen. Sani dugu ka fɔlɔ. Le ciment n’a pas encore durci. The
gwɛ / jɛ. Avant l’aube. Before it gets light. cement has not hardened yet. Der Zement ist
Bevor es hell wird. noch nicht hart geworden.
4 • vt. rendre propre, nettoyer; clean; sauber 2 • Nom. dureté, solidité; hardness, solidity,
machen, reinigen. firmness; Härte, Derbheit, Haltbarkeit,
gwɛgiku Nom. plante (espèce); plant sp; Pflanzenart. Festigkeit.
Category: Grass, herb, vine. heliotropium gwɛlɛya 2 comparer: nɔgɔya 1 .[ɛ̀-ɛ̀-á] variante: gɛlɛya.
indicum. 1 • Nom. difficulté, pauvreté, contrainte,
gwɛlɛ [ɛ-́ ɛ́] bambara: gɛlɛ. Nom. croc, canine, dent problèmes, effort, résistance; difficulty,
1
problem, effort, resistance; Schwierigkeit,
protubérant, défense (der certains animaux);
Problem, Bemühung, Widerstand. gwɛlɛya la
fang, tusk; Fangzahn. Category: Parts of an
animal. synonyme: gɛlɛ .
/ ni gwɛlɛya ye difficilement, avec difficulté.
3
with difficulty. mit Schwierigkeiten. ni
gwɛlɛ [ɛ-̀ ɛ̀] adj.pred. 1 • être difficile; to be difficult;
2 gwɛlɛya tɛ sans difficulté. without difficulty.
schwierig sein. Nin ka gwɛlɛ. C'est difficile.
ohne Schwierigkeiten. Gwɛlɛya ye n mina. Je
It is difficult. Es ist schwierig.
suis dans la difficulté. I have come into
2 • cher; expensive; teuer. A sɔngɔ ka gwɛlɛ. difficulties. Ich bin in Schwierigkeiten geraten.
C'est cher. It s expensive. Es ist teurer. 2 • Verbe. difficile (être ou devenir), être rare,
gwɛlɛ [ɛ-̀ ɛ́] Emprunt de : arabe. Nom. canon; big être pénible; to be difficult, to be rare, to be
3
painful; schwierig sein, selten sein,
gun, cannon; Kanone. synonyme: kanun ,
1 schmerzlich sein.
tawutawu, gɛlɛ .
1 3 • Verbe. être cher; to be expensive; teuer sein.
gwɛlɛ 4 [ɛ-̀ ɛ́] variante: gɛlɛn. adj.pred. 1 • dur, fort, 4 • Verbe. insister, s'efforcer; insist, make a
solide, résistant; hard, firm, strong, solid, effort; insistieren, sich bemühen.
resistant, resilient; hart, fest, stark, solide, 5 • Verbe. se débrouiller, s'arranger; to manage,
widerstandsfähig. synonyme: gɛlɛn. know how to go about to solve problems; sich
1
zu helfen wissen.
29/01/2026 263

gwɛman gwɛya
gwɛman n adj. blanc, blanche; white; weiss. Kɔgɔ ye gwɛɲi Nom. arbre (espèce); tree sp; Baumart.
gwɛman ye. Le sel est blanc. Salt is white. Category: Bush, shrub. maytenus
Salz ist weiss. Category: colour. senegalensis.
synonyme: jɛman. gwɛrɛ variante: gɛrɛ, gbɛrɛ. vi. approcher,
gwɛn Nom. plante (espèce); plant sp; Pflanzenart. s'approcher; get near, come close to,
1
Category: Bush, shrub. landolphia heudelotii.
approach; sich nähern, nahe kommen. Aw ka
gwɛrɛ tasuma la ! Approchez-vous du feu !
gwɛn [ɛ ́] bambara: gɛn. vt. 1 • chasser, renvoyer,
2 Come closer to the fire! Nähere dich dem
répudier, poursuivre, pousser devant soi;
Feuer. synonyme: madon, gɛrɛ.
chase, hunt, repudiate, expel, send away;
jagen, verfolgen, wegjagen, verjagen. X gwɛn gwɛrɛbaliya Nom. absence de relations, absence de
ka bɔ Y la chasser X de Y. chase/drive out X contacte; absence of relationships or of
from Y. X von Y wegjagen. synonyme: gɛn. contact; Absenz von Beziehungen oder
Kontakt. synonyme: gɛrɛbaliya.
2 • faire paître, garder le troupeau; herd; hüten,
weiden lassen. Misigwɛnla i misi gwɛn. Le gwɛrɛgwɛrɛ bambara: gɛrɛgɛrɛ. synonyme: yɛrɛ yɛrɛ.
1
vacher fait paître les vaches. The cowherd is adj. pur, original, authentique, vrai, véritable;
herding the cows. Der Hirte läßt die Kühe pure, original, authentic, real, genuine; rein,
weiden. Der Hirte hütet die Kühe. ursprünglich, authentisch, echt.
gwɛnɛkala [ɛ̀-ɛ̀-á-á] Nom. 1 • jambe, tibia; leg, synonyme: gɛrɛgɛrɛ 1 .
shin-bone, tibia; Bein, Scheinbein, Tibia. gwɛrɛgwɛrɛ [ɛ́-ɛ́-ɛ́-ɛ́] Nom. catastrophe, malheur,
2
Category: Body, Parts of an animal. injustice; catastrophe, adversity, misfortune,
synonyme: gɛnɛnkala. injustice; Katastrophe, Unglück,
2 • patte (d'un oiseau); leg (of a bird); Fuss Ungerechtigkeit. synonyme: gɛrɛgɛrɛ 2 .
(eines Vogels). Category: Parts of an animal.
gwɛrɛn Nom. club; club; Klub, Verein.
1
gwɛnɛkolonin Nom. tibia; shin-bone, tibia;
gwɛrɛn Verbe. concentrer (condenser), évaporer, tarir,
Schienbein. Category: Body. 2
synonyme: gɛnɛnkala.
se dessécher; concentrate, condense,
evaporate, dry up; konzentrieren,
gwɛnɛlatanganan Nom. protège tibia; shin pad; kondensieren, verdichten, verdampfen,
Schienbeinschützer. Category: Clothing. verdunsten, austrocknen. Kɔji gwɛrɛnna.
gwɛngwɛn Verbe. faire paître, garder (moutons, L'eau du marigot a tari. The water of the river
dried up. Das Wasser vom Fluss ist
chèvres); to herd, look after (sheep, goats);
ausgetrocknet.
weiden lassen (Schafe, Ziegen).
Category: Animal husbandry. gwɛrɛngwɛrɛnnin Nom. espèce d'arbre; kind of tree;
synonyme: gɛngɛn. Baumart. Category: Tree. hymenocardia
acida; hymenocardia lyrata.
gwɛnin Nom. arbre (espèce); tree-sp; Baumart.
Category: Tree. pterocarpus erinaceus.
gwɛrɛnin ɲɔgɔn na expr. approximatif; rough,
approximate; annähernd, ungefähr,
gwɛnla [ɛ ́-á] variante: gwɛnna. Nom. berger, pasteur;
approximativ.
shepherd; Schafhirte. Category: Person.
synonyme: gwɛnnikɛla.
gwɛsɛ
1
[ɛ́-ɛ́] bambara: gɛsɛ. Nom. cure-dent;
toothpick; Zahnstocher. Category: Tool.
gwɛnnikɛla Nom. berger, pasteur; shepherd, cowboy;
gwɛsɛ [ɛ́-ɛ́] bambara: gɛsɛ. Nom. brosse à dents
Hirte. Category: Animal husbandry. 2
synonyme: bagangwɛnla, gwɛnla, dɛndɛla.
traditionnelle; traditional toothbrush, made
from a twig; traditionelle Zahnbürste, aus
gwɛnsɛn Nom. attelle; splint; Armschiene, Schiene. einem Zweig. Category: Tool. synonyme: gɛsɛ ,
2
Category: Treat disease, Tool. dakobɔrɔsi.
gwɛɲɛ [ɛ-́ ɛ́] variante: gɛɲɛ. 1 • Nom. fouet, chicote, gwɛtɛrɛ [ɛ́-ɛ̀-ɛ́] bambara: gɛtɛrɛ.
coup de fouet; whip, floggings; Peitsche,
synonyme: konsonkansan. Nom. pangolin
Peitschen-schlag. bugɔ ni gwɛɲɛ ye fouetter,
géant; giant pangolin; Riesen-Schuppentier.
frapper à coups de fouet. to flog, whip. Category: Mammal. manis gigantea.
auspeitschen.
synonyme: nkosonkasan.
2 • Verbe. fouetter; to flog, to whip; geisseln,
peitschen.
gwɛya
1
synonyme: kɔnɔgwɛya, hɔɔrɔnya. Nom.
transparence; transparency; Transparenz,
Durchsichtigkeit, Durchschaubarkeit.
29/01/2026 264

gwɛya haati
gwɛya bambara: jɛya. 1 • vt. blanchir, être ou devenir 4 • Nom. propreté, hygiène, innocence;
2
cleanliness, hygiene, innocence; Sauberkeit,
blanc, disculper; whiten, exculpate; bleichen,
Hygiene, Unschuld.
tünchen, weiß machen, rechtfertigen.
synonyme: jɛya. gwili [í-í] variante: gili. adj.pred. être lourd; to be
2 • vt. nettoyer; clean; reinigen, säubern, heavy; schwer sein.
putzen. gwiliman [í-í-ã́] variante: guliman. adj. lourd;
3 • vi. être ou rendre clair, propre, être sûr, heavy; schwer. Category: Mathematics.
certain, convaincu, franc; make clear; be sure,
gwiliya [í-í-á] variante: guiliya. Nom. lourdeur,
certain, convinced; deutlich, sicher sein,
gewiß sein, überzeugt sein. A y’a fɔ k’a poids; heaviness, weight; Schwere, Gewicht.
gwɛya. Il l’a dit de manière claire. He said it gwiliya sumanikɛnanw variante: gwiliya
clearly. Er sagte es deutlich. I gwɛyanin b’a sumananw. Nom. mesures de poids; weight
la ? Tu en es sûr ? Are you sure of it ? Bist du measurement; Gewichtsmasse.
scher, daß es so ist?
gwingwin [ĩ-̀ ĩ́] bambara: gingin. Nom. hibou; owl;
Eule, Kauz. Category: Bird.
H - h
haali [á] Emprunt de : arabe. variante: haalila. 2 • émettre un bruit (la bouche grande ouverte);
make a noise (mouth wide open); ein Geräusch
Adverbe. 1 • valeur intensive : beaucoup,
machen (mit weit geöffnetem Mund). Waraba
énormément, parfaitement; intensity value:
very much, enormously, perfectly; haalola u la. Le lion grogna sur eux. The lion
Intensivierung: sehr, enorm, außerordentlich. growled at them. Der Löwe knurrte sie an.
Ala ye diɲɛ kanu haali ... Dieu a tant aimé le haaminako comparer: dusukasi. Nom. chagrin, peine;
monde ... God loved the world so much ... So
grief, sorrow, trouble; Kummer, Gram,
sher hat Gott die Welt geliebt ...
Betrübnis, Klage, Schmerz.
2 • assurément; certainly; sicherlich.
haan [àá] interj. 1 • ah bon ! marque d’étonnement; is
3 • très loin; very far away; sehr weit weg.
that so (marking amazement); ach so (markiert
Mɔgɔ min taara haali o, i ma taa haali o, bɛɛ
Erstaunen). A ko haan ? Il dit : «Ah bon ?».
y'a dɔn haali yɔrɔ ka jan. Celui qui est allé
He said: “Oh right?” Er sagte: „Oh, richtig?“.
très loin, tout comme celui qui n'est pas allé
2 • oui (réponse à un appel); yes (answer to a
très loin, chacun sait ce que veut dire «très
loin» (proverbe). He who has gone very far,
call); ja, (Antwort auf einen Ruf).
just as he who has not gone very far, everyone haaro [á-ó] Verbe. ne plus savoir ce qu'on fait, être
knows what “very far” means (proverb). Wer
sidéré; not knowing what to do, be
sehr weit gegangen ist, genauso wie wer nicht flabbergasted, be stunned; nicht wissen, was
sehr weit gekommen ist, jeder weiß, was „sehr
man tut, verblüfft sein. O kibaru balala n na
weit“ bedeutet (Sprichwort).
fo ka n haaro. Cette nouvelle m'est tombée
haalila [á] interj. intensive : fort, énormément, dessus et m'a complètement sidéré. This news
parfaitement, assurément, absolument; hit me and completely stunned me. Diese
intensive value: strong, enormously, perfectly, Nachricht hat mich getroffen und völlig
assuredly, absolutely; intensiver : stark, verblüfft.
enorm, perfekt, sicher, absolut. A y'a siri
haati [á-í] synonyme: dimansi. Nom. dimanche;
haalila ! Il l'a attaché très solidement ! He tied
Sunday; Sonntag. synonyme: dimansi, kari.
it very securely! Er hat es sehr sicher
2
gebunden!
haalo [á-ó] vi. 1 • bâiller; yawn; gähnen. Ne
haalokan don. C'est moi qui bâille. It's me
who yawns. Ich bin es, der gähnt.
synonyme: yaala .
2
29/01/2026 265

habada hakɛ
habada [á-á-á] variante: abada, abadalezi. hafizu [á] Nom. 1 • qui a appris par cœur le Coran; who
Adverbe. jamais, à jamais, pour toujours, learned the Quran by heart; der den Koran
absolument, en aucune façon; never, for ever, auswendig lernte.
absolutely; nie, für immer, absolut. Aw ye a 2 • sage, saint; a wise man, a saint; ein weiser
bɔnfɛ ye jamana in kan habada ? Avez-vous Mann, ein Heiliger. ... a bɛna kɛ hafizu ye ...
jamais vu dans ce pays quelqu’un qui lui ... il deviendra un saint homme... ...he will
ressemble ? Have you ever seen anyone in this become a holy man... ...er wird ein heiliger
country who looks like him? Haben Sie jemals Mann werden...
jemanden in diesem Land gesehen, der wie er
haha [á] variante: hɛhɛ. Verbe. être essoufflé,
aussieht? Ne ye n kali, o bɛ kɛ habada. Je l'ai
haleter; be out of breath, pant, gasp, puff;
juré, cela se fera, absolument ! I swore, it will
ausser Atem sein, hecheln, keuchen. Wulu bɛ
happen, absolutely! Ich habe geschworen,
daß es passieren wird, auf jeden Fall!
haha. Le chien halète. The dog pants. Der
synonyme: abada. Hund hechelt. synonyme: hihanhi.
hadamaden [á] Morphemes: hadama-den. Nom. haja [á-á] Emprunt de : arabe. Nom. nom donné
personne, homme, être humain; person, man, aux femmes ayant fait le pèlerinage; name
human being; Person, Mann, Mensch. given to women having don the pilgrimage;
Name für Frauen, die die Pilgerreise gemacht
Hadamaden bɛ na mɔgɔw bolo, a bɛ taa
haben.
mɔgɔw bolo. L’être humain naît parmi les
hommes, il meurt parmi les hommes haju [á-ú] Emprunt de : arabe. Nom.
(proverbe). The human being is born among préoccupation, affaire, problème;
men, he dies among men (proverb). Der preoccupation, concern, problem, case,
Mensch wird unter Menschen geboren, er matter, business; Beschäftigung, Anliegen,
stirbt unter Menschen (Sprichwort). Besorgnisse. Mɔgɔw bɛ taa u haju la n ma.
Category: Person. synonyme: adamaden. Les gens vont chez moi pour leurs problèmes.
hadamadenya [á] Nom. 1 • humanité, condition People come to me for their problems.
Menschen kommen mit ihren Problemen zu
humaine; humanity, human condition.
mir.
Hadamadenya tɛ taa jiri kɔ. L'humanité ne
peut pas se passer des arbres. Humanity cannot
hakɛ
1
[á-ɛ́] Emprunt de : arabe. Nom. 1 • mesure,
do without trees. Die Menschheit kann nicht teneur, quantité, nombre, limite, niveau, partie,
ohne Bäume auskommen. prix, salaire; quantity, content, amount,
synonyme: mɔgɔninfinya, adamadenya, number of; Mass, Menge, Betrag, Anzahl. Si
bunahadamadenya. hakɛ dɔgɔyalenba ka kɛ san 30 ye. L'âge
2 • civilisation; civilization; Zivilisation.
minimum doit être de 30 ans. The minimum
age must be 30 years old. Das Mindestalter
3 • relations humaines, comportement humain;
muß 30 Jahre betragen. Hakɛ bɛ falikusama
human relations, human behaviour;
menschliche Beziehungen, menschliches na. Tirer la queue de l'âne a une limite
Verhalten. (proverbe). Pulling the donkey's tail has a limit
(proverb). Dem Esel am Schwanz zu ziehen
hadamadenyakalan [á] Nom. leçon de morale;
hat eine Grenze (Sprichwort).
moral lesson; moralische Lektion.
synonyme: sumahakɛ.
hadiri [à] Nom. fil de soie, soie; silk thread, silk; 2 • moyen; medium, average; Mittel,
Seidenfaden, Seide. hadirifininw vêtement de Durchschnitt. Salifu ka jan wa ? Ayi, a bi
soie, vêtement noir des femmes wahabites. silk hakɛ la. Est-ce que Salif est grand ? Non, il est
clothing, black clothing of Wahabi women. de taille moyenne. Is Salif tall? No, he’s of
Seidenkleidung, schwarze Kleidung average height. Ist Salif gross? Nein, er ist im
wahabitischer Frauen. Durchschnitt / mittelgross.
hadiya [á-í-á] Emprunt de : arabe. Verbe. faire une
offrande, faire un sacrifice en faveur d'un
défunt; make an offering, sacrifice in favour of
a deceased; opfern, ein Opfer bringen zu
Gunsten eines Verstorbenen, Opfergabe. Saga
in, ne fa hadiya don. Ce mouton, c'est une
offrande pour mon père. This sheep is an
offering for my father. Dieses Schaf ist eine
Opfergabe für meinen Vater.
29/01/2026 266

hakɛ hakili dɔnni
hakɛ comparer: jurumu.[à-ɛ́] Emprunt de : arabe: hakɛta [à-ɛ́-à] Verbe. faire du tort à autrui; harm
2
haqq. Variant: jurumuta. Nom. tort, péché, others; andern Unrecht tun.
faute, offense; wrong, sin, mistake, offence; hakɛtigi Morphemes: hakɛ-tigi. Nom. coupable,
Unrecht, Sünde, Fehler, Verstoss. I bi hakɛ
pécheur; guilty person, sinner; schuldige
to ! / Hakɛ to ! Pardonne-moi ! Excuse-moi ! Person, Sünder. Category: Person.
Please forgive me! Sorry! Vergib mir!
hakɛya 1 • Nom. nombre, quantité; number, quantity;
Entschuldige bitte! Pardon! Hakɛ tɛ to, ni i
Anzahl, Quantität. a si hakɛya son âge. his
joli ma bɔ. Pas de pardon du péché sans
age. sein Alter.
effusion de sang (proverbe). There is no
2 • Verbe. mesurer, calculer, doser; measure, to
forgiveness of sin without the shedding of
blood (proverb). Ohne Blutvergießen gibt es
measure out, calculate, to dose; messen,
keine Vergebung der Sünden (Sprichwort).
berechnen, dosieren.
hakɛ [á] Emprunt de : arabe. Nom. moment; hakili [á-í-í] Emprunt de : arabe. 1 • Nom.
3
moment; Moment. Taali hakɛ sera. C'est le
intelligence, mémoire, esprit, raison, réflexion,
attention; mind, memory, intelligence, reason,
moment de partir. It's time to leave. Es ist Zeit
consideration, pondering, thought;
zu gehen.
Intelligenz, Gedächtnis, Vernunft,
hakɛ farali Nom. augmentation; increase; Überlegung, Denkweise. I hakili latigɛlen
Vermehrung. Category: Mathematics. ikomi ŋɔmijiranna mɔden. Tu as l'esprit
synonyme: jiidili, cayali. tranquille comme le petit-fils de la femme qui
hakɛ kelen expr. autant; so much, so many, such;
fait frire des beignets (proverbe). You have
peace of mind like the grandson of the woman
ebenso viel, genau so. synonyme: ŋɔgɔnna.
who fries donuts (proverb). Du hast
hakɛkɛla [à-ɛ̀-à-á] Morphemes: hakɛ-kɛ-la. Nom. Seelenfrieden wie der Enkel der Frau, die
Donuts fritiert (Sprichwort). I hakili la san bi
délinquant, pécheur; offender, sinner;
Delinquent, Täter, Sünder, Übeltäter. na bi wa ? Ayi, n ma la la. Tu penses qu’il va
Category: Person. pleuvoir aujourd'hui ? Non, je ne le pense pas.
Do you think it will rain today? No, I don’t
hakɛlaman synonyme: mankan. adj. moyen; average;
think so. Denkst du es werde heute regen?
Durchschnitt, Mittelwert. synonyme: mankan 2 . nein, ich glaube nicht. N hakili b’i la. Je pense
hakɛma [á] Nom. mesuré (à la bonne mesure), moyen; à toi. I think about you. Ich denke an dich. N
measured (to the right measure), average; hakili b’a la ka taga Bobo lajɛ. J’espère aller
angemessen (im richtigen Maß), Durchschnitt. visiter Bobo. I hope to go and see Bobo. Ich
kalan hakɛma des études à un niveau hoffe Bobo besuchen zu können. I hakili b’a la
moyen. studies at an average level. Studium wa ? Ayi, n hakili t’a la. Est-ce que tu t’en
auf durchschnittlichem Niveau. souviens ? Non, je ne m’en souviens pas. Do
hakɛmako [à-ɛ̀-à] Nom. faute, tort, préjudice; fault, you remember? No, I don’t remember. Kannst
du dich erinnern? Nein, ich kann mich nicht
wrong, harm; Schuld, Unrecht, Schaden. I ye
erinnern. I ka n hakili jigi o la. Rappelle-le
hakɛmako n na. Tu m'as porté préjudice. You
moi ! Remind me about that! Erinnere mich
have harmed me. Du hast mir geschadet.
daran! N hakili bɔra. J’ai oublié. I forgot. Ich
hakɛntan [à-ɛ̀-á] Jula: hakɛtan. Nom. innocent, habe es vergessen. I hakili ka di. Tu es
pur, sans offense; innocent, pure, without intelligent. You are intelligent. Du bist
offense; unschuldig, rein. intelligent. O ye hakili ɲuman ye. Ça c’est
hakɛntanya [à-ɛ̀-à-á] Jula: hakɛtanya. Nom. une bonne idée. That’s a good idea. Das ist
innocence, pureté; innocence, purity; eine gute Idee.
Unschuld, Reinheit. Ala sagoɲinina bɛ hami 2 • Verbe. réfléchir, faire attention, prendre
hakɛntanya nɔfɛ. Celui qui recherche la
garde; think, pay attention, take care;
nachdenken, achtgeben, aufpassen . Ne hakili
volonté de Dieu aspire à la pureté. He who
seeks the will of God aspires to purity. Wer la kɔni ... Ce que je pense, moi ... What I
den Willen Gottes sucht, strebt nach Reinheit. think... Was ich denke...
synonyme: sɔntanya. hakili dɔnni [á-í-í ɔ́-í] bambara: hakili lɔnni. Nom.
hakɛsuma [á-ɛ́-ú-á] synonyme: sumahakɛ. Nom. psychologie; psychology; Psychologie.
dosage, bonne mesure; dose, dosing, dosage,
good measure; Dosierung, gutes Mass.
29/01/2026 267

hakilidiya hakilimaya
hakilidiya Nom. bonne mémoire, bonne intelligence; hakililatafɔli n.comp. expression de pensée ou idée ou
good memory, very good intelligence, opinion; expression of thinking or idea or
understanding; Verstand, gutes Gedächtnis. opinion; Äußerung der Meinung.
Dɔw ko hakilidiya bɛ sɔrɔ sinji fɛ. Certains Category: Think.
disent que inintelligence est héréditaire. Some hakililatigɛ [á] comparer: hakililatigɛlenya. Nom.
say that intelligence is hereditary. Manche
tranquillité, sérénité, sécurité, soulagement,
sagen, daß Intelligenz erblich ist.
assurance; tranquillity, serenity, calm,
hakiligoya Morphemes: hakili-go-ya. Nom. stupidité, security, assurance; Stille, Gelassenheit,
manque de mémoire; stupidity, lack of Heiterkeit, Sicherheit, Friedlichkeit,
memory; Dummheit, Stumpfsinn, fehlen der Zuversicht. Bana kɛnɛyalen, hakililatigɛ
Erinnerung. ... Faatu, e ta in ye hakiligoya nana a la sisan. Après avoir recouvré la santé,
dan ye. Fatou, toi tu es vraiment au comble il a retrouvé la sérénité. After regaining his
de la stupidité. Fatou, you are truly at the health, he found serenity. Nachdem er wieder
height of stupidity. Fatou, du bist wirklich auf gesund geworden war, fand er Gelassenheit.
dem Höhepunkt der Dummheit. Category: Think. synonyme: hakilisigilenya.
hakilijagabɔ [á] Morphemes: hakili-jaka-bɔ. hakililatigɛbali Nom. indécis; hasn't decided yet,
synonyme: hakilifalen, baro. Nom. réflexion indecisive, uncertain; unentschieden, hat noch
profonde, débat; reflection, debate; Debatte, nicht entschieden, Ungewissheit.
Besinnung, Reflexion, Überlegung, hakililatigɛlenya [á] variante: hakilisigilenya.
Nachdenken. hakilijagabɔbaaraw exercices
Nom. tranquillité, sérénité, calme; tranquillity,
faisant travailler l'intelligence. exercises to serenity, calm; Stille, Ruhe, Gelassenheit,
exercise intelligence. Übungen zur Schulung Heiterkeit. ... ka baara nafama kɛ
der Intelligenz. Category: Think.
hakililatigɛlenya la. ... accomplir un travail
hakilijigi n.comp. rappel; reminder; Wink, Mahnung. utile en toute sérénité. ... carry out useful
hakilila [á] variante: hakilina, hakilinata,
work with complete peace of mind. ... sinnvolle
Arbeiten beruhigt ausführen.
hakililata. Nom. opinion, avis, idée; opinion,
synonyme: hakilisigilenya.
view; Meinung, Einschätzung, Ansicht,
Auffassung. ... o ye áw hakilila ye. ... c'est hakilima [á-í-í-á] Nom. intelligent, sage, réfléchi;
votre opinion. ...that's your opinion. ...das ist intelligent, wise, thoughtful; intelligent, weise,
deine Meinung. synonyme: hakililata, miiriya. überlegt. Hakilima bɛɛ bɛ syɛdenw la
dondon dɔn. Toute personne intelligente sait
hakililabaarala Nom. intellectuel; intellectual,
reconnaître parmi les poussins celui qui sera le
scholar; Intellektueller. Category: Worker,
coq (proverbe). Any intelligent person knows
occupation.
how to recognize among the chicks which one
hakililabana Morphemes: hakili-la-bana. Nom. will be the rooster (proverb). Jeder intelligente
maladie mentale; mental illness; psychische Mensch weiß, welches Küken der Hahn sein
Krankheit. Category: Disease. wird (Sprichwort).
synonyme: kunkolowuli, jinɛbana, hakilimajɔ [á] Verbe. 1 • prêter attention; pay
kunnabana, kunfɛn. attention, take notice; aufpassen, achtgeben.
hakililafɛn [á] comparer: kunnabisigiyanin. Nom. synonyme: tulomada.
abstrait; abstract; abstrakt. 2 • attention; attention; Aufmerksamkeit. Aw
Category: Grammar. synonyme: bisigi . ni ce áw ka hakilimajɔ la. Merci pour votre
1
attention. Thank you for your attention. Vielen
hakililakunu Nom. sensibilisation; awareness,
Dank für Ihre Aufmerksamkeit.
sensitization; Sensibilisierung.
synonyme: lafaamuyali.
hakilimaya [á-í-í-á-á] Nom. intelligence, sagesse,
prudence; intelligence, wisdom, caution,
hakililata [á-í-í-á-á] comparer: fɛko. prudence; Intelligenz, Weisheit, Vorsicht.
synonyme: ŋaniyayira, kɔnɔnata. n.comp. idée,
pensée, opinion, avis; idea, thought, opinion,
view; Idee, Gedanke, Meinung, Ansicht.
Category: Think. synonyme: miirina, hakilila,
kɔnɔta, miiriya.
29/01/2026 268

hakilinan halala
hakilinan Nom. opinion, point de vue; opinion, point hakilisonyɛ [á] variante: hakilisonya. Nom. action
of view; Meinung, Gesichtspunkt, Ansicht. I de détourner l'attention de quelqu'un, de
hakilinan ye mun ye ? Qu’est-ce que tu en tromper la vigilance de quelqu’un; action of
diverting someone's attention, deceiving
penses ? Quelle est ton opinion ? What is your
someone's vigilance; Handlung, die
point of view? What do you think about it?
Aufmerksamkeit einer Person abzulenken, ihre
Was ist deine Meinung / Gesichtspunkt /
Ansicht? O ye hakilinan ɲuman ye. C’est une
Wachsamkeit zu täuschen. Donni sɛbɛn tun
bonne idée. That’s a good idea/suggestion.
t'a bolo, a ye hakilisonyɛ kɛ ka don. Il
Das ist eine gute Idee / Vorschlag. n'avait pas de ticket d'entrée, il a trompé la
synonyme: kɔnɔta. vigilance des gardiens pour entrer. He did not
have an entry ticket, he deceived the vigilance
hakilinanko [á-í-í-á-ó] Nom. préoccupation, soucis; of the guards to enter. Er hatte keine
preoccupation, concern, worry; Anliegen, Eintrittskarte und täuschte die Wachsamkeit
Besorgnisse, Sorgen. Mali sɛnɛkɛlaw der Wachen, um einzutreten.
hakilinanko fɔlɔ ye samiyɛ kuncɛko ɲuman hakilitigi [á] Nom. sage, personne intelligente,
ye. Le soucis primordial des paysans est le bon personne réfléchie, sensée; wise person; weise
aboutissement de la saison des pluies. The Person.
primary concern of farmers is the successful
hakilitigiya [á] Morphemes: hakilitigi-ya. Nom.
conclusion of the rainy season. Das
sagesse; wisdom; Weisheit. ni hakilitigiya ye
Hauptanliegen der Landwirte ist der
erfolgreiche Abschluß der Regenzeit. avec sagesse. wisely. mit Weisheit.
hakilintan [á] Jula: hakilitan. Nom. 1 • inconscient, hakiliya [á] Verbe. faire réfléchir, rappeler, remémorer,
inintelligent, stupide; unconscious, stupid; raisonner; make to think, remind, to reason,
unbewußt, bewußtlos, ahnungslos, dumm. think; zum Denken anregen, erinnern, folgern,
argumentieren, logisch denken.
2 • idiote, imbécile; idiot, foolish person,;
Dummkopf, Blödmann. haku [á] Emprunt de : arabe. Verbe. douter; doubt;
hakilintanya Jula: hakilitanya. Nom. folie, bêtise, zweifeln, bezweifeln. U ko a kɔnɔma don, ne
manque d'intelligence, stupidité; folly, hakura a la. Ils disent qu'elle est enceinte, moi
foolishness, stupidity; Unsinn, Dummheit, j'en doute fort. They say she's pregnant, but I
Torheit. Cɛ in ka hakilintanya barika ka highly doubt it. Man sagt, sie sei schwanger,
bon. Cet homme est vraiment d'une grande aber ich bezweifle es stark. synonyme: tamaki,
stupidité. This man is truly stupid. Dieser siga.
Mann ist wirklich dumm.
halaki Emprunt de : arabe. vt. faire périr, ruiner,
hakiliɲagami [á] Morphemes: hakili-ɲagami. Nom.
détruire, corrompre, dépérir, amaigrir; ruin,
trouble mental; mental disorder; psychische destroy, corrupt, wither, decline, die off;
Störung. Category: Disease. zerstören, ruinieren, verderben, verkümmern,
hakilisaniya synonyme: hakiliɲumanya. Nom. absterben. Dɔlɔ bi mɔgɔ halaki. L’alcool
ruine l'homme. Alcohol ruins a person. Der
hygiène mentale; mental hygiene;
Mentalhygiene, Psychohygiene.
Alkohol ruiniert eine Person.
hakilisigilenya Nom. calme, sérénité; calm, serenity; halakibagatɔ [á] Nom. 1 • personne qui un
comportement marginal, anormal; person who
Ruhe, Gelassenheit. Ni ko ganna, a bɛ
exhibits marginal, abnormal behaviour;
ɲɛnabɔ hakilisigilenya dɔrɔn kɔnɔ. Quand
Person, die geringfügiges, abnormales
un problème devient sérieux, on ne peut le Verhalten zeigt.
régler que dans le calme. When a problem
2 • irrespect, malhonnêteté, vices; disrespect,
becomes serious, it can only be resolved
dishonesty, vice; Respektlosigkeit,
calmly. Wenn ein Problem ernst wird, kann es
Unehrlichkeit Laster.
nur in Ruhe gelöst werden. synonyme: ɲamalɔ,
halakili Morphemes: halaki-li. Nom. destruction;
hakililatigɛlenya, hakililatigɛ.
destruction; Zerstörung.
hakilisira [á-í-í-í-á] comparer: lasigidenyasira.
halala [à-à-á] comparer: yɛrɛwolo, tigitigi.
Nom. diplomatie; diplomacy; Diplomatie.
Emprunt de : arabe. adj. 1 • bien personnel, bien
légitime, propriété personnelle; legitimate
good, personal good; gesetzlich Eigentum,
persönliches Eigentum. Nin tɛ e halala ye !
Ce n'est pas à toi ! It's not yours! Es ist nicht
deines!
29/01/2026 269

halaladen han
2 • authentique, vrai, légitime, véritable; halisa [á] Adverbe. jusqu'à présent, jusque là, encore
authentic, true, real; authentisch, wahr, real,
actuellement; till now, still now; bis jetzt, noch
legitim. Tarawele halala un vrai Traoré. a
jetzt. ... nka halisa baara tɔ caman bɛ yen.
real Traoré. ein echter Traoré.
... mais encore aujourd'hui il reste beaucoup à
halaladen [à-à-à-ẽ́] synonyme: furukɔnɔden. Nom. faire. ...but even today there is still much to do.
enfant légitime; legal child; eheliches Kind. ...aber auch heute gibt es noch viel zu tun.
synonyme: furuden. hami [á] Variant: haminanko. 1 • Nom.
halalaya [à-à-á-á] vt. légitimer; legitimize; préoccupation, souci, chagrin; concern, care,
1
legitimieren, ermächtigen, rechtfertigen.
worry, grief; Besorgnis, Sorge, Kummer,
Gram. Hami caman ti denmisɛnw fɛ. Les
halalaya
2
[à-à-à-á] Nom. caractéristique, légitimité,
enfants n’ont pas beaucoup de soucis.
authenticité; characteristics, legitimacy, Children do not have many worries. Kinder
authenticity; Eigenschaften, haben nicht viele Sorgen.
Leistungsmerkmale, Verhalten,
2 • Nom. désir, envie, rêve; desire, dream;
Legitimierung, Rechtmässigkeit.
Verlangen, Wunsch, Traum.
halɛ [à] Verbe. prendre des airs de supériorité a 3 • vi. avoir le souci de, se soucier de, être
l'égard de quelqu'un, être méprisant, crâner; impatient de, avoir fort envie de; have concern
take on an air of superiority towards someone, for, worry about, care for; besorgt sein um,
be contemptuous, show off; gegenüber kümmern. ... a t'i hami. ... il ne se soucie pas
jemandem ein Gefühl der Überlegenheit an de toi. ...he doesn't care about you. ...er
den Tag legen, verächtlich sein, angeben. kümmert sich nicht um dich. Bilakoro ti hami
Halɛli dan ye diɲɛ ye. La limite de la crânerie, dugu kunko la. Les garçons non circoncis
c'est le bout de la vie. The limit of brashness is n’ont pas de souci pour les affaires du village.
the end of life. Die Grenze der Dreistigkeit ist Uncircumcised boys do not worry about the
das Ende des Lebens. A halɛlen don. Il est affairs of the village. Unbeschnittenen Knaben
méprisant. He is contemptuous. Er ist sorgen sich nicht um Dorfangelegenheiten.
verächtlich. 4 • vi. avoir du chagrin; grieve; bekümmern,
hali [á] Emprunt de : arabe. part. 1 • même, tout de betrüben, kränken.
même; even; sogar. Hali denmisɛn bi se nin hamina [á] variante: haminanko. Nom. souci,
na. Même un enfant peut faire ça. Even a child préoccupation; worry, concern; Sorge,
can do this. Sogar ein Kind kann das tun. Hali Kummer, Besorgnis, Unruhe. U hamina ye ka
u bi tɔri dun ! Ils mangent même les ... Leur souci essentiel est de ... Their main
grenouilles ! They even eat frogs! Sie essen concern is to... Ihr Hauptanliegen ist es,...
sogar Frösche! hali ni même si, bien que. even haminanko See main entry: hami,
if. sogar wenn. hali k’a sɔrɔ bien que. jɔrɔnanko.[á] variante: hamina. n.comp.
although, even though. obwohl. Hali ni ne ye souci, préoccupation; worry, concern; Sorge,
san kɛmɛ kɛ Burukina la, ne tɛna se ka Kummer. A ka baara kɛtaw dama de tun ye
julakan dɔn ka ban. Même si je passe cent a haminanko ye. Son unique souci était le
ans au Burkina, je ne finirai pas de connaître le travail qui lui restait à accomplir. His only
dioula. Even if I spend a hundred years in concern was the work that remained to be
Burkina, I won’t be able to know everything in done. Seine einzige Sorge galt der Arbeit, die
Dioula. Selbst wenn ich 100 Jahre in Burkina noch zu erledigen war.
Faso lebe, werde ich nicht gut Dioula lernen.
han [à] variante: haan. interj. marque un
hali bi jusqu’à présent. up to now, still, still
avertissement, hein ! surtout; warning, pay
today. bis jetzt.
attention or else ...!, eh! ; Warnung, passe auf
2 • au point que, si bien que; so that; so daß.
!, eh!, nicht wahr! Diɲɛlatigɛ ka gɛlɛn han !
hali ni See main entry: . expr. même si; even if; sogar La vie est difficile, hein ! Life is difficult, huh!
wenn. Hali n'i ma sɔn ... Même si tu n'est pas Das Leben ist schwierig, nicht wahr! O tɛ kɛ
d'accord ... Even if you don't agree ... Sogar han ! Ça ne se fait pas, dis donc ! That’s not
wenn du nicht einverstanden bist ... happening, I mean! Das passiert nicht, meine
halibele Adverbe. encore!; again!; schon wieder! ich!
nochmals!
29/01/2026 270

harabaharaba haya
harabaharaba hawuja [á] Emprunt de : arabe. Verbe. sidérer, frapper
[à-à-à-á-á-á] variante: harakaharaka. de stupeur, bouleverser; to astound, to be
Adverbe. faire à la hâte, bâcler, s'affoler; rush, astonished, to overwhelm; verblüffen,
dash off, botch, half done; schlampig, erstaunen, überwältigen, fassungslos sein. A
nachlässig, unzuverlässig . O ye baara hawujara. Il est sidéré. He is stunned. Er ist
harabaharaba. Ils ont bâclé le travail. They fassungslos.
did a work half done. They did a shoddy job. hawula [á-ú-á] Emprunt de : arabe.
Sie haben eine schlampige Arbeit geleistet.
variante: hawulɛ, hawulaba. Nom. cupidité,
haramu [à-à] 1 • Verbe. être défendu, être illicite; to be avidité, voracité, gloutonnerie; cupidity, greed,
forbidden, to be unlawful; verboten sein, avarice, avidity, gluttony; Gier, Habgier,
rechtswidrig sein. Olu bɛ tɔnɔn min ɲini a la, Habsucht, Geiz, Völlerei, Freßgier. A hawula
o ye tɔnɔn haramulen de ye. L'intérêt qu'il y ka bon, bɛɛ bɛ wuli ka a to dumini kunna. Il
cherche est illicite. The interest he seeks there est d'une grande gloutonnerie, il reste à manger
is illicit. Die Zinsen, die er dort sucht, sind après tout le monde. He is very gluttonous, he
illegal. stays to eat after everyone else. Er ist sehr
2 • Nom. interdit, tabou; forbidden, taboo; gefräßig, er bleibt zum Essen nach allen
Verbot, Tabu. ... u k'u yɔrɔ janya anderen.
haramukow la ... ... qu'ils s'éloignent des hawulabaya [á] Nom. voracité, goinfrerie,
choses interdites ... ...let them stay away from gloutonnerie, avidité; Gefräßigkeit, Völlerei,
forbidden things... ...lassen Sie sie sich von Gier.
verbotenen Dingen fernhalten...
hawusakala [á] synonyme: timikala. Nom. canne à
haramuya [à-à-ù] synonyme: bali. vt. interdire,
sucre; sugar can; Rohrzucker.
maudire, bannir, rendre illicite; prohibit, curse, Category: Grass, herb, vine. saccharum
banish; verbieten, verhindern, verdammen, officinarum. synonyme: sukarokala.
verfluchen, verbannen, bannen. Dɔlɔtɔya
hawusatɛrɛn [á] Nom. à pied (populaire); on foot
haramuyalen don silamɛya la. L'alcoolisme
(popular); zu Fuß (Volksmund). An bɛ taa
est banni par l'Islam. Alcoholism is banned by
Islam. Alkoholismus ist im Islam verboten. hawusatɛrɛn na. On s'en va à pied. We're
synonyme: bali . leaving on foot. Wir gehen zu Fuß.
1
hasidi [á] Emprunt de : arabe. variante: hasigi. Nom. haya [á-á] Emprunt de : arabe. Nom. 1 • verset
égoïste, méchant (par jalousie), mauvais, coranique; Koran verse; Koran Vers. Haya joli
jaloux; selfish, mean (out of jealousy), bad, b'a kɔnɔ ? Ba wɔɔrɔ ni kɛmɛ ni bisɔɔrɔ ni
jealous; egoistisch, gemein (aus Eifersucht), wɔɔrɔ. Le Coran comprend combien de
böse, eifersüchtig. Cɛkɔrɔba in ye hasidi ye versets ? Six-mille cent soixante-six. How
... Ce vieillard était méchant ... This old man many verses does the Quran have? Six
was mean... Dieser alte Mann war gemein... thousand one hundred and sixty-six. Wie viele
Verse hat der Koran? Sechstausend einhundert
hasidiya Nom. égoïsme, méchanceté, jalousie
sechsundsechzig.
méchante; selfishness, egoism, wicked
2 • incantation coranique, incantation à Dieu;
jalousie, wickedness, malice; Selbstsucht,
Quranic incantation, incantation to God;
Egoismus, bösartige Eifersucht, Bosheit,
Koran-Beschwörung, Beschwörung an Gott.
Boshaftigkeit. Fadenya dɔwɛrɛ bɛ yen, o ye
3 • protection magique; magical protection;
hasidiya ye. Il y a une autre forme de rivalité,
magischer Schutz. ... o ka sanpɛrɛnhaya di
la jalousie. There is another form of rivalry,
... a ma. ... afin qu'il lui donne une protection
jealousy. Es gibt eine andere Form der
Rivalität: Eifersucht.
magique contre la foudre. ...so that it gives him
magical protection against lightning. ...damit
hatɛ [á-ɛ́] Emprunt de : arabe. interj. assurément, es ihm magischen Schutz vor Blitzen gibt.
certes, parfaitement; surely, certainly,
perfectly, definitely; sicherlich, bestimmt,
gewiß, zweifellos. A ko hatɛ ! I ma fosi fɔ ni
tiɲɛ tɛ ! Il dit : «Pour sûr, tu n'as rien dit que la
vérité !». He said: “For sure, you said nothing
but the truth!” Er sagte: „Sicherlich haben
Sie nichts als die Wahrheit gesagt!“.
29/01/2026 271

hayibu hijabu
hayibu [á-í-ú] Emprunt de : arabe. Verbe. faire du hɛɛrɛ sira wa? expr. comment ça va?; how are you?;
tort, dénigrer, humilier; do wrong to wie geht es dir? «I ni sɔgɔma.» «Nse, hɛɛrɛ
somebody, denigrate sb./sth., depreciate, sira wa?» «Bonjour.» «Bonjour, comment ça
malign sb./sth., disparage sb./sth., humiliate,
va?». «Good morning.» «Thanks, how are
put sb. down; jemanden Unrecht tun,
you?». «Guten Morgen.» «Danke, wie geht
verunglimpfen, diffamieren, verachten,
es?».
demütigen. A y'a den hayibu. Il a humilié son
enfant. He humiliated his child. Er hat sein
hɛlɛlɛ [ɛ́] Adverbe. aux éclats (rire); outbursts
Kind gedemütigt. Mɔgɔ jogo jugu fɔlen, o ye (laughter), laughing out loud; laut zu lachen.
a hayibulen ye. Parler du mauvais caractère
A yɛlɛla hɛlɛlɛ !. Elle se mit à rire aux éclats !
de quelqu'un, c'est le dénigrer. To talk about
She started laughing out loud! Sie begann laut
someone's bad character is to denigrate them.
zu lachen!
Über den schlechten Charakter einer Person zu hɛn [ɛ̀] interj. marque de surprise, hein ! ah !;
sprechen bedeutet, sie zu verunglimpfen.
marking surprise, ah! what!; Ausdruck der
synonyme: lɛɛbu. Überraschung, was!?
hayida [á] Emprunt de : arabe. Nom. menstrue, hɛrɛ Emprunt de : arabe. Nom. paix, bonheur,
règles; menstruation, periods; Menstruation, félicité, réjouissance; peace, happiness, bliss,
Perioden. A muso tɛmɛna hayida kan. Sa rejoicing; Frieden, Glück, Fröhlichkeit,
femme est ménopausée. His wife is Glückseligkeit, Freude, Vergnügen.
post-menopausal. Seine Frau ist synonyme: hɛɛrɛ.
postmenopausal. synonyme: kalo, jibɔn, koli,
hidaya [ì-à-á] Emprunt de : arabe. Nom. mendicité;
kalolaada.
begging; Betteln. Garibuw bɛ hidaya ɲini.
hayidanpogo [á] Nom. serviette hygiénique; sanitary Les jeunes élèves coraniques pratiquent la
napkin, sanitary towel; Damenbinde. mendicité. Young Quranic students are
engaged in begging. Die jungen Koranschüler
heyi [é-í] interj. eh !, attention ! holà !; attention !,
betteln. synonyme: garibuya.
eh!; Achtung!, eh!, passe auf! Heyi ! Aw tɛ
sira bila, n ka tɛmɛ ? Holà ! Laissez-moi
hihanhi [í-à-í] Verbe. haleter, être essoufflé; pant,
passer passer ! Hello ! Let me pass! Hallo !
gasp, be breathless; hecheln, keuchen,
Laßt mich passieren! schnaufen, atemlos sein. A bolila, fo ka
hihanhi. Il a couru au point d'être essoufflé.
hɛɛrɛ [ɛ-́ ɛ́] Emprunt de : arabe. variante: hɛrɛ,
He ran to the point where he was out of breath.
hɛɛra. 1 • Nom. paix, bonheur, félicité; peace,
Er rannte so weit, daß er außer Atem war.
happiness, bliss, rejoicing; Frieden, Glück,
synonyme: fanfyɛ, haha.
Fröhlichkeit, Glückseligkeit, Freude,
Vergnügen. Hɛɛrɛ sira ? As-tu passé la nuit en hii [í] à l'infini, très soin, très longtemps;
paix ? (salut.) Did you spend the night in infinitely, very far away, a very long time;
peace? (Hi.) Hast du die Nacht in Ruhe unendlich. Fu, kelen, fila saba, fo hii... Zéro,
verbracht? (Hallo.) synonyme: hɛrɛ. un. deux, trois jusqu'à l’infini ... Zero, one,
2 • expr. ça va (réponse à une salutation); it's all two, three, till infinitely ... Null, eins, zwei,
right / it is fine (answer to a greeting); Es geht drei, bis unendlich ... kabini hii depuis très
gut (Antwort auf eine Gruss). Hɛɛrɛ, longtemps. for a very long time. schon sehr
somɔgɔw do? Ça va, comment va ta famille?
lange.
Fine, how is your family? Gut, wie geht es der hiilɛ Verbe. tromper; deceive, mislead, fool;
Familie? täuschen. Kana n hiilɛ ! Ne me trompe pas !
3 • expr. réjouissance; rejoicing, festivity, Don't fool me! Täusche mich nicht!
celebration; Jubel, Feierlichkeiten. ... kɔɲɔw
hijabu Emprunt de : arabe. Nom. protection divine,
ni denkundiw n'án ka hɛɛrɛ wɛrɛw senfɛ ...
bénédiction, maraboutage; divine protection,
... au cours des mariages, des baptêmes et des
blessing; Göttlicher Schutz, Segen. Hajabu
autres réjouissances ... ...during weddings,
baptisms and other celebrations... ...bei
min b'a la ... Toutes ses protections divines ...
Hochzeiten, Taufen und anderen All his divine protections... Alle seine
Feierlichkeiten... göttlichen Schutze ... Category: Religion.
29/01/2026 272

hiji hinɛtɔya
hiji [í] Emprunt de : arabe: hajj. Nom. 5 • plaire, satisfaire; please, satisfy; gefallen,
zufrieden stellen. O yɔrɔ y'u hinɛ. Cet endroit
1 • pèlerinage à la Mecque; pilgrimage;
Pilgerreise. Minnu taara hiji la ɲinan ... Ceux
leur a plu. They liked this place. Sie mochten
qui sont allés cette année en pèlerinage ...
diesen Ort. Ne hinɛ fara. Je suis très satisfait. I
Those who went on pilgrimage this year... am very satisfied. Ich bin sehr zufrieden.
Diejenigen, die dieses Jahr gepilgert sind... hinɛbagatɔ [í] Nom. miséricordieux, compatissant;
Category: Religion.
merciful, compassionate; barmherzig, gnädig.
2 • accomplir le pèlerinage; perform the fɛntigi hinɛbagatɔw les riches qui sont
pilgrimage; die Pilgerfahrt durchführen.
compatissants. The rich who are
hijibu [í] Emprunt de : arabe. Nom. soixantième compassionate. Die Reichen, die mitfühlend
partie du Coran, chapitre; sixtieth part of the sind. synonyme: makarinci.
Koran, chapter; sechzigste Teil vom Koran,
hinɛbali Morphemes: hinɛ-bali. adj. impitoyable;
Kapitel. hijibu maninkɛmɛ ... les soixante
merciless; erbarmungslos, grausam,
parties du Coran ... the sixty parts of the
unbarmherzig.
Quran... die sechzig Teile des Korans...
Category: Religion. hinɛma [í] Nom. intéressant, agréable; interesting,
hijiden [í] Morphemes: hiji-den. Nom. pèlerin; pleasant; interessant, angenehm. sigiyɔrɔ
pilgrim; Pilger. Hijidenw ma na ka bɔ Maaka
ɲuman don, jamana hinɛma don. C'est un
fɔlɔ. Les pèlerins ne sont pas encore retournés
bon endroit pour s'installer, c'est un pays qui
offre des conditions de vie agréables. It's a
de la Mecque. The pilgrims have not yet
good place to settle, it's a country that offers
returned from Mecca. Die Pilger sind noch
pleasant living conditions. Es ist ein guter Ort,
nicht aus Mekka zurückgekehrt.
um sich niederzulassen, es ist ein Land, das
synonyme: hijitaala.
angenehme Lebensbedingungen bietet.
hijitaala [í] Jula: hijitagala. Nom. pèlerin; pilgrim; hinɛnci [í] Nom. miséricordieux; merciful; barmherzig.
Pilger. synonyme: hijiden. Ala tɔgɔ ye hinɛnci. Le nom de dieu est le
hinan [í-á] Emprunt de : arabe. variante: hina. Miséricordieux. The name of God is the
Merciful. Der Name Gottes ist der
1 • Nom. pitié, compassion, miséricorde; pity,
compassion, mercy; Erbarmen, Mitleid. Ala
Barmherzige. synonyme: makarinci.
ma hinan'a ra. Que Dieu ait pitié de lui. May hinɛnciya [í] Nom. miséricorde, pitié, grande
God have mercy on him. Möge Gott sich über compassion; mercy, pity, great compassion.
ihn erbarmen. synonyme: minsin, hinɛnciya. Ala ka hinɛnciya b'a to, a bɛ sanji na mɔgɔ
2 • Verbe. avoir pitié, soulager, faire du bien, juguw ni mɔgɔw ɲumanw bɛɛ ye. Dieu dans
secourir; to have compassion, relieve, sa miséricorde fait venir la pluie pour les
alleviate, do good, rescue; Mitleid haben, méchants comme pour les bons. God in his
erleichtern, lindern, gut tun, retten. mercy brings rain for the bad and the good.
hinɛ [í-ɛ́] [í] variante: hina. Nom. 1 • pitié,
Gott bringt in seiner Barmherzigkeit Regen für
die Bösen und die Guten. synonyme: hinɛ,
compassion; pity, compassion; Erbarmen,
Mitleid, Güte. Ala ka hinɛ a la ! Que Dieu ait
minsin, makari, hinan.
pitié de lui ! (par exemple, quand quelqu’un est hinɛtɔ [í] part. sensible, pitoyable, personne qui fait
mort.) May God have pity on him/her! (used, pitié; sensitive, pitiful, person who makes one
for example, when hearing of someone’s feel pity for him; einfühlsam, empfindsam,
death.) Möge Gott mit ihm erbarmen haben. feinfühlig, erbärmlich, kläglich, mitfühlend.
synonyme: minsin, hinɛnciya. Kana i yɛrɛ kɛ hinɛtɔ ye sa ! Ne cherche pas à
2 • satisfaction, plaisir, abondance, prospérité; apitoyer les gens. Don't try to pity people.
satisfaction, pleasure, abundance, prosperity; Versuchen Sie nicht, Menschen zu
Zufriedenheit, Vergnügen, Überfluß, bemitleiden.
Wohlstand.
hinɛtɔya [í] Nom. (fait d'éprouver de la) pitié ou
3 • avoir pitié; have pity; Mitleid haben. Ala bɛ
compassion, sensibilité; sensibility, sensitivity,
hinɛ, nka a tɛ makari. Dieu a pitié, pourtant il feeling compassion or pity; Feingefühl,
est impitoyable (proverbe). God has mercy, yet Zartgefühl, Empfindsamkeit, Sensibilität,
he is merciless (proverb). Gott hat Mitleid, Mitleid fühlen / empfinden. Hinɛtɔya tɛ
doch er ist unbarmherzig (Sprichwort).
kɛlɛyɔrɔ la. Il n'y a pas de pitié sur le champ de
4 • soulager, faire du bien, secourir; relieve, do
bataille. There is no mercy on the battlefield.
good, help; entlasten, Gutes tun, helfen.
Auf dem Schlachtfeld gibt es keine Gnade.
29/01/2026 273

hinhin huu
hinhin [ǐ-ǐ] Verbe. 1 • hennir; neigh, whinny; wiehern. hɔɔrɔnya [ɔ́-ɔ́-á] comparer: danbe.
Sokɛ tɛ hinhin bɛɛ ka so bilen. Le cheval ne variante: hɔrɔnya. 1 • Nom. honnêteté, intégrité,
hennit plus chez tous. The horse no longer dignité, fidélité, transparence, indépendance;
neighs at everyone. Das Pferd wiehert nicht honesty, integrity, dignity, fidelity, loyalty,
mehr jeden an. transparency; Ehrlichkeit, Echtheit, Integrität,
2 • crier de joie; scream with joy, shout with Redlichkeit, Würde, Treue, Transparenz. Cɛ tɛ
joy; schreien vor Freude, jubeln vor Freude. hɔɔrɔnya n'a furumuso tɛ. L'homme sans
Denmisɛnninw hinhinna ka baba kungɛn. épouse n'a pas de dignité. The man without a
Les enfants ont crié de joie en allant à la wife has no dignity. Ein Mann ohne Frau hat
rencontre de leur papa. The children shouted keine Würde.
with joy as they went to meet their dad. Die 2 • Verbe. libérer, être libre, affranchir; liberate,
Kinder jubelten vor Freude, als sie ihrem Vater be free, set free; befreien, frei sein. Ni Ala ye
entgegengingen.
fanga di yan, n b'i hɔrɔnya. Si Dieu me
hiriba [ì-ì] Emprunt de : arabe. Nom. usure; usury; donne le pouvoir, je t’affranchirai. If God gives
Wucher. N bɛ kɛmɛ di i ma, i b'a sara kɛmɛ me power, I will set you free. Wenn Gott mir
ni mugan, o ye hiriba ye. Je te donne cinq
Macht gibt, werde ich dich befreien.
cents francs, tu me rembourses six cents, c'est 3 • Verbe. être digne; be worthy; würdig sein.
ce qu’on appelle usure. I give you five hundred hɔrɛ [ɔ́] Emprunt de : peul. variante: hɔɔrɛ. Verbe.
francs, you reimburse me six hundred, that’s
sortir les troupeaux le matin, emmener paître
what we call usury. Ich gebe dir fünfhundert
les vaches; Take out the flocks in the morning,
Franken, du erstattest mir sechshundert, das
feed the cows; Führe morgens die Herden raus
nennen wir Wucher. Category: Finance.
und bringe die Kühe auf die Weide, morgens
hohaho [ó-à-ó] Nom. cris, tumulte (par exemple die Herden raus-führen, morgens die Kühe
derrière quelqu'un qu'on poursuit); cries, weiden. Misiw bɛ hɔrɛ sɔgɔma fɛ. On sort les
tumult (for example behind someone being vaches le matin. We take the cows out in the
chased); Schreie, Tumult (zum Beispiel hinter morning. Morgens führen wir die Kühe raus.
jemandem, der verfolgt wird). A bɛ hohaho la Category: Animal husbandry.
a nɔfɛ. Elle crie courant derrière lui. She hɔrɔnyali variante: hɔɔrɔnyali. Nom. liberté; freedom;
screams running after him. Sie schreit und Freiheit.
rennt ihm nach.
hujunu [ú] Nom. souci, difficulté; concern, difficulty;
hɔn
1
[ɔ]́ variante: mɔn. vi. tiens !, prends !; take it !,
Sorge, Schwierigkeit. A hujunu ka ca. Elle a
hold it!; nimm es! halte es! Hɔn syɛ la ! Tiens,
beaucoup de soucis. She has a lot of worries.
prends la poule ! Here, take the chicken! Hier, Sie hat viele Sorgen.
nimm das Huhn! synonyme: mɔn .
2 hukumu [ú-ú-ú] Emprunt de : arabe. Nom. 1 • cadre,
hɔn 2 [ɔ]́ variante: [ɔ́nɔ̀n]. interj. non; no; nein. contexte, sous le patronage de, dans le
Hɔn, a ma kɔgɔ fɔlɔ ! Non, non, elle n'est pas domaine de, ; context, under the patronage of;
encore mûre ! No, no, it's not ripe yet! Nein, Rahmen, Kontext, unter der Schirmherrschaft
nein, es ist noch nicht reif! synonyme: ɔnhɔn, von. Taama in hukumu kɔnɔ ... Au cours de
2
un un, unhun , ɔn ɔn. ce voyage ... During this journey... Während
2
dieser Reise...
hɔn [ɔ]̌ interj. oui; yes; ja. A ko: «hɔn» ! Il répondit
3 2 • autorité, égide; authority, aegis; Autorität,
: «Oui»! He replied: “Yes”! Er antwortete: Patronage, Schirmherrschaft. ... komite ka
„Ja“! synonyme: iyo, awɔ, unhun 1 , ɔnhɔn 1 . hukumu kɔnɔ ... ... sous l'égide du comité ...
hɔɔrɔn [ɔ]́ Emprunt de : arabe. variante: hɔrɔn. Nom. ... under the aegis of the committee ... ... im
Namen des Komitees ...
1 • noble, digne, libre; noble, worthy, free;
Adelige, Edelmann, würdig, frei. hululu [ù-ù] variante: kululu. Nom. illicite, ce qui
2 • homme libre; free man; freier Mensch. est malhonnête; illicit, which is dishonest;
Hɔɔrɔn malobali ni subaga ka kan. Le noble illegal, was unehrlich ist. ka hululu dun
qui est éhonté ne vaut pas mieux qu'un prendre des pots-de-vin. take bribes.
sorcier (proverbe). The noble who is shameless Bestechungsgelder annehmen.
is no better than a sorcerer (proverb). Der Category: Finance.
schamlose Adlige ist nicht besser als ein
huu [ú] interj. hou ! (appel au secours, à l'aide);
Zauberer (Sprichwort).
hoo! (call for help, help); Hui! (Hilferuf,
Hilfe). A ye huu da mɔgɔw ye. Elle a appelé
les gens à l'aide. She called people for help.
Sie rief Menschen um Hilfe.
29/01/2026 274

huyu i ni wula
huyu [ù] Nom. cris, clameur, cris de joie; shouts, fɛ ... Les chiens aboyèrent ensemble ... The
clamour, cries of joy; Schreie, Geschrei, dogs barked together... Die Hunde bellten
Freudenschreie. Wuluw ye huyu don ɲɔgɔn
zusammen...
I - i
i [í] synonyme: e. pron. 1 • tu, toi, ton, ta, tes: i na a fɔ comparer: iko. Jula: i n'a fɔ. variante: i ko,
deuxième personne du singulier; you, your: iko. expr. comme, ainsi, on dirait, par exemple,
second person singular pronoun; du, dein, c'est à dire; like, so, one would say, for
deine. I nana. Tu es venu(e). You have come. example; wie, so, man würde sagen, zum
Du bist gekommen. Beispiel, das heisst. A kunkolo ka gwɛlɛ i n’a
2 • on; one; man. I tɛ foyi sɔrɔ n'i ma kuma. fɔ fali taa. Il est têtu comme un âne (lit. sa tête
On n'obtient rien sans la parole. One doesn't est dure comme celle d’un âne). He is as
get anything without speaking. Man erhält stubborn as a donkey (lit. his head is hard like
nichts ohne reden. Mɔgɔ ɲɛ o ɲɛ, i tɛ se k'i a donkey’s). Er ist trotzig wie ein Esel.
mankutu. Proverbe: Si bien qu'on soit, on ne Faransɛkan bi fɔ jamana caman na, i n’a fɔ
peut se louer soi-même. Proverb: You might Burukina, Mali, Senegali ani Togo. On parle
be as good as you may, but you cannot praise le français dans beaucoup de pays, comme le
yourself. Sprichwort: Du kannst noch so gut Burkina, le Mali, le Sénégal et le Togo. French
sein, du darfst dich nicht selber loben. is spoken in a lot of countries such as Burkina,
3 • pronom réfléchi 2ème et 3ème personnes du Mali, Senegal and Togo. Französisch spricht
singulier et de la 3ème du pluriel; reflexive man in vielen Ländern wie z.B. in Burkina,
pronoun for you sg. he / she and they; reflexiv Mali, Senegal und Togo. A b'i n’a fɔ... Il
Pronomen für du er, sie und sie pl. Jaraw tun semble que, c’est comme. It was like. Es war
bi na i min. Les lions venaient s'abreuver. The wie ... i n’a fɔ misali la... comme par
lions came to drink water. Die Löwen sind exemple... like for example... wie zum Beispiel
gekommen um zu trinken. ...
4 • pronom de reprise de «mɔgɔ»; reference i ni baraji expr. que (Dieu) te bénisse; may (God)
pronoun for «mɔgɔ»;
bless you; möge (Gott) dich segnen. Ami. I ni
Wiederholung-Pronomen für «mɔgɔ».
ce, i ni baraji. Amen, que Dieu te bénisse.
i dansɛ [ì á-ɛ̀] bambara: i daan se!. interj. bienvenu
Amen, may God bless you. Amen, möge Gott
(sg.), bienvenu à toi (celui qui vient de dich segnen.
voyage); welcome (sg.); willkommen (sg.)
i ni ce comparer: á ni ce. interj. merci (sg.); thank you
i fɛ expr. chez toi; at your place; bei dir.
(sg.); danke (sg.)
i fo expr. quel malheur, salutation à quelqu'un qui i ni kunnadiya expr. félicitations; congratulations;
est dans la peine, qui est malade; how terrible, herzliche Glückwünsche.
greeting to someone being sick or suffering;
i ni sɔgɔma excl. bonjour; good morning; guten
was für ein Unglück,Gruss an jemanden, der
leidet oder krank ist. Morgen.
i n'a fɔ expr. égale à peu près; about, around, i ni suu expr. bonsoir (après le coucher du soleil);
approximately; ungefähr, etwa.
good evening (after sunset); guten Abend
Category: Mathematics, Sign, Symbol. (nach Sonnenuntergang).
i ni taama Jula: i ni tagama. expr. sois le / la
bienvenu(e); welcome; willkommen. I ni
tagama, Bobokaw do? Sois le bienvenu,
comment vont les gens de Bobo? Welcome,
how are the people in Bobo? Willkommen,
wie geht es den Leuten in Bobo?
i ni tile expr. bonjour (au milieu de la journée); hello
(in the middle of the day); hallo (mitten am
Tag).
i ni wula interj. bonsoir; good afternoon; guten Tag
(am Nachmittag).
29/01/2026 275

i taaw ja
i taaw expr. les tiennes; your (close) people; die in [ì] Déterminant. ce, cette, le ou la ... en question;
deinen. this, that, the or the ... we are talking about;
iko comparer: i na a fɔ.[í] Jula: i ko. variante: i dieser, diese. ... jamana in kodɔngogoro bɛ
ko. expr. comme, ainsi, on dirait, comme si, par
olu de bolo. ... c'est entre leur mains que se
trouvent les clefs du savoir de ce pays. ... it is
exemple; like, thus, so, one would say, for
in their hands that the keys to knowledge of
example; wie, so,man würde sagen, zum
this country are found. ... in ihren Händen
Beispiel. A ka cegu i ko wɔlɔ. Il est malin
liegen die Schlüssel zum Wissen über dieses
comme une perdrix. He is as clever as a
Land.
partridge. er ist schlau wie ein Rebhuhn. I ka i
irido [ì-ì-ó] Emprunt de : français. Nom. rideau;
mɔgɔ ɲɔgɔn kanu i ko i yɛrɛ. Aime ton
curtain; Vorhang.
prochain comme toi-même. Love your
neighbour as yourself. Liebe deinen Nächsten irisi Nom. russe (personne); Russian (person);
wie dich selbst. Note: Bible: Matiyu 22.39 Russe.
synonyme: komi.
Isa n.pro. Isa, Jésus (en islam); Isa, Jesus (in
ikomi [í] conj. comme; as, like; wie. An bɛɛ lajɛlen Islam); Jesus.
bɛ siran a ɲɛ ikomi nɛnɛ. Nous avons tous isamɛn Emprunt de : français. Nom. examen; exam;
peur de lui comme du froid ! We are all afraid
Examen, Prüfung. Isamɛn kɛ. Passer un
of him like the cold! Wir haben alle Angst vor
ihm wie vor der Kälte!
examen. Sit an exam. Eine Prüfung ablegen.
Category: Learn.
ikɔrɔ Adverbe. immédiatement, sur le champ;
isamɛnkɛla Morphemes: isamɛn-kɛ-la. Nom.
immediately, at once; sofort, umgehend, auf
der Stelle. Ni Ala ye mɔgɔ tɔgɔ kari, a bɛ a
candidat d’examen; examinee; Prüfling.
Category: Person.
taamasen don ikɔrɔ. Quand Dieu casse la
Italye variante: Italiyɛn. Nom. italien; Italian;
hanche de quelqu'un, il lui indique
immédiatement comment marcher (proverbe). Italiener.
When God breaks someone's hip, he iyo [í] interj. oui; yes; ja. Layidu tadon, «iyo» fɔli
immediately tells them how to walk (proverb).
man gɛlɛn, a labatoli de ka gɛlɛn. Le «oui»
Wenn Gott jemandem die Hüfte bricht, sagt er
ihm sofort, wie er gehen soll (Sprichwort). d'une promesse n'est pas difficile à prononcer,
mais respecter ensuite cette promesse est plus
imam Variant: alimami. Nom. l'imam; imam; Imam.
difficile. The “yes” of a promise is not difficult
Category: Person. to say, but then keeping that promise is more
difficult. Das „Ja“ eines Versprechens ist nicht
schwer zu sagen, aber dieses Versprechen zu
halten ist noch schwieriger. synonyme: hɔn ,
3
awɔ, unhun , ɔnhɔn.
1 1
izini Emprunt de : français. Nom. usine; factory;
Fabrik. Category: Building.
J - j
ja [à] 1 • vt. être sec, sécher, dessécher; dry; 3 • vt. se réchauffer auprès du feu; warm up by
1
the fire; sich wärmen am Feuer.
trocknen, austrocknen, vertrocknen. A y'a bila
4 • Nom. sécheresse; drought, dryness;
tile la a ka ja. Il l'a mis à sécher au soleil. He
Trockenheit, Dürre. ... ja man jugu a ma ... ...
put it to dry in the sun. Er ließ ihn in der Sonne
il résiste à la sécheresse ... ... it resists drought
trocknen. Kini bi kɔnɔ ja. Le riz sèche le
... ... widersteht der Trockenheit ...
ventre (donne des constipations). Rice dries up
the stomach. Reis trocknet den Magen aus.
2 • vt. être raide, rigide, engourdi, paralysé; to
be stiff, rigid, dumb, paralyze; lähmen,
lahmlegen, steif sein, stumm. A y'i jalen to ...
Elle resta raide ... She remained stiff ... Sie
blieb steif ...
29/01/2026 276

ja jaabili
ja [à] comparer: jabɔ, japapa, jasigi, jasiran, 2 • partie d’une être humaine, centre
2
d’assurance et de peur, siège de la force d'âme,
jatigɛ, jawuli. variante: jaa. Nom. 1 • esprit,
double, esprit, sens, ensemble de toutes les
sens, double, siège de la force d'âme; spirit,
facultés de la personne; part of person, center
sense, double; Geist, Sinn Doppel. Kabini of assurance and fear, seat of the power of the
Ala ka n da, n ja ma bɔ. Depuis que Dieu m'a soul, complex of all faculties of a person; Teil
crée, je n'ai pas eu peur. Since God created me, des Menschen, Zentrum der Zuversicht und
I have not been afraid. Seit Gott mich der Angst, Geist, Seele, Sitz der seelischen
erschaffen hat, hatte ich nie Angst. Kraft, das Zusammenspiel aller Fähigkeiten
2 • illustration, dessin, carte, photo; einer Person. I jaa gwɛlɛya ! Bon courage !
illustration, drawing, card, photo, picture; Have courage! Sei mutig! X jaa gwɛlɛya
Illustration, Zeichnung, Karte, Foto. encourager X. encourage X. X ermutigen. A
3 • cinéma; cinema, film; Kino, Film. An bɛ jaa bɔra. Il a eu peur. He was scared. Er hatte
taa ja la. Nous allons au cinéma. We are going Angst. X jaa tigɛ décourager quelqu’un.
to the cinema. Wir gehen ins Kino. discourage. entmutigen.
4 • ombre; shadow, shade; Schatten. A ja filɛ jaa [àá] bambara: ja. Nom. sécheresse; drought;
3
dugu ma. Voici son ombre sur le sol. Here is
Trockenheit. Category: Weather.
his shadow on the ground. Hier ist sein
Schatten auf dem Boden.
jaa
4
[àá] conj. or, cependant, mais, vraiment,
pourtant, en fait; however, but, nevertheless,
ja [à] Verbe. loger quelqu'un, héberger, descendre
3 though, yet; doch, aber, allerdings, dennoch,
chez quelqu'un; to host, to house, to trotzdem, wenn auch. Faama ni nisɔndiya
accommodate, shelter sb., lodge; beherbergen,
yɛlɛla ka a kunbɛn, jaa janfa b'a bolo. Le roi
unterbringen, aufnehmen, logieren. U jara
l'accueillit en souriant, mais il pensait à la
dugutigi kan. Ils ont été logés chez le chef du
trahison. The king greeted him with a smile,
village. They were housed with the village
but he thought of treason. Der König begrüßte
chief. Sie wurden vom Dorfvorsteher ihn lächelnd, aber er dachte an Verrat.
untergebracht.
jaa basigili expr. désertification; desertification;
ja [à] Jula: jaa. Nom. balance; scales, balance;
4 Desertifikation, Verödung, Versteppung,
Waage. ka a ja ta peser. weigh. wiegen. Wüstenausbreitung. Category: Land.
synonyme: murujan. synonyme: kɛnɛbɔ.
2
ja juruman Nom. balance à fléau; scales; Waage. jaaba [à-á] Morphemes: ja-ba. Nom. grande
Category: Tool. sécheresse; serious drought; grosse
ja lɔnin expr. balance de Roberval; scales of Roberval; Trockenheit, Dürre. Category: Weather.
Roberval Waage. Category: Tool. jaabi [á-í] variante: jabi. 1 • vt. répondre, exaucer;
jaa [àá] bambara: ja. synonyme: ɲɛgɛn. Nom. answer, to fulfill, to grant, to satisfy;
1
antworten, erhören. Amidu y’u jaabi ko : « ...
1 • ombre; shadow; Schatten.
» Amidou leur a répondu, « ... ». Amidou
2 • carte; map; Landkarte.
answered them, " ... ". Amidou hat ihnen
3 • graphique; graphic; Grafik, anschauliche
geantwortet: “...».
Darstellung.
2 • Nom. réponse, résultat, solution; answer,
jaa 2 [áà] bambara: ja. synonyme: ɲɛgɛn. Nom. result, solution; Antwort, Ergebnis, Lösung. N
1 • illustration, image, dessin, photo, film; bi ka jaabi ɲinina. Je suis en train de chercher
illustration, image, picture, drawing, photo,
la réponse. I am looking for the answer. Ich
film; Illustration, Bild, Foto, Photo,
suche eine Antwort.
Zeichnung, Film. jaa dilan dessiner, faire un
dessin. draw a picture. ein Bild zeichnen.
jaabi ɲuman Nom. réponse favorable; positive /
synonyme: ɲɛgɛn. favorable response; wohlwollende Antwort,
2
vorteilhafte Antwort, bejahende Antwort,
positive Antwort.
jaabili Morphemes: jaabi-li. variante: jabili. Nom.
réponse; answer; Antwort. jaabili kɛ
répondre. answer. antworten. jaabili sɔrɔ
trouver la réponse. find the answer. die
Antwort finden.
29/01/2026 277

jaakɔrɔ jabagaya
jaakɔrɔ [á] Nom. vache adulte jeune, génisse, broutard; jaati [á] variante: jati. interj. vraiment, en vérité,
young adult cow, heifer, cow; junge exactement, parfaitement, absolument, tout à
ausgewachsene Kuh, Färse, Muttertier. fait; really, truth, exactly, perfectly, absolutely,
Category: Animal husbandry. downright; wirklich, Wahrheit, genau, absolut,
synonyme: jagawere, jaga , misinin. perfekt, ganz und gar. O kɛra jaati. Cela s'est
3
jaaseere [à] 1 • Verbe. avertir, mettre en garde; warn;
vraiment passé. That really happened. Das ist
wirklich geschehen. Jaati ! Nin yɛrɛ de y'a ta !
warnen. ka mɔgɔ jaaseere avertir quelqu'un.
Absolument ! C'est lui-même qui l'a pris !
warn someone. jemanden warnen.
Absolutely ! He took it himself! Absolut ! Er
2 • Nom. avertissement, mise en garde; hat es selbst genommen!
warning, caution; Warnung, Vorsicht.
Jaaw n’u daɲɛgafeba farafinna Nom.
synonyme: kankarimada.
dictionnaire visuel africain; African visual /
3 • Nom. attention !; attention !, be careful!;
illustrated dictionary; afrikanisches Bilder
Aufmerksamkeit ! Achtung ! Vorsicht! ... n bɛ
Lexikon. Category: Learn.
siran malo ɲɛ, jaaseere ! ... je crains
jaba [à-á] Nom. 1 • oignon; onion; Zwiebel.
l'humiliation, attention ! ...I fear humiliation, 1
be careful! ...Ich habe Angst vor Category: Food. synonyme: alibasa.
Demütigung, sei vorsichtig! 2 • échalote; shallot; Schalotte.
jaasi [á-í] variante: jasi. vt. 1 • ruiner, dévaloriser, synonyme: jabawulennin.
mépriser, diminuer; ruin, reduce the value, jaba [à-á] 1 • Verbe. coucher avec; sleep with;
2
depreciate, diminish; ruinieren, zerstören, schlafen mit.
verachten, herabsetzen, verringern,
2 • Nom. sexe féminin; female sex; weibliches
erniedrigen. ... u ka kan bɛ jaasi. ... on
Geschlechtsorgan. Category: Body.
méprise leur langue. ...they despise their
language. ...man verachten ihre Sprache. A
jaba
3
[à] Verbe. 1 • rougir, rouge; redden, red; rot, rot
kilo sɔngɔ bɛ jaasi ka taa a fɛ. Le prix au kilo werden. A kasira fo ka a ɲɛ jaba. Il a pleuré
diminue de plus en plus. The price per kilo is
au point d'avoir les yeux rouges. He cried so
decreasing more and more. Der Kilopreis
much that his eyes were red. Er weinte so sehr,
sinkt immer mehr.
daß seine Augen rot wurden.
2 • être sans valeur; to be worthless; wertlos 2 • rendre tout rouge, faire mûrir en même
sein. Jahanamaden ka fɛn bɛɛ jaasilen don.
temps; make everything red, let ripen at the
same time; alles rot machen, gleichzeitig
Tout ce que possède un maudit est sans valeur.
reifen lassen. mangoro jabalen des mangues
Everything a cursed person owns is worthless.
mûres. ripe mangoes. reife Mangos.
Alles, was eine verfluchte Person besitzt, ist
wertlos. jabaga [à-á-á] Nom. hôte (celui qui reçoit), logeur;
jaasilenya [á] 1 • Verbe. perdre sa valeur, déprécier; to host, lodger, landlord; Gastgeber, Vermieter.
loose one's value, depreciate, disparage; Ne jabaga ye Musa ye. Mon logeur, c'est
seinen Wert verlieren, abwerten, mindern. An Moussa. My landlord is Moussa. Mein
ka wari jaasilenyana kosɛbɛ ! Notre argent a
Vermieter ist Moussa. Category: Person.
été très déprécié ! Our money has been greatly jabagala [à-à-à-á] Nom. logement, lieu où on est
depreciated! Unser Geld wurde stark logé par quelqu’un; accommodation, lodging;
entwertet! Unterkunft, Unterbringung. E jabagala ye
2 • Nom. déchéance, dépréciation; forfeiture, yɔrɔ jumɛn ye? Où es-tu logé ? Where are you
degradation, deprivation, depreciation,
staying? Wo wohnst du?
devaluation; Verfall, Degeneration
Abwertung, Wertverlust, Wertminderung. jabagaya [à-à-à] 1 • Verbe. loger quelqu'un, recevoir
Foyi ma bɔ a ka jaasilenya na. Il reste dans la un hôte; to lodge somebody; jemanden
déchéance. He remains in decline. Er bleibt im beherbergen. Sunguruba jabagaya man di. Il
Niedergang. n'est pas bon de donner l'hospitalité à une
femme de mauvaise vie. It is not good to give
hospitality to a woman of bad life. Es ist nicht
gut, einer Frau mit zweifelhafter
Lebensführung Gastfreundschaft zu gewähren.
2 • Nom. hospitalité; hospitality;
Gastfreundschaft.
29/01/2026 278

jabajɛ jabɔyɔrɔ
jabajɛ [à-à] Jula: jabagwɛ. Morphemes: jaba-jɛ. jabɛlɛ variante: jabɛrɛ, jabere. Nom. colocase, taro;
Verbe. innocenter, laver de tout soupçon, kind of tuber; Knollen Art. Category: Food.
disculper, acquitter; acquit of guilt; clear; für colocasia esculenta.
unschuldig erklären, rechtfertigen,
jabɛrɛ [à-ɛ́-ɛ́] Nom. utérus, ventre de la femme;
freisprechen. A larawera, fɛn soɲɛnen ma
uterus, lower part of the woman, tummy of a
sɔrɔ a bolo, a jabajɛra. On l'a fouillé sans
woman, belly of a woman; Uterus, Bauch einer
retrouver l'objet volé sur lui, il a été innocenté.
Frau, Gebärmutter. Jabɛrɛ ye muso bangeso
He was searched without finding the stolen
de ye. L'utérus, c'est l'endroit où se forme
object on him, he was cleared. Er wurde
l'enfant chez la femme. The uterus is where the
durchsucht, ohne dass man den gestohlenen
child is formed in the woman. Die Gebärmutter
Gegenstand bei ihm gefunden hat, er wurde
freigesprochen.
ist der Ort, an dem das Kind bei der Frau
entsteht. Category: Body. synonyme: bangeso,
jabaji [à-à-í] Morphemes: jaba-ji. Nom. sauce
bangenugu.
légère à base d'oignon; onion sauce; Sauce mit
Zwiebeln, Zwiebelsauce. Category: Food. jabɛti [á-ɛ́-í] Emprunt de : français. Nom. diabète;
jabakasala Nom. plante (espèce); plant sp; diabetes; Zuckerkrank. Category: Disease.
Pflanzenart. Category: Grass, herb, vine. jabɛtibana [á-ɛ́-í-á-á] variante: jabɛti. Nom.
cassia alata. Diabète; diabetes; Zuckerkrankheit.
jabalan [à-à-á] Nom. sorgho rouge; red sorghum; Category: Disease.
roter Sorghum. Category: Food, Agriculture, jabi [à-í] Nom. henné; henna; Pflanzenart, Henna.
Grass, herb, vine. sorghum caudatum. Faatu ye jabi da a sen la. Fatou a mis de
jabali [à-á-í] Nom. intarissable; inexhaustible; henné sur ses pieds. Fatou put henna on her
unerschöpflich. birimisi jabali personne
feet. Fatou hat Henna auf ihre Füße gemalt.
Category: Bush, shrub. Lawsonia inermis.
généreuse (littéralement : «vache à lait
intarissable»). Generous person (literally: jabibi [à-í-í] Nom. ananas; pineapple; Ananas.
"milk cow that never runs out of milk"). Category: Types of food. ananassa sativa.
Großzügige Person (wörtlich: «ausdauernde
jabidafura [à-ì-à-ú-á] Nom. pomme de Sodome,
Milchkuh»).
arbre à soie; kind of tree; Baumart.
jabaranin [à-à-à-ĩ́] Morphemes: ja-bara-nin. Nom. Category: Bush, shrub. calotropis procera.
télévision; television; Fernseher. synonyme: nponponpogolon.
Category: Household equipment, Machine.
synonyme: tele.
jabima [à-ì] Nom. violet, couleur de henné; purple,
henna colour; violett, Farbe von Henna.
jabaraninfilɛla Nom. téléspectateur; television Category: colour.
viewer; Fernsehzuschauer.
jabobobɔnan Nom. rétroprojecteur; overhead
jabaraɲa Nom. écran; screen; Bildschirm.
projector; Hellraumprojektor.
jabaru [à] variante: jabaro. Nom. majestueux; jabɔ 1 • Verbe. effrayer; scare; erschrecken.
1
majestic; majestätisch. jabarumasa Dieu de synonyme: jasiran.
majesté, Dieu tout-puissant. God of majesty, 2 • Nom. frayeur, peur, panique; fright, scare,
almighty God. Majestätischer Gott, fear, panic; Schrecken, Furcht, Angst, Panik.
allmächtiger Gott.
jabɔ [à-ɔ́] Nom. projection de film, film; movie
2
jabati [à-à] Emprunt de : peul. Verbe. arracher
projection, film projection, film;
violemment; tear away violently, pull it off; Filmvorführung, Film.
heftig abreißen, ausreißen. Ni i y'a jabati, a
jabɔbali [à-ɔ̀-á-í] Nom. brave, courageux, sans peur;
den bɛɛ bɛ to dugu la. Si tu l'arraches, ses
brave, courageous, fearless; mutig, tapfer,
tubercules vont rester dans le sol. If you pull it
angstlos. hɔrɔnkɛ jabɔbali l'homme noble qui
off, its tubers will stay in the ground. Wenn du
sie abreißt, bleiben die Knollen im Boden.
n'a pas peut. the noble man who is not afraid.
Der edle Mann, der keine Angst hat.
jabawulennin Nom. échalote; shallot; Schalotte,
jabɔso [à-ɔ̀-ó] Nom. cinéma, salle de cinéma; cinema;
kleine Zwiebel. Category: Food.
synonyme: jaba .
Kino, Kinosaal. Category: Building.
1
jabɔyɔrɔ Nom. écran de projection, écran d'ordinateur;
jabe variante: jabi. Nom. plante (espèce), henné;
projection screen, screen; Leinwand,
plant sp; Pflanzenart. Category: Bush, shrub.
Bildschirm.
lawsonia inermis.
29/01/2026 279

jadilala jago
jadilala [à-à-à-á] Nom. cinéaste; film-maker; 2 • index; index finger; Zeigefinger. A y'a
Filmmacher. Category: Worker, occupation. jagase da na rɔ, a y'a da a nɛn kan. Elle mit
son index dans la sauce puis le mit sur sa
jadonyɔrɔ Nom. objectif; camera lens; Kameralinse.
langue. She put her index finger in the sauce
jadɔ [á] Nom. brigand, bandit; brigand, robber, and then put it on her tongue. Sie steckte ihren
Zeigefinger in die Soße und legte ihn dann auf
thief, bandit; Räuber, Dieb, Einbrecher,
Bandit. synonyme: siratigɛla, binkannikɛla,
ihre Zunge. Category: Body.
tegere. jagase 2 Verbe. 1 • panacher (hydromel et bière de mil);
mix (mead and millet beer); Mischung (Met
jafarana [à-à-à] variante: jafaranɛ. Nom. safran
und Hirsebier).
(colorant pour certains plats); saffron (colour
2 • mélanger (les cartes); shuffle (the cards);
for some dishes); Safran (Farbstoff für einige
(die Karten) mischen. ka marasi jagase battre
Gerichte). Jafarana b'a ɲɛ di na ma. C'est le
les cartes. shuffle the cards. die Karten
safran qui donne à la sauce sa couleur. It is the
mischen.
saffron that gives the sauce its colour. Es ist
der Safran, der der Sauce ihre Farbe verleiht. jagawere Nom. génisse; young cow, heifer; junge
Category: Food, Grass, herb, vine. carthamus Kuh, die noch nicht gekalbt hat, Rind, Färse.
tinctorius. Category: Mammal. synonyme: jaakɔrɔ, jaga ,
3
jafilɛ [à] variante: [jaflɛ]. Nom. miroir, glace, misinin.
cinéma; mirror, ice, cinema; Spielgel, Eis, jagɛlɛya [à-ɛ̀-ɛ̀] Jula: jagwɛlɛya.
Kino. Nɔgɔ dara i ka jafilɛ la. Ton miroir est
variante: jalagɛlɛya. Verbe. 1 • prendre courage,
sale. Your mirror is dirty. Dein Spiegel ist
fortifier son courage; take courage,
schmutzig.
strengthen your courage; Mut fassen, stärke
jaga 1 Verbe. creuser, fouiller; dig, search; graben, deinen Mut. synonyme: jagwɛlɛya.
suchen. ka dingɛ jaga creuser un trou. dig a 2 • assurance, sang-froid, hardiesse, audace;
hole. ein Loch graben. assurance, composure, boldness, audacity,
jaga [à] Nom. bouc castré; castrated goat; kastrierte
confidence; Sicherheit, Gelassenheit,
2
Kühnheit, Selbstvertrauen. Jagɛlɛya kojugu
Ziege, kastrierter Bock. Bakɔrɔ tɛ dumuni kɛ
karantan tɛ. Trop d'assurance n'est pas sans
i ko jaga. Le bouc ne mange pas comme un
risque (proverbe). Too much confidence is not
bouc castré (proverbe). The goat does not eat
without risk (proverb). Zu viel Selbstvertrauen
like a castrated goat (proverb). Der Bock frißt
ist nicht ohne Risiko (Sprichwort).
nicht wie ein kastrierter Bock (Sprichwort).
jago [à] Nom. 1 • commerce, négoce; commerce,
jaga [à] Nom. génisse; heifer; junge Kuh, Färse. 1
3
trade; Handel, Verkehr. ka jago kɛ faire le
jaga geren génisse non encore saillie. heifer
commerce. trade. mit ... handeln. Banki ye so
not yet bred. Färse noch nicht gezüchtet.
Category: Animal husbandry.
ye, min bɛ wari jago. Les banques sont des
synonyme: jagawere, ɲɛlɛ , misinin, jaakɔrɔ.
établissements qui font le commerce de
1
l'argent. Banks are establishments that deal in
jagaci bambara: jakaci. Nom. moquerie, foutaise, money. Banken sind Einrichtungen, die mit
raillerie; mockery, nonsense, taunt; Spott, Geld handeln.
Hohn, Unsinn. synonyme: jakaci. 2 • commercer, négocier; to trade, to
negotiate; handeln.
jagaro [à-à-ó] comparer: kerebere, tubabugɔyɔ.
variante: jagantu, njagaro. Nom. aubergine,
jago
2
[à-ó] 1 • Verbe. faire l’important, faire le malin,
se vanter; playing to be important, to boast;
tomate amère; eggplant, aubergine, bitter
tomato; Aubergine, bittere Tomate. sich aufspielen, sich rühmen, angeben. A b'i
Category: Food. solanum lycopersicum, jago mɔgɔ tɔw la n'a ka finin ye. Il fait le
solanum aethiopicum. synonyme: nkɔyɔ, gɔyɔ. malin auprès des autres avec ses beaux habits.
He acts smart to others with his nice clothes.
jagase [à-à] Nom. 1 • danger, menace; danger, threat;
1 Mit seiner schönen Kleidung spielt er sich
Gefahr, Bedrohung. Dɔlɔmafɛn min ye anderen gegenüber auf.
jagase ye ka tɛmɛ... Les boisson alcoolisées 2 • Verbe. orner, bien tourner (un discours);
les plus dangereuses ... The most dangerous adorn, turn well (a speech); schmücken, schön
alcoholic beverages... Die gefährlichsten machen (eine Rede). Jago b'a ka kuma la
alkoholischen Getränke ...
kojugu ! Son discours est très recherché ! His
beautiful speech is very elaborate! Seine Rede
ist sehr ausgeklügelt!
29/01/2026 280

jagobaara jahanamaden
3 • Nom. accessoire, ornement, gadget, jagokun [à-ò-ú] Nom. capital, stock, commerce,
superflu; accessory, ornament, gadget,
pécule; capital, allowance, stock, supply;
superfluous; Accessoire, Ornament,
Kapital, Rücklagen, finanzielles Polster,
Dekoration, Überfluß.
Vorrat. Saratu ye jagokun ban, a bɛ juru de
jagobaara comparer: jago. Nom. commerce; trade,
bolo. Saratou épuisa son capital, elle prit du
business; Handel, Geschäft. crédit. Saratou exhausted her capital, she took
jagobaganci [à-ò-à-à] variante: jagonci. Nom. out credit. Saratou erschöpfte ihr Kapital, sie
nahm Kredite auf. Category: Finance.
prétentieux, vantard, fanfaron; pretentious
person, bragger; anmaßende Person, jagoma [à-ò] Nom. orné, décoré; ornate, decorated;
eingebildet, Prahler. Jagobaganci mana fɛn dekoriert, geschmückt. Kɔɲɔkɛ ni kɔɲɔmuso
sɔrɔ, o tɛ dogo mɔgɔ si la. Quand le tun bɛ mibili jagoma kɔnɔ. Le marié et la
prétentieux obtient quelque chose, tout le mariée étaient dans une voiture décorée. The
monde le sait. When the conceited person gets groom and bride were in a decorated car. Der
something, everyone knows it. Wenn der Bräutigam und die Braut saßen in einem
eingebildete Mensch etwas bekommt, weiß es geschmückten Auto.
jeder.
jagomafila [à-ò-à] variante: jagomanfila. Nom.
jagofɛn [à-ò] synonyme: marisandisi. Nom.
revente, revendeur, vente au détail; resale,
marchandise; goods, merchandise; Güter, reseller, retailer, retail trade; Weiterverkauf,
Ware. Faatu ka jagofɛn feereta ka ca. Fatou Wiederverkäufer, Einzelhandel. Ni i bɛ
a beaucoup de marchandises à vendre. Fatou
jagomafila kɛ, i k'i jigi sɛmɛ mɔgɔ sɛbɛ la.
has a lot of merchandise to sell. Fatou hat eine
Si tu fais du commerce en détail, tu sois
Menge Waren zu verkaufen. Jagofɛn ɲuman
t'appuyer sur quelqu'un de sérieux. If you do
de b'a yɛrɛ feere. Une bonne marchandise retail business, you need to rely on someone
s'écoule d'elle-même (proverbe). Good serious. Wenn Sie im Einzelhandel tätig sind,
merchandise sells itself (proverb). Gute Ware müssen Sie sich auf jemanden verlassen, der
verkauft sich von selbst (Sprichwort). seriös ist.
synonyme: karayogo. jagwɛlɛya [à-ɛ̀-ɛ̀-á] Nom. courage, assurance,
jagofɛnsɛnɛ Nom. culture commerciale; commercial hardiesse, audace; courage, assurance,
agriculture; Kommerzielle Landwirtschaft. audacity; Mut, Courage, Gewissheit.
Category: Agriculture. synonyme: jagɛlɛya.
jagokɛkan jahadi [à-à-í] Emprunt de : arabe. variante: jaadi.
comparer: kanjɛ .[à-ò-ɛ̀-ã́] Morphemes: jago Nom. malheur, catastrophe, guerre; misfortune,
1
-kɛ-kan. Nom. langue véhiculaire: langue que disaster, war; Unglück, Mißgeschick, Unfall,
Katastrophe, Krieg. A bɛ kɛ ko cɛjugu ye, a
l’on utilise pour le commerce; trade language;
Handelssprache. bɛ kɛ jahadi ye. C'est une chose terrible, une
jagokɛla [à-ò-ɛ̀-á] Morphemes: jago-kɛ-la. Nom.
catastrophe. It's a terrible thing, a catastrophe.
Es ist eine schreckliche Sache, eine
marchand, commerçant; trader, merchant;
Katastrophe.
Händler, Handelsmann, Kaufmann.
Category: Person. jahanama Emprunt de : arabe. Morphemes: jahanama.
jagokɛlaba comparer: sɔrɔbatigi. Nom. opérateur Nom. enfer; hell; Hölle. ... n'a sara, a bɛ don
jahanama kɔnɔ. ... s'il meurt, il entrera en
économique; businessman, entrepreneur;
Geschäftsmann, Unternehmer, Kaufmann. enfer. ...if he dies, he will enter hell. ...wenn
er stirbt, wird er in die Hölle kommen.
jagokɛso [à-ò-ɛ̀] Nom. société commerciale, maison
antonyme: alijɛnɛ, alijinɛ;
de commerce; commercial company, trading
synonyme: alatasuma.
house; Handelsunternehmen, Handelshaus. ...
tubabu ka jagokɛsobaw... ... les grandes jahanamaden Morphemes: jahanama-den. Nom.
sociétés commerciales européennes ... ...the damné, maudit; damned, doomed, cursed;
major European trading companies... ...die Verdammter, Verurteilter, verflucht.
großen europäischen Handelsunternehmen... Jahanamaden ka fɛn bɛɛ jaasilen don. Tout
jagokɛyɔrɔ bonba Nom. immeuble commercial;
ce qui possède un homme maudit est sans
valeur. All that possesses a cursed man is
commercial building; Geschäftshaus,
worthless. Alles, was ein verfluchter
Warenhaus. Category: Building.
Menschen besitzt, ist wertlos.
29/01/2026 281

jahili jakikuru
jahili [à-í-í] Emprunt de : arabe. Nom. rapporteur, jakabɔ [á-á-ɔ́] Jula: jagabɔ. Verbe. ridiculiser, se
mouchard, imposteur, voyou; sneak, impostor, moquer; ridicule sb./sth., scorn sb./sth., mock,
rogue; Spitzel, Petze, Betrüger, Schwindler, scoff; verspotten, verhöhnen, verspotten. I
Gauner. synonyme: kolakalila, naafigi. kana banabagatɔ jakabɔ ! Ne te moque pas
jahiliya Nom. imposture, hypocrisie, mouchardage; d'un malade ! Don't make fun of a sick person!
Machen Sie sich nicht über eine kranke Person
sham, deception, hypocrisy, bush hammering;
lustig!
Schwindel, Betrug, Hochstaplerei, Heuchelei,
Bespitzelung. synonyme: jijukɔrɔsaya. jakabɔlan Nom. ce qui exerce (l'esprit), faire réfléchir;
jaja [ǎ-ǎ] Verbe. mettre à sécher plusieurs choses,
that which exercises (the mind), make us think;
das, was (den Geist) trainiert, Nachdenken
sécher vite; put to dry several things, dry
anregen. Ja belebele ... o bɛ án hakili
quickly; mehrere Sachen zum Trocknen
auslegen, schnell trocknen. Faatu y'a ka
jakabɔlan bɔ. Cette grande richesse... doit
nous faire réfléchir. This great wealth... should
nafɛnw jaja tile la. Fatou a mis ses
make us think. Dieser große Reichtum... sollte
condiments à sécher au soleil. Fatou has dried
uns zum Nachdenken anregen.
her condiments in the sun. Fatou hat ihre
Gewürze in der Sonne trocknen lassen. jakaci [á-á-ǐ] Jula: jagaci. Verbe. 1 • se vanter, faire
jajaja [à-à] Nom. vagabondage, errance; vagrancy,
le fier; to brag, to be proud; prahlen, stolz sein.
Kana i jakaci án na. Ne fais pas le faraud avec
wandering; Wanderschaft, Umherwandern,
nous. Don't fool around with us. Spielen Sie
herumirren. Mɔgɔ ɲɛmajɔlen tɛ, a b'e jajaja
nicht mit uns herum. synonyme: jagaci.
la yɔrɔw ɲɛfɛ n'a yɛrɛ ye. C'est quelqu'un qui
2 • raillerie, moquerie; taunt, mockery; Spott. I
ne reste pas tranquille, il va errer partout. It’s
someone who doesn’t sit still, he’ll wander kana jakaci kɛ mɔgɔ la yan. Ne te moques de
everywhere. Er ist jemand, der nicht still steht personne ici. Don't make fun of anyone here.
und überall herumirrt. synonyme: bajanbila. Machen Sie sich hier über niemanden lustig.
3 • exagération, excès; exaggeration, excess;
jajɛ [à-ɛ́] Nom. espèce d'herbe; kind of grass;
1 Übertreibung, Exzeß.
Grasart. Category: Grass, herb, vine.
jakalimɛ [á-á-í-ɛ́] variante: jankalama, jankalima,
brachiaria fulva / panicum laetum / paspalum
scrobiculatum. jankalimɛ. Nom. enfant illégitime, bâtard,
jajɛ Emprunt de : peul. Verbe. ramener le bétail (le enfant adultérin; illegitimate / illicit child
2
(born from adultery), bastard; uneheliches
soir); bring back the cattle (in the evening);
Kind, Bastard. Category: Person.
das Vieh wieder nach Hause bringen (abends).
synonyme: bɔlɔnnaden.
ka misiw jajɛ sinsan kɔnɔ. rentrer les vaches
à l'enclos. bringing the cows back to the pen. jakalimɛkari [á] variante: jakalimɛtigɛ. Verbe.
Kühe zurück ins Gehege bringen. 1 • frapper copieusement, casser la gueule; hit
jaju [à-ú] Verbe. se faire des soucis; to be worried copiously, break the face; Ausgiebig schlagen,
das Gesicht zerschlagen. N b'i jakalimɛkari
about something; sich Sorgen machen. An
sisan. Je vais te frapper copieusement
jajura de. Nous nous sommes vraiment faits
immédiatement. I'm going to hit you hard right
de souci. We were really worried. Wir haben
away. Ich werde dich sofort hart treffen.
uns wirklich Sorgen gemacht.
2 • une raclée; beating; eine Tracht Prügel.
jaka comparer: nilifɛn.[á-á] Emprunt de : arabe:
jakanlɔnan Nom. pause/ arrêt sur l'image; stop or
zakat. variante: jaga. Nom. dîme, aumône,
pause button; Pause (Standbild).
offrande; tithe, alms, offering; der Zehnte,
Almosen, Opfer. A ye jaka bɔ malo la. Il a jaki [à] variante: jɛki. Nom. 1 • partie supérieure du
fait une offrande de riz. He made an offering of dos, omoplate, encolure; upper back, shoulder
rice. Er machte ein Reisopfer. blade, neckline; Oberer Rücken, Schulterblatt,
Halsausschnitt.
jakaana- [à-à-à-à] Nom. qui stupéfie, qui
2 • crinière; mane; Mähne. Category: Body.
émerveille, qui déconcerte; who amazes, who
3 • nageoire; fin; Flosse. Category: Parts of an
disconcerts, stunning; verblüfft, verwundert,
verwirrt, erstaunlich. I ye dabakanaden ye, i
animal.
ye jakaanaden ye. Tu es un enfant jakikuru [à-ì] Nom. dos arqué; arched back;
extraordinaire, un enfant stupéfiant. You are gewölbter Rücken. Kɔrɔ ye jakikuru k'a la.
an extraordinary child, a stunning child. Du La vieillesse lui a voûté le dos. Old age has
bist ein wunderbares Kind, ein erstaunliches arched his back. Das Alter hat seinen Rücken
Kind. gewölbt.
29/01/2026 282

jakisii jalagɛlɛn
jakisii [à-ì] Nom. crinière; mane; Mähne. Hɔrɔn jakumamori
jakisii ni a karafe ye a kumakan ye. Les [à-ù-à-ó-í] Morphemes: jakuma-mori.
paroles du noble sont sa crinière et son mors Nom. hypocrite, fourbe, sournois; hypocrite,
(proverbe). The nobleman's words are his cunning, deceitful, sly, sneaky; Heuchler,
mane and his bit (proverb). Die Worte des Scheinheiliger, Schlitzohr, hinterhältig,
Edelmanns sind seine Mähne und sein Gebiß heimtückisch. synonyme: surɔgungurun.
(Sprichwort). synonyme: kansi.
jakumamoriya Morphemes: jakuma-mori-ya. Nom.
jakɔngɔ [à-ɔ ́-ɔ́] Nom. famine, disette due à la hypocrisie, sournoiserie, fourberie; hypocrisy,
sécheresse; famine, food shortage due to lack deviousness, deceit; Heuchelei,
of rain; Hungersnot, Nahrungsmangel wegen Hinterhältigkeit, Heimtücke, Betrügerei. E t'i
Regenmangel. ... jakɔngɔ min ye jamanaden ka jakumamoriya dabila ! Tu ne cessera donc
bɛɛ tɔɔrɔ ... ... la famine qui a frappé tous les pas ton hypocrisie ! So you won't stop your
habitants deu pays... ...the famine which struck hypocrisy! Sie werden also nicht mit Ihrer
all the inhabitants of the country... ...die Heuchelei aufhören! synonyme: jijukɔrɔsaya.
Hungersnot, die alle Einwohner des Landes
heimgesucht hat...
jakumamuso Nom. chatte; female cat; weibliche
Katze. Category: Mammal.
jakuma [à-ú-á] variante: jakumanin. Nom. chat;
cat; Katze. Category: Mammal.
jakumancɔlɔ variante: cɛkumancɔlɔ, cɛkunbancɔlɔ.
Nom. pomme d'Adam; Adam's apple;
jakumaagama [à-ù-à] Jula: jakumatagama.
Adamsapfel. Category: Body.
Verbe. marcher à pas de loup, avancer synonyme: cɛkuru, ncɔlɔ.
1
précautionneusement; go very carefully; sich
sehr vorsichtig fortbewegen. A y'i jakumasogo [à-ù-à] Morphemes: jakuma-sogo.
jakumaagama ka taa ... Il avança à pas de Nom. sexe féminin (populaire); female sexual
loup ... He moved slowly... Er bewegte sich
organ (popular); weibliches Geschlecht
langsam...
(Volksmund). Category: Body. synonyme: latu,
musoyayɔrɔ, kere, baɲɛba, latu.
jakumacɛ Nom. chat (mâle); cat (male); männliche
Katze. Category: Mammal. jakumawara [à-ù-à-á-á] Nom. serval, chat sauvage
jakumaden [à-ù-à-ẽ́] Morphemes: jakuma-den.
d'Afrique, chat ganté, chat-tigre, chat de
Libye; serval; Serval, Buschkatze.
variante: jakumadennin. Nom. chaton; kitten;
Category: Mammal. felis silvestris lybica.
Kätzchen. Category: Mammal. synonyme: mɔlɔnkɔ.
jakumadɔgɔ [à-ù-à] Jula: jakumalɔgɔ. n.comp. jala [á-á] synonyme: jalayiri. Nom. caïlcédrat;
1
affaire imprévisible, situation imbriquée,
African mahogany; Baum Art. Category: Tree.
chose aléatoire, improvisée; interlinked
Khaya senegalensis.
situation, unpredictable matter, improvised;
verzwickte Situation, unberechenbare Sache jala 2 [à-á] Nom. 1 • cordon, coulisse, cordelière,
miteinander verbundene Situation, ruban; cord, string, backstage, tape, ribbon;
improvisierte Sache, unvorhersagbar. mɔgɔ ti Schnur, Hintergrund, Umhängeband, Band,
jakumalɔgɔ girintuma lɔn A ka dugutaa ye Schleife. cɛsirijala cordelière. drawstring.
jakumadɔgɔ ye. Son voyage est aléatoire. His Kordel.
journey is random. Seine Reise ist zufällig. 2 • grade, décoration, récompense; decoration,
award, grade, rank; Dekoration, Dienstgrad,
jakumakun [à-ù-à] Morphemes: jakuma-kun.
Rang, Stufe. A ka jala kɛra zenerali ye. Il a
Nom. 1 • phallus, pénis (populaire); phallus,
reçu le grade de général. He received the rank
penis (popular); Phallus, Penis (Volksmund).
of general. Er erhielt den Rang eines Generals.
2 • chose convenue, dont on ne souhaite pas
jala di [à-á í] synonyme: masiri. vi. décorer;
parler en présence d'un tiers; something agreed
upon, which we do not wish to discuss in the decorate; dekorieren, schmücken, zieren.
presence of a third party; etwas vereinbartes, jalagɛlɛn variante: jalafarin. Nom. personne téméraire
das wir nicht im Beisein Dritter besprechen
, audacieuse, courageuse; reckless, daring,
möchten. E hakili bɛ jakumakun na wa ? Te
courageous person; rücksichtslose, mutige
souviens-tu de ce sont nous avons parlé ? Do
Person. Jalagɛlɛn don. C'est un homme
you remember what we talked about? Erinnern
audacieux. He is a daring man. Er ist ein
Sie sich, worüber wir gesprochen haben?
mutiger Mann.
29/01/2026 283

jalagosi jalaninba
jalagosi [à-à] Morphemes: jala-gosi. jalakibali Morphemes: jalaki-bali. adj. 1 • innocent;
variante: jalalagosi, jalasa, jalasiri, jalalasiri. innocent; unschuldig. Mɔgɔ jalakibali tɛ yen
Nom. impuissance masculine; male impotence; diɲɛ in na. Il n'y a personne qui soit
männliche Impotenz. Jalagosi bɛ daamuta irréprochable en ce monde. There is no one in
bali muso la. L'impuissance empêche de jouir this world who is beyond reproach. Es gibt
d'une femme. Impotence prevents you from niemanden, der in dieser Welt tadellos ist.
enjoying a woman. Impotenz hindert Sie 2 • irréprochable, irrépréhensible;
daran, eine Frau zu genießen. irreproachable, beyond reproach, blameless;
synonyme: dalannabana. untadelig, einwandfrei, tadellos.
jalaji [á] Morphemes: jala-ji. Nom. 1 • boisson au jalakinin comparer: mɔgɔ nɔminɛnin. Nom. inculpé;
caïlcédrat très amère; drink from the Ebony accused; angeklagt sein, Angeklagte.
tree, very bitter; Getränk von einer Baumart jalakintan [à-à-ì-ã́] comparer: sɔntan.
(sehr bitter). Ni a ye li dun ɲɔgɔn fɛ, ni jalaji
Jula: jalakitan. adj. innocent, non coupable;
nana, a ka o min ɲɔgɔn fɛ. Proverbe : Si vous
innocent, not guilty; unschuldig.
mangez du miel ensemble, quand l’eau de
jalakitigi [à-à-ì-í-í] synonyme: kotiɲɛla. Nom.
caïlcédrat vient, il faut en boire ensemble
(Restez ensemble même si la vie devient dure). coupable, celui qui a tort; culprit; Schuldige,
Proverb: If you eat honey together, when bitter Angeklagte, Verbrecher. Aw kana jotigi ɲini,
water comes, you should drink it together (Stay áw kana jalakitigi ɲini. Ne cherchez pas qui a
together even in bad times). Sprichwort: Wenn
raison et qui a tort. Do not seek to know who is
du zusammen Honig ißt, falls bitteres Wasser right and who is wrong. Sucht nicht nach dem,
kommt, sollt ihr es zusammen trinken (Bleibt der schuldig ist und dem der unschuldig ist.
zusammen selbst in schwierigen Zeiten).
jalaminɛ [à-à] Nom. uriner, fait d'uriner, miction,
2 • situation pénible, épreuve; difficult
situation, ordeal; Schwere Situation, Prüfung.
urine (euphémisme); urinate, urine
A kɛra jalaji ye. C'est une chose difficile. It’s
(euphemism); urinieren, Wasserlassen, Urin
(Euphemismus). Jalaminɛ bɛ kɛ min yan ? Où
a difficult thing. Das ist eine schwierige Sache.
est-ce qu'on peut uriner ici ? Where can we
jalajiri [á-á-í-í] Jula: jalayiri. synonyme: jala,
urinate here? Wo kann man hier urinieren?
jalasun. Nom. caïlcédrat; African mahogany; synonyme: bawili, ɲɛgɛnɛji.
Baum Art. Jalayiriw ka jan jan. Les caïlcédrat
jalamugu [à-à-ú-ú] n.comp. turban; turban; Turban.
sont très hauts. The mahogany trees are very
Category: Clothing.
high. Diese Bäume sind sehr hoch.
Category: Tree. jalan [à-á] adj. 1 • sec, aride, desséché, maigre, nu;
jalaki [à-à-í] comparer: fili. Emprunt de : arabe. dry, arid, skinny, thin; trocken, dürr,
unfruchtbar, wasserarm, dünn, mager. jɛgɛ
1 • Nom. tort, culpabilité, faute; guilt, blame,
fault; Schuld, Vergehen, Fehler. Ni y'i jalaki jalan poisson sec. dried fish. getrockneter
ye. C'est de ta faute. It is your fault. Das ist
Fisch.
dein Fehler. 2 • sans accessoire, nu, sans grande valeur,
simple; without accessory, bare, without great
2 • vt. accuser, inculper, donner tort; blame,
value, simple; ohne Zubehör, nackt, ohne
accuse, charge; anklagen, anschuldigen,
anzeigen. Jo dira muso ma, cɛ jalakira. On
großen Wert, einfach. sabara jalan de simples
chaussures. simple shoes. einfache Schuhe.
donna raison à la femme, et tort à l'homme.
kuma jalan parole sans importance. words of
The woman was justified, and the man was
wrong. Der Frau wurde recht gegeben, dem no importance. Worte ohne Bedeutung.
Mann aber unrecht. 3 • uniquement, seulement; only; nur.
jalakibagatɔ Nom. accusé, fautif présumé; accused,
Tilematuma, a tɛ fosi ɲɛ, fo kamalenbaya
jalan. A la saison sèche, ils ne font rien sinon
defendant, suspected person; Angeklagter,
Beschuldigter, mutmasslicher Täter.
courir les filles. In the dry season, they do
Jalakibagatɔ bɛɛ tɛ jalakitigi. Tous les
nothing except run after the girls. In der
Trockenzeit machen sie nichts, außer den
accusés ne sont pas des coupables. Not all the
Mädchen nachzulaufen.
accused are guilty. Nicht alle Angeklagten
sind schuldig.
4 • drogues; drugs; Drogen, Rauschgift.
jalaninba [á] variante: jalaninkunba,
jalaninkunan, jalasina. Nom. casse noire; kind
of plant; Pflanzenart. Category: Grass, herb,
vine. cassia nigricans.
29/01/2026 284

jalaninkuma jamajɛnfanga
jalaninkuma Nom. espèce de plante; kind of plant; 2 • fête; festival, celebration, party; Fest, Feier,
Pflanze (Art). Category: Grass, herb, vine.
Party. jama kɛ faire la fête. celebrate. feiern.
cassia nigricans. Jama kuntaa bɛ janya. La fête va durer
longtemps. The party will last a long time. Die
jalankɔgɔ [à-à] variante: jarakɔgɔ. Nom. sel
Party wird noch lange dauern.
gemme; rock salt; Steinsalz. synonyme: faradi,
jama [á-á] Verbe. tempêter (de colère), se fâcher,
misikɔgɔ. 2
s’exciter, faire du bruit; rant and rave, rant at,
jalaseere Nom. index; index finger; Zeigefinger. rave at, get angry, make noise; hart reagieren
Category: Body. (weil zornig), sich ärgern, lärmen.
jalasenan Nom. télévision; television; Fernseher. jama 3 [à-á] Verbe. être tard, s'éloigner, avancer; be
late, move away from sb. or sth; verspätet sein,
jalatigɛbaga [á] variante: jalatigɛla, jalatigɛ. Nom.
sich entfernen. Wagati, jamana. Il fait tard. It
arbitre; arbitrator, referee, umpire;
is late. Es ist spät. synonyme: janfa .
Schiedsrichter. ntolatan jalatigɛbaga l'arbitre 2
du match de football. the referee of the football jama buguyali Nom. croissance démographique;
match. der Schiedsrichter des Fußballspiels. demographic growth, population growth;
Category: Worker, occupation. Bevölkerungswachstum.
synonyme: filetigi.
jama ka sigiyɔrɔfalen expr. mouvement de
jalatigi [à-à] n.comp. officier, gradé; army officer; population; population movement, movement
Armeeoffizier, Offizier. polisi jalatigi officier of people; Bevölkerungsbewegung,
de police. police officer. Polizeibeamter.
Bevölkerungsverschiebung.
Category: Worker, occupation. jama ladonbaara bololanin expr. programme de
jalon [à-ó] 1 • Verbe. aller de droite à gauche, ne pas société; social programme, society's
programme, company's development
rester stable; going from left to right, not being
stable; herumgehen, nicht stabil sein. Ni i
program; Programm der Gesellschaft,
Programm des Unternehmens.
taara Bamakɔ, i k'i ɲɛsin baara dɔrɔn ma, i
kana taa a kɛ jalonjalon ye. Si tu vas à
jama ladonni synonyme: jama latanga baarada.
Bamako, occupe-toi seulement de faire ton Nom. sécurité sociale; social security; soziale
travail, ne va pas de droite à gauche. If you go Sicherheit.
to Bamako, just focus on doing your work, jama latanga baarada synonyme: jama ladonni.
don't go from right to left. Wenn Sie nach
Nom. sécurité sociale; social security; soziale
Bamako reisen, konzentrieren Sie sich einfach
Sicherheit.
auf Ihre Arbeit und gehen Sie nicht von rechts
nach links. jamabaara Nom. travail d'équipe; teamwork;
2 • Nom. femme célibataire; unmarried woman, Gemeinschaftsarbeit, Teamarbeit.
single female; alleinstehende Frau. jamaden ka joow Nom. droits des peuples; right of
jalonjalon [à-ò] Nom. dévergondage, grande peoples; Völkerrechte.
inquiétude, affolement; promiscuity, deep jamadon [à-à] Jula: jamalon. variante: jamadonya.
concern, panic, confusion; Unstetigkeit,
Nom. grand jour, jour de fête, jour à part; big
Unruhe, Hektik. Furu joona tɛ jalonjalon sa.
day, celebration day, special day; großer Tag,
Le mariage précoce n'empêche pas le,
Festtag, besonderer Tag. Kɔɲɔkodon,
dévergondage (proverbe). Early marriage
denkundidon, sayakɛdon, dɔgɔdon, o bɛɛ
does not prevent debauchery (proverb). Eine
frühe Ehe verhindert nicht die Zügellosigkeit ye jamadonya ye. Les jours de mariage, de
(Sprichwort). baptême, de décès, de marché, sont tous de
grands jours. Wedding days, baptism days,
jama [à] comparer: fasojama. variante: jaman.
1 death days, market days, are all special days.
Nom. 1 • peuple, foule, population, assistance, Hochzeitstage, Tauftage, Beerdigungen,
monde, gens; crowd, population, people; Markttage sind alles besondere Tage.
Volk, Bevölkerung, Menschenmenge. Jamaba synonyme: jamalon.
bɛ sɛgɛji min. Une grande foule est capable de
jamafu [à-à] Nom. lieu de culte : mosquée, église;
boire l'eau de potasse (proverbe). A large
place of worship: mosque, church; Kultstätte:
crowd is able to drink the potash water
(proverb). Eine große Menge ist in der Lage,
Moschee, Kirche. Category: Religion,
Kalium zu trinken (Sprichwort).
Building.
jamajɛnfanga n.comp. démocratie; democracy;
Demokratie. Category: Government.
29/01/2026 285

jamajɔdon jamana
jamajɔdon [à-à-ɔ̀-ó] Nom. jour du jugement dernier; jamamayɔrɔ Nom. endroit public; public place /
day of the last judgement, final judgement day; space; öffentlicher Ort / Bereich. Selidonya
Tag des Jüngsten Gerichts, Tag für das fɛ, jamamayɔrɔw bɛ fa. Les jours de fête, les
Endgericht. Min ko a bɛ sun, min ko a bɛ
lieux publics sont pleins de monde. On
seli, jamajɔdon, o bɛɛ na woloma. Certains celebration days, public places are full of
disent pratiquer le jeûne, d'autres disent prier : people. An Feiertagen sind öffentliche Plätze
au jour du jugement denier , tout cela sera tiré voller Menschen.
au clair (proverbe). Some say they practice
jamamuruti Nom. insurrection populaire; uprising of
fasting, others say they pray: on the day of
judgement, all this will be clarified (proverb).
the people, insurrection of the people;
Volksaufstand, Revolte des Volkes.
Manche sagen, sie praktizieren das Fasten,
andere sagen, sie beten: Am Tag des Gerichts jaman [à] variante: jama. Verbe. 1 • avancer (pour un
1
wird sich das alles klären (Sprichwort). moment), être tard; move forward (for a
Category: Religion. synonyme: siratu, kiyama, moment), be late; (für einen Moment)
laharadon, alikiyamalon. vorwärts gehen, zu spät kommen. U tora o
jamako ni baarako expr. socioprofessionnel; baro de la fo su jamanna. Ils restèrent ainsi à
parler jusqu'à ce que la nuit fût avancée. They
socio-professional; beruflich-soziale
Entwicklung, sozio-professionelles Umfeld.
remained thus talking until the night was late.
Category: Work and occupation.
Sie unterhielten sich so, bis es spät in die Nacht
war.
jamako ni lɔnko expr. socioculturel; socio-cultural;
2 • s'éloigner (dans l'espace); move away
im sozialen und kulturellen Bereich, (space); wegbewegen (Raum). ... ka taa fo ka
soziokulturelle Entwicklung.
jaman. ... et aller très loin. ...and go very far.
Category: Language and thought.
...und sehr weit gehen.
jamakulu [à-à-ú-ú] synonyme: sigiyɔrɔ mɔgɔw.
jaman [á] Verbe. 1 • faire du bruit, s'exciter; make
2
Nom. 1 • société, communauté, groupe social;
noise, get excited; Lärm machen, aufgeregt
society, community, social group;
sein. Kana i jaman ! Ne parle pas si fort !
Gesellschaft, Gemeinschaft, soziale Gruppe,
Gesellschaftsgruppe. Don't speak so loudly! Sprich nicht so laut!
2 • commission, groupe de travail; committee, 2 • se fâcher, tonner contre quelqu'un; to get
commission, working group, panel; angry, to thunder at someone; wütend werden,
Kommission, Ausschuss, Gremium, jemanden anfeuern. Ka i jaman dajɛ kunna
Arbeitsgruppe, Komitee. U ye jamakulu sigi kosɛbɛ ! Et se fâcher contre l'hippotrague !
... Ils ont mis sur pied une commission ... They And get angry at the antelope! Und werde
set up a commission... Sie haben eine wütend auf die Antilope!
Kommission gegründet... 3 • se vanter, être arrogant, faire l'important; to
jamalafinin Nom. vêtement de sortie, tenue habillée;
boast, to be arrogant, to act important;
prahlen, arrogant sein, sich aufspielen. Aa !
going out clothing, formal outfit;
Ausgehkleidung, formelles Outfit.
Musa jamanna bi, a yaadara. Ah ! Moussa
Category: Clothing. est orgueilleux aujourd'hui, il fait le fier. Ah!
Moussa is proud today, he’s proud. Ah!
jamalajɛ [à-à] Nom. rassemblement, réunion;
Moussa ist heute stolz, er verhält sich stolz.
gathering, meeting; Versammlung, Treffen, 4 • choyer, gâter; pamper, spoil; verwöhnen. A
Sitzung. jamalajɛlaw les participants à la
fa y'a jaman, a ba y'a jaman. Son père et sa
réunion. participants in the meeting.
mère le choyèrent. His father and mother
Teilnehmer an der Tagung,
pampered him. Sein Vater und seine Mutter
Sitzungsteilnehmer. synonyme: lajɛrɛ.
haben ihn verwöhnt.
jamalakuma synonyme: kanlase. Nom. discours; jamana [à-à-á] variante: jamani. Nom. pays, état,
1
speech; Rede, Ansprache. Category: Language nation, région, contrée; land, country, state,
and thought. synonyme: jɛmukan. nation, region; Land, Staat, Nation, Region,
jamalon [à-à-ó] variante: jamalonya. Nom. jour de Landschaft. ... farajɛjamana ni
farafinjamana ... ... les pays européens et les
fête, grand jour; day of celebration, the great
day; Festtag, der grosse Tag. pays africains ... ... European and African
synonyme: selidonya, jamadon. countries ... ... die europäischen und
afrikanischen Länder ...
Category: Government, Country.
29/01/2026 286

jamana jamanáw já
jamana [à-à] Nom. temps, époque; time, era, age; jamanadenjati Morphemes: jamana-den-jati. Nom.
2
Zeit, Epoche, Zeitalter. A ka jamana banna. recensement; census, population count;
Son temps a pris fin (: il est décédé). His time Volkszählung.
has ended (: he is dead). Seine Zeit ist zu Ende jamanadenya synonyme: fasodenya. Nom.
(: er ist gestorben).
citoyenneté, nationalité; citizenship,
jamana faaba synonyme: faaba. Nom. capitale; nationality; Staatsbürgerschaft, Nationalität,
capital city; Hauptstadt. Staatsangehörigkeit.
jamana fasa comparer: fasa. Nom. hymne national; jamanadenyajo Nom. droit à la nationalité; right of
national anthem; Nationalhymne. nationality; Recht auf Nationalität.
jamana ka kɛlɛkɛdenkulu synonyme: arime. jamanafanga Nom. pouvoirs publics; public
Nom. forces armées nationales, armée; national authorities, government authorities;
armed forces, army; Heeresmacht, Armee. öffentliche Behörden, Regierungsbehörden.
Category: Government.
jamana ka kongosogo wɛɛrɛ Nom. parc
jamanakalan Morphemes: jamana-kàlan. n.comp.
national; national park; Nationalpark.
géographie; geography; Geographie.
jamana ka nafolodilanbali expr. patrimoine
jamanakalanna Morphemes: jamanakalan-na.
naturel; natural heritage, natural patrimony;
Naturerbe, Naturschätze. n.comp. géographe; geographer; Geograph.
Category: Land.
jamana ka sariyatabulon synonyme: jamana ka
jamanakɔnɔtaa Nom. exode, émigration temporaire;
depitebulon. Nom. assemblée nationale;
exodus, temporary emigration; Exodus,
national assembly, congress;
Nationalversammlung.
vorübergehende Auswanderung.
Category: Government.
synonyme: jamanakɔnɔtaga.
jamana ka seliba synonyme: bonba. Nom. fête jamanakɔnɔtaala Nom. celui qui part en (ou revient
nationale; national holiday, public holiday; de) exode, migrant, émigré temporaire; one
Nationalfeiertag. who leaves in (or returns from) exodus,
migrant, temporary emigrant; jemand, der
jamana ka siyakan n.comp. langue nationale;
im Exodus abreist (oder daraus zurückkehrt),
national language, local language; Migrant, vorübergehender Auswanderer oder
Nationalsprache, einheimische Sprache. Einwanderer. synonyme: jamanakɔnɔtagala.
Category: Language. synonyme: barakan.
jamanakɔnɔtaga Nom. émigration temporaire,
jamana ka waribon synonyme: jamana ka
exode; emigration, temporary emigration;
nafolobon. Nom. trésor public; government vorübergehende Emigration.
department in charge of public finances; synonyme: jamanakɔnɔtaa.
Staatsgelder. Category: Finance.
jamanakɔnɔtagala Nom. migrant, émigré, celui qui
jamana ka yɛrɛtigiya Nom. souveraineté nationale;
part ou qui revient; migrant, emigrant, the one
national sovereignty; Nationale who is going abroad or comes back from
Unabhängigkeit, Rechtshoheit, abroad; Zuwanderer, Auswanderer.
Eigenstaatlichkeit. synonyme: jamanakɔnɔtaala.
jamana maracogoɲuman Nom. bonne jamanakuntigi Morphemes: jamana-kun-tigi.
gouvernance; good governance; gute
variante: jamanatigi. n.comp. chef d’État,
Verwaltung.
président; head of state, president; Staatschef,
jamana maralikan Nom. langue officielle; official Staatsoberhaupt, Präsident.
language; offizielle Landessprache. Category: Government.
jamana ɲamɔgɔ voteli n.comp. élection jamanakuntigiya Nom. présidence de la république;
présidentielle; presidential election; presidency of the Republic; Präsidentschaft in
Präsidentschaftswahlen. der Republik.
Category: Government. jamanaɲɛmɔgɔ Morphemes: jamana-ɲɛmɔgɔ.
jamanaden Morphemes: jamana-den. variante: jamana ɲɛmɔgɔ. n.comp. chef d’État;
synonyme: fasoden. n.comp. citoyen, habitant, head of state; Staatschef, Staatsoberhaupt.
autochtone; citizen, inhabitant, resident, Category: Government.
aboriginal, native; Staatsbürger, Bürger, jamanáw já Nom. carte politique; political map;
Einwohner, Ureinwohner.
politische Karte.
Category: Government.
29/01/2026 287

jamandenw ka ɲɔgɔndɛmɛ jan
jamandenw ka ɲɔgɔndɛmɛ Nom. solidarité jan comparer: biri.[á] vt. allonger, tendre, être face
1 2
internationale; international solidarity; en l'air, tourner face au ciel; stretch out, turn to
internationale Solidarität. face the sky; ausstrecken, nach oben hin
jamanjaman [á] Verbe. 1 • faire du bruit, se quereller; ausgerichtet. Ni boli ye saraka minɛ, sisɛ bi
make noise, quarrel; Lärm machen, streiten.
jan, n'a m’a minɛ, sisɛ bi biri. Si le fétiche
accepte le sacrifice, la poule tombe face au
K'u to sira fɛ, u bɛ k'u jamanjaman, si tɛ si
ciel, sinon elle tombe sur le poitrine face à la
ta faamu. Pendant la route, ils se querellèrent,
terre. If the fetish accepts the offering, the
aucun des deux ne voulait écouter l'autre.
chicken falls on it’s back facing the sky, if it’s
During the trip, they quarreled, neither wanted
not accepted, the chicken falls on it’s front,
to listen to the other. Während der Fahrt
facing the ground. Falls der Götze das Opfer
stritten sie sich, keiner wollte dem anderen
annimmt, fällt das Huhn auf den Rücken, also
zuhören.
die Brust nach oben ausgerichtet. Wenn nicht,
2 • faire l'important, être fier; be proud; stolz fällt das Huhn mit der Brust nach unten.
sein. A jamanjamannen don. Il est gonflé
jan [ã̀] comparer: jamanjan. adj.pred. 1 • grand
d'orgueil. He is puffed up with pride. Er ist
2
aufgeblasen vor Stolz.
(de taille); to be tall; groß sein. Musa ka jan ni
Salifu ye. Moussa est plus grand que Salif.
jamanjan comparer: surun. variante: janmanjan. adj.
1
Moussa is taller than Salif. Moussa ist größer
haut, grand (en hauteur); tall, high; gross,
als Salif.
hoch. yiri jamanjan haut arbre. tall tree. ein
2 • être long ; to be long; lange sein.
hoher Baum, ein grosser Baum.
3 • être loin, éloigné (temps ou espace); to be
jamanseli comparer: mɔgɔkelenseli. far; weit weg sein. A ka jan wa ? Est-ce que
Morphemes: jama-seli. variante: jamaseli. c’est loin ? Is it far? Ist es weit (weg) ? A man
n.comp. prière collective; collective prayer; jan. Ce n’est pas loin. It’s not far. Es ist nicht
Gemeinschaft Gebet.
weit.
jamaɲɛmɔgɔ 4 • détaillé; detailed; detailliert. Nsan bugɔra
[à-à-ɛ́-ɔ́-ɔ́] variante: jamanɲɛmɔgɔ. Nom. Nsan somɔgɔw ɲɛna, cisama jan t'o la. Zan
leader, guide, meneur; leader; Leiter, Führer, a été battu devant les gens de sa famille, plus
Anführer. besoin de leur faire un long rapport détallé
jamatigi [à-à] Nom. personne célèbre, personnage,
(proverbe). Zan was beaten in front of his
family, no need to give them a long, detailed
homme public; celebrity, famous person;
report (proverb). Zan wurde vor den Augen
berühmte Person.
seiner Familie geschlagen, es war nicht nötig,
jamayɔrɔ Nom. lieu public, manifestation publique; ihnen einen langen, detaillierten Bericht zu
public space, public manifestation; erstatten (Sprichwort).
öffentlicher Ort, öffentliche Kundgebung. 5 • dilué, coupé; diluted, cut; verdünnt,
jamu [à-ú] Nom. nom de famille, nom clanique;
geschnitten. zawɛliji jan eau de Javel diluée.
1
diluted bleach. verdünntes Bleichmittel.
surname; Familienname. I jamu do ? / I jamu
duman ? Quel est ton nom de famille ? What
jan
3
comparer: bolokunnaden. variante: jaan. Nom.
is your family name? Was ist dein
majeur; middle finger; Mittelfinger.
Familienname? Category: Body. synonyme: cɛmabana.
jamu 2 [à-ù] Emprunt de : arabe. vt. regrouper les jan 4 [ã́] variante: jaan. Nom. piège; trap; Falle. A
prières, chanter ou dire des louanges; group ye n minɛ jan na. Il m'a pris au piège. He
prayers together, sing the praises; Gebet trapped me. He’s got me trapped. Er hat mich
gruppieren, das Lob singen. gefangen. Er hat mich in die Falle gelockt.
jan [à] variante: jaan. Nom. terrain propre aux
5
cultures; good soil for agriculture; guter
Boden für die Landwirtschaft.
Category: Agriculture, Land.
jan [à] Nom. attention, soin; attention, care;
6
Aufmerksamkeit, Fürsorge. N jan b'a la. Je
prête attention à cela. I pay attention to this.
Darauf achte ich.
29/01/2026 288

jan jango
jan [á] Nom. putain, prostituée (populaire); whore, 2 • vt. trahir, tromper; betray, deceive;
7
betrügen, hintergehen, verraten. ... e de sɔnna
prostitute (popular); Hure, Prostituierte
(Volksmund). Jan don. C'est une putain. She's ka ne janfa ... ... tu as osé, toi, me trahir ...
a whore. Sie ist eine Hure. synonyme: caka,
...you dared to betray me... ...du hast es
gewagt, mich zu verraten...
jatɔmuso, sungurunba, nankɛ, surɔtɛmɛ,
yɛrɛkunfeerela. janfa 2 [à] Verbe. être tard, s'éloigner; be late, move
away; spät sein, sich wegbewegen. Musa
jan jan adj. hauts; high, tall; hoch. Jalayiriw ka jan
janfara dugu la ... Moussa s'éloigna du
jan. Les caïlcédrats sont hauts. The trees are
village ... Moussa moved away from the
high. Die Bäume sind hoch.
village... Moussa zog aus dem Dorf weg... Tile
janajɛ [à-à] Emprunt de : arabe. variante: jalaja, janfara. Il se fait tard. It's getting late. Es wird
janaja, jɛnɛja, jɛnɛjɛ. Nom. enterrement, spät. synonyme: jama.
3
funérailles, ensevelissement, obsèques;
janfabaliya comparer: hɔɔrɔnya, kankelentigiya.
funeral, burial; Begräbnis, Beerdigung,
Bestattung, Beisetzung. A janajɛ bi kɛ Bobo. Nom. fidélité; fidelity, loyalty; Treue,
Aufrichtigkeit.
Son enterrement auront lieu à Bobo. His
funeral will be held in Bobo. Seine Beerdigung janfaci variante: janfanci, janfatɔ. Nom. traître;
wird in Bobo sein. traitor; Verräter. synonyme: janfatɔ.
janbakalan [á] Nom. espèce d'arbuste; kind of shrub, janfajɛ [à-à] Nom. complot; conspiracy;
small tree; Baumart. Category: Bush, shrub.
Verschwörung. ka janfajɛ siri monter un
combretum glutinosum.
complot ... hatch a conspiracy... eine
janbalan [á] Verbe. suspendre, interrompre, ne pas Verschwörung aushecken...
aller au bout de; suspend, interrupt, not go to janfali [ã̀-à-í] Morphemes: janfa-li. Nom. trahison;
the end of; aufheben, unterbrechen, nicht bis
treason, betrayal; Verrat, Hochverrat.
zum Ende. ka baarajanbalan. suspendre un
travail. suspend work. die Arbeit unterbrechen. janfanci [ã̀-à-í] Morphemes: janfa-nci. Nom. traître;
janbɔ [à] Verbe. ne plus s'occuper de, se traitor; Verräter. Category: Person.
synonyme: janfatɔ.
désintéresser, laisser; not take care any more,
becoming disengaged ; sich nicht mehr janfasiri [ã̀-à-í-í] synonyme: dusigi. Nom.
kümmern um, das Interesse verlieren. A y'i conspiration; conspiracy; Verschwörung,
janbɔ a la. Il ne s'en est plus occupé. He didn't Komplott.
take care of it any more. Er kümmerte sich janfatɔ [à-à] Nom. traître; traitor; Verräter.
nicht mehr darum.
synonyme: janfanci, janfaci.
janburuciya Nom. vagabondage, débauche,
jangara [ã̀-à-á] bambara: jankaro.
aventurisme; vagrancy, debauchery, 1
adventurism; Landstreicherei, Vagabundieren, synonyme: farigwan. variante: jangaro. Nom.
Ausschweifung, Abenteuerlust. Faatu dɛsɛra maladie (terme général),, maladie grave;
ka furu labato fo janburuciya. Fatou n'a pas
illness, disease, sickness; Krankheit,
Erkrankung, Unwohlsein. Category: Disease.
été une épouse sérieuse, elle s'est livrée à la
synonyme: jankaro.
débauche. Fatou was not a serious wife, she
gave herself over to debauchery. Fatou war jangara Nom. arbre (espèce); tree sp; Baumart.
2
keine ernsthafte Ehefrau, sie gab sich der
Category: Tree. annona senegalensis.
Ausschweifung hin.
jangaratɔ [ã̀-à-à-ɔ́] synonyme: banabagatɔ. Nom.
janfa [ã-̀ á] Emprunt de : arabe. 1 • Nom. trahison,
1 malade; sick person; Kranker. Category: Sick.
traîtrise, conspiration, complot, tromperie;
synonyme: gantɔ, sogoratɔ.
treason, treachery, betrayal, conspiracy, plot,
deceit; Verrat, Treulosigkeit, Treuebruch, jangata [ã̀-à-á] Nom. fléau, catastrophe; blight,
Verschwörung, Betrug, Täuschung. Ni ɲɔ disaster; Katastrophe, Desaster, Unglück,
suurula su fɛ, janfa donna ntugannin na. Unheil, Plage. synonyme: masubajugu.
Quand on vanne le mil la nuit, la tourterelle est
jango [ã̀-ó] bambara: janko. synonyme: janko.
bien trahie (proverbe). When we winnow the
variante: sango. Adverbe. 1 • parce que, pourvu
millet at night, the turtle dove is truly betrayed
(proverb). Wenn wir nachts die Hirse sichten, que, pour que, afin que ; provided that, as long
ist die Turteltaube wirklich verraten as, because, so that; vorausgesetzt daß, wegen,
(Sprichwort). damit. jango a ka ɲɛ synonyme: ka la a kan,
barisa, janko.
29/01/2026 289

janin janko
2 • surtout, à plus forte raison, encore moins, , jankaro [à-á-ǒ] Nom. maladie (terme général),
d'autant moins, non plus que, a fortiori,
maladie grave; illness (general term), serious
particulièrement; above all, all the more so,
illness; Krankheit (allgemeiner Begriff),
particularly; vor allem, um so mehr,
schwere Krankheit. Jankaro tɛ fatɔ la, hakili
besonders. u kuma ka ca kojugu, jango
de t'a la. Le fou n'est pas malade, il ne lui
musonin yɛrɛ.
manque que la raison (proverbe). The madman
janin [à-í] Nom. espèce d'instrument de musique fait is not sick, he only lacks reason (proverb). Der
en calebasse; kind of calabash music Verrückte ist nicht krank, ihm fehlt nur die
instrument; Art Musikinstrument aus einer Vernunft (Sprichwort). Category: Disease.
Kalebasse. Category: Musical instrument. synonyme: jangara 1 .
janjali [á] Adverbe. gros et lourd; big and heavy; groß jankarotɔ [à-à-ò] Nom. un malade; a sick person;
und schwer. Ale ka tulufilenw bɛɛ bɛ janjali ! ein kranker Mensch. Mɔgɔ ka kanka i cogo
Toutes ses calebasses de beurre de karité sont dɔn jankarotɔ la ... Il faut prendre des
bien grosses et bien lourdes. All of her shea précautions avec les malades ... We must take
butter calabashes are very large and very precautions with the sick... Wir müssen
heavy. Alle ihre Kalebassen mit Sheabutter Vorsichtsmaßnahmen gegenüber den Kranken
sind sehr groß und sehr schwer. treffen ...
janjigi Nom. 1 • élégant, coquet; elegant, stylish, janko variante: ɲanko, sanko. conj. 1 • pour que, afin
pretty; elegant, vornehm, schick, verspielt. que, surtout, particulièrement; so that, in order
Muso janjigi. Femme élégante. Stylish to, above all, as long as; damit, vor allem,
woman. Schicke Frau. besonders, dann. Aw k'aw faa n'aw baa
2 • danse élégante (pour les femmes); elegant bonya, janko ne, Masaba aw ka Ala be
dance (for women); eleganter Tanz (für
jamana min k'aw ma, aw ka sijan sɔrɔ o
Frauen). ... janjigitulonkɛ dɔ tun don. ...
kɔnɔ. Respecte ton père et ta mère, afin de
c'était une soirée de danse janjigi. ...it was a
jouir d'une longue vie dans le pays que moi, le
janjigi dance party. ...es war eine
Seigneur ton Dieu, je te donne. Respect your
Janjigi-Tanzparty.
father and your mother, so that you may live a
janjon [à] variante: jɛnjɛ. Nom. 1 • hymne à la long time in the land that God gives you. Du
bravoure; hymn to bravery; Hymne an den sollst deinen Vater und deine Mutter ehren.
Mut. A' ye janjon fo n ye ... Chantez-moi Dann wirst du lange in dem Land leben, das dir
l'hymne aux exploits ... Sing me the hymn of
der Herr, dein Gott, gibt. . Den bɛ bamun
exploits... Sing mir die Hymne der Heldentaten janko ka a tanga. On porte l'enfant au dos
... afin de le protéger. Carry the child on the back
2 • grande bataille de guerriers; great battle of to protect it. Das Kind wird auf dem Rücken
warriors; große Schlacht der Krieger. getragen, um es zu schützen. synonyme: sanko,
3 • drapeau; flag; Flagge. jango.
4 • fête de réjouissance; celebration of 2 • à plus forte raison, encore moins, d'autant
rejoicing; Feier der Freude. U taara janjon la. moins, non plus que, a fortiori, surtout,
Ils sont allés à la fête. They went to the party. particulièrement; even more so, even less so,
Sie gingen zur Party. not even more so, that a fortiori, above all,
particularly; noch stärker, noch weniger, und
jankamu [ǎ-à-ú] variante: jɔnkɔmi. Nom. scorpion
erst recht nicht mehr, vor allem, besonders. A
noir; black scorpion; schwarzer Skorpion.
ma dogo diɲɛ fan tan ni naani si kɔnɔ,
Category: Spider.
janko Mali. Cela n'a pas été gardé secret dans
jankarabu [á] Nom. importun, gêneur; intrusive,
le monde entier, pas plus qu’au Mali. This has
unwanted, troublesome, unwelcome; not been kept secret in the world, nor in Mali.
aufdringlich, lästig, unerwünscht, störend. Bɔ Das ist nicht in der ganzen Welt geheim
n dala, e jankarabu ! Laisse-moi tranquille, gehalten worden, und auch nicht in Mali. E tɛ
tu m'importunes ! Leave me alone, you're denmisɛn bugɔ bilen, janko mɔgɔba kɔrɔ.
bothering me! Laß mich in Ruhe, du nervst Tu ne frapperas plus les enfants, et moins
mich! encore les vieillards. You will not strike the
children, and even less the old. Du wirst nicht
mehr die Kinder schlagen, geschweige denn
die alten.
29/01/2026 290

jankɔnɔna jantonyɛrɛla
3 • pourvu que, parce que; provided that, janto [ã̀-ó] v.ref. 1 • faire attention, veiller à,
because; vorausgesetzt, weil. N tɛ fɛn yɛrɛ fɔ i
surveiller, prudent; pay attention, watch out,
ye, janko e ye ɲamakala ye. Je ne te dirai keep watch over, careful; aufpassen auf, Acht
d’ailleurs rein, parce que tu es un homme de geben auf, achten auf, sich hüten vor,
caste. I will not tell you in addition to rein, vorsichtig sein. I janto ! Attention ! Watch
because you are a man of caste. Ich sage dir
out! Paß auf! I janto nɔnɔ na tasuma kan. Il
nicht rein, denn du bist ein Mann der Kaste.
faut faire attention au lait sur le feu. Pay
jankɔnɔna variante: jankɔnɔ, jakɔnɔ. Nom. rizière, attention to the milk on the fire. Paß auf die
champ de riz inondé, terre de riz; rice field, Milch auf dem Herd auf. I janto wulu nin na,
rice field flooded, rice land; Reisfeld, a bi mɔgɔw cin. Fais attention à ce chien: il
überflutetes Reisfeld. Category: Agriculture. mord des gens. Beware of this dog: he bites
synonyme: maloforo. people. Hüte dich vor diesem Hund, er beisst
jankunnandi [à-ù-à] variante: jankunnanin. Nom. Leute. synonyme: kɔlɔsi 2 .
myrrhe africaine; African myrrh; afrikanische 2 • prendre soin de; take care of; sich jemandes
Myrrhe. Category: Bush, shrub. commiphora annehmen, sorgen für, achtgeben auf. i janto X
africana. la prendre soin de X. take care of X. Pass auf X
janmanjan [à-à] adj. long, longue, grand (de taille), auf. I janto den na, a man kɛnɛ. Prends soin
de l’enfant: il est malade. Take care of the
éloigné; long, big, tall, far away; lang, groß,
hoch, weit weg. O kamalen janmanjan cɛɲi
child: he is not well. Sorge für das Kind, es ist
nicht gesund.
... Ce grand et beau gaillard ... This tall,
3 • se méfier; beware, distrust; mißtrauen. An
handsome fellow ... Dieser große, feine Kerl ...
bonbonsii janmanjanba une longue barbe. a ka án yɛrɛ janto u la dɛ ! Méfions-nous
long beard. einen langen Bart. yɔrɔ
d'eux ! Beware of them! Wir müssen ihnen
mißtrauen!
janmanjanba endroit très éloigné. faraway
place. sehr abgelegener Ort. jantoli variante: jt. N.B. abréviation de «nota bene»
qui veut dire «bien noter que»; take note that;
jansan [ã-̀ à] variante: jansa. 1 • vt. honorer (auprès
beachten sie gut, daß.
d'un louangeur), gratifier, récompenser,
jantonna [à-ò] Nom. 1 • vigilance, surveillance;
dédier, offrir en l'honneur de (ou à l'occasion
d'une cérémonie); honour, gratify, reward, vigilance, alertness, surveillance, oversight,
dedicate, to offer in honor of (or on the monitoring; Wachsamkeit, Achtsamkeit,
occasion of a ceremony) ; ehren, loben, Aufmerksamkeit, Aufsicht. Ni baw ka
vergelten, vergüten, widmen, zu Ehren (oder jantonna tɛ ... Sans la surveillance des
anläßlich einer Zeremonie) anbieten. Sɔrɔ n mamans ... Without the supervision of moms ...
bolo bɛ Gawusu jansan. Le cadeau reçu sert Ohne Aufsicht der Mütter ...
à offrir un cadeau à Gaoussou (proverbe). The 2 • souci, soins (pour quelqu'un); care (for
gift received is used to give a gift to Gaoussou someone); Sorge, Pflege (für jemanden). An
(proverb). Das erhaltene Geschenk wird
ka a dɔn ko mandiya ani jantonna ka di
verwendet, um Gaoussou ein Geschenk zu
hadamadenw bɛɛ ye. Sachons que toute
machen (Sprichwort). ... ka sujansanmisi bɔ.
personne aime qu'on l'aime et qu'on se soucie
... fournir le bœuf en l'honneur du mort. ... to
d'elle. Let us be aware that everyone wants to
supply the ox in honour of the dead. .. Rind zu
be loved and cared for. Lassen Sie uns
Ehren des Toten geben. synonyme: kunnawolo.
bedenken, daß jeder geliebt und umsorgt
2 • Nom. présent offert à un griot; gifts given to werden möchte.
a griot; Geschenke die man einem Griot gibt. a
jantonyɛrɛla [ã̀-ó ń
ye samaɲin di a safa jansa ye
ɛ̀-ɛ̀-á] Morphemes: janto-n-yɛrɛ-la. n.comp.
jantɛlɛ [á] Nom. croc-en-jambe, lutte; fight; Kampf. U faire attention à soi, prudence, circonspection,
cɛbakɔrɔ fila ye jantɛlɛ ta so kɔnɔ. Les deux prévention; take care of oneself, caution,
hommes luttèrent dans la maison. The two men prudence, prevention; auf sich selbst
fought in the house. Die beiden Männer stritten aufpassen, Vorsicht, Zurückhaltung, Umsicht,
sich im Haus. Vorbeugung, Prävention. Kɛnɛya tɛ taa jɛya
ani jantonyɛrɛla kɔ. La santé exige l’hygiène
et la prévention. Health requires hygiene and
prevention. Gesundheit erfordert Hygiene und
Prävention.
29/01/2026 291

janya jaraminɛjara
janya [ã-̀ á] Morphemes: jan-ya. 1 • Nom. longueur, Jara n.pro. patronyme; family name; Familienname.
taille, grandeur, éloignement, distance; length,
jarabi [à-à-í] comparer: kanu. Emprunt de : arabe.
size, distance, altitude, depth; Länge, Distanz,
Grösse, Höhe. A janya ye mɛtɛrɛ saba ye. Il a
1 • Nom. passion, amour, personne aimée;
passion, love; Passion, Liebe, Leidenschaft.
3 mètres de longueur. It is 3 metres long. Es ist
Donsoya jarabilen don a bolo. Il est
3 Meter lang. synonyme: lɔjan.
passionné de chasse. He is passionate about
2 • vt. hausser, éloigner, être long, allonger; hunting. Er liebt die Jagd.
raise, increase, move away, lengthen;
2 • vi. être amoureux, tomber amoureux, se
erhöhen, sich entfernen, lang sein, verlängern.
passionner pour, désirer physiquement; fall in
U ma janya kosɛbɛ so la. Ils ne s'étaient pas
love, be passionate; sich verlieben,
beaucoup éloignés de la maison. They hadn't leidenschaftlich sein. N jarabilen b'i la. Je
gone far from the house. Sie waren nicht weit
suis amoureuse de toi. I'm in love with you. Ich
vom Haus entfernt.
bin in dich verliebt.
janya sumanikɛnanw variante: janya sumnanw.
jarabiji [à-à-ì] Nom. 1 • sperme; sperm, semen;
Nom. mesures de longueur; length
Sperma. synonyme: cɛɛ kɔji, sawaji, lawaji,
measurement; Längenmessung .
Category: Mathematics.
fɔrɔji, maniyu.
janyi [á] interj. 1 • bien fait; well done; gut gemacht, 2 • sécrétions vaginales pendant l'acte sexuel;
vaginal secretions during sexual intercourse;
geschieht dir recht. Janyi ! Mɔgɔ ma a fɔ i ka
Scheidenausfluss während des
taa o ! Bien fait pour toi ! Personne ne t'a dit Geschlechtsverkehrs.
d'y aller ! Well done for you! Nobody told you
jaradennin [à-à-ẽ̀-ĩ́] variante: jaraden. Nom.
to go! Gut gemacht für dich! Niemand hat dir
gesagt, daß du gehen sollst!
lionceau; lion cub; junger Löwe.
Category: Mammal.
2 • très bien, à la bonne heure; very good, at the
right time; sehr gut, zur richtigen Zeit. Ni jaraka [á] Nom. fosse d'aisance; cesspit; Jauchegrube.
baara kɛra i dungɔ ye, u b'a fɔ k'a kɛra janyi Datugulan ka kan ka kɛ jaraka ɲɛgɛndingɛ
ye. Si le travail a été réalisé comme tu le la .... On doit mettre un couvercle sur la fosse
voulais, ils disent que c'est bien ainsi. If the job d'aisance ... We need to put a lid on the
was done the way you wanted it, they say that's cesspool... Wir müssen einen Deckel auf die
fine. Wenn die Arbeit so erledigt wurde, wie Jauchegrube setzen ... synonyme: saranga.
Sie es wollten, heißt es, das sei in Ordnung.
jarakɔrɔkilifara Nom. espèce de plante; kind of plant;
japaga [á] Nom. au bout du monde (nom propre d'une
Pflanze (Art). Category: Grass, herb, vine.
ville au Burkina Faso); at the end of the world smilax kraussiana.
(proper name of a town in Burkina Faso); am
jaramankaana [à-à-à] variante: [jaramaŋaana].
Ende der Welt (Eigenname einer Stadt in
Burkina Faso). A ka so bɛ fo japaga. Sa Nom. 1 • être humain métamorphosé en fauve
(lion, panthère); human being transformed into
maison est au bout du monde. His house is at
a beast (lion, panther); Mensch verwandelt
the end of the world. Sein Haus liegt am Ende
sich in ein Tier (Löwe, Panther).
der Welt.
2 • personne qui en impose par sa force et sa
japapa [à] 1 • Verbe. effrayer, menacer; frighten,
prestance; person who imposes by his strength
threaten; erschrecken, drohen. ka denmisɛnw and his presence; Person, die sich durch ihre
japaga menacer les enfants. threaten children. Stärke und Präsenz auszeichnet.
Kinder bedrohen. synonyme: jasiran, 3 • fauve mythique; mythical beast;
bagabaga .
mythisches Tier.
1
4 • vieux lion très fort; very strong old lion;
2 • Nom. peur, frayeur; fear, fright; Angst,
sehr starker alter Löwe.
Schrecken.
jaramina
jara [à-á] synonyme: waraba. Nom. lion, lionne;
comparer: sugunɛ.[à-à-í-á] synonyme: ɲɛgɛ
lion; Löwe. Ka Ala to sanfɛ, jaraden tɛ bin
nɛ, bawili. Nom. urine, fait d'uriner; urine;
ɲimi. Tant que Dieu restera dans le ciel, le
Urin. synonyme: ɲɛgɛnɛji.
lionceau ne mangera pas d'herbe (proverbe).
As long as God remains in heaven, the lion cub jaraminɛjara Nom. 1 • grand lion, grande panthère;
will not eat grass (proverb). Solange Gott im big lion, big panther; großer Löwe, großer
Himmel bleibt, wird das Löwenbaby kein Gras Panther.
fressen (Sprichwort). Category: Mammal. leo
2 • grande fauve mythique; great mythical
leo. synonyme: kungotigi.
beast; großes mythisches Tier.
29/01/2026 292

jaramuso jate
jaramuso [à-à-ú-ó] Nom. lionne; female lion; 2 • faire avec calme, avec attention; do it with
Löwin, Löwenweibchen. Category: Mammal.
calm, care; ruhig, vorsichtig zu tun. Ne bɛ n
jasigi n ka baaraw fɛ. Je fais mes travaux
jarasisi [à-à] Emprunt de : français : exercice. Nom.
avec attention. I do my work carefully. Ich
1 • activité sportive, exercice; sport activity; mache meine Arbeit mit Sorgfalt.
sportliche Betätigung.
synonyme: farikoloɲɛnajɛ.
jasiran [à] variante: jalasiran. Verbe. effrayer, faire
2 • défilé; parade; Parade.
peur; scare, make fear; erschrecken. A kulela
3 • gymnastique; gymnastics; Gymnastik.
fo ka n jasiran. Il a tellement crié sur moi que
ça m'a effrayé. He shouted at me so much that
jarawaraya [à-à-à-à] Verbe. être brave comme un
it scared me. Er hat mich so angebrüllt, dass
lion; be brave like a lion; mutig wie ein Löwe ich Angst hatte. synonyme: papa, japapa,
sein. jarawaraya: ka farinya iko jara cela
felefele , sɔnnasiran, fyefye, baabaali, jabɔ,
2 1
veut dire être fort comme un lion. it means to
bagabaga .
be strong like a lion. es bedeutet, stark wie ein
1
Löwe zu sein. jason [à] variante: jaso, saso. Verbe. 1 • remonter
jarawu [à-à] variante: jarawuya. Verbe. se révolter, un enfant au dos, remonter quelque chose qui
tombe; Pull a child up on the back, lift
être insoumis; to revolt, to be rebellious;
something that falls; Kind auf den Rücken
rebellieren, rebellisch sein. Jarawu man ɲi tɔn
setzen, etwas hochziehen, das fällt. Ni den
kɔnɔ. Il n'est pas bon d'avoir un révolté dan
bɛna burun, a ba b'a jason. Quand l'enfant
une association. It is not good to have a rebel
va tomber, sa mère le rattrape. When the child
in an association. Es ist nicht gut, einen
is about to fall, his mother catches up. Wenn
Rebellen in einem Verein zu haben.
das Kind fällt, holt seine Mutter es auf.
jarawulennin Nom. sauterelle (espèce), criquet;
2 • attraper quelqu'un qui tombe, attraper au
grasshopper sp, locust sp; Heuschrecke (Art). vol, se saisir de quelque chose avec rapidité;
Category: Insect. catch someone falling, catch on the fly, grab
jasa [á-á] synonyme: sinsan. Verbe. 1 • clôture, something quickly; Auffangen eines
Stürzenden, Auffangen im Flug, Auffangen
palissade, haie, séparation; fence, enclosure,
von etwas mit Geschwindigkeit. Jakuma ye
palisade; Gehege, Haag, Zaun, Abzäunung,
Trennwand. A ye jasa kɛ a ka butigi la. Il a
ɲinɛ jason. Le chat a attrapé la souris. The cat
caught the mouse. Die Katze hat die Maus
placé une séparation das sa boutique. ( : entre
le vendeur et l'acheteur). He placed a
gefangen.
separation in his shop (between seller and jatabali synonyme: kilifara. Nom. câprier d'Afrique;
buyer). Er platzierte eine Trennung in seinem
kind of shrub; Baumart. Category: Bush,
Laden. (: zwischen Verkäufer und Käufer).
shrub. capparis tomentosa.
2 • clôturer, entourer d'une palissade; to fence synonyme: donkarifin, kilifara.
in, close; einzäunen.
jatala [à-à-á] Morphemes: ja-ta-la. Nom.
jasakɛnɛ [á-á-ɛ́-ɛ́] Nom. haie vive; green /plant
photographe, cameraman; photographer,
fence; grüne Hecke.
cameraman; Fotograf, Kameramann.
jasi [á] variante: jarisa, jasa, janko. prepos. à Category: Person. synonyme: fototala.
plus forte raison, encore moins; even more so, jatalan [à-à-ã]́ Morphemes: ja-ta-lan. Nom. appareil
even less; umso mehr, umso weniger. I bolo tɛ
photo, caméra; camera; Fotoapparat, Kamera.
gosi fasasira la jasi kolo. Ta main ne Category: Machine.
rencontre pas un seul nerf, à plus forte raison
jataviridaki Nom. déclencheur; shutter-release
un os. Your hand does not encounter a single
nerve, let alone a bone. Ihre Hand stößt auf button; Kameraauslöser.
keinen einzigen Nerv, geschweige denn auf jate [à] variante: jati. 1 • vt. compter, calculer,
1
einen Knochen.
dénombrer, analyser, valider, vérifier; count,
jasigi [ǎ-ì-í] Verbe. 1 • calmer, tranquilliser; calm, calculate, analyze, validate, verify; zählen,
tranquillize; beruhigen. I jasigi sa ! Calme-toi berechnen, analysieren, bestätigen,
à présent ! Calm down now! Beruhige dich
nachprüfen, kontrollieren. A y'a ka tigɛbɔrɛ
jetzt! A jasigilen iko tigatulu. Il est calme sɛnɛnen jate. Il a compté le nombre de sacs
comme de l'huile d'arachide (expression). Hi is
d'arachides qu'il a récoltés. He counted the
calm as peanut oil (expression). Er ist ruhig
number of bags of peanuts he collected. Er
wie Erdnußöl (Ausdruck). synonyme: lafiɲɛbɔ. zählte die Anzahl der Erdnusssäcke, die er
geerntet hatte. Category: Mathematics.
synonyme: dan.
1
29/01/2026 293

jate jatikɛmansin
2 • Nom. compte, nombre, total, calcul; jatelaban [à-è-à-ã́] Jula: jatilaban.
account, number, total, calculation;
synonyme: bilan. Nom. bilan; balance sheet,
Berechnung, Betrag, Zahl, Total,
Gesamtsumme. Tubabubaarakɛla hakɛ ka to
financial statement, assessment; Bewertung,
Bilanz. Category: Finance. synonyme: jatefilɛ.
ka jate tuma bɛɛ. Que le nombre des
fonctionnaires soit constamment vérifié. The jatemansin Jula: jatimansin. Nom. calculatrice;
number of staff is constantly checked. Die Zahl calculator; Rechenmaschine.
der Angestellten wird ständig überprüft. Category: Machine.
3 • Verbe. considérer, tenir compte de, faire cas jateminɛ [à-è-ì-ɛ̀] Jula: jatiminɛ.
de; consider, take account of; beachten,
einbeziehen, rechnen. Dɔw yɛrɛ b'u jate
synonyme: ka-jate-minɛ. Verbe. réfléchir, tenir
compte, estimer, considérer prendre en
fɔlɔmɔgɔw ye, walima mɔgɔ kunkolotɔw ...
compte, calculer, compter; reflect, think about,
Certains d'ailleurs les considèrent comme des
estimate; überlegen, nachdenken, abmessen,
rétrogrades, ou des fous ... Some people
abschätzen. N y'a ka miirinata jateminɛ. J'ai
consider them to be retrograde, or crazy ...
tenu compte de son point de vue. I have taken
Manche halten sie für rückständig oder
his point of view into account. Ich habe seine
verrückt ...
Meinung berücksichtigt. Baara in ma
4 • Nom. estimation, avis; estimate, opinion;
Schätzung, Bewertung. ne jate la selon mon
jateminɛ. On n'a pas estimé ce travail à sa
estimation. in my estimation. nach meiner
juste valeur. The work was not valued
Einschätzung.
properly. Diese Arbeit wurde nicht
angemessen gewürdigt.
jate Jula: jati. synonyme: kɔnti. Nom. compte;
2 jateminɛna Jula: jatiminɛna. Nom. comptable,
account; Konto. Category: Finance.
recenseur; accountant, bookkeeper,
jate ta Jula: jati ta. synonyme: jati bɔ. Nom. faire le enumerator, census taker; Buchhalter, Zähler.
compte; do the accounting; abrechnen. Category: Worker, occupation.
Category: Finance. jateɲini Morphemes: jate-ɲini. variante: jatesigi. Nom.
jatebɔsɛbɛn [à] variante: jatebɔ. Nom. statistique; problème, opération (mathématique); problem,
statistic; Statistik. operation (mathematical); Problem, Operation
(mathematisch).
jateda Jula: jatida. n.comp. numéral cardinal; cardinal
number; Grundzahl. Category: Mathematics. jatigi [à-í-í] Nom. hôte, logeur; host; Gastgeber. Ne
jateden [à-è-ẽ́] Jula: jatiden. Nom. chiffre; number, jatigi ye Musa ye. Musa est mon hôte. I am
staying with Musa (lit. my host is Moussa).
digit; Zahl, Ziffer. Category: Mathematics.
Moussa ist mein Gastgeber. Subaga jatigi ne
jateden mɔntɔrɔ Jula: jatiden mɔntɔrɔ. Nom.
mɔgɔ gansan man kan. Le logeur du sorcier
montre à affiche numérique; digital watch;
n’est pas un homme ordinaire (proverbe). The
Digitaluhr.
lodger of the sorcerer is not an ordinary man
jatedenso Jula: jatidenso. Nom. case des différentes (proverb). Der Gastgeber des Zauberers ist
kein gewöhnlicher Mann (Sprichwort).
unités; boxes for the different units; Häuschen
für die verschiedenen Einheiten. jatigila [à-ì-ì-á] Nom. maison d'hôte, maison du
Category: Mathematics. logeur, maison où l'on est reçu; house of the
jatedenw sɛbɛnnikɛnan expr. touche de retour; host; Gastgeber Haus, Haus des Gastgebers. ...
backspace key; Zurück-Taste. a taara a jatigila la. ... il se rendit chez son
jatefilɛ Jula: jatifilɛ. Nom. bilan; balance sheet,
hôte. ...he went to his host. ...er ging zu
seinem Gastgeber. Category: Building.
financial statement; Bilanz.
Category: Finance. synonyme: jatelaban. jatigiya [à-ì-ì-á] Morphemes: jatigi-ya. Nom.
1 • hospitalité; hospitality; Gastfreundschaft,
jatekalan [à-ì-á-ã́] Jula: jatikalan.
Gastlichkeit, Gastfreundlichkeit.
Morphemes: jate-kàlan. Nom. arithmétique,
2 • logement, lieu d’hébergement;
calcul, mathématiques; arithmetic, accommodation; Logis, Unterkunft.
calculation, mathematics; Arithmetik,
jatikɛmansin Nom. calculette; calculator;
Berechnung, Rechnung, das Rechnen,
Mathematik. Sɛbɛnni ka nɔgɔn a bolo Taschenrechner. Category: Mathematics,
jatekalan ye. L'écriture est plus facile pour lui
Tool.
que le calcul. Writing is easier for him than
calculating. Schreiben ist für ihn einfacher als
rechnen. Category: Mathematics.
29/01/2026 294

jatili jeleda
jatili [à-ì-í] comparer: danni. Nom. recensement, je [è] variante: de. vi. se taire; be silent, say
1 1
calcul, comptabilité; census, inventory, nothing about something, hush something up;
accounting, bookkeeping; Zählung, schweigen. synonyme: de .
2
Volkszählung, Inventar, Buchhaltung.
Category: Finance, Mathematics.
je
2
[è] Nom. courge, giraumont, citrouille; squash,
pumpkin; Kürbis. A bɛ jekala min. Il fume
jatili [à-ì-í] Jula: jatili. synonyme: kasabiya,
2
des tiges de courge. He smokes squash stems.
sɔnni. Nom. validité; validity; Gültigkeit,
Er raucht Kürbisstiele. cucurbita pepo.
Geltung.
jebara [è-á-á] Nom. citrouille, courge, fruit de la
jatiminɛ Nom. réflexion, opération, recensement;
courge; pumpkin, squash, squash fruit;
reflection, evaluation, calculation, census; Kürbis, Kürbisfrucht. Category: Food.
Besinnung, Betrachtung, Reflektion,
Berechnung,, Volkszählung, Zensus.
jee [èé] Jula: jee. variante: je, jebara. Nom.
courge, citrouille, giraumont; gourd, marrow,
jatiminɛbaliya n.comp. manque de discernement;
pumpkin; Kürbis. Category: Food. cucurbita
lack of discernment; fehlende Urteilskraft. pepo.
jatisɛbɛ Nom. fiche comptable; account card, account jeferelen [è-é-è-ĩ́] Jula: jeferenin.
sheet; Buchhaltungs-Blatt, Abrechnungsblatt. variante: jefurulen, jibirilen, njefurulen. Nom.
Category: Finance.
moineau, amarante commun; sparrow; Spatz,
jatisɛbɛnnin Nom. calcul écrit; written calculation; Sperling. Category: Bird. lagonosticta
schriftliches Rechnen. Category: Mathematics. senegala. synonyme: kolonkɔrɔkɔnɔnin,
jatita [à-ì-á] n.comp. compte (calcul); count;
njɛkɔɔnin.
Rechnen, Zählen, Berechnung. jejan [è-á] Nom. courge; marrow; Gartenkürbis.
Category: Mathematics. Category: Food.
jatɔ [á-ɔ́] Nom. individu immoral; immoral person; jele [é] variante: jeleke. Nom. 1 • hache; axe, ax;
unmoralische Person. Axt. Ni jeleden ma don kala la, a tɛ se ka jiri
jatɔmuso [á-ɔ́-ú-ó] Morphemes: jatɔ-muso. Nom. tigɛ. Si le fer de hache n'est pas emmanché, il
prostituée; prostitute; Prostituierte, Hure. ne peut abattre l'arbre (proverbe). If the ax
Category: Person. synonyme: jan, surɔtɛmɛ. head is not hafted, it cannot fell the tree
7
(proverb). Wenn der Axtkopf nicht geheftet
jatɔya [á-ɔ́-á] Morphemes: jatɔ-ya. Nom. débauche,
ist, kann er den Baum nicht fällen
immoralité; debauchery, immorality; (Sprichwort). synonyme: jende, taro.
Ausschweifung, Sittenlosigkeit, Unsittlichkeit.
2 • bécane , «clou» bicyclette sans accessoires
jaturu [à] Nom. hyène (surnom de l'hyène); hyena (populaire); bike, bicycle without accessories
(nickname for hyena); Hyäne (Spitzname für (popular); Fahrrad, Fahrrad ohne Zubehör
Hyäne). Mali ni jaturu tun ye teri sɛbɛw ye. (beliebt). I ka jele singa n ma ! Prête-moi ton
L'hippopotame et l'hyène étaient de bons amis. vieux clou / vélo ! Lend me your old nail/bike!
The hippopotamus and the hyena were good Leihen Sie mir Ihren alten Nagel/Ihr altes
friends. Das Nilpferd und die Hyäne waren Fahrrad!
gute Freunde. synonyme: lagabure, namakɔrɔ, 3 • sept (ai jeu de cartes); seven (playing
suruku, dajugu, konjo, cards); sieben (Spielkarten).
1
surukutomitominin, walowalo , npereden.
4 •
2
jeleda [é] Morphemes: jele-da. Nom. tranchant de la
jawu [à] variante: jakun. Nom. padouk d'Afrique 1
hache; edge of the axe; Kante der Axt. ... a tɛ
(arbre), bois corail; African padauk tree, coral
wood; Afrikanischer Padauk (Baum), jeleda kari. ... il n'ébrèche pas la lame de la
Korallenholz. Category: Tree. pterocarpus hache. ...it does not chip the blade of the axe.
santalinoides. ...es splittert nicht an der Klinge der Axt.
jawuli [à] Verbe. peur, impressionner, inquiéter, jeleda 2 [é] Nom. blessure faite avec une hache; wound
effrayer, prendre peur; fear, impress, bother, made with an axe; mit einer Axt verursachte
scar, frighten; Angst, ängstigen, Wunde. Category: Disease.
beeindrucken, belästigen, Furcht einjagen /
einflössen. Ko balalen bɛ mɔgɔ jawuli. Ce
qui surprend effraie. What surprises frightens.
Was überrascht, macht Angst.
29/01/2026 295

jeli jɛ
jeli comparer: ɲamakala, 3 • vt. émouvoir fortement; to move strongly;
stark bewegen. A saya kibaru y'án jeni. La
garanke.[è-í] variante: jelicɛ, jelikɛ. Nom.
nouvelle de sa mort nous a beaucoup émus.
griot; bard, griot, praise singer; Sänger, Griot,
The news of his death moved us greatly. Die
Barde. Jeli tɛ malo, nka a fɔnkun bɛ wɔsi. Le
Nachricht von seinem Tod hat uns sehr
griot n'a pas honte, mais son front transpire
berührt.
(proverbe). The griot is not ashamed, but his
4 • Nom. marque (au feu) pour le bétail; brand
forehead sweats (proverb). Der Griot schämt
(fire) for livestock; Marke (Feuer) für Vieh.
sich nicht, aber seine Stirn schwitzt
(Sprichwort). Category: Person. jenida [è-ì] Morphemes: jeni-da.
jeliba [è-ì-á] Nom. grand griot; great griot; grosser variante: tasumajenida. Nom. brûlure, marque
Griot / Sänger. au feu du bétail; burn, scorch, burn mark on
cattle; Brandwunde, Verbrennung,
jelikaɲɔ Morphemes: jeli-ka-ɲɔ. Nom. mil rouge du
Brandmarke auf Vieh. Category: Animal
teinturier; red millet from the dyer; Rote Hirse husbandry.
vom Färber. sorghum caudatum.
jenikaɲimi [è-ì-à] Morphemes: jeni-ka-ɲimi.
jeliya [è-ì-á] Nom. art du griot, métier de griot, 1 • Nom. bouchée pour goûter, affaire ou
comportement de griot, flatterie; art / occasion à saisir sur le champ, chose bradée;
know-how of the griot, behaviour of a griot; bite for a snack, deal or opportunity to seize
Kunst des Griot, Benehmen des Griot. Ne ye n immediately, thing sold off; einen Happen für
ka jeliya dege ka a sɔrɔ n si bɛ sanji tan ani einen Snack, ein Schnäppchen oder eine
wolowula. J'ai appris mon métier de griot à
Gelegenheit zum sofortigen Ergreifen.
l'âge des dix-sept ans. I learned my trade as a
2 • Nom. personne avide, cupide, opportuniste;
griot at the age of seventeen. Ich habe mein
greedy person, greedy, opportunistic; gieriger
Mensch, gierig, opportunistisch.
Handwerk als Griot im Alter von siebzehn
Jahren erlernt. 3 • Nom. sitôt gagné, sitôt dépensé; As soon as
you’ve earned it, as soon as you’ve spent it;
jenbe [ẽ̀-é] variante: junbe. Nom. tambour «
Sobald gewonnen, sobald ausgegeben.
djembé »; kind of drum; Trommel (Art).
4 • Verbe. liquider, brader; liquidate, bargain;
Category: Musical instrument.
Liquidieren, veräußern. ka mobili jenikaɲimi
jenbefɔla [è-è-ɔ̀] Morphemes: jenbe-fɔ-la. Nom. liquider une voiture à vil prix. sell a car at a
batteur, celui qui joue du jembe; drummer; low price. Verkauf eines Autos zu einem
Trommler. Dɔ burankɛ ye dɔ jenbefɔla ye. niedrigen Preis.
Le beau-père de l'un est le joueur de tambour jeninba [è-ì] 1 • Verbe. donner une claque, gifler; slap;
de l'autre (proverbe). One man's father-in-law
eine Ohrfeige geben, ohrfeigen.
is another man's drummer (proverb). Der
2 • Nom. gifle, claque; slap, clap; Ohrfeige.
Schwiegervater des einen ist der Schlagzeuger
Jeninba fila fila d'a ma. Donne-lui quelques
des anderen (Sprichwort).
claques. Give him a few slaps. Gib ihm ein
jende variante: jele. Nom. hache; axe, ax; Axt, Beil. paar Ohrfeigen.
Category: Agricultural tool. synonyme: jele, jentura [è-ú-á] variante: getura, jetura. Nom.
taro.
1 • taureau adulte; bull; Stier.
jendekala Morphemes: jele-kàla. Nom. manche d’une Category: Mammal. synonyme: getura.
hache; axe handle; Stiel einer Axt. 2 • étalon; stallion; Hengst.
jeni 1 • vt. brûler, incinérer; burn, incinerate; jesedan Nom. tissage; weaving; Weben.
brennen, verbrennen. Tile bi mɔgɔ jeni. Le Category: Worker, occupation.
soleil brûle sur les gens. The sun burns people. jɛ [ɛ̀] Verbe. 1 • manquer, échouer à, rater; to miss,
1
Die Sonne brennt die Leute.
to fail; verpassen, scheitern, fehlen.
2 • vt. griller, rôtir; grill, roast; rösten, braten, Kunnafoni dɔw b'a jɛ ... Certaines
grillieren. Mɔgɔ tɛ ku jeninen karifan dɔn.
informations manquent ... Some information is
On ne sait jamais où l’igname grillée se rompra
missing... Es fehlen einige Informationen...
(proverbe). You never know where the roasted
synonyme: jɛn.
yam will break (proverb). Man weiß nie, wo
2
die geröstete Yamswurzel zerbricht 2 • arriver trop tard; arrive too late; zu spät
(Sprichwort). kommen. Aa, cɛ, i y'a jɛ dɛ ! An tilala sisan.
Ah ! mon vieux, tu as raté, on vient juste de
finir ! Ah! man, you missed it, we just finished!
Ah! Mann, du hast es verpaßt, wir sind gerade
fertig!
29/01/2026 296

jɛ jɛ
3 • refuser; refuse, reject; verweigern, 5 • Nom. associé; partner, associate; Partner. I
ablehnen. Da t'i ban sotigideli ma ko a b'i jɛ. jɛ don ? C'est ton associé ? Is he your partner?
La bouche n'hésite pas à demander quelque Ist das dein Partner?
chose au chef de famille, même s'il est
probable qu'il refuse (proverbe). The mouth
jɛ
3
Nom. 1 • phacochère; warthog;
does not hesitate to ask the head of the family Warzenschwein. Mɔgɔ min tɛ jɛ dɔn, o de b'a
for something, even if he is likely to refuse ta a ku ma. Seul celui qui ne connaît pas le
(proverb). Der Mund zögert nicht, das phacochère essaie de l'attraper par la queue
Familienoberhaupt um etwas zu bitten, auch (proverbe). Only the one who does not know
wenn es wahrscheinlich ablehnen wird the warthog tries to catch it by the tail
(Sprichwort). synonyme: jɛn 1 . (proverb). Nur wer den Warzenschwein nicht
4 • échapper à; escape from; entkommen, kennt, versucht ihn am Schwanz zu fangen
entgehen. (Sprichwort). Category: Mammal.
5 • priver, être en moins; to be less, deprive; synonyme: lɛfali, jɛfali, lɛ 1 , kongolɛ.
entbehren, weniger sein, entziehen. U y'i mɔkɛ 2 • potamochère; bush-pig; wildes Schwein.
jɛ ciɲɛ na ... Ils ont privé ton grand-père de sa 3 • porc; pig; Schwein.
part d'héritage ... They deprived your 4 •
grandfather of his share of the inheritance... jɛ [ɛ́] Nom. 1 • espace dégagé; clear space; freier
4
Sie haben Ihrem Großvater seinen Anteil am
Erbe entzogen ...
Raum. Ne kelen bɛ jɛ kunna. Moi seul, je
suis comme devant un grand endroit vide
6 • excepter; except; außer. ... ni i ye olu mɔgɔ
(proverbe). Me alone, I am like in front of a big
fila jɛ, a tɛ mɔgɔ wɛrɛ la yan. ... si on excepte
empty place (proverb). Ich allein, ich stehe wie
ces deux personnes , personne d'autre ici n'a vor einem großen, leeren Ort (Sprichwort).
(cette maladie). ...except for these two
2 • large plaine propre aux cultures; wide plain
people, no one else here has (this disease).
suitable for crops; breite Ebene, geeignet für
...außer diesen beiden Menschen hat hier
den Anbau.
niemand (diese Krankheit).
jɛ [ɛ́] 1 • adj. blanc, clair; white, clear; weiß, klar.
jɛ [ɛ]̀ 1 • Verbe. unir, s'unir, se lier, s'accoupler; 5
2
A ka jɛ pas ! C'est complètement blanc ! It's
unite, bind, mate; vereinen, binden, paaren.
completely white! Es ist komplett weiß!
Tɔndenw bɛ jɛ ka baara kɛ. Les membres de
synonyme: gwɛ, jɛman.
l'association se mettent ensemble pour
travailler. The members of the association get 2 • adj. pur, propre, chaste; pure, clean, chaste;
together to work. Die Mitglieder des Vereins rein, keusch. Npogotigi in ka jɛ. Cette jeune
kommen zusammen, um zu arbeiten. fille est chaste. This young girl is chaste.
synonyme: jɛn. Dieses junge Mädchen ist keusch.
3
2 • Verbe. assembler, être ensemble, s'accorder; 3 • adj. évident , exact; obvious, exact;
assemble, be together, agree; sich offensichtlich, genau. Ni ɲinɛ ye jakuma
versammeln, zusammen sein, sich einigen. taayɔrɔ jɛ dɔn ... Si la souris connaît l'endroit
Kɔnɔw jɛlen bɛ bii fɔ. C'est quand ils sont exact où est allé le chat ... If the mouse knows
assemblés que les oiseaux produisent un the exact place where the cat went... Wenn die
bourdonnement (proverbe). When birds are Maus den genauen Ort kennt, wohin die Katze
assembled, they produce a buzzing sound gegangen ist ...
(proverb). Wenn sie zusammenkommen, dann 4 • Verbe. blanchir, nettoyer, rendre propre;
machen die Vögel ein gemeinsames whiten, clean, make clean; aufhellen, reinigen,
Gezwitscher (Sprichwort). sauber machen. A y'a jɔsi ka a jɛ. Il le nettoya
3 • Nom. union, alliance, relation, accord; et le rendit bien propre. He cleaned it and
union, alliance, relationship, agreement; made it very clean. Er hat es gereinigt und es
Vereinigung, Bündnis, Beziehung, sehr sauber gemacht. Dugu jɛra. Le matin se
Vereinbarung, Union. ka jɛ sinsin renforcer leva. (littéralement: «blanchit»). Morning
l'union. strengthen the union. die Union zu dawned. (literally: “whitens”). Der Morgen
stärken. brach an. (wörtlich: „weiß gemacht“).
4 • Nom. part commune; common share; 5 • Verbe. être certain; to be certain; sicher sein.
gemeinsamer Anteil. Aw fila jɛ filɛ nin ye. 6 • Nom. taie (sur l’œil), cataracte; cataract;
Voici votre part commune à tous les deux. Katarakt.
Here is your share of the two. Das ist der
7 • Nom. cheveux blancs; white hair; weißes
gemeinsame Anteil.
Haar. Jɛ ka ca a kunkolo la. Il a beaucoup de
cheveux blancs. He has a lot of white hair. Er
hat viele weiße Haare.
29/01/2026 297

jɛbɛn jɛgɛminɛla
8 • Nom. comptant, argent liquide; cash; jɛgɛ [ɛ́-ɛ́] variante: jigɛ. Nom. 1 • poisson; fish;
Bargeld. Kɛmɛ duuru jɛ ka fisa ba kelen juru
Fisch. jɛgɛ jalan poisson sec. dried fish.
ye. Mieux vaut deux mille cinq cents francs
getrockneter Fisch. jɛgɛ kɛnɛ poisson frais.
comptant que cinq mille à crédit (proverbe).
fresh fish. frischer Fisch. Jɛgɛ kunba bɛ balo
Better two thousand five hundred francs in
cash than five thousand on credit (proverb). jɛgɛ misɛnw na. Les gros poissons se
Besser zweitausendfünfhundert Franken in bar nourrissent des petits (proverbe). The big fish
als fünftausend auf Kredit (Sprichwort). feed on the small ones (proverb). Die großen
Category: Finance. Fische ernähren sich von den kleinen
9 • Nom. (en opposition avec «fin») : ni une (Sprichwort). Category: Fish.
chose, ni son contraire, pour rien, en vain ..; (in 2 • homosexuel (populaire); homosexual
opposition to “fin”): neither a thing, nor its (popular); homosexuell (Volksmund).
opposite, for nothing, in vain..; (Gegensatz zu jɛgɛ nɛnɛkiriminanw Nom. branchies du poisson;
„fin“): weder ein Ding noch sein Gegenteil,
gills of fish; Fisch Kiemen. Category: Parts of
umsonst, umsonst... I ma fin kɛ a la, i ma jɛ kɛ
an animal.
a la. Tu ne leur as fait ni mal ni bien. (« tu ne
jɛgɛbuti [ɛ́-ɛ́-ú-í] n.comp. poisson entier séché et
leur as rien fait du tout»). You have done them
neither harm nor good. (“you didn’t do fermenté, brisure de poisson séché (utilisée
anything to them at all”). Du hast ihnen weder
comme condiment); dried and fermented fish;
Schaden noch Gutes getan. („Du hast ihnen trockener und fermentierter Fisch.
überhaupt nichts getan“). Category: Food.
jɛbɛn [ɛ]́ variante: jaban. Verbe. 1 • malmener, mal jɛgɛbwati Nom. boite de poisson; tinned fish;
faire, gâcher; to mishandle, to spoil; falsch Fischbüchse. Category: Food.
behandeln, mißhandeln, verderben. ... fo ka u jɛgɛdila [ɛ́] Nom. préparation du poisson; cooking of
bɛɛ jɛbɛn. ... au point de tout gâcher. ... to the fish; Zubereitung von Fisch. Category: Food.
point of ruining everything. ... so sehr, daß es
jɛgɛdumukɔnɔ synonyme: kɔnɔ bɔɔrɔtigi. Nom.
alles vermasselt.
pélican; pelican; Pelikan. Category: Bird.
2 • faire honte, humilier; to shame, to
synonyme: kulanjan.
humiliate; beschämen, demütigen. A tun b'a
fɛ k'i ban a cɛ la, a faw y'a sigi ka a jɛbɛn jɛgɛfagajabi Nom. espèce d'arbuste; kind of shrub;
kosɛbɛ. Elle voulait se rebeller contre son Pflanzenart. Category: Bush, shrub. tephrosia
mari, ses pères lui ont fait honte. She wanted to
vogelii.
rebel against her husband, her fathers shamed jɛgɛfeerela n.comp. poissonnier; fish vendor;
her. Sie wollte gegen ihren Mann rebellieren,
Fisch-Verkäufer. Category: Worker,
ihre Väter beschämten sie.
occupation.
3 • coucher (avec une femme); sleep (with a
woman); schlafen (mit einer Frau).
jɛgɛjalan [ɛ́-ɛ́-á-ã́] variante: jɛgɛwalan, jɛgɛwala.
n.comp. 1 • poisson séché; dried fish;
jɛɛn [ɛ]́ variante: jɛn. Nom. accouplement; pairing,
getrockneter Fisch. Category: Food, Fish.
copulation; Paarung. synonyme: jɛgɛwalan.
jɛfali [ɛ]̀ Nom. 1 • phacochère; warthog; 2 • poisson boucané; smoked fish; geräucherter
Warzenschwein. Jɛfali ka kɔɲɔ don, o ye Fisch.
gɛlɛko dan ye. Le jour du mariage du jɛgɛkɛnɛ [ɛ́-ɛ́-ɛ́-ɛ́] n.comp. poisson frais; fresh fish;
phacochère, il y a pléthore de défense frischer Fisch.
(proverbe). On the warthog's wedding day,
jɛgɛkolo [ɛ́] Nom. arête, dard (d'un poisson); fish bone;
there is a plethora of defence (proverb). Am
Hochzeitstag des Warzenschweins gibt es jede Fischgräte. Jɛgɛkolo baga ka farin kojugu !
Menge Verteidigung (Sprichwort). La douleur causée par le dard du poisson est
synonyme: lɛ , kungokɔnɔjɛ, lɛfali, kongolɛ, très forte ! The pain caused by the fish bone is
1
jɛ . very strong! Der durch den Fischstachel
3
verursachte Schmerz ist sehr stark!
2 • verrat; boar; Eber.
Category: Parts of an animal.
jɛfu [ɛ]́ variante: jɛfuu. Nom. petit pluie, averse;
jɛgɛminasegi Nom. nasse; keep-net; Fischreuse,
light rain, downpour; leichter Regen,
Reuse. Category: Hunt and fish.
Platzregen. Jɛfu bɛ bala cikɛla caman na.
synonyme: nsɔɔlɔ.
L’averse surprend beaucoup de cultivateurs.
The downpour surprises many farmers. Der jɛgɛminɛla n.comp. pêcheur; fisherman; Fischer.
Regenguß überrascht viele Bauern. Category: Person. synonyme: dolendala.
Category: Weather.
29/01/2026 298

jɛgɛminɛsɛgɛn jɛlankuna
jɛgɛminɛsɛgɛn [ɛ́] Nom. aigle pêcheur; fish eagle; jɛkakɛ [ɛ̀-à] Morphemes: jɛ-ka-kɛ.
Fischadler. Category: Bird. variante: jɛkawale. Nom. union dans l'action,
jɛgɛmugu Nom. farine de poisson; fish-flour; travail en commun, action commune; union in
action, joint work, joint action; gemeinsame
Fischmehl. Category: Food.
Arbeit, gemeinsame Aktion. Ni sogokafɔ ye
jɛgɛsugu [ɛ́-ɛ́-ú-ú] Morphemes: jɛgɛ-sugu. Nom.
daamu ye, jɛkakɛ ɲɔgɔn tɛ. La discussion est
marché de poisson; fish market; Fischmarkt.
excellente, mais rien ne vaut une action en
jɛgɛwusu poisson fumé. smoked fish. commun (proverbe). Discussion is excellent,
geräucherter Fisch. Category: Food. but nothing beats joint action (proverb). Die
jɛgɛtigi synonyme: jɛgɛfeerela. Nom. poissonnier; fish Diskussion ist ausgezeichnet, aber nichts geht
über gemeinsames Handeln (Sprichwort).
vendor; Fisch-verkäufer. Category: Person.
Category: 6.1 Work. synonyme: jɛkabaara,
jɛgɛwalan [ɛ́] n.comp. poisson éventré, séché et jɛnkakɛ.
fermenté; gutted fish, dried and fermented;
ausgenommener und getrockneter Fisch.
jɛkan [ɛ̀] Nom. termes d'un accord; terms of an
Category: Food. synonyme: jɛgɛjalan. agreement; Bedingungen einer Vereinbarung.
synonyme: jɛnkan.
jɛgɛwusu n.comp. poisson fumé; smoked fish;
geräucherter Fisch. Category: Food.
jɛkasigi [ɛ̀-à] Nom. réunion. Jɛkasigi in senfɛ ... Au
cours de cette réunion ... During this meeting...
jɛkabaara [ɛ̀-à] Morphemes: jɛ-ka-baara.
Während dieses Treffens... synonyme: lajɛnnin,
variante: jɛkawale. Nom. travail en commun,
jɛnkasigi, tɔnsigi, ɲɔgɔnye, lajɛnni, lajɛnba.
travail collectif; joint work, collective work;
gemeinsame Arbeit, kollektive Arbeit, jɛkɛnɛ [ɛ́] Nom. clairière, endroit sans végétation,
Gemeinschaftsarbeit. jɛkabaara nafamaw grève; clearing, place without vegetation,
travaux collectifs utiles. useful collective work. shore; Lichtung, Platz ohne Vegetation, Ufer.
nützliche Gemeinschaftsarbeit. Category: 6.1 ... bakɔla fɛ, jɛkɛnɛ min bɛ yen ... ... derrière
Work. synonyme: jɛkakɛ, jɛnkabaara. le fleuve, sur la grève qui est là-bas ... ...behind
the river, on the shore over there... ...hinter
jɛkabɛn [ɛ̀-à] Nom. accord, décision; agreement,
dem Fluß, am Ufer dort drüben...
decision; Vereinbarung, Entscheidung. Category: Land. synonyme: kɛnɛ, jɛnkɛnɛ.
4
Jɛkabɛn nafa ye walekelenkɛ ye. Se mettre
jɛkɔnɔ [ɛ̀-ɔ́-ɔ́] synonyme: lɛkɔnɔ. Nom. barbican à
d'accord à l’avance a pour avantage de
permettre d'agir d'un seul bloc. Agreeing in poitrine rouge; bearded Barbet;
advance has the advantage of allowing you to Senegal-Furchenschnabel. Category: Bird.
act as one. Eine vorherige Zustimmung hat lybius dubius.
den Vorteil, daß Sie als Einheit agieren jɛkɔnɔninsaɲɔ Nom. espèce de plante; kind of plant;
können. synonyme: jɛnkabɛn.
Pflanze (Art). Category: Grass, herb, vine.
jɛkafɔ [ɛ-̀ à] variante: jɛkakuma. Nom. concertation, polycarpaea linearifolia.
dialogue, avis collectif, consensus, décision jɛkulu [ɛ̀] Nom. groupe, commission, association,
commune; consultation, dialogue, collective
équipe; group, commission, association, team;
opinion, consensus, joint decision;
Gruppe, Kommission, Verein, Team. ... i ni i
Konsultation, Dialog, kollektive Meinung,
ka jɛkulu ... ... toi et ton groupe ... ...you and
Konsens, gemeinsame Entscheidung. Jɛkafɔ
your group... ...du und deine Gruppe...
ye daamu ye. On accepte avec joie ce qui a été
sannijɛkulu groupement d'achat, coopérative
décidé en commun. We happily accept what
d'achat. purchasing cooperative.
has been decided together. Was gemeinsam
Einkaufsgenossenschaft. synonyme: kulu,
beschlossen wurde, nehmen wir gerne an. 1
synonyme: jɛnkafɔ. sikulu, jɛnkulu, bakuruba.
jɛlankuna [ɛ̀-à] synonyme: jɛnkuna, jɛlankunadi,
jɛlankunan. Nom. myrrhier trèfle; kind of tree;
Baumart. Category: Tree. commiphora
africana.
29/01/2026 299

jɛlenya jɛn
jɛlenya [ɛ̀-è] Nom. union, unité; union, unity; 2 • causer, bavarder; chat, talk; chatten, reden,
1
sich mit jemanden unterhalten. U bɛ jemu
Vereinigung, Einheit. ... sariyaba min
bulonda la tuma bɛɛ. Ils causent tout le
barajuru ye jɛlenye, baara ani hɔrɔnya ye.
temps devant le vestibule. They talk all the
... une constitution dont les fondations sont
time in front of the vestibule. Sie reden die
l'union, le travail et la liberté. ...a constitution
ganze Zeit vor dem Vorraum.
whose foundations are union, work and
freedom. ...eine Verfassung, deren Grundlagen jɛmukan [ɛ̀-ù] Nom. discours; speech; Rede.
Einheit, Arbeit und Freiheit sind. synonyme: jamalakuma, jɛmu, kuma .
1
jɛlenya 2 [ɛ́] Nom. 1 • clarté, transparence; clarity, jɛn Verbe. refuser, priver; refuse, deprive;
1
transparency; Klarheit, Transparenz. A ka
ablehnen, berauben, ausschliessen, fehlen,
kan ka sɛbɛn jɛlenya la ... Cela doit être écrit durchfallen, mangeln. synonyme: jɛ .
1
clairement ... This must be written clearly...
jɛn [ɛ ̀] variante: jɛ. vt. rater, manquer, échouer à;
Das muß deutlich geschrieben werden... 2
fail, miss; verfehlen, verpassen. Madu ye kɔnɔ
2 • propreté, hygiène; cleanliness, hygiene;
Sauberkeit, Hygiene. Jɛlenya ye kɛnɛya bon k’a jɛn. Madou a visé un oiseau mais il l’a
taamasyɛn ye. La propreté est signe de santé. raté. Madou aimed at a bird and missed.
Cleanliness is a sign of health. Sauberkeit ist
Madou hat auf den Vogel gezielt aber er hat
ein Zeichen von Gesundheit.
ihn verfehlt. bi jɛn manquer le but (football).
miss the goal (football). das Tor verfehlen.
jɛmakan [ɛ̀-à] variante: jɛmako. Nom. accord,
isamɛn jɛn échouer à un examen. fail an
entente; agreement, understanding;
exam. in einer Prüfung durchfallen.
Zustimmung, Verständnis, Vereinbarung. ... u
synonyme: jɛ .
1
bɛ se ka a miiri ko e ni ne jɛmakan don. ...
jɛn [ɛ ̀] variante: jɛ. vt. unir, réunir, se lier,
ils peuvent penser que c'est une entente entre 3
nous. ...they may think it's an agreement s'accoupler, assembler, être ensemble; unite,
between us. ...sie denken vielleicht, es sei eine assemble, mate, be together; einen, vereinigen,
Vereinbarung zwischen uns. zusammenführen, ansammeln, versammeln,,
synonyme: jɛnmakan. zusammen sein, paaren. synonyme: jɛ 2 .
jɛman [ɛ]́ Nom. 1 • blanc; white; weiß. misi jɛman jɛn 4 [ɛ ̀] 1 • Nom. permission, accord, aval,
lewulewu ! une vache complètement blanche. consentement; permission, consent,
a completely white cow. eine völlig weiße
agreement; Erlaubnis, Genehmigung,
Kuh. synonyme: gwɛman, jɛ, gwɛ.
Einverständnis. A ye jɛn ɲini a fa n’a ba fɛ,
5
olu y’a yamaruya. Il a demandé permission à
2 • blanc (de l’œil, de l’œuf); white (of the eye,
of the egg); Weiß (des Auges, des Eies).
ses parents, ils étaient d’accord. He asked
synonyme: ɲɛjɛ, fanjigwɛ.
permission from his parents, and they gave it.
Er fragte seine Eltern um Erlaubnis, und sie
jɛmɛ [ɛ]́ Nom. 1 • porte-monnaie; wallet, purse; gaben sie ihm.
Geldbörse. Ni i ma fɛn bila musokɔrɔnin ka 2 • vi. permettre, accorder, consentir; allow,
jɛmɛ na, min b'a la, kan'o ta ka bɔ a la. Si tu grant; erlauben, bewilligen, gestatten.
n'as rien mis dans le porte-monnaie de la petite 3 • vi. accepter; accept; akzeptieren, annehmen.
vieille, n'enlève pas ce qui s'y trouve A ko a jɛnna n'o ye. Il dit qu'il acceptait. He
(proverbe). If you didn't put anything in the said he accepted. Er sagte, er habe akzeptiert.
little old lady's purse, don't take out what's 4 • vi. reconnaître; recognize, acknowledge,
there (proverb). Wenn Sie nichts in die admit; erkennen, anerkennen. ... i yɛrɛ jɛnnen
Geldbörse der kleinen alten Dame gesteckt
bɛ ni i ka fɛntigiya ye. ... tu reconnais ta
haben, nehmen Sie nicht heraus, was da ist
condition d'homme aisé. ...you recognize your
(Sprichwort). Category: Finance.
condition as a wealthy man. ...Sie erkennen
2 • sacoche, giberne; bag, pouch; Tasche,
Ihren Zustand als wohlhabender Mann.
Beutel. Category: Container.
5 • vi. renoncer à, abandonner, effacer;
jɛmu [ɛ]̀ Nom. 1 • parole, discours, propos; word, renounce, abandon, erase; aufgeben, löschen,
speech; Wort, Rede, Aussage. Mɔgɔ tɛ jɛmu verzichten. Musa jɛnna a sara kɔ, ka wuli ka
don mɔgɔ da. On ne met pas ses propres tɛmɛ. Moussa a renoncé à son salaire, il s'est
paroles dans la bouche d'autrui (proverbe). levé et il est parti. Moussa gave up his salary,
You don't put your own words in another's got up and left. Moussa verzichtete auf sein
mouth (proverb). Man legt einem anderen Gehalt, stand auf und ging.
seine eigenen Worte nicht in den Mund
(Sprichwort). synonyme: manfila , jɛmukan.
1
29/01/2026 300

jɛnbaliya jɛnkakɛ
jɛnbaliya Nom. refus de consentement; refusal of jɛngɛ vt. 1 • pencher, se pencher, incliner, écarter;
consent; Verweigerung der Einwilligung, lean, tilt; sich lehnen, anlehnen, beugen,
Verweigerung der Zustimmung. Jɛnbaliya neigen, stützen auf / gegen. Dondo y’a kun
fanga kɔ, o ye maloya lase a ma. Son refus jɛngɛ ka tɔnkɔnɔ filɛ. Le coq s’est penché la
de céder le pouvoir lui a fait connaître tête pour regarder le canard. The cock lowered
l'humiliation. His refusal to cede power made his head to look at the duck. Der Hahn hat
him experience humiliation. Seine Weigerung, seinen Kopf geneigt um die Ente anzusehen.
die Macht abzugeben, ergab, daß er erfuhr was Note: Dononkɔrɔ tor’a dɔnko la, p.5
Demütigung ist. synonyme: madeenkun.
jɛnbana synonyme: jɛnbana banakisɛta. expr. 2 • dévier; deviate; abweichen.
infection sexuellement transmissible, IST, 3 • boiter; limp; hinken, lahm gehen, schlaff
maladie sexuellement transmissible, MST; sein. Tabali bɛ jɛngɛ. La table boîte.
venereal disease; Geschlechtskrankheit. 4 • écarter, éviter; to dismiss, to avoid;
Category: Disease. abweisen, vermeiden, ausschließen,
jɛnda Nom. factorielle; factorial; Fakultät. abweichen. I mana yɛlɛn, i ka ga kala jɛngɛ
Category: Mathematics, Sign, Symbol. ... Quand tu monteras, tu écarteras les tiges du
toit du hangar ... When you go up, you will
jɛnɛ [ɛ]̀ Nom. fuseau (pour filer); spindle, distaff;
move the rods from the roof of the shed...
Achse, Spindel, Welle. Wolo tɛ n bolo ka n Wenn Sie nach oben gehen, bewegen Sie die
ka jɛnɛ jɔ a kan. Je n'ai pas de cuir pour y Strohhalme vom Dach des Schuppens ... N'a
piquer mon fuseau. I don't have any leather to ye min fɔ ... o tɛ jɛngɛ habada ! Il ne s'écarte
stick my spindle on. Ich habe kein Leder, auf
jamais de ce qu'il a dit qu'il ferait. He never
das ich meine Spindel kleben könnte.
deviates from what he said he would do. Er
jɛnɛjaba [ɛ̀-ɛ̀] synonyme: kɛlɛnnintiga. Nom. espèce weicht nie von dem ab, was er versprochen hat.
de plante, glaïeul; kind of plant, gladiolus; 5 • ne pas être droit (envers quelqu'un), ne pas
Pflanze (Art), Gladiole. Category: Grass, être correct (ou conforme à l'usage ...); not
herb, vine. gladiolus klattianus; gladiolus being right (towards someone), not being
gregarius. correct (or conforming to custom...); nicht
recht haben (jemandem gegenüber), nicht
jɛnɛtugan [ɛ̀-ɛ̀-ú-á] synonyme: tuganin,
recht haben (oder sich an Sitten halten ...) I
njɛnɛtugan, njɛnɛtuganin. Nom. colombe,
kumacogo i buranw ɲɛna jɛnɛna dɔɔni. La
pigeon domestique; dove, pigeon; Taube.
manière dont tu as parlé devant tes
Category: Bird. synonyme: beretugan.
beaux-parents n'est pas très correcte. The way
jɛnɛya [ɛ-̀ ɛ̀-á] Emprunt de : arabe. Nom. adultère, you spoke in front of your in-laws is not very
correct. Die Art und Weise, wie Sie vor Ihren
fornication; adultery, fornication; Ehebruch,
Schwiegereltern gesprochen haben, ist nicht
Seitensprung, Unzucht. N’i jɛnna ni
sehr korrekt.
walimuso ye, o le ye jɛnɛya ye. Si tu as des
jɛnkabaara [ɛ̀-à-á-á] variante: jɛnkakɛ. Nom.
rapports sexuels avec une femme qui ne
t’appartient pas, ça c’est l’adultère. If you have travail de groupe, travail en commun, travail
sexual intercourse with someone else’s wife, collectif; group work, collective work;
that’s adultery. Wenn du mit einer anderen Gruppenarbeit, Kollektivarbeit.
Frau schläfst als die deine, so ist das Ehebruch. synonyme: jɛkabaara.
jɛnɛyakɛla [ɛ̀-ɛ̀-à-ɛ̀] Nom. débauché, débauchée; jɛnkabɛn [ɛ̀-à-ɛ́] Nom. accord, décision; agreement,
debauchery, depravity; Prasser, Zügelloser. ... decision; Übereinkunft, Entschluss,
i muso Safiyatu kɛra jɛnɛyakɛla ye. ... ta Entscheidung. synonyme: jɛkabɛn.
femme Safiatou est devenue une débauchée. ... jɛnkafɔ [ɛ̀-à-ɔ́] variante: jɛn kafɔ. Nom. discussion,
your wife Safiatou has become a debauchee. ...
concertation, dialogue, consensus; discussion,
Ihre Frau Safiatou ist eine Ausschweiferin
consultation, dialogue; Diskussion, Debatte,
geworden.
Aussprache, Dialog. synonyme: jɛkafɔ.
jɛnkakɛ [ɛ̀-à-ɛ́] comparer: baarakɛɲɔgɔnya,
ɲɔgɔndɛmɛ. variante: jɛnkawale. Nom.
coopération, union dans l'action, travail en
commun, action commune; cooperation;
Zusammenarbeiten, gemeinsame Aktion.
synonyme: jɛkakɛ, baarakɛɲɔgɔnya.
29/01/2026 301

jɛnkakuma jɛya
jɛnkakuma Nom. dialogue, concertation, réunion de 4 • Nom. diffusion; diffusion, dissemination;
Verbreitung.
travail; dialogue, consultation, work meeting;
Dialog, Absprache, Zusammenarbeit, jɛnsɛnli n.comp. expansion, diffusion; expansion,
Arbeitssitzung. growth, diffusion, broadcasting; Ausbau,
jɛnkan [ɛ-̀ á] Nom. termes d'un accord; terms of Ausdehnung, Erweiterung, Expansion,
Ausstrahlung, Ausbreitung.
agreement; Grundlagen einer Vereinbarung.
synonyme: jɛkan. jɛnsɛnta [ɛ́] Nom. contagieux; contagious; ansteckend.
jɛnkasigi Nom. réunion; meeting; Sitzung. bana jɛnsɛnta maladie contagieuse.
contagious disease ; infectious disease.
synonyme: jɛkasigi.
ansteckenden Krankheit. Category: Disease.
jɛnkɛnɛ variante: jɛkɛnɛ. Nom. plaine, clairière, endroit synonyme: yɛlɛmata.
sans végétation; plain, clearing, glade; Ebene, jɛnsira Nom. voie sexuelle; by sexual transmission;
Lichtung. Category: Land. synonyme: jɛkɛnɛ.
durch Geschlechtsverkehr (übertragen).
jɛnkulu [ɛ-̀ ú-ú] synonyme: gurupeman, tɔɔn, jɛɲɔgɔn [ɛ̀] variante: jɛɲɔgɔnma. Nom. associé,
labɛnkulu. variante: jɛkulu. Nom. groupe, compagnon, collègue, copain, allié, complice;
groupement, association, équipe, commission, companion, fellow, mate, colleague, comrade,
organisation, mouvement; group, association, partner; Begleiter, Partner, Gefährte, Geselle,
team, committee, organization, movement; Kollege, Kumpel. ... ka a fɔ Musa teriw n'a
Gruppe, Vereinigung, Verein, Team,
jɛɲɔgɔnw ye ... ... dire aux amis et aux copains
Kommission, Organisation, Bewegung.
de Moussa ... ... tell Moussa’s friends and
synonyme: jɛkulu.
associates ... ... den Freunden und Kollegen
jɛnmakan variante: jɛnmako. Nom. accord, entente; von Moussa sagen ...
agreement; Vereinbarung, Übereinstimmung. jɛɲɔgɔnya Nom. 1 • association, compagnie,
synonyme: jɛmakan. mouvement; association, companionship,
jɛnna Nom. refus; refusal; Ablehnung. Buran deli ka fellowship, movement; Verband,
Genossenschaft, Gemeinschaft, Bewegung.
jugu, nka jɛnna t'a la. La demande du
Jɛɲɔgɔnya bɛ án ni ɲɔgɔn cɛ. Nous avons une
beau-père est sans doute pénible (à son
association entre nous. We have an association
gendre), mais il ne peut la lui refuser
between us. Wir haben eine Gemeinschaft
(proverbe). The father-in-law's request is
untereinander.
undoubtedly painful (to his son-in-law), but he
cannot refuse it (proverb). Die Bitte des
2 • entente; agreement, understanding;
Vereinbarung, Verständigung. ... baro bɛ
Schwiegervaters ist zweifellos schmerzhaft
(für seinen Schwiegersohn), aber er kann sie jɛɲɔgɔnya don baarakɛlaw ni ɲɔgɔn cɛ. ... la
nicht ablehnen (Sprichwort). discussion permet l'entente entre les
jɛnɲɔgɔn fila [ɛ̀-ɔ́-ɔ ́ ì-à] Nom. couple; couple, pair; travailleurs. ... discussion allows for
agreement between workers. ... die Diskussion
Zweierpaar, Ehepaar, Paar.
ermöglicht die Verständigung zwischen den
jɛnsɛn [ɛ ́-ɛ́] synonyme: wangoli. variante: jɛnsɛ, Arbeitnehmern.
jɛnjɛn. 1 • vt. disperser, se répandre, diffuser, 3 • sexualité; sexuality; Sexualität.
disséminer, propager, généraliser; disperse, jɛya [ɛ́] 1 • Verbe. être ou devenir blanc, être clair,
spread; ausbreiten, verbreiten. O y'a sɔrɔ
être propre; be or become white, be clear, be
kibaru ma jɛnsɛn ban. La nouvelle ne s'était clean; weiß sein oder werden, klar sein, sauber
pas encore répandue. The news had not yet sein. A y'a fan kelen fin ka a fan dɔ jɛya. Il
spread. Die Nachricht hatte sich noch nicht a fait un côté noir et l'autre blanc. He made one
verbreitet. synonyme: duruntu. side black and the other white. Er hat eine
2 • vt. éparpiller; scatter; streuen, verteilen. U schwarze und eine weiße Seite.
nana laturuso ci ka a jɛnsɛn. Ils tracèrent en
synonyme: gwɛya
2
.
les éparpillant sur le sol des signes 2 • Verbe. être franc; be honest; ehrlich sein. ...
divinatoires. They traced them by scattering on ale tun tɛ i jɛya ne ye. ... il n'était pas franc
the ground divinatory signs. Sie zeichneten sie avec moi. ... he wasn’t being honest with me. ...
auf, indem sie die Zeichen der Weissagung er war nicht ehrlich zu mir.
über den Boden verteilten.
3 • Verbe. être certain, être sûr; be certain, be
3 • vt. se séparer; separate; sich trennen. U sure; sicher sein. N jɛyara a sako kan. Je suis
jɛnsɛnna. Ils se séparèrent. They separated. certain de sa mort. I am certain of his death.
Sie trennten sich. Ich bin sicher, daß er tot ist.
29/01/2026 302

ji jiden
4 • Verbe. blanchir, disculper; clear, exonerate; jibaranin Morphemes: ji-bara-nin. Nom. anacardier,
Vertuschen, Freispruch. A ye n jɛya. Il m'a
pomme-cajou; cashew tree; Cashewnuss
disculpé. He cleared me. Er hat mich entlastet. Baum. Category: Tree, Food.
5 • Nom. propreté, hygiène, innocence; synonyme: komika.
cleanliness, hygiene, innocence; Sauberkeit,
Hygiene, Unschuld. Kɛnɛya tɛ taa jɛya ani
jibirili Nom. moineau; sparrow; Spatz. Category: Bird.
jantonyɛrɛla kɔ. La santé exige l'hygiène et la jibolisira [í] Morphemes: ji-boli-sira. Nom. chemin
prévention. Health requires hygiene and pour l’eau de couler, canal d'écoulement,
prevention. Gesundheit erfordert Hygiene und tuyau, drain; trench for directing water to flow,
Prävention. water channel, pipe, drain; Wassergraben,
ji [í] Jula: jii. 1 • Nom. eau, jus, toute élément Wasserkanal, Abfluss, Wasserrohr.
1
Category: Water. synonyme: jibɔsira.
liquide; water, juice, liquid; Wasser, Saft,
Flüssigkeit. Ji tɛ yen tugun. Il n'y a plus jibolo [í-ó-ó] Nom. cours d'eau; stream, river;
d’eau. There is no water. Es hat kein Wasser Wasserlauf, Fluß. Category: Water.
mehr. lenburuji jus d'orange. orange juice.
jibɔda Nom. bec verseur; beak; Zinken.
Orangensaft. Category: Water.
2 • Verbe. boire, couler, arriver à l'eau; drink, jibɔli [í-ɔ́-í] synonyme: farikolojibɔ. Nom.
sink; trinken, sinken. I jira. Tu es coulé. sécrétion; secretion; Sekretion.
(littéralement : «tu es fichu»). You are sunk. jibɔn Nom. 1 • libation d'eau, sacrifice, ; libation of
(literally: «you are doomed»). Du bist
versenkt. (wörtlich: «du bist ruiniert»).
water, sacrifice; Trank-opfer, Opfer. A' ye
3 • Verbe. année; year; Jahr. ... a bɛ ji
bana jibɔn kɛ wa ? Avez-vous fait les
libations pour cette maladie ? Did you make
wolowula bɔ. ... cela fait sept ans. ... it’s been
the libations for this disease? Haben Sie die
seven years. ... es ist sieben Jahre her.
Trank-opfer für diese Krankheit gemacht?
ji [í] Nom. 1 • ressemblance, air de famille; Category: Religion.
2
resemblance, similarity, likeness; 2 • arrosage; watering; Bewässerung, Gießen.
Ähnlichkeiten. A ni Musa ji bɛ ɲɔgɔn na. Il Category: Agriculture.
ressemble à Moussa. He looks like Moussa. Er 3 • réception, cocktail; reception, cocktail
sieht aus wie Moussa. party; Empfang, Cocktail.
2 • apparence, air; appearance; Erscheinung, 4 • menstrues, règles; menstruation;
Aussehen. U ji man di. Ils n'ont pas l'air Menstruation. A bɛ jibɔn na. Elle a ses règles.
sympathique. They don’t look friendly. Sie She got her period. Sie hat ihre Periode.
sehen nicht sehr sympathisch aus. synonyme: laada, hayida.
ji 3 [í] Nom. peur, poltronnerie; fear, cowardice; jibɔsira Nom. canal d'écoulement, tuyau, drain; flow
Angst, Feigheit. Ji b'a la. Il a peur. He is channel, pipe, drain; Ablaufkanal, Schlauch,
afraid. Er Angst hat. Karisa ji ka bon. Untel Abfluß. synonyme: jibolisira.
est très peureux. He is very fearful. So ein Typ Jibuti Nom. Djibouti; Djibouti; Dschibuti.
ist sehr ängstlich.
Category: Country.
ji [í] Nom. coup (au jeu); hit (to play); Schlag (im
4 jida Nom. berge; riverbank, shore; Uferböschung,
Spiel). A ko katawu ! Ne ka ji ! A ko yan
Flussufer, Ufer. Category: Water, Land.
minɛ ! Il dit : «Tiens, vlan, voici mon coup, synonyme: dangan.
prends donc ça !». He says, "Here you go,
whoa, here’s my shot, take that!" Er sagt:
jidafɛtu Nom. forêt galerie; gallery forest;
«Hier, Mann, hier ist mein Schlag, nimm Galeriewaldstreifen. Category: Tree.
das!». jidaga Morphemes: ji-daga. Variant: jifiɲɛ. Nom. jarre
ji mayɛlɛmali Nom. cycle de l’eau; water cycle; pour conserver l'eau, cruche; water pot;
Wasserkreislauf. Category: Water. Tonkrug, Tonbehälter, Wassertopf,
jibara [í] Morphemes: ji-bara. Nom. glande; gland;
Wasserkrug. Category: Container.
Drüse. Samanɛnɛ ye jibara ye ... Le pancréas
jidawolo [í] Morphemes: ji-da-wolo. Nom. rive,
est une glande ... The pancreas is a gland ... berge, bord de l'eau; river bank, shore; Ufer,
Die Bauchspeicheldrüse ist eine Drüse ...
Flussufer.
Category: Body. jiden [í] Nom. 1 • génie des eaux; water spirit; Geist
der Gewässer.
29/01/2026 303

jidɛsɛ jigida
2 • jeune fille consacrée au génie de l'eau; girl jiganna [í] Morphemes: ji-gan-na. Nom. jeune fille;
dedicated to the genius of water; Mädchen, das
young girl; Mädchen. ... ánw ye jiganna ye
sich dem Genie des Wassers widmet.
Category: Religion. min ye án diya, án b'a fɛ a ka kɛ án
buranmuso ye. ... nous avons vu une jeune
jidɛsɛ Morphemes: ji-dɛsɛ. Nom. déshydratation;
fille qui nous a plu, nous voudrions en faire
dehydration; Wasserabspaltung,
notre belle-fille. ...we saw a young girl who we
Dehydratisierung, Austrocknung.
liked, we would like to make her our
Category: Disease.
daughter-in-law. ...wir haben ein junges
jidon n.comp. perfusion; drip; Perfusion. Mädchen gesehen, das uns gefiel, wir würden
sie gerne zu unserer Schwiegertochter machen.
jidonnan n.comp. perforeuse; card punch;
jigɛ [ì-ɛ́] variante: jɛgɛ. Nom. poisson; fish; Fisch.
Bohrmaschine, Locher.
Category: Fish.
jidunun [í] Nom. instrument à percussion fait de
-jigi [í] suf. (en composition surtout) : mâle, vieux
calebasses, tambour d'eau; calabash musical
instrument, water drum; Kalebassen mâle, champion, le plus fort, as; (especially
Musikinstrument, Wassertrommel. in composition): male, old male, champion,
Category: Musical instrument. strongest, ace; (insbesondere in der
Zusammensetzung): männlich, alter Mann,
jifa [í] variante: jufa, jufɛ. 1 • Verbe. crever (pour
Champion, Stärkster, Aß. sagajigi bélier. ram
un animal); die (for an animal); verenden (für
(male sheep). Schafbock. jɛjigi vieux
ein Tier), sterben (für ein Tier). Baganw
phacochère mâle. old male warthog. altes
jifara. Le bétail a crevé. The cattle died. Das männliches Warzenschwein.
Vieh starb. synonyme: jufa , jufa .
4 2 jigi [ì] 1 • Nom. espoir, espérance, attente, secours
2 • Verbe. tuer (populaire); kill (popular); töten
soutien, personne ou chose sur laquelle on
(Volksmund). A y'a jifa yɔrɔnin kelen. Il l'a
s'appuie, sur laquelle on compte; hope,
liquidé sur place. He killed him on the spot. Er expectation, rescue, person or thing on which
hat ihn sofort erledigt. we rely; Hoffnung, Erwartung, Person oder
3 • Nom. bête qui n'a pas été tuée selon le rite Sache, auf die wir uns verlassen. N jigi b'e
musulman; beast that was not killed according kan. Je compte sur toi. Mon espoir est en toi.
to the Muslim rite; Tier, das nicht nach
I’m counting on you. My hope is in you. Ich
muslimischem Brauch getötet wurde. O tuma
hoffe auf dich. ich zähle auf dich. N jigi b’a
na sa, dononkɔrɔ in ye jifa ye, waa jifa tɛ ?
kan ko... J’espère... I hope that... Ich hoffe,
Alors, ce coq est-il ou non une bête crevée ?
daß... i jigi da X kan mettre ton espoir en X.
So, is this cock killed according to the Muslim
rite or not? Wurde dieser Hahn nach
put your hope/trust in X. die Hoffnung auf X
muslimischem Brauch getötet oder nicht? setzen. A jigi tigɛnin lo. Il est déçu,
découragé. He is disappointed, discouraged.
jifilen Nom. outre pour puiser, puisette; container to
Er ist enttäuscht, entmutigt. Jigi ka fisa fa ye.
draw water from a well; Wasser Schöpfeimer .
Mieux vaut l'attente que la satisfaction
Waraw minyɔrɔ la, jifilen tɛ yen. Là où
(proverbe). Waiting is better than satisfaction
boivent les fauves, on ne trouve point d'outre (proverb). Warten ist besser als Zufriedenheit
(proverbe). Where wild animals drink, there is (Sprichwort). synonyme: jigida.
no container to draw water (proverb). Wo
2 • vt. espérer, compter sur, s'attendre à,
wilde Tiere trinken, gibt es keinen Wasser
souhaiter, escompter, prévoir; hope, to count
Schöpfeimer (Sprichwort).
on, expect, wish, foresee; hoffen, zählen auf,
Category: Container.
rechnen, erwarten, wünschen, voraussehen. A
jifiɲɛ See main entry: jidaga. variante: jifinyɛ [jifyɛn].
ko n y'o jigi. Il dit : «C'est bien ce que
Nom. 1 • grande jarre; water pot; Wasser j'escomptais». He said: “That’s exactly what I
Tontopf. Category: Container. expected.” Er sagte: „Genau das habe ich
2 • gobelet; cup; Becher. erwartet.“.
jifunfunnan Nom. pomme (d'arrosoir); rose (of jigi la vt. espérer; to hope; hoffen.
watering can); Brause, Giesskopf.
Category: Agricultural tool.
jigida [ì-ì] Morphemes: jigi-da. Nom. espérance,
attente; hope, expectation; Hoffnung,
jifunti [í-ú-í] synonyme: jiwalankata. n.comp.
Erwartung. synonyme: jigi, jigiya .
1
inondation; inundation; Überschwemmung.
Category: Water, Weather.
29/01/2026 304

jigilamisɛnya jiginbaga
jigilamisɛnya Verbe. décevoir, faire perdre espoir; 3 • vi. rappeler, venir à l'idée; remind,
remember, come to mind; sich erinnern, in de
disappoint, make to lose hope; enttäuschen,
Sinn kommen. Usumani hakili jigira X la.
die Hoffnung verlieren. Cɛkɔrɔba ka nin
Ousmane s’est souvenu de X. Ousmane
jaabi ye Musa jigilamisɛnya kosɛbɛ. Cette
remembered X. Ousmane erinnert sich an X. I
réponse du vieux déçut énormément Moussa.
ka n hakili jigin o la. Rappelle-le moi !
This response from the old man greatly
disappointed Moussa. Diese Antwort des alten Remind me about that! Erinnere mich daran! I
Mannes enttäuschte Moussa zutiefst. hakili jigi a la ko... Souvenez-vous que...
jigilamɔgɔ [ì-ì-à] Nom. personne sur laquelle on Remember that... Erinnert euch, daß...
compte pour être aidé; someone you count on 4 • vi. finir; finish; beenden, enden, fertig
for help; Jemand, auf den Sie zählen können. I
machen, fertig sein. Baara jigira. Le travail a
jigilamɔgɔ, n'o sara, o ye jigitigɛsaya ye. La
fini. Work has finished. Die Arbeit ist fertig.
5 • vt. accoucher; give birth; gebären,
mort de celui qui vous aide met un terme à tout
espoir. The death of the one who helps you puts
entbinden. Ne Hawa jiginna da fila in na,
an end to all hope. Der Tod desjenigen, der den sara. Moi Hawa, j'ai accouché il y a
Ihnen hilft, macht aller Hoffnung ein Ende. quelques jours, l'enfant est mort. Me Hawa, I
jigilatigɛ variante: jigimisɛnya. 1 • Verbe. décourager, gave birth a few days ago, the child died. Ich
Hawa, ich habe vor ein paar Tagen entbunden,
désespérer, perdre espoir; discourage, despair,
das Kind ist gestorben.
lose hope; entmutigen, verzweifeln, verzagen,
die Hoffnung verlieren. O ko in ye ne
6 • vt. descendre chez quelqu'un, recevoir un
hôte; receive a guest; bei jemanden absteigen,
jigilatigɛ ka se a dan ma. Cela me désespéra
einen Gast empfangen. ka dunan jigin
complètement. This completely despaired me.
recevoir un étranger. receive a stranger. einen
Das hat mich völlig verzweifelt.
Fremden empfangen.
synonyme: jigitigɛ.
7 • vt. en vouloir à quelqu'un, se disputer; to be
2 • Nom. découragement, désespoir, déception; angry with someone, to argue, fight; auf
discouragement, hopelessness, deception; jemanden wütend sein, streiten. An ma jigin
Entmutigung, Hoffnungslosigkeit,
ɲɔgɔn na fɔlɔ. Nous ne nous sommes pas
Enttäuschung. N jigilatigɛra. Mon espérance a
encore disputés. We haven't had a fight yet.
été déçue. My hope was disappointed. Meine
Wir hatten noch keinen Streit. N ma da a la ni
Hoffnung wurde enttäuscht.
n fa na jigin n na o la bilen. Je ne crois pas
jigilikɛmuso Nom. sage-femme; midwife; Hebamme.
que mon père puisse m'en vouloir encore. I
Category: Worker, occupation. don't think my father can blame me anymore.
synonyme: musojiginna, lajiginnikɛla, Ich glaube nicht, daß mein Vater mir mehr die
tinminɛmuso, jiginnikɛmuso. Schuld geben kann.
jigiliso Nom. maternité; maternity hospital, maternity jiginan [ì-ì-á] variante: jiginɛ. Nom. grenier (en
ward, maternity clinic; Entbindungsanstalt, paille); granary; Getreidespeicher,
Entbindungsstation, Wöchnerinnenstation, Kornspeicher. Category: Building.
Geburtsabteilung, Geburtsklinik. synonyme: mɔɔnɔ 2 , jiginɛ.
synonyme: musojiginso, jiginnisi. jiginantigi synonyme: jigininan benna, mɔgɔ min
jigin [ì-ì] Jula: jigi. 1 • vi. descendre, abaisser; kan. Nom. prévenu; defendant, the accused;
descend, come down; senken, vermindern. N Angeklagte.
bi jigi (yan)! Je descends (ici)! I get off (here)! jiginbaga [ɩ̀-ì] Jula: jigibaga.
. Ich steige hier aus. A panna ka jigi. Il a sauté Morphemes: jigin-baga. Nom. 1 • celui qui
(vers le bas). He jumped down. Er sprang décharge, qui soulage (d'un fardeau); the one
hinunter. who unloads, relieves (of a burden); der
2 • vi. décharger, déposer; unload, put down; Entladende, Entlastende. A balimamuso de
abladen, abstellen. A' ye julaw jigin ! ye a ye. C'est sa sœur qui le soulage. It's his
Déchargez les commerçants ! ( : faites sister who relieves him. Es ist seine Schwester,
descendre les charges de leurs têtes). Unload die ihn entlastet.
the traders! (: bring down the loads from their
2 • ange; angel; Engel. Jiginbaga nana jigin
heads). Entladen Sie die Händler! (: die Lasten
von ihren Köpfen herunter lassen).
... L'ange est descendu ... The angel has
descended... Der Engel ist herabgestiegen...
29/01/2026 305

jiginda jigitanya
jiginda [ì-ì] Nom. descente praticable, descente, pente; jiginnisi [ì-ì-ì] Nom. maternité; maternity;
practicable descent, descent, slope; Entbindungsheim. Category: Building.
praktikabler Abstieg, Abstieg, Gefälle. synonyme: musojiginso, jigiliso.
Burukutu ka teli, nka jiginda ɲuman tɛ. La
jigintan [ì-ì] Nom. sans espoir, sans appui, sans
dégringolade est rapide, mais ce n'est pas une
bonne manière de descendre (proverbe). The
secours, sans recours; without hope, without
support, without relief, without recourse,
fall is fast, but it’s not a good way to go down
(proverb). Der Fall ist schnell, aber es ist kein
hopeless; ohne Hoffnung, ohne Unterstützung,
guter Weg, um abzusteigen (Sprichwort).
ohne Hilfe, ohne Rückgriff, hoffnungslos. Ɲɛ
synonyme: jiginjigin. jigintan sunɔgɔ man di. L’œil sans espoir a
du mal à trouver le sommeil (proverbe). The
jiginɛ [ì-ì] variante: jiginyɛ, jiginyɔ. Nom. grenier
hopeless eye has trouble finding sleep
(en paille); grain storage (straw); (proverb). Das hoffnungslose Auge schläft
Kornspeicher (aus Stroh). Ni i y'a mɛn ko nicht so gut (Sprichwort). synonyme: jigitan.
jiginɛ, ɲɔ bɛ min kɔnɔ don. Si l'on parle de
jigintanya [ì-ì-à] 1 • Verbe. désespérer, ôter tout
grenier, c'est à coup sûr de celui qui est plein
(proverbe). If we speak of grain storage, it is
appui; despair, take away all support;
certainly the one that is full (proverb). Wenn
verzweifeln, jegliche Unterstützung verlieren.
synonyme: jigitanya.
man von Kornspeicher spricht, ist es sicher der
volle (Sprichwort). Category: Agriculture, 2 • Verbe. abandonner, décourager; give up,
Building. synonyme: mɔɔnɔ , jiginan, dodo . discourage, abandon; aufgeben, entmutigen,
2 2
verlassen. Ala kana án jigintanya ! Que Dieu
jiginjigin [ì-í-ì-í] Jula: jigijigi. variante: jiginda.
ne nous abandonne pas ! May God not
Nom. 1 • descente, pente; descent, downhill,
abandon us! Gott möge uns nicht verlassen!
slope; Gefälle, Neigung, Hang. tintin jiginda
3 • Nom. désespoir, découragement; despair,
la pente descendante d'une élévation de terrain.
discouragement; Verzweiflung, Verzagtheit.
the downward slope of a land elevation. das
Gefälle einer Landerhebung. jigisɛmɛ [ì-ì-ɛ́-ɛ́] Nom. confiance, appui, protection;
synonyme: jiginda. trust, confidence, support, assistance, backing,
protection; Vertrauen, Zutrauen,
2 • descendre; get down, to come down;
Unterstützung, Schutz. Jigisɛmɛyɔrɔ tɛ n na.
hinuntergehen, herabsteigen,
herunterkommen. Mali y'i jiginjigin ji jukɔrɔ. Je n'ai plus rien où mettre ma confiance. I have
L'hippopotame descendit au fond de l'eau. The
nothing left to put my trust. Ich habe nichts
mehr, worauf ich vertrauen kann.
hippopotamus descended to the bottom of the
water. Das Nilpferd sank auf den Grund des jigisigi [ì-ì-í-í] Nom. satisfaction, espoir comblé;
Wassers.
satisfaction, fulfilled hope; Befriedigung,
jiginjiginda Nom. escalier, pente; staircase, slope; erfüllte Hoffnung. A ko kɛlen bɛ jigisigi ye
Treppe, Hang. npɛri jiginjiginda la pente de sisan. C'est une attente qui est à présent
la digue. the slope of the dike. die Neigung des satisfaite. This is an expectation that has now
Deiches. been met. Diese Erwartung ist nun erfüllt.
jiginna [ì-ì] Nom. reproche, rancune, rancœur, fait d'en jigisɔ [í] Nom. frêle, souffreteux, maigre; frail, sickly,
vouloir à quelqu'un; reproach, resentment, thin; gebrechlich, kränklich, dünn. Jigisɔjigisɔ
rancour, grudge; Vorwurf, Bitterkeit, Groll. ka fisa jigi lankolon ye. Un frêle point
... a ma jiginna sɔrɔ Faatu la ... ... il n'y a rien d'appui vaut mieux que pas de point d'appui du
à reprocher à Fatou ... ...there is nothing to tout (proverbe). A frail point of support is
reproach Fatou... ...es gibt nichts, was man better than no point of support at all (proverb).
Fatou vorwerfen könnte... Ein schwacher Stützpunkt ist besser als gar
jiginni [ì-ì-í] Jula: jigili. Nom. accouchement;
kein Stützpunkt (Sprichwort).
delivery, giving birth; Geburt, Gebären. ka jigitan Nom. sans espoir, sans appui, sans secours,
jiginni ɲɛsigi préparer l'accouchement. sans recours; without hope, without help;
prepare for childbirth. Bereiten Sie sich auf
hoffnungslos, hilflos. synonyme: jigintan.
die Geburt vor. synonyme: denwolo, wolo 1 . jigitanya variante: jigintanya. Nom. 1 • désespoir,
jiginnikɛmuso variante: jiginnimuso. Nom. découragement; hopelessness, despair,
sage-femme; midwife; Hebamme.
discouragement; Hoffnungslosigkeit,
Category: Worker, occupation.
Verzweiflung, Entmutigung.
synonyme: jigintanya.
synonyme: lajiginnikɛla, musojiginna,
tinminɛmuso, jigilikɛmuso. 2 • désespérer, décourager; despair,
discourage; verzweifeln, entmutigen.
29/01/2026 306

jigitigɛ jija
jigitigɛ [ì-í-ì-ɛ́] 1 • vt. désespérer, décevoir; despair, jii saniyanin variante: ji saniyanin. Nom. eau potable;
lose hope, disappoint; verzweifeln, verzagen, drinking water; Trinkwasser. Category: Water.
enttäuschen. Suruku jigitigɛlen sigilen tora a jiidi [í] Emprunt de : arabe. 1 • vt. augmenter,
cogo la. L'hyène resta ainsi, sans bouger et
multiplier, croître; increase, multiply, grow in
déçue. The hyena remained like that, number ; wachsen, vermehren, multiplizieren.
motionless and disappointed. Die Hyäne blieb ka sɔrɔ jiidi augmenter la production.
so stehen, regungslos und enttäuscht.
increase the production. die Produktion
synonyme: jigilatigɛ.
steigern.
2 • Nom. désespoir, déception; despair, 2 • Nom. expansion (grammaire); expansion
deception, disappointment; Verzweiflung, (grammar); Erweiterung (Grammatik). ... a tɔ
Enttäuschung. A ko bɛ ɲini ka kɛ jigitigɛ ye
bɛɛ ye jiidiw ye. ... tout le reste constitue les
... Mais c'est en train de se transformer en
expansions. ... everything else constitutes the
déception ... But it's turning into a expansions. ...alles andere sind die
disappointment... Aber es wird zur Erweiterungen. Category: Grammar.
Enttäuschung...
3 • vt. accélérer, aviver, attiser; accelerate,
jigitigɛbagatɔ Nom. déçu, désespéré; disappointed quicken, stir up, speed up, fan; beschleunigen,
person, frustrated; enttäuschte Person, aufrütteln, anfachen. Fiɲɛ ye tasuma jiidi ...
verzweifelt. Le vent attisa le feu ... The wind fanned the
jigiya [ì-ì] Nom. espoir, attente, appui, recours,
fire... Der Wind fachte das Feuer an...
1
espérance; hope, expectation, support, appeal; jiidilan [í] Nom. ce qui fait augmenter (avancer,
Hoffnung, Erwartung, Unterstützung. A den progresser); what makes you increase
ye a jigiya ye. Son enfant est son espérance. (advance, progress); was wachsen läßt
Her child is her hope. Ihr Kind ist ihre
(Fortschritt). Bɛn ye hadamadenya jiidilan
Hoffnung. synonyme: jigida. ye. L'entente est ce qui fait progresser
l’humanité. Understanding is what moves
jigiya
2
[ì-ì] Verbe. donner l'hospitalité; give
humanity forward. Verständnis ist das, was die
hospitality; Gastfreundschaft gewähren. Musa Menschheit voranbringt.
y'u jigiya kosɛbɛ. Moussa les a très bien jiidili synonyme: jɛnsɛli. Nom. expansion, croissance,
accueillis. Moussa welcomed them very well.
augmentation; growth, expansion; Wachstum,
Moussa hat sie sehr gut aufgenommen.
Anstieg, Vergrößerung, Ausbau, Erweiterung,
jigon [ì] Nom. trou dans un plafond, trou dans un Expansion. synonyme: hakɛ farali.
plateau, lucarne; hole in a ceiling, skylight; jiidiya [í] comparer: jiidili. Morphemes: jiidi-ya.
Loch in einer Decke, Oberlicht. Jigon ye
1 • Nom. croissance; growth; Wachstum.
finɛtiri ye, n'a bɛ bɔ so bili la; kɛnɛɲɛ de bɛ
Fanga jiidiyara a bolo. Le pouvoir s'accrut
don ale fɛ. C'est une fenêtre dans le toit, qui
entre ses mains. Power increased in his hands.
permet à la lumière de pénétrer. It is a window Die Macht in seinen Händen nahm zu.
in the roof, which allows light to penetrate. Es
2 • Verbe. augmenter, croître, multiplier;
handelt sich um ein Fenster im Dach, durch
increase, grow, multiply; wachsen, ausweiten,
das Licht eindringen kann. Category: Building.
vergrössern, vermehren.
jii [í] bambara: ji. Nom. 1 • eau; water; Wasser. jija comparer: cɛsiri .[í-ǎ] Morphemes: ji-ja. vi.
1 1
Jii suma. Eau froide. Cold water. Kaltes 1 • s’efforcer, se débrouiller, persévérer,
Wasser. Category: Water. s'appliquer, tout faire que; make an effort, try
2 • liquide; liquid; Flüssigkeit. hard, do one’s best; sich große Mühe geben,
3 • jus; juice; Saft. sich bemühen, sich anstrengen. An ka jija ka
jii barikakuran expr. énergie hydroélectrique; na ! Faisons un effort pour venir ! Let’s make
an effort to come! Bemühen wir uns zu
hydroelectric power, hydroelectric energy;
kommen!
Wasserenergie, Wasserkraft.
2 • serrer, comprimer, essorer, tendre; grip,
jii jigifan expr. bassin versant; watershed;
tighten, compress, squeeze, wring; andrehen,
Wassereinzugsgebiet. Category: Water. anziehen, fester machen, komprimieren,
jii labɔ synonyme: bajuw kafo. Verbe. drainer; to drain; aus-winden, spannen. ka finin jija essorer le
entwässern. Category: Water.
linge. antonyme: jimagaya.
jii labɔli [í á-ɔ́-í] variante: ji labɔli. Nom. drainage; jija 2 Morphemes: ji-ja. Nom. évaporation;
draining; Entwässerung. synonyme: jilabɔ, evaporation; Verdunstung. Category: Water,
jisubɔ.
Weather.
29/01/2026 307

jijalan jilafɛn
jijalan [í] Nom. tendeur, ce qui sert à tendre; tensioner, jikɔnɔfɛnw Nom. ressource halieutique; fishery
stretcher; Spannvorrichtung, Spanner. resource; Fischereiressource. Category: Fish,
pulikala jijalan tendeur de la poulie. pulley Hunt and fish.
tensioner. Riemenscheibenspanner. jikɔnɔnan Nom. écluse; lock; Schleuse.
Category: Tool.
Category: Travel.
jijali comparer: cɛsiri
1
.[í-à-í] Nom. persévérance,
jikɔnɔtulon Nom. sport nautique; nautical sports,
endurance; perseverance, endurance;
water-sport; Wassersport.
Ausdauer, Beharrlichkeit, Durchhaltekraft,
Standhaftigkeit. jikɔrɔ [í-ɔ́-ɔ́] Nom. boisson alcoolisée; alcoholic
jijukɔrɔsa [í] variante: jijabali. Nom. serpent d'eau; beverage; alkoholisches Getränk.
Category: Types of food.
water snake; Wasserschlange.
synonyme: dɔlɔmafɛn.
Category: Reptile. gray smithii.
synonyme: jilasa. jikuru [í-ú-ú] Nom. 1 • vague; wave; Welle. ... jikuru
jijukɔrɔsaya [í] variante: jijukɔrɔgun, jijukɔrɔsa. y'u ka kurun digi ni fanga ye ... ... une vague
Nom. hypocrisie; hypocrisy; Heuchelei. I
a poussé violemment leur pirogue ... ...a
wave violently pushed their canoe... ...eine
kɔlɔsi a la dɛ, a bɛ jijukɔrɔsaya de kɛ.
Welle trieb ihr Kanu heftig voran...
Méfie-toi de lui, il pratique l'hypocrisie. Category: Water.
Beware of him, he practices hypocrisy. Hüten
2 • glace; ice; Eis. synonyme: galasi.
Sie sich vor ihm, er übt Heuchelei.
synonyme: jahiliya, dɛrɛdɛrɛ , jakumamoriya, 3 • grêle; hail; Hagel. Samiya tuma, jikuru bɛ
2
filankafoya. bin. Il grêle à la saison des pluies. It hails in
the rainy season. Es hagelt in der Regenzeit.
jikafoyɔrɔ synonyme: walandenin. Nom. bassin; pool,
pond; Teich. Category: Water, Land.
jilabana Morphemes: ji-la-bana. Nom. maladie
hydrique; water-borne disease;
jikankurun [í-ã́-ú-ṹ] Morphemes: ji-kàn-kurun.
wasserbedingte Krankheit, Krankheit, die
Nom. pirogue, barque, bateau, pinasse; boat, durch unsauberes Wasser verursacht wurde.
canoe; Boot, Kanu, Schiff. Jikankurun de Category: Disease.
firila n'u ye. La pirogue s'est retournée avec jilabasa [í] Nom. reptiles aquatiques (crocodile, varan
eux. The canoe turned with them. Das Kanu
d'eau etc.); water reptiles; Wasser Reptilien.
drehte sich mit ihnen um. Category: Travel.
Category: Reptile.
jikanso Nom. maison sur pilotis; house built on stilts, jilabɔ Nom. drainage; draining; Entwässerung.
stilt house; Pfahlbauten. Category: Building.
Category: Water. synonyme: jii labɔli, jisubɔ,
jikantaama Jula: jikantagama. Nom. transport bajiw kafoli.
maritime et fluvial; sea and river transport,
jilabɔn [í] Nom. aigle pêcheur; fish eagle; Fischadler.
maritime transport; Seeverkehrs und
Binnenschiffahrt, Seeverkehr, Schiffsverkehr. Category: Bird. haliaeetus vocifer.
Category: Travel. antonyme: sanfɛbɔn.
jikisɛ [í] Nom. 1 • goutte d'eau; drop of water; jilafalenfɛnw synonyme: jikɔnɔfalenw. Nom.
Tropfen Wasser. Category: Water. végétaux aquatiques; aquatic vegetation;
2 • étendue d'eau; body of water; Gewässer. aquatic plants; Wasserpflanzen.
Category: Grass, herb, vine.
jikolon [í-ó-ṍ] Nom. eau usée; waste-water;
jilafɛn [í] Nom. créature aquatique, tout ce qui vit dans
Abwasser. Category: Water.
l'eau; water creature, sea animals, aquatic
jikɔnɔ [í] Morphemes: ji-kɔnɔ. Nom. oiseau
creature; Wasserlebewesen. N tɛ ji dɔn, n tɛ
aquatique en général; aquatic bird in general;
jilafɛn ye. Je ne sais pas nager, je ne suis pas
Wasservogel im Allgemeinen. Category: Bird.
une créature aquatique. I can’t swim, I’m not a
synonyme: jilakɔnɔ.
aquatic creature. Ich kann nicht schwimmen,
jikɔnɔben Nom. plongeon de départ; start dive; ich bin kein Wasserlebewesen.
Startsprung.
jikɔnɔfɛn Morphemes: ji-kɔnɔ-fɛn. Nom. espèce
amphibienne; kinds of amphibians;
Amphibienarten. Category: Amphibian.
29/01/2026 308

jilaja jimanfɛn
jilaja [í] Verbe. 1 • être assidu, appliqué, persévérant, jilasula [í] Nom. tortue aquatique; aquatic turtle, water
tenir bon; be diligent, keen, hard-working, turtle; Wasserschildkröte. Category: Reptile.
persevering, persistent, keep going; eifrig, pelomedusa ssp..
emsig, fleißig, beharrlich, hartnäckig,
jilasyɛ [í] Jula: jilasisɛ. variante: jirɔsyɛ. Nom.
durchhalten. O y'a sɔrɔ a jilajalen don a ka
1 • poule d'eau; Moor-hen; Wasserhuhn.
ɲɛnini na. Il était alors en plein dans ses
Category: Bird. gallinula chloropus.
recherches. He was then in the middle of his
synonyme: kɔsyɛnin, jirɔsyɛ.
research. Er war gerade dabei, eifrig seine
Forschung zu betreiben.
2 • poule sultane; Purple Swamp-hen;
Purpurhuhn. Category: Bird. porphyrio
2 • s'efforcer, se débrouiller, tout faire pour; to
porphyrio.
strive, to manage, to do everything, do your
3 • râle noir; Black crake; Wasservogel Art.
best; sich bemühen, sich selbst zu helfen, alles
tun um zu. A' y'a jilaja ka syɛ minɛ.
Category: Bird. limnos corax flavirostra.
Débrouillez-vous pour attraper la poule. Do
4 • poule d'Allen; Allen's gallinule;
your best to catch the chicken. Geben Sie Ihr
Bronzesultanshuhn. porphyrio alleni.
Bestes, um das Huhn zu fangen. jilatɛmɛdugukolo Nom. terre perméable; permeable
jilakelekele [í] variante: jilaketekete. Nom. escargot land; poröser Boden, durchlässige Erde.
d'eau; water snail; Wasserschnecke.
Category: Agriculture, Land.
Category: Small animals. synonyme: kerekete. jilatɛmɛni Nom. infiltration; infiltration; Eindringen,
jilakɔnɔ Nom. oiseau aquatique; water bird;
Versickerung, Infiltration.
Wasservogel. Category: Bird. synonyme: jikɔnɔ. jilawulu [í] Morphemes: ji-la-wulu. Nom. 1 • loutre a
joues blanches; Clawless otter; Kapotter,
jilakukenin [í] Nom. scorpion d’eau; water scorpion;
Otter. Category: Mammal. aonyx capensis.
Wasserskorpion.
2 • loutre à col tacheté; Spotted-neck otter;
jilama [í] Nom. 1 • liquide, sous forme liquide; liquid, Fleckenhalsotter. Category: Mammal. lutra
in liquid form; flüssig. synonyme: jimafɛn.
maculicollis.
2 • fécondée de fraîche date; freshly fertilized; jilen [í] ivre, soûl; drunk; betrunken. A jilen don. Il
frisch befruchtet. A kɔnɔ jilama don. Elle est est ivre. He is drunk. Er ist betrunken.
enceinte des tout premiers mois. She is jilɔ [í-ɔ́] synonyme: jitɔni. Nom. flaque d'eau;
pregnant in the very first months. Sie ist in den
puddle; Wasserlache, Pfütze. Category: Water.
ersten Monaten schwanger.
synonyme: banfan, jitɔni.
jilaminan [í] Nom. guib d'eau; marsh-buck, antelope;
jima [í-ã́] Jula: jiman. Morphemes: ji-man. adj.
Wasserkudu, Sumpfbock oder Sumpfantilope.
Category: Mammal. tragelaphus spekei.
liquide, qui a de l'eau, mouillé, humide; liquid,
synonyme: jirɔmina.
wet, humid; flüssig, naß, feucht. Ntori
nɔbɔtuma ye a jima ye. Le bon moment pour
jilankogonin [í] variante: jilasula. Nom. petite
suivre le crapaud à la trace, c'est quand il est
tortue d'eau; small water turtle; kleine humide (proverbe). The right time to follow the
Wasserschildkröte. Category: Reptile. toad is when it is wet (proverb). Der richtige
pelomedusa sp. synonyme: ngongon 1 . Zeitpunkt, um die Kröte auf den Spuren zu
verfolgen, ist, wenn sie nass ist (Sprichwort).
jilankɔsɔn [í] Nom. espèce de crevette; kind of shrimp,
synonyme: jimanfɛn, jimafɛn.
prawn; Krevette, Shrimp, Krabbe.
Category: Small animals. jimafɛn [í] Nom. liquide, produit liquide; liquid, liquid
jilanɔnfɔn [í] Nom. liseron d'eau; water bindweed, product; Flüssigkeit, flüssiges Produkt.
synonyme: jilama, jima.
water spinach, kind of water plant;
Wasserwinde, Wasserpflanze Art. jimagaya [í-à-à-á] Verbe. se relâcher, se détendre,
Category: Grass, herb, vine. ipomea aquatica.
être décontracté; relax, be relaxed;
jilasa [í] Nom. serpent d'eau; water snake; entspannen. E b'i jimagaya musow bolo
Wasserschlange. Category: Snake. kosɛbɛ ! Tu te relâches trop avec les femmes !
synonyme: jijukɔrɔsa. You relax too much with women! Du
entspannst dich zu sehr mit Frauen!
jilasogo [í] Nom. animal aquatique de grande taille,
antonyme: jija .
1
crocodile, hippopotame, lamantin etc; big
water animals (crocodile, hippopotamus and jimanfɛn [í-ã́-ɛ ́] synonyme: gazimanfɛn. Nom.
so on); große Wassertiere (Nilpferd, Krokodil fluide; liquid, fluidity; Flüssigkeit.
usw.) synonyme: jima.
29/01/2026 309

jimarayɔrɔ jinɛ
jimarayɔrɔ Nom. retenue d'eau; water storage; jin [ì] variante: jinkala. Nom. muraille, mur
Wasser Aufstauung. Category: Water. d'enceinte, mur, rempart, mur de fortification;
jiminkala [í] variante: jiminkalanin. Nom. espèce de
surrounding wall, rampart, fortification wall;
Mauer, Umfassungsmauer, Wall,
plante grimpante; species of climbing plant;
Befestigungsmauer. ... i mana mugukan mɛn
Art der Kletterpflanze. Category: Grass, herb,
vine. clerodendrum capitatum.
jin kɔfɛ ... ... si tu entends le bruit de la poudre
derrière le mur de la ville ... ... if you hear the
jiminkalanin synonyme: jiminnan. Nom. espèce
sound of gunpowder behind the city wall ... ...
d'herbe; kind of grass; Grasart. wenn du das Geräusch des Pulvers hinter der
Category: Grass, herb, vine. panicum long Stadtmauer hörst ... Category: Building.
jubatum.
jinabana Morphemes: jina-bana. Nom. 1 • maladie
jiminminan [í] variante: jiminminɛn. Nom.
mentale, crise de folie; mental illness;
abreuvoir; drinking trough; Trinktrog. psychische Krankheit.
Category: Container. synonyme: kunkolowuli, kunfɛn, kunnabana,
jiminnɔgɔ [í] Nom. soif; thirst; Durst. Jiminnɔgɔ ni jinɛbana.
kɔngɔ digira u la. La soif et la faim les 2 • maladie venant de mauvais génies; illness
accablèrent. Thirst and hunger overcame caused by evil spirits; Krankheit von bösen
them. Durst und Hunger überwältigten sie. Geistern bewirkt. Category: Disease.
synonyme: minnɔgɔ. jinajaba Nom. ail; garlic; Knoblauch. Category: Food.
jiminsira [í] Morphemes: ji-min-sira. Nom. allium sativum. synonyme: tumɛ 1 , jinɛjaba.
œsophage (surtout utilisé au sens figuré : jinajakuma Nom. zorille commun; striped polecat;
plaire, faire plaisir, convenir); esophagus
Band-Iltis. ictonyx striatus.
(especially used figuratively: please, agree,
synonyme: jinɛjakuma, npɛrɛngɛɲɛ,
suit; Speiseröhre (meist bildlich: gefallen,
zurechtkommen, zustimmen). Fɛn min diyara
pɛnɛɲɛgɛn.
mɔgɔ ye, o taara i jiminsira fɛ. Ce qui plaît à jinaji [í-á-í] Nom. mirage, illusion; mirage, illusion;
quelqu'un, ça lui passe par l'oesophage. ( : «ça Fata Morgana, Trugbild, Illusion.
lui convient»). What pleases someone goes
jinamori bambara: jinɛmori. Nom. magicien,
down their esophagus. (: “it suits him”). Was
jemandem gefällt, geht in die Speiseröhre. (: charlatan; magician: person with supernatural
„es paßt zu ihm“). synonyme: kanfyele. powers, e.g. who can transform something
into something else; Zauberer.
jiminta [ì-ì] variante: didɛgɛ, ɲiminta. Nom. Category: Person. synonyme: jinɛmori,
1 • pâtisserie faite de farine grillée, de miel et kooromori.
de beurre; pastry made with toasted flour,
honey and butter; Gebäck aus geröstetem jinamoriya Nom. magie, lutte contre les sorciers;
Mehl, Honig und Butter. Category: Types of magic, charm, enchantment; Magie, Zauber,
food. Zauberkunst.
2 • grossière farine de riz mélangée de miel et jinɛ [í] Emprunt de : arabe. Jula: jina. Nom.
1
de piment, que l'on s'adresse entre amis
1 • esprit, démon, diable, djinn, génie, être
pendant le Ramadan; coarse rice flour mixed
surnaturel; spirit, demon, devil, supernatural
with honey and chili pepper, which we eat with
being; Geist, Dämon. jina gɛn chasser un
friends during Ramadan; grobes Reismehl
démon. drive out an evil spirit. einen bösen
gemischt mit Honig und Chili, das wir im
Ramadan mit Freunden essen. Category: Types Geist austreiben. O wagati, jinɛko barika ka
of food. bon. En ce temps-là, la puissance des génies
jiminvɛɛri [í] Morphemes: ji-mìn-vɛɛri. était grande. At that time, the power of
geniuses was great. Damals war die Macht der
variante: jiminwɛɛri. Nom. verre (à boire); glass
Genies groß.
(drinking); Glas, Trinkglas.
2 • syndrome convulsif (maladie de l'enfant
Category: Container.
attribué aux génies); convulsive syndrome
(childhood illness attributed to geniuses);
Krampfanfälle (Krankheit des Kindes, die auf
Geister zurückzuführen ist).
29/01/2026 310

jinɛ jintanya
jinɛ [í] Nom. humeur, disposition; mood, jingijanga [ì-ì] Verbe. 1 • se dandiner, se balancer en
2
disposition; Stimmung, Laune. A ka jinɛ marchant; waddle, sway while walking;
ɲuman nalen don bi. Il est venu de très bonne watscheln, schwanken beim Gehen. A y'i
humeur aujourd'hui, ( et dans de bonnes jingijanga ka taa. Elle partit en se dandinant.
dispositions). He came in a very good mood She waddled away. Sie watschelte davon.
today, (and in good dispositions). Er kam 2 • tituber, chanceler; stagger, stumble;
heute sehr gut gelaunt (und in guter taumeln, straucheln. Yɛrɛwolokɛ bɛ
Stimmung).
jingijanga, nka a tɛ bin. Le fils légitime peut
jinɛbana [í] Nom. 1 • maladie dont l'origine est chanceler, mais il ne tombe pas (proverbe).
attribuée à un génie; illness whose origin is The legitimate son may stumble, but he does
attributed to a genius; Krankheit, deren not fall (proverb). Der eheliche Sohn mag
Ursprung einem Genie zugeschrieben wird. straucheln, aber er fällt nicht (Sprichwort).
synonyme: kunkolowuli, kunfɛn. jini Emprunt de : français. Nom. jean; jeans; Jeans.
2 • hystérie, maladie mentale; hysteria, mental Category: Clothing.
illness; Hysterie, Geisteskrankheit.
jinjinbere [í] variante: jininbere. Nom. boisson au
Category: Disease. synonyme: kunnabana,
hakililabana, jinabana.
gingembre; ginger drink; Ginger Getränk.
Category: Types of food.
3 • toute maladie mystérieuse; any mysterious
illness; alle geheimnisvollen Krankheiten.
jinnɛden Nom. enfant d'une fée; fairy child; Fee Kind.
jinɛjaba [í] Nom. ail; garlic; Knoblauch. jinɔgɔ [í-ɔ́-ɔ́] Nom. eau usée, eau sale, eau souillée;
Category: Food. allium sativum. used water, dirty water; unsauberes Wasser.
synonyme: layi , tumɛ , jinajaba. Category: Water.
1 1
jinɛjakuma [í] Nom. zorille commun; striped polecat; jinɔgɔbolisira synonyme: wɛlɛwɛlɛda, wuluwuluda.
gestreifte Iltis oder Zorilla. Category: Mammal. Nom. égouts; sewer; Kanalisationsrohr,
ictonyx striatus. synonyme: pɛnɛɲɛgɛn,
Abwasserkanal.
jinajakuma, npɛrɛngɛɲɛ. jinɔgɔw lɔli expr. stagnation des eaux usées; standing
water, waste water; Ansammlung von
jinɛmori [í] Nom. 1 • personne à qui sont attribués des
stehendem Gewässer. Category: Water.
dons extraordinaires; Person to whom
jinɔnkɛla [í] Nom. nageur; swimmer; Schwimmer. Ala
extraordinary gifts are attributed; Person, der
außergewöhnliche Fähigkeiten zugeschrieben ka bon, a bɛ jinɔnkɛla kɔkiliw lakana. Dieu
werden. est grand, il protège les testicules du nageur
2 • magicien, charlatan; magician, charlatan; (proverbe). God is great, he protects the
Zauberer, Scharlatan, Magier. swimmer's testicles (proverb). Gott ist groß, er
Category: Religion. synonyme: kooromori, beschützt die Hoden des Schwimmers
jinamori. (Sprichwort). tout: nɔmikɛla.
jinɛmoriya [í] Nom. 1 • pratique des magiciens, magie; jinson [í] Nom. torrent; torrent, stream; Bach, Strom,
Magic practice, magic; Zauberei, Magie. Fluß. Saya ye jinson ye. La mort est comme le
2 • lutte contre les sorciers; fight against torrent (proverbe). Death is like the torrent
witches; Kampf gegen die Hexer. (proverb). Der Tod ist wie ein Strom
(Sprichwort). Category: Water.
jinɛsaga [í] Jula: jinasaga. Nom. bélier blanc, pour
jintanya [í] 1 • Nom. sécheresse, dessèchement,
les sacrifices; white ram, for sacrifices; weißer
Widder, für die Opfer. Category: Animal déshydratation; drought, drying out,
husbandry. dehydration; Trockenheit, Austrocknung,
Dehydrierung. farikolo jintanya la
jinɛtɔ [í] Jula: jinatɔ. Morphemes: jinɛ-tɔ. Nom.
déshydratation du corps. dehydration of the
possédé d’un esprit, en transe; possessed by
body. Dehydrierung des Körpers.
spirit, in trance; besessen von einem bösen
synonyme: jitanya.
Geist, Besessener, in Trance.
jinɛtɔmɔgɔ Nom. personne lunatique, bizarre; lunatic,
weird person; launenhafte Person, seltsam.
29/01/2026 311

jiɲɛ jiriden
2 • Verbe. manquer d'eau, priver d'eau; lack jiran [í] Jula: yiran. Verbe. 1 • griller, frire; grill,
water; Wassermangel, an Wasser mangeln,
fry; grillen, braten. ka ŋɔmi jiran aller faire
mangeln an Wasser, fehlen von Wasser. Ka a
frire les beignets. go fry the donuts. Die
ta salon na ka na ɲinan na, án jintanyana
Donuts fritieren. synonyme: yiran.
kosɛbɛ ! Depuis l'an dernier jusqu'à cette
2 • grillé, frit; grilled, fried; gegrillt, gebraten.
année, nus avons beaucoup manqué d'eau.
From last year until this year, we lacked a lot jiri [í] Jula: yiri. Nom. arbre, bois; tree, wood;
of water. Von letztem Jahr bis zu diesem Jahr Baum, Holz. ka jiri turu planter un arbre.
fehlte uns viel Wasser.
plant a tree. einen Baum pflanzen.
jiɲɛ [í] Nom. 1 • canal par lequel coulent les eaux de Category: Tree. synonyme: yiri 1 .
pluie; channel through which rainwater flows; jiri bɛ binjankongo min na Jula: yiri bi
Kanal, durch den Regenwasser fließt.
binjankongo min na. expr. savane arborée;
Category: Water.
wooded savannah; Savannengürtel, Busch-
2 • chenal qui relie le marigot au fleuve;
und Baumsavanne .
channel which connects the brook-water to the
river; Kanal, der das Bachwasser mit dem Fluß jiri fanw Jula: yiri fanw. Nom. parties d'un arbre; parts
verbindet. Ni sanji caman nana ka taa ba of a tree; Baumteile. Category: Parts of a
kɔnɔ, jɛgɛw bɛ yɛlɛn jiɲɛ fɛ. Quand les eaux plant.
de pluies sont abondantes, les poissons jiri kuncɛ Jula: yiri kuncɛ. Nom. cime; tree top;
remontent du fleuve par les chenaux. When
Wipfel, Baumkrone. Category: Parts of a
rainwater is abundant, fish come up from the
plant.
river through the channels. Wenn viel
Regenwasser vorhanden ist, kommen Fische jiri tigɛ Jula: yiri tigɛ. synonyme: waga bin. expr.
durch die Kanäle aus dem Fluß. déboiser; to deforest; abholzen.
jira [ì] Verbe. 1 • montrer, exposer, faire voir, Category: Tree. synonyme: jirintanya.
indiquer; show, expose, indicate; zeigen, jiriba Nom. espèce d'arbre fruitier, jacquier; species
entlarven, anzeigen. N ye tiɲɛ de jira i la. of fruit tree, jack-fruit tree; Jackfruchtbaum.
C'est la vérité que je t'ai fait voir. This is the Category: Tree. artocarpus heterophyllus.
truth that I showed you. Das ist die Wahrheit,
jiribaara Jula: yiribaara. Nom. menuiserie; joinery,
die ich dir gezeigt habe. Mɔgɔ diyanyetɔ tɛ i
woodwork; Schreiner-arbeiten, Schreinerei,
bobara jira i buran na. Ce n'est pas par plaisir
Tischlerei. Category: Worker, occupation.
qu'on montre ses fesses à son genre (proverbe).
It's not for pleasure that you show your butt to jiribacɛ Jula: yiribacɛ. Nom. tronc; trunk, tree trunk;
your in-laws (proverb). Es ist nicht aus Baumstamm. Category: Parts of a plant.
Vergnügen, daß man seinem Schwager sein jiribili [í] Nom. poutre de charpente; structural beam;
Gesäß zeigt (Sprichwort). synonyme: yira.
Strukturbalken Träger für Baugerüste.
2 • démontrer, prouver; demonstrate, prove; Category: Building.
demonstrieren, beweisen.
jiribolo [í] Morphemes: jiri-bolo. Verbe. branche;
jirafɛn Nom. aquatique; aquatic; im Wasser,
branch; Zweig, Ast. A taara i sigi jiribolo
aquatisch.
kan. Elle alla s'asseoir sur une branche d'arbre.
jiralan [ì-à] Jula: yiralan. Nom. qui montre, She went to sit on a tree branch. Sie ging zu
démonstratif (grammaire); which shows, einem Ast und setzte sich auf ihn.
demonstrative (grammar); was zeigt,
jiribuguri [í] Nom. sciure; sawdust; Sägemehl.
demonstrativ (Grammatik). Jiralan ni tɔgɔ bɛ
synonyme: buguri , yirimugu, jirimugu.
1
taa ɲɔgɔn fɛ, walima a kelen bɛ u fila jɔyɔrɔ
fa. Le démonstratif accompagne le nom, ou jiribulu [í] Nom. feuille; leaf; Blatt. Category: Parts of
bien se substitue à lui. The demonstrative a plant. synonyme: filaburu, fura 1 , buru 3 ,
accompanies the noun, or replaces it. Der furabulu, yirifurabulu.
Demonstrativ begleitet das Substantiv oder
ersetzt es. Category: Grammar.
jiriden [í] Jula: yiriden. Morphemes: jiri-den. Nom.
synonyme: yiralan. fruit; fruit; Obst, Frucht. A balo ye jiriden ye
... Il se nourrit de fruits ... He feeds on fruit...
jirali [ì-à] Jula: yirali. Nom. exposition; exhibition;
Er ernährt sich von Früchten...
Ausstellung, Exposition. bololabaarafɛnw
Category: Types of food. synonyme: jirimɔ,
jirali l'exposition des produits artisanaux. the
yiriden.
exhibition of craft products. synonyme: yirali.
29/01/2026 312

jiridɛsɛ jirimɔ
jiridɛsɛ Jula: yirilɛsɛ. Nom. sculpture; sculpture; 2 • Verbe. bander, excitable; excitable;
erregbar, reizbar. Muso ɲuman yeli b'a
Skulptur. synonyme: yirilɛsɛ.
jirikɔrɔta. La vue d'une jolie femme le fait
jirifara [í] Nom. écorce d'arbre; tree bark; Baumrinde.
bander. The sight of a beautiful woman makes
Jirifara caman bɛ kɛ fura ye. Beaucoup him hard. Der Anblick einer hübschen Frau
d'écorces servent à faire des médicaments. macht ihn erregbar.
Many barks are used to make medicines. Viele 3 • Nom. envie de vomir; want to vomit;
Rinden werden zur Herstellung von Übelkeit. N jirikɔrɔtalen, fɛn bɛ jiri kun kan.
Medikamenten verwendet. Category: Treat Si l'on dit qu'on a envie de vomir, c'est qu'on a
disease, Parts of a plant. synonyme: yiriŋɔmɔ, quelque chose à vomir (proverbe»). If we say
yirifara. that we want to vomit, it is because we have
something to vomit (proverb). Wenn wir
jiriforo [í] Jula: yiriforo. Nom. plantation d'arbres,
sagen, dass wir uns übergeben wollen, dann
verger; tree plantation, orchard; deshalb, weil wir etwas zum Erbrechen haben
Baumplantage, Obstgarten. synonyme: yiriforo. (Sprichwort).
jirifu [í] Nom. aubier; sapwood; Splintholz. 4 • Nom. érection; erection; Erektion.
jirikɔrɔtali [í] Jula: yirikɔrɔtali. Nom. 1 • nausée;
jirifura [í] feuille, feuillage; leaf, foliage; Blatt, Laub.
nausea; Übelkeit, Brechreiz.
Jirifura bɛ bin ji la don min na, a tɛ toli o
synonyme: yirikɔrɔtali, dusuɲugun.
don. Les feuilles qui tombent dans l-eau ne
2 • érection; erection; Erektion.
pourrissent pas le même jour (proverbe).
Leaves that fall into water do not rot the same jirikunanman [í] variante: jirikunannin. Nom. nim,
day (proverb). Blätter, die ins Wasser fallen, neem; Neem tree; Nimbaum. Category: Tree.
verrotten nicht am selben Tag (Sprichwort). azadirachta indica.
Category: Parts of a plant.
jirikuru [í] Jula: yirikurun. variante: jirikurun. Nom.
synonyme: furaburutu, jirifurabulu.
1 • morceau de bois, bûche; piece of wood, log;
jirifurabulu Morphemes: jiri-fura-bulu. Nom. feuille, Stück Holz, Holzstück, Holzscheit. I ka
feuillage; leaf, foliage; Blatt, Laub, Laubwerk. jirikuru bɛɛ ma se so. Toutes les bûches ne
Category: Parts of a plant. synonyme: jirifura.
sont pas arrivées jusqu'à la maison. ( : tu es un
jirijɛ [í] Morphemes: jiri-jɛ. Nom. balanzan (surnom idiot). All the logs did not get to the house. ( :
you’re an idiot). Nicht alle Holzscheite sind
de); white-thorn, white acacia, apple ring
bis nach Hause gekommen. ( : du bist ein
acacia, apple ring tree; Anabaum.
Idiot). synonyme: yirikurun.
Category: Tree. acacia albida, faidherbia
albida. synonyme: balansan. 2 • tronc (d'un arbre coupé); trunk (of a tree
cut); Stamm (von einem abgeschnittenen
jiriju [í] Jula: yiriju. Nom. tronc d'arbre, bas du Baum).
tronc; tree trunk, bottom of the trunk;
jiriladɔnkɔnɔnin Jula: yiriladɔnkɔnɔnin. Nom.
Baumstamm, unterer Stamm. Category: Parts
of a plant. synonyme: yiriju.
souimanga; sunbird; Nektarvogel,
Honigsauger. Category: Bird. nectarinia ssp.
jirikakala [í] Nom. menuisier; carpenter; Schreiner, synonyme: ladɔndunkɔnɔnin.
Zimmermann. Category: Worker, occupation.
jirima [í] Nom. arborescent, en bois; tree-like,
synonyme: yirikakala, yiribaara, meniziye.
wooden; baumartig, hölzern. Falenfɛn dɔw ju
jirikolo [í] Morphemes: jiri-kolo. Nom. bois; wood;
ye jirima ye ... dɔw ju ye kalama ye ...
Holz. Jirikolo dɔgɔ si ka ca. Il y a de Certaines plantes ont des troncs, d'autres sont à
nombreuses sortes de bois de chauffage. There tiges ... Some plants have trunks, others have
are many types of firewood. Es gibt viele stems... Manche Pflanzen haben Stämme,
verschiedene Arten von Brennholz. andere haben Stängel ...
synonyme: yirikolo. jirimɔ [í] Nom. fruit; fruit; Obst, Frucht. Bɛɛ bɛ
jirikɔɔnkɔn [í] Jula: yirikɔnkɔn. Nom. toutes warabilen dɔn jirimɔdunna ye ... Chacun sait
espèces de pics (oiseaux); all species of que le singe rouge est mangeur de fruits ...
woodpeckers (birds); alle Arten von Spechten Everyone knows that the red monkey eats
(Vögel). Category: Bird. fruit... Jeder weiß, daß der Rote Affe Obst
synonyme: yirikɔɔnkɔn, yirikɔnkɔn. frisst ... synonyme: jiriden, yiriden, kagala.
jirikɔrɔta [í] 1 • Verbe. donner la nausée; give nausea,
turn one's stomach; Übelkeit hervorrufen.
29/01/2026 313

jirimɔgɔnin jitala
jirimɔgɔnin [í] Jula: yirimɔgɔnin. Nom. sculpture, jirɔmina [í] variante: yirɔminan. Nom. guib
statuette, marionnette, masque, cimier; harnaché; bush-buck, marshbuck;
sculpture, statuette, puppet, mask, crest; Wasserkudu, Sumpfbock oder Sumpfantilope.
Skulptur, Statuette, Marionette, Maske, Category: Mammal. tragelaphus spekei.
Wappen. Dɔgɔ banna man ɲi jirimɔgɔnin synonyme: yiramina, jilaminan, minakalan,
da. Il n'est pas sans danger pour le masque minan .
1
d'annoncer qu'il ne reste plus de bois de
jirɔsyɛ [í] comparer: kɔsisɛnin. Jula: jirɔsisɛ. Nom.
chauffage (proverbe). It is not safe for the
poule d'eau; Moor-hen; Vogelart.
mask to announce that there is no more
firewood left (proverb). Es ist nicht sicher, daß
Category: Bird. gallinula chloropus.
synonyme: kɔsyɛnin, jilasyɛ.
die Maske verkündet, daß kein Brennholz
mehr übrig ist (Sprichwort). jisamamansin [í] Nom. pompe à eau; water pump;
synonyme: yirimɔgɔnin.
1 Wasserpumpe. Category: Machine.
jirimugu [í] Nom. sciure; sawdust; Sägemehl. jísiraw já Nom. carte hydrologique; hydrological map;
synonyme: jiribuguri, yirimugu. hydrologische Karte. Category: Water.
jirininbilen [í] Morphemes: jiri-nin-bilen. Nom. jisolilan [í] Nom. louche, instrument servant à puiser
petit arbre rouge; little red tree; kleiner roter l'eau; ladle, instrument for drawing water;
Baum. Category: Tree. combretum nigricans; Wasserschöpfer, Kelle, Schöpfkelle,
combretum crotonoides. Werkzeug um Wasser zu schöpfen.
jirininbulu [í] Morphemes: jiri-nin-bulu. Nom. Category: Tool.
moringa oleifera; moringa oleifera, “tree of jisɔn [í-ɔ ́] Nom. arrosage; watering; Bewässerung.
life” or “miracle tree,” Drumstick tree; Category: Agriculture, Water.
Meerrettichbaum. Category: Tree. moringa synonyme: sɔnni , yirisɔn.
1
oleifera. synonyme: yirininbulu, arijinɛyiri,
jisɔɔlɔlan [í] Morphemes: ji-sɔɔlɔ-lan. Nom.
yiribulu.
entonnoir; funnel; Trichter.
jirintanya [í] Morphemes: jiri-ntan-ya. 1 • Verbe.
jisu [í] Morphemes: ji-su. Nom. eau usée, eau du
déboiser; deforest; entwalden, abholzen.
ruissellement; waste water, run-off water;
synonyme: jiri tigɛ.
Abwasser, Abflußwasser. Category: Water.
2 • Nom. déboisement; deforestation;
jisubɔ [í] Morphemes: ji-su-bɔ. Nom. drainage;
Abholzung. Category: Tree, Land.
drainage; Drainage. Category: Water.
jiriɲɛliji Jula: yiriɲɛli. Morphemes: jiri-ɲɛ-li-ji. Verbe.
synonyme: jii labɔli, jilabɔ, bajiw kafoli.
sève de l'arbre; tree sap; Baumsaft, Harz.
synonyme: yiriɲɛji. jisumanikɛla [í] Nom. météorologiste; meteorologist;
Meteorologe. ... án taara jisumanikɛlaw
jiriŋɔmɔ Jula: yiriŋɔmɔ. Morphemes: jiri-ŋɔmɔ.
ɲinika ɲinansamiɲɛ jiko la. ... nous sommes
variante: jiriŋɔmɛ. Nom. écorce de l'arbre; tree
allés interroger les météorologistes sur la
bark; Baumrinde. synonyme: yiriŋɔmɔ. pluviométrie pendant las saison des pluies de
jirisun [í] Nom. arbre; tree; Baum. Jirisun ncininnin cette année. ...we went to ask meteorologists
about the rainfall during this year's rainy
bɛ se ka tilen; n'a dulen, a tɛ se ka tilen. On
season. ...wir haben Meteorologen nach den
peut redresser un arbre jeune; lorsqu'il a grossi,
Niederschlägen während der diesjährigen
s'il est tordu, on ne peut plus le redresser
Regenzeit gefragt.
(proverbe). You can straighten a young tree;
when it has grown, if it is crooked, it can no jisusula [í] Morphemes: ji-susu-la.
longer be straightened (proverb). Sie können variante: jisuurula. Nom. idiot, personne
einen jungen Baum begradigen; wenn es stupide; stupid, stupid person; Dummkopf,
gewachsen ist, wenn es schief ist, kann es nicht dummer Mensch.
mehr gerade ausgerichtet werden
jisuuru [í] Nom. cascade, jet d'eau; waterfall,
(Sprichwort). synonyme: yirisun.
water-shoot, water jet; Wasserfall,
jiritu [í] Jula: yiritu. Nom. bosquet, bois; grove, Wasserstrahl. Category: Water, Land.
wood; Hain, Wald. Kamalen kelen bɔra jiritu synonyme: wurudu, kurukanjiwoyo.
la ... Un jeune homme sortit du bosquet ... A jitala [í-á-á] Morphemes: ji-ta-la. Nom.
young man came out of the grove... Ein junger
1 • porteuse d’eau; water carrier;
Mann kam aus dem Hain ... Category: Tree,
Wasserträger.
Bush, shrub. synonyme: furatu, yiritu.
2 • buveur (alcool). synonyme: minkɛla.
29/01/2026 314

jitanya jo
jitanya bambara: jintanya. Nom. sécheresse, 2 • être ou devenir liquide; to be or become
liquid; flüssig sein oder werden.
dessèchement, déshydratation; drought,
drying, dryness, dehydration; Trockenheit, jiyali [í] Nom. liquidation; liquidation; Liquidation.
Austrocknung, Dehydration. synonyme: wɛntɛrɛ.
synonyme: jintanya.
jiyɔrɔ Nom. bassin hydrographique, milieu aquatique;
jitɛmɛyɔrɔbaw baraji expr. barrage à contreforts;
hydro-graphic basin, water environment;
buttress dam; Staudamm. Wassereinzugsgebiet, Wasserumwelt.
jitigi [í-á-á] Morphemes: ji-tigi. Nom. vendeur de Category: Water.
l’eau; water seller; Wasser-Verkäufer. jo [ó] synonyme: saniya. variante: ko. vt.
1
Category: Person. désinfecter, faire une toilette mortuaire, laver
jitolikasa [í-ó-í-á-á] Morphemes: ji-toli-kasa. un défunt; disinfect; desinfizieren. ka su jo
Nom. odeur de l’eau pourrie; smell of rotten laver un cadavre. wash a corpse. eine Leiche
water; Gestank von verdorbenem Wasser.
waschen.
jitɔ [í-ɔ́] Nom. peureux, lâche, poltron; fearful, jo 2 [ó] variante: joo. 1 • Nom. droit, raison, motif;
coward; ängstlich, angstvoll, furchtsam, right, reason, motive; Recht, Ordnung, Grund.
Feigling. Cɛ kisɛ, cɛ jitɔ un homme Jo dira muso ma, cɛ jalakira. On donna
courageux, un homme peureux. a brave man, a raison à la femme, et tort à l'homme. The
fearful man. ein mutiger Mann, ein ängstlicher woman was found right and the man wrong.
Mann. Die Frau wurde im Recht befunden, der Mann
im Unrecht. synonyme: joo.
jitɔni [í] Nom. flaque d'eau; puddle; Pfütze, 1
2 • Nom. priorité (code de la route); priority
Wasserlache. Category: Water. synonyme: jilɔ,
(highway code); Priorität
banfan.
(Straßenverkehrsordnung), Vortritt. Jo bɛ
jitɔnnan [í] Nom. barrage, retenu d'eau; dam; minnun bolo ... Ceux qui ont la priorité ...
Staudamm. Category: Water. Those who have priority... Diejenigen, die
Vortritt haben...
jitɔya [í] 1 • Nom. poltronnerie, couardise, peur;
3 • Verbe. donner raison à, disculper; give
cowardice, fear; Feigheit, Angst.
reason to, exonerate; Recht geben, entlasten.
2 • Verbe. avoir peur; be afraid, fear; Angst Á jo don. Vous avez raison. You are right. Du
haben, fürchten.
hast Recht.
jiwalankata [í-á-ã́-á] synonyme: jifunti. Nom. jo [ò] Nom. véhicule à deux ou quatre roues en
3
inondation; flood; Überschwemmung.
mauvais état : clou, bécane, tacot; two or
Jiwalankata kɛra Ɛndonezi. So caman
four-wheeled vehicle in poor condition: nail,
bɛnna. Il y a eu de grandes inondations en bike, jalopy; Zwei- oder vierrädriges Fahrzeug
Indonésie. Beaucoup de maisons ont été in schlechtem Zustand: Nagel, Fahrrad, Auto,
détruites. There were floods in Indonesia. Schrottkarre. I ka jo kolon... Ton «tacot»
Many houses were destroyed. In Indonesien pourri ... Your rotten “jalopy”... Dein miese
kam es zu schweren Überschwemmungen. „Schrottkarre“...
Viele Häuser wurden zerstört.
jo [ò] Nom. fétiche, convention secrète, pacte,
Category: Water, Weather. 4
serment; fetish, secret convention, pact, oath;
jiwɛwɛ Nom. ruissellement; run-off; abfliessen.
Fetisch, Geheimkonvention, Pakt, Eid.
Category: Water. Sanankunya ye jo ye. La parenté à
jiwoyoba [í-ó-ó-á] Nom. torrent, courant (de l'eau); plaisanterie est une convention sacrée. Joking
torrent, flood, current of water; Sturzflut, kinship is a sacred convention.
Sturzbach, Wasserlauf. Category: Water. Scherzverwandtschaft ist eine geheime
Konvention. Category: Religion.
jiwoyota Nom. eau de ruissellement; run-off waters;
synonyme: joo .
2
Oberflächenwasser. Category: Water.
jiya [í-á] vt. 1 • diluer, délayer; dilute; verwässern,
verdünnen. Dɛgɛ in jiya kosɛbɛ án bɛɛ ka dɔ
sɔrɔ. Délaye bien le «dèguè» pour que chacun
de nous en ait. Dilute the “dèguè” well so that
each of us has some. Verdünnen Sie das
„Dèguè“ gut, sodass jeder von uns etwas
davon hat.
29/01/2026 315

jo jogoɲumanw
jo [ó] Verbe. 1 • être aguerri, être endurci, être joginda [ó] synonyme: madimiyɔrɔ. Nom. blessure,
5
immunisé, être habitué, résister; to be lésion; wound, lesion, hurt, injury; Wunde,
hardened, to be immune, to be accustomed, to Verletzung. Category: Disease.
resist; abgehärtet sein, immun sein, sich daran
jogo [ó-ó] Nom. conduite, comportement, caractère,
gewöhnen, widerstehen. Ne mamamuso ka
1
façon d'être, attitude; behaviour, character,
makumali jora n na. Je suis habité à la
attitude; Benehmen, Charakter. Denmisɛnnin
critique de ma grande-mère. I am accustomed
ye bɔgɔ kɛnɛ de ye : n'a ni jogo min wulila,
to my grandmother's criticism. Ich bin an die
Kritik meiner Großmutter gewöhnt.
a n'o de bɛ to fo ka taa a sa. L'enfant est
synonyme: zo. comme l'argile fraîche, les qualités et les
défauts avec lesquels il grandit, il les gardera
2 • être costaud, être compétent; be strong, be
toute sa vie (proverbe). The child is like fresh
competent; stark sein, kompetent sein. Cɛ
clay, the qualities and defects with which he
jolenba in ... Ce grand costaud-là ... That big grows up, he will keep them all his life
guy there.. Der große Kerl da... (proverb). Das Kind ist wie frischer Ton, die
3 • en pleine forme, imbattable, excellent; in Qualitäten und Mängel, mit denen es
great shape, unbeatable, excellent; in aufwächst, wird es sein ganzes Leben lang
Topform, unschlagbar, ausgezeichnet. solɔla behalten (Sprichwort).
jolen un très bon maçon. a very good mason. jogo [ó] Nom. antidote, contre-poison; antidote,
2
ein sehr guter Maurer. counter-poison; Gegengift, Gegenmittel. Ni sa
jo [ó] interj. mec, gars, mon vieux, ma vieille y'i cin, fura min bɛ k'o la, a bɛ fɔ o ma ko
6
(populaire); dude, man, my old (popular); jogo. Lorsqu’un serpent te mord, le
Mann, mein alter, meine alte (Volksmund), médicament qu'on utilise à ce moment-là, c'est
Kumpel. Cɛ jo ! Eh, mec ! Hey, man! Hey, cela un antidote. When a snake bites you, the
Mann. Hey! Jo, án ka taa sa ! Eh mec ! medicine that is used at that time is an
Foutons le camp maintenant ! Hey man! Let’s
antidote. Wenn eine Schlange dich beißt, ist
get out of here now! Hey, Mann! Hauen wir
die Medizin, die man in diesem Moment
ab!
verwendet, das Gegenmittel.
jo [ó] Verbe. 1 • diminuer la rigueur jogodon [ó-ó-ṍ] synonyme: ladili ladagamuni.
7
(l’amertume...); decrease the rigor Nom. morale; morals, ethics; Moral, Ethik,
Sitte.
(bitterness...); Verringerung der Strenge
(Bitterkeit...) A ye te wuli fo ka a jo. Il a fait jogojogo [ó] Verbe. 1 • se dépêcher, se hâter; hurry,
du thé jusqu'à ce que ça n'ait plus de goût. He hurry up; beeilen, eilen. I jogojogo ka bɔ án
made tea until it didn’t taste any better. Er
ka taa ! Dépêche-toi de sortir, qu'on parte !
machte Tee, bis es nicht mehr schmeckte.
Hurry up and get out, let’s go! Schnell raus,
2 • perdre de sa force, perdre de son goût; lose
wir gehen!
its strength, lose its taste; Kraft verlieren,
2 • hâte; haste, rush; Eile. ka kuma fɔ
Geschmack verlieren. A ka fura jora. Son
remède a perdu de son efficacité. His remedy
jogojogo la. dire des paroles à la hâte. speak
has lost its effectiveness. Seine Medizin hat an words in haste. Worte in Eile zu sprechen.
Wirksamkeit verloren. jogojuguya [ó] Nom. mauvais caractère, mauvais
jogin [ó] vt. 1 • blesser; hurt, injure; verletzen, comportement; bad behaviour, bad character;
verwunden, beschädigen. Mɔgɔ 2 sara, 9 schlechter Charakter, schlechtes Benehmen.
Dutigi caman b'i makasi n'u den ka
wɛrɛ joginna. 2 sont morts. 9 ont été blessés. 2
people died. 9 others were injured. 2 sind tot. 9
jogojuguya ye. Beaucoup de chefs de famille
andere wurden verletzt. synonyme: majogin.
se plaignent du mauvais comportement de
leurs enfants. Many heads of households
2 • se rouvrir ( pour une blessure); re-open (for
complain about their children’s bad
injury); wieder öffnen (bei Verletzung). A
behaviour. Viele Familienoberhäupter
joginda joginna. Sa blessure s'est rouverte. beschweren sich über das schlechte Verhalten
His wound has opened. Seine Wunde hat sich ihrer Kinder.
wieder geöffnet.
jogoɲumanw [ó-ó-ú-ã́] Nom. bonnes mœurs; good
joginbagatɔ [ó] Nom. blessé; wounded person, moral standards; gute moralisches Benehmen,
injured person; Verwundeter. gute Sitten.
Category: Person.
29/01/2026 316

jogoɲumanya jolikafosira
jogoɲumanya [ó] Nom. bon comportement, bon jolicaya [ò-ì-á-á] Nom. hypertension, tension;
caractère; good behaviour, good character; hypertension, high blood pressure;
gutes Benehmen, guter Charakter. ... ka Bluthochdruck. Kɔgɔ dun kojugu bɛ se ka
jogoɲumanya sinsin jamana kɔnɔ ... ... et jolicayabana bila hadamaden na.
renforcer dans le pays les comportements Consommer trop de sel peut occasionner de
vertueux ... ... and strengthen virtuous l'hypertension. Consuming too much salt can
behaviour in the country ... ... und die Stärkung cause high blood pressure. Zu viel Salz kann
der guten Sitten im Land ... zu Bluthochdruck führen. Category: Disease.
jokajo [ò-à] Nom. anémie, fièvre jaune; anemia, jolida [ó-í-á] synonyme: joginda. Nom. plaie,
yellow fever; Anämie, Gelbfieber. blessure; wound; Wunde. Category: Disease.
Category: Disease. synonyme: joli .
1
jokala variante: syɔkala. Nom. téléphone tchagra; jolidɛsɛ synonyme: fulabana, fulagwan. Nom. anémie;
black-crowned Tchagra; Senegaltschagra, anaemia; Anämie. Category: Disease.
Damaratschagra, synonyme: jolintanya.
Schwarzscheitel-Ameisenpitta,
Kronenmonjita. Category: Bird. tchagra jolidɔgɔya Morphemes: joli-dɔgɔ-ya.
senegala. synonyme: syɔkala 1 . variante: jolidɔgɔyabana. Nom. hypotension;
jokɛlɛ [ò-ɛ̀-ɛ̀] Nom. légitime défense; self-defence;
hypo-tension, low blood pressure;
Hypotension, tiefer Blutdruck.
Notwehr.
Category: Disease.
jolasegi synonyme: danbesegi. Nom. réhabilitation;
jolifara [ó] Morphemes: joli-fara. Nom. croûte (de la
rehabilitation; Rehabilitierung.
plaie); scab (of the wound); Schorf (der
jolen Nom. plante (espèce), herbe baïonnette; plant Wunde). Joli sumana ka ban, i ɲɛ tɛ jolifara
sp; Pflanzenart. Category: Grass, herb, vine. yonkonnen ye wa ? La plaie est guérie, tu ne
imperata cylindrica. vois pas que la croûte se soulève ? The wound
joli comparer: basi .[ó-í] Nom. plaie; wound, sore, is healed, can't you see that the scab is lifting?
1 2
Die Wunde ist verheilt, können Sie nicht
cut; Wunde, Verletzung. A ye fura firi joli la.
sehen, daß sich der Schorf löst?
Il versa le médicament sur la plaie. He poured
synonyme: joliŋɔmɔ.
the medicine on the wound. Er schüttete die
Medizin auf die Wunde. Category: Disease. jolifinsira Morphemes: joli-fin-sira.
synonyme: jolida. variante: jolisegisira. Nom. veine; vein; Vene,
joli [ò-í] inter. combien; how much, how many; Ader. Category: Body.
2
synonyme: joliseginsira.
wieviel. Nin ye joli ye ? Combien coûte ceci ?
How much is this? Wieviel kostet das? jolifɔn [ó] Nom. cicatrice; scar; Narbe. Jolifɔn bɛ to i
Dɔrɔmɛ joli tora? Il reste combien de francs ? fari la. La cicatrice reste sur le corps. The scar
How much money is left? Wieviel Geld bleibt? remains on the body. Die Narbe bleibt am
joli 3 [ò-í] Nom. sang; blood; Blut. Category: Body. Körper. synonyme: fɔn 3 .
joli 4 [ò] Nom. aspect extérieur, apparence; external jolijɛnsɛsira 1 Nom. circulation artérielle; arterial
appearance, appearance; äußeres blood circulation; Arterieller Blutkreislauf.
Erscheinungsbild, Aussehen. I joli ka di Category: Body.
mɔgɔw ye. Tu plais aux gens. People like you. jolijɛnsɛsira 2 Nom. aorte; aorta; Aorta,
Die Leute sehen dich gern. Hauptschlagader. Category: Body.
joli ka boli expr. le pouls; the pulse; der Puls. jolijɛnsɛsira jigita Nom. aorte descendante;
descending aorta; abwärtsfliessende
Joliba n.pro. le Niger (fleuve); Niger River; der Niger
Hauptschlagader. Category: Body.
Fluss. Category: Water.
jolijɛnsɛsira yɛlɛta Nom. aorte ascendante;
jolibolisira Nom. circulation sanguine; blood
ascending aorta; steigender Aorta
circulation; Blutkreislauf. Category: Body. Blutkreislauf. Category: Body.
jolibɔn Morphemes: joli-bɔn. variante: jolibɔ. Nom. jolikafosira Nom. voie veineuse, circulation veineuse;
saignement, hémorragie; bleeding,
venous way, venous blood circulation; durch
haemorrhage; Blutung, Hämorrhagie.
den Blutweg, Venen Blutkreislauf.
Category: Disease.
Category: Body. synonyme: joliseginsira.
jolibɔsira [ò-ì-ɔ̀-í-á] variante: jolibilensira. Nom.
artère; artery; Arterie. Category: Body.
29/01/2026 317

jolikafosira datugunan jolinan
jolikafosira datugunan Nom. valve de l'aorte; jolimafɛn [ò-ì-à] Morphemes: joli-ma-fɛn. Nom.
aorta valve; Aortenklappe. Category: Body. être à sang chaud (animaux et humains); a
jolikisɛ [ò-ì] Nom. globule (du sang); blood cells;
warm-blooded being (animals and humans);
Warmblüter (Tiere und Menschen), ein
Blutkörperchen. Category: Body.
warmblütiges Wesen . Bana don min dama
jolikisɛjɛ [ò-ì-ì-ɛ-ɛ́] Jula: jolikisɛgwɛ. ka kan jolimafɛn bɛɛ la. C'est une maladie
variante: jolikisɛ jɛman. Nom. globule blanc; qui est identique pour toutes les créatures à
white blood cell, leukocyte; weisses sang chaud. It is a disease that is the same for
Blutkörperchen. Category: Body. all warm-blooded creatures. Es handelt sich
um eine Krankheit, die bei allen Warmblütern
jolikisɛwulen Morphemes: joli-kisɛ-wulen.
gleich ist.
variante: jolikisɛ bilen. Nom. globule rouge;
jolimandi [ò-ì-à] variante: jelimandi. Nom.
red blood cell, erythrocyte; rotes
Blutkörperchen. Category: Body.
sympathique, qui plaît, favori; sympathetic,
pleasant, favourite; sympathisch, Favorit,
jolikɔli Nom. pansement adhésif; plaster, band-aid;
Günstling. antonyme: jolimango.
Heftpflaster. Category: Treat disease.
jolimandiya [ò-ì-à] variante: jelimandiya. Nom.
jolikuru [ò-ì] Nom. 1 • globule; blood cell;
qualité d’être sympathique, don de plaire aux
Blutkörperchen, Blutzelle. jolikuru bilenman gens; quality of being friendly, gift of pleasing
globules rouges. red blood cells. rote people; Eigenschaft, freundlich zu sein, Gabe,
Blutkörperchen. Menschen zu gefallen. Sara ni jolimandiya, a
2 • caillot de sang; blood clot; Blutgerinnsel. tɛ mɔgɔ bolo, a bɛ Ala de bolo. Avoir du
3 • fœtus; foetus; Fötus. synonyme: jɔnɔji, charme, éveiller la sympathie, cela dépend non
jolikuturunin. des hommes, mais de Dieu. To have charm, to
arouse sympathy, that depends not on men, but
jolikuturunin [ò-ì] Morphemes: joli-kuturu-nin.
on God. Charme zu haben, Sympathie zu
Nom. 1 • fœtus; fetus, foetus; Fötus. erwecken, das hängt nicht von Menschen ab,
synonyme: denkuru, jolikuru, jɔnɔji, sondern von Gott.
wolonugu, denfan. jolimango [ò-ì-à] variante: jelimango. Nom.
2 • tout petit bébé, nouveau-né; tiny baby, antipathique, qui déplaît, désagréable;
newborn; kleines Baby, Neugeborenes. unsympathetic, unpleasant; unsympathisch,
3 • petit enfant, garçonnet, fillette; little child, unangenehm. mɔgɔ jolimango une personne
little boy, little girl; kleines Kind, kleiner antipathique. an unpleasant person. ein
Junge, kleines Mädchen. unangenehmer Mensch. antonyme: jolimandi.
jolila [ò-ì-á] Nom. pour combien, pour quelle joliminkɔnɔnin [ò-ì-ì-ɔ́-ɔ́-ǐ] Nom. pique-bœuf à
somme; for how much, for what price; für
bec jaune; yellow Ox-pecker;
wieviel, für welchen Preis. I bi jolila san? N
Gelbschnabel-Madenhacker. Category: Bird.
bɛ kɛmɛna san. Tu veux pour combien? J'en buphagus africanus. synonyme: misigɛnkɔnɔ,
veux pour 500 francs. You want for how tɛrɛbɔkɔnɔnin, faligɛnfulanin.
much? I want it for 500 francs. Für wieviel
willst du? Ich will es für 500 Franken. joliminteri [ò-ì-ì] Morphemes: joli-min-teri.
jolima [ò-ì] Nom. ensanglanté, sanglant, taché de variante: jɔnminteri. Nom. ami intime, ami
inséparable; intimate friend; intimer Freund.
sang; bloody, bloodstained; blutig,
blutbefleckt. Donsokɛ tɛgɛ jolima tɛ wuya
synonyme: jɔnminteri, terima.
fɔ. Le chasseur les mains couverts de sang ne jolinan Déterminant. quantième ?; how many times; das
ment pas (proverbe). The hunter with his wievielte mal. I kɔnɔya jolinan don ? Cette
hands covered in blood does not lie (proverb). grossesse est ta quantième ? How many
Der Jäger mit blutverschmierten Händen lügt pregnancies are yours? Diese
nicht (Sprichwort). Schwangerschaft ist deine wievielte? I den
jolinan de don ! C'est ton quantième enfant ?
With this child, you have how many children
now? Dies ist dein wievieltes Kind?
29/01/2026 318

jolintanya joro
jolintanya Jula: jolitanya. Nom. anémie; anaemia; 2 • plume; feather; Feder. syɛjolo plume de
Anämie. Jolintanya ni kɔdimin ... b'a
poule. chicken feather. Hühnerfeder.
Category: Parts of an animal.
tigilamɔgɔ faga. L'anémie et les maux de dos
... tuent la personne en question. Anemia and jolomafɛn [ó] Nom. 1 • oiseau; Vogel; Vogel.
back pain ... kill the person in question. 2 • animal pourvu de piquants (ou de plumes);
Anämie und Rückenschmerzen ... töten die animal with quills (or feathers); Tier mit
betreffende Person. Category: Disease. Stacheln (oder Federn). Jolomafɛn bɛɛ tɛ
synonyme: jolidɛsɛ.
pan. Tous les animaux à plumes ne volent pas.
joliŋɔmɔ [ó] Nom. croûte (d'une plaie); scab (of a Not all feathered animals fly. Nicht alle
wound); Schorf (einer Wunde). Ni i ye
gefiederten Tiere fliegen.
joliŋɔmɔ tufa, a bɛ madimin. Si tu arraches jonjon [ó] variante: jojo, jɔnjɔn. Verbe.
la croûte de la plaie, ça ravive la plaie. If you 1 • gambader, trotter; frolicking, trotting;
tear the scab off the wound, it revives the herumtollen, trotten. So bɛ boli ka jonjon. Le
wound. Wenn man den Schorf von der Wunde cheval gambade. The horse is running. Das
abreißt, wird die Wunde wiederbelebt. Pferd springt.
synonyme: jolifara, ŋɔmɔ. 2 • vite; fast, quickly; schnell. A bolila jonjon !
jolisaniyalan Nom. désinfectant; disinfectant; Il a couru à toute allure. He ran at full speed.
Desinfektionsmittel.
Er rannte so schnell.
joliseginsira Nom. veine; vein; Vene. Joliseginsiraw jononbon Nom. plante (espèce); plant sp; Pflanzenart.
Category: Grass, herb, vine. tinospora bakis.
: joli min bɛ segin ka na dusukun kɔnɔ, o
de bɛ boli ale fɛ. Veines : le sang qui retourne joo 1 [ó] bambara: jo. comparer: joyɔrɔ. Nom. droit,
au cœur passe par elles (définition). Veins: the raison, motif; right, reason, motive; Recht,
blood that goes back to the heart passes Ordnung, Grund. I joo b’a ra / I joo lo. Tu as
through them (definition). Venen: das Blut, raison. You’re in the right. Du bist im Recht. I
das zum Herzen zurückkehrt, geht durch sie
joo t’a ra. Tu n’as pas raison. You’re not in the
(Definition). synonyme: jolifinsira,
right. Du bist nicht im Recht. du hast nicht
jolikafosira.
recht. synonyme: jo .
2
jolisɛgɛsɛgɛli [ò-ì-ɛ́-ɛ́-ɛ́-ɛ́-í] Nom. analyse de sang; joo [òó] bambara: jo. Nom. fétiche, pacte,
2
blood test; Bluttest.
serment; fetish, pact, oath; Götze, Fetisch,
jolisira [ò-ì] Morphemes: joli-sira. Nom. veine, Pakt, Schwur, Eid. synonyme: jo 4 .
vaisseau sanguin, voie sanguine; vein, blood joona comparer: teliya.[ó-á] variante: jona.
vessel; Ader, Blutader, Blutgefäß. jolisira
Adverbe. 1 • vite, rapidement, hâtif, précoce;
misɛnw vaisseaux capillaires. capillary quickly, rapidly, hasty, hurried, precocious;
vessels, capillaries. Kapillargefäße, schnell, sofort, frühreif. I sera ka takisi ta
Kapillaren. Category: Body.
joona wa ? Est-ce que tu as pu trouver vite un
jolisu [ò-ì] Nom. sang de couleur sombre, sang épais, taxi ? Did you find a taxi quickly? Konntest du
sang d'un hématome, sang mort; dark blood, sofort ein Taxi finden?
thick blood, blood from a hematoma, dead 2 • tôt, de bonne heure; early; früh. Sɔgɔma, n
blood; dunkles Blut, dickes Blut, Bluterguß, bɛ wuli joona. Le matin, je me lève tôt. In the
totes Blut. jolisu ani joli salasala le sang
morning, I get up early. Am Morgen steh ich
sombre et le plasma sanguin. dark blood and früh auf. Tubabudenw bɛ mobili boli joona.
blood plasma. dunkles Blut und Blutplasma.
Les enfants européens conduisent tôt.
jolita [ò] [ò-ì] Nom. prise de sang; blood sample, European children drive early (in life).
blood test; Blutentnahme. U ye jolita kɛ ... Ils Europäische Jugendliche haben früh den
ont fait des prises de sang ... They took blood
Führerschein.
samples ... Sie haben Blutproben genommen ... joonajoona [ó] Adverbe. très vite, très tôt, à la hâte;
jolitɛmɛsira datugunan Nom. valvule mitrale; very quickly, very soon, in a hurry, hastily;
mitral valve; Mitralklappe.
sehr schnell, sehr bald, in Eile, hastig. A y'o
ɲimi joonajoona ... Elle la croqua à la hâte ...
jolo [ó-ó] Nom. 1 • piquant; prickle, spine; Stachel.
She hastily crunched it... Sie zerkaute es
Balajolo piquant de porc-épic. porcupine quill.
hastig...
Stachelschwein-Stachel.
joro [ò] Nom. arbre à serpent, arbre aux hachettes;
kind of tree; Baumart. Category: Bush, shrub.
securidaca longipedunculata. synonyme: yoro .
1
29/01/2026 319

josariya jɔ
josariya [ò-á-í-á] Morphemes: jo-sariya. Nom. 2 • bâtir, construire; build, construct; bauen,
aufbauen. Ni kakala ma so jɔ, a na bugu. Si
droit; right; Recht. hadamadenw ka
le paresseux ne peut bâtir une maison à
josariyaw les droits de l'homme. human
terrasse, il bâtira une paillote (proverbe). If
rights. die Menschenrechte.
the lazy person cannot build a terrace house,
josɔn Morphemes: jǒ-sɔn. Nom. cérémonie de he will build a straw hut (proverb). Wenn der
Faule kein Flachdachhaus bauen kann, baut er
fétiche, culte des idoles; fetish ceremony,
eine Strohhütte (Sprichwort).
worship of idols; Fetisch Zeremonie,
Götzendienst. 3 • pointer, diriger, prêter (attention); point,
direct, pay attention; zeigen, führen,
josɔnna [ò-ɔ̀] Jula: josɔnla. Morphemes: jo-sɔn-na.
aufpassen. ... ka marifa jɔ wɔlɔw la. ... diriger
Nom. féticheur: celui qui adore des fétiches;
le fusil vers les francolins. ... point the gun at
person who worships fetishes, fetishist;
the francolins. ... Richten Sie die Waffe auf die
jemand der die traditionelle afrikanische
Perlhühner.
Religion befolgt, Fettischanbeter.
Manadonon ka di josɔnnaw ye. Les
4 • arrêter, cesser; stop; stoppen, aufhören. Á
féticheurs aiment les poules rousses. The
y'a jɔ, a ka a lamɛn. Arrêtez et écoutez. Stop
fetishists love reddish chicks. Fetischisten and listen. Halten Sie inne und hören Sie zu.
mögen rote Hühner. Category: Person. San jɔra. La pluie a cessé. The rain has
synonyme: bolitigi. stopped. Der Regen hat aufgehört.
jotigi [ó] Morphemes: jo-tigi. Nom. féticheur: vieux 5 • demeurer, rester, stagner; remain, stagger;
1 verweilen, stagnieren. Ji tɛ jɔ a la. L'eau fuit. (
qui est désigné le responsable d’un fétiche, et
: l'eau n'y reste pas). The water is leaking. (:
qui fait les incantations, etc; elder responsible
the water does not stay there). Das Wasser tritt
for a fetish, making incantations, etc., fetishist;
aus. (: Das Wasser bleibt nicht dort).
Ältester, der als Priester für die traditionelle
afrikanische Religion funktioniert. 6 • mettre, se mettre, faire, placer; put, do,
Category: Person. synonyme: bolitigi. place; sich setzen, tun, setzen. Mɔgɔ tɛ se ka
jɔ ɲɔjago kan ni i ma kannaminɛ kɛ. On ne
jotigi [ó-í-ó] Nom. celui qui a raison, celui à qui on
2 peut pas faire le commerce du mil sans faire
donne raison; the one who is right, the one who des réserves. We cannot trade in millet without
is given a reason; der, der Recht hat. ... ka making reserves. Wir können nicht mit Hirse
jotigi jo, ka jalakitigi jalaki. ... donner raison handeln, ohne Reserven zu bilden.
à l'innocent, et tort au coupable. ... to give the 7 • tenir tête, s'opposer, résister; stand up,
right to the innocent, and wrong to the guilty. oppose, resist; Widerstand leisten, sich
... Der Unschuldigen Recht geben, und dem widersetzen. Kalo tɛ jɔ kalo kan sa, nka dolo
Schuldigen Unrecht.
ɲɛ dumanw bɛ falen a kɛrɛfɛ. Certes la lune
joyɔrɔ [ó-ɔ́-ɔ́] synonyme: sariyasira. Nom. droit; n'a pas d'égale, mais bien des étoiles brillantes
right, law; Recht. naissent à côté d'elle (proverbe). Certainly the
moon has no equal, but many bright stars are
jɔ
1
[ɔ]̀ Jula: jɔɔ. Nom. filet, tout réseau de
born next to it (proverb). Sicherlich ist der
mailles, hamac; net, fishing net, any mesh Mond seinesgleichen, aber neben ihm werden
network, hammock; Netz, Fischernetz, jedes viele helle Sterne geboren (Sprichwort). A jɔra
Maschennetz, Hängematte. ka jɔ fili jeter un
a kɔrɔ fɛ. Il a tenu tête à son aîné. He stood up
filet. cast a net. ein Netz auswerfen.
to his elder. Er stellte sich gegen seinen
Category: Hunt and fish.
Älteren.
jɔ 2 [ɔ]̀ Nom. longueur; longueur; Länge. A jɔ n'a 8 • avouer; admit, confess; gestehen, zugeben.
kɔnɔ bɛɛ ka kan. Sa longueur et sa largeur A jɔra a la. Il l'a avoué. He admitted it. Er gab
sont égales. Its length and width are equal. es zu.
Seine Länge und Breite sind gleich. 9 • respecter; respect; respektieren. ... a ma jɔ
jɔ [ɔ]̀ Jula: lɔ. Verbe. 1 • dresser, être debout, ánw fa ka jigiya si kɔrɔ. ... il n'a respecté
3
lever, élever; to stand, to raise, lift; stehen, aucune des attentes de notre père. ...he didn't
heben, aufstehen, anheben. A wulila k'i jɔ ... Il live up to any of our father's expectations. ...er
se leva et se dressa ... He got up and stood... Er
hat die Erwartungen unseres Vaters nicht
stand auf und stellte sich aufrecht ...
erfüllt.
synonyme: lɔ.
1
29/01/2026 320

jɔbanto jɔgɔjɔgɔ
10 • accepter, reconnaître, suivre (une loi); 2 • effet; effect, impact; Wirkung.
accept, recognize, follow (a law); akzeptieren, Bamananfura ninnu ... jɔdaba yera u la wa ?
erkennen, folgen (ein Gesetz). Mɔgɔ tɛ jɔ bɛɛ Est-ce que les remèdes traditionnels ont un
seereya kɔrɔ. On n'accepte pas tous les grand effet ? Do traditional remedies have a
témoignages. We do not accept all testimonies. great effect? Haben traditionelle Heilmittel
Wir akzeptieren nicht alle Zeugenaussagen. eine große Wirkung?
11 • soupçonner, croire; suspect, believe; jɔda [ɔ̀] Nom. filets de but (de football); goal nets
2
vermuten, glauben. ... mɔgɔ si tun t'i jɔ n'o (football); Tornetze (Fußball).
ye. ... personne n'aurait soupçonné cela. ...no
jɔdon [ɔ̀] Nom. le jour du jugement dernier (et plus
one would have suspected this. ...das hätte
généralement «jour de rassemblement»); the
niemand vermutet.
day of the last judgment (and more generally
12 • prendre en charge, assumer, soutenir; take
“day of assembly”); der Tag des jüngsten
charge, assume, support; Verantwortung
Gerichts (und allgemeiner „Tag der
übernehmen, übernehmen, unterstützen. A b'i Versammlung“). sugu jɔdon le jour de
jɔ ni bolokodenko musaka ye. Il prend en marché. market day. Markttag.
charge les dépenses de circoncision. He covers synonyme: kiyama, siratu.
the circumcision expenses. Er übernimmt die
Beschneidungskosten. jɔfa [ɔ̀] Nom. filet dont les femmes entourent les
13 • prendre; take; nehmen. Naji jɔra. La sauce calebasses pour les porter sur leur tête; net with
a pris. The sauce has set. Die Soße ist fest
which the women surround the calabashes to
geworden.
carry them on their heads; Netz, mit dem die
Frauen die Kalabassen umgeben, um sie auf
14 • concevoir (un enfant); conceive (a child);
dem Kopf zu tragen.
ein Kind empfangen. A jɔra den na. Elle a
conçu. She conceived. Sie wurde schwanger.
jɔfɛ [ɔ̌-ɛ̌] postp. le long de, contre (quelque chose
de vertical); along, against (something
15 • avoir besoin; need, require; brauchen,
benötigen. Baara ma jɔ u la. On n'a pas eu
vertical); entlang, gegen (etwas Vertikales).
Tɛmɛ kogo jɔfɛ. Passe le long du mur. Go
encore besoin d'eux pour le travail. We haven't
needed them for work yet. Wir haben sie
along the wall. Gehen Sie an der Wand
noch nicht für die Arbeit benötigt. entlang. synonyme: jurukun, lɔfɛ.
16 • aller, se rendre à; go, get to; gehen, sich jɔfɛba [ɔ̀-ɛ̀] Emprunt de : peul. Nom. péripneumonie
begeben. A bɛ taa dɔgɔ jɔ. Il va au marché.
des bovins; bovine pleuropneumonia;
He goes to the market. Er geht auf den Markt. Rinderpleuropneumonie. Jɔfɛba ye misiw ka
jɔbanto [ɔ̀-à] Morphemes: jɔ-ban-to. Nom. flotteur bana jugu ye. La péripneumonie est une
de filet de pêche; fishing net float; grave maladie des bovins. Pleuropneumonia
Fischernetzschwimmer. Category: Hunt and is a serious disease of cattle. Pleuropneumonie
fish. ist eine schwere Rindererkrankung.
jɔbɔrɛ [ɔ]̀ Nom. sac en mailles; mesh bag; Netzbeutel. jɔgɔ [ɔ̀] variante: jɔgɔn. 1 • Verbe. mettre en meule,
... bilakoronin bɛ jɔbɔrɛnin bila u kɛrɛ la. ... en tas; put in a stack, in a heap; auf einen
les incirconcis ont au côté de petits sacs en Stapel, auf einen Haufen legen, aufstapeln. ...
mailles. ...the uncircumcised have small mesh ka malo jogow jɔ án ka forow kɔnɔ ... ...
bags at their sides. ...die Unbeschnittenen dresser le riz en meules dans nos champs ... ...
haben kleine Netzbeutel an ihren Seiten. to heap up the rice in our fields ... .. au unseren
Category: Container. Feldern den Reis aufstapeln ...
jɔda [ɔ]̀ Jula: lɔda. Nom. 1 • place, rôle; place, Category: Agriculture.
1
role; Ort, Rolle. Daba jɔda ka bon sɛnɛ na
2 • Nom. gerbier, meule, entassement; stack,
pile; Stapel.
cogo min na, kalan fana jɔda ka bon sɛnɛ
na ten. Si la place de la houe dans
jɔgɔjɔgɔ [ɔ̀-ɔ́-ɔ̀-ɔ́] Verbe. 1 • mettre en meules; put in
a stack, in a heap; aufstapeln, stapeln.
l'agriculture est importante, la place de
l'instruction l'est tout autant (proverbe). If the Maaɲɔ... i b'a tigɛ ka a jɔgɔjɔgɔ foro kɔnɔ ...
place of the hoe in agriculture is important, the Le maïs ... est coupé et entassé dans le champ
place of education is just as important même ... Corn ... is cut and heaped in the field
(proverb). Wenn der Platz der Hacke in der itself ... Mais ... wird geschnitten und auf dem
Landwirtschaft wichtig ist, ist der Platz der Feld selbst gestapelt ...
Bildung ebenso wichtig (Sprichwort).
synonyme: lɔda.
29/01/2026 321

jɔgɔramɛ jɔlan
2 • entasser, empiler; pile, stack; stapeln. ... jɔkolo [ɔ̀] Nom. ferment; ferment; Gärung. Jɔkolo bɛ
1
nka syɛdenw jɔgɔjɔgɔ ɲɔgɔn kan ... ... mais bila dɔlɔ de la. On met du ferment dans la
entasser les poussins les uns contre les autres bière. We put ferment in the beer. Wir geben
... ... but to pile the chicks against each other ... dem Bier Gärung.
... aber die Küken aneinander zu drängen ...
jɔkolo [ɔ̀] Nom. colonne vertébrale, épine dorsale;
jɔgɔramɛ [ɔ́] variante: jɔhɔramɛ, jɔbɔramɛ. Nom.
2
spine, backbone; Wirbelsäule, Rückgrat.
Radiogramme (ou Diawambé : «caste Category: Body. synonyme: kɔkolojuru,
intermédiaire entre la classe des nobles et celle
cɛmakolo, cɛkisɛkolo, kɔkolo .
des hommes de caste»); Diogoramé (or 1
Diawambé: «intermediate caste between the jɔkɔlɔsibaga [ɔ̀-ɔ̀-ɔ̀-ì] Nom. gardien de but;
class of nobles and that of men of caste»);
goalkeeper; Torwart, Torhüter.
Diogoramé (oder Diawambé: «Kaste zwischen
synonyme: jɔlakanana, goliye.
der Klasse der Adligen und der der Männer
von Kaste»). Jɔgɔramɛ kuncilen bɛ diɲɛ jɔkɔtɔ Nom. coupole; cupola, dome; Kuppel,
wuli. Même assommé, un Diogaramé peut Kuppelgewölbe, Dom. Category: Building.
soulever le monde (proverbe). Even knocked jɔkun [ɔ̀] Nom. 1 • taille; size, height; Größe. A jɔkun
out, a Diogarame can lift the world (proverb).
ka surun. Il est de taille courte. He is short in
Selbst wenn er betäubt ist, kann ein Diogaramé
die Welt erheben (Sprichwort).
size. Er ist kurz gewachsen.
2 • raison (de la venue); reason (for coming);
jɔjan [ɔ]̀ Jula: lɔjan. variante: dɔjan. Nom.
Grund (des Kommens). synonyme: jɔkan.
longueur; length; Länge. O jɔjan ye mɛtɛrɛ
jɔkundama [ɔ̀] Nom. taille; size; Größe. Ni wulu ma
10 ye, a jɔsurun ye mɛtɛrɛ fila ni tila ye. Sa
largeur est de 10 mètres et sa largeur de 2,5. Its
wuli, a jɔkundama tɛ dɔn. Tant que le chien
width is 10 meters and its width is 2.5. Seine n'est pas debout, on ne peut connaître sa taille
Breite beträgt 10 Meter und seine Breite (proverbe). As long as the dog is not standing,
beträgt 2,5. synonyme: lɔjan. we cannot know its size (proverb). Solange der
Hund nicht steht, können wir seine Größe nicht
jɔjiri Nom. statut; status; Status, Stellung. kennen (Sprichwort).
lakɔlikaramɔgɔ ka jɔjiri kɛrɛnkɛrɛnnen le jɔlakanana [ɔ̀-à-à-à] Nom. gardien de but;
statut particulier des instituteurs. the special
goalkeeper; Torwart. synonyme: jɔkɔlɔsibaga,
status of teachers. der Sonderstatus der Lehrer.
synonyme: lɔyɔrɔ , jɔsen.
goliye.
1
jɔjɔ [ɔ-̌ ɔ̌] Verbe. être debout et arrêté (à plusieurs),
jɔlan [ɔ̀] Nom. 1 • toute chose servant à tenir debout :
pied, jambe, patte, fourche (d'un deux-roues)
être hérissé; to be standing and stopped (with
..; anything used to stand up: foot, leg, paw,
several people), to be bristling; stehen und
fork (of a two-wheeler)..; alles, was zum
stehen bleiben (mit mehreren Leuten), sich
Aufstehen dient: Fuß, Bein, Pfote, Gabel
sträuben. Á y'a jɔjɔ ɲɔgɔn dafɛ. Mettez-vous
(eines Zweirads) ... A siranna fo a bɛ pɛpɛ a
en rang l'un devant l'autre. Line up in front of
each other. Stellt euch voreinander auf. ... a sii
jɔlan kan. Il eut peur au point d'avoir les
jambes qui tremblent. He was so frightened
jɔjɔlen don. ... elle a le poil hérissé. ... her
that his legs were shaking. Er hatte solche
hair stands on end. ... ihr stehen die Haare zu
Angst, daß seine Beine zitterten.
Berge.
2 • soutien; support; Unterstützung, Stütze.
jɔkan [ɔ]̀ Nom. 1 • déclaration, décision; declaration, Mɔgɔ fa ni ba ye i jɔlan ye. Ton père et ta
decision; Erklärung, Entscheidung, Beschluß, mère sont ton soutien. Your father and mother
Beschlüsse. ... walasa a jɔkanw ka waleya ... are your support. Dein Vater und deine
... afin que soient mises en application les Mutter sind deine Stütze.
décisions ... ... to ensure that decisions are 3 • hauteur (d'un triangle); height (of a
implemented ... ... damit die Beschlüsse triangle); Höhe (eines Dreiecks).
umgesetzt werden... 4 • signe de ponctuation; punctuation mark;
2 • raison (de la venue); reason (for coming); Satzzeichen. Category: Grammar.
Grund (des Kommens). synonyme: jɔkun.
3 • motif valable; valid reason; triftiger Grund.
jɔkisɛw Nom. mailles; meshes; Maschen.
29/01/2026 322

jɔlen jɔn
jɔlen [ɔ-̌ ě] variante: dɔlen. Nom. espèce d'herbe, 2 • quel, quelle, lequel, laquelle (et les formes
pluriel correspondantes); what, which (and the
herbe baïonnette, herbe coupante; kind of
corresponding plural forms); welcher, welche,
grass, bayonet grass; Grasart, Bajonettgras.
was (und die entsprechenden Pluralformen).
Goni lasɔnyɔrɔ tɛ jɔlentu ye. Ce n'est pas
Muso jɔn ? Quelle femme ? Which woman?
dans un fourré d'herbes-baïonnettes qu'on peut
garder des braises (proverbe). It is not in a
Welche Frau? ... yɔrɔ jɔn na ? ... à quel
thicket of bayonet grass that you can keep endroit ? ... at what place? ...where? ... an
embers (proverb). In einem Dickicht aus welchem Ort ... wo?
Bajonettgras kann man keine Glut jɔn [ɔ̀] Jula: jɔɔn. variante: jɔnfin. Nom.
2
aufbewahren (Sprichwort). Category: Grass,
1 • esclave, captif; slave, captive; Sklave,
herb, vine. imperata cylindrica.
Gefangener. A ko dɔin ye n ka jɔnmuso ye,
jɔlenya [ɔ-̀ è] Nom. stabilité; stability; Stabilität. dɔin de ye n muso ye. Il dit : «L'une est ma
pankurun jɔlenya la stabilité de l'avion. the captive, l'autre est ma femme». He said, "One
stability of the plane. die Stabilität des is my captive, the other is my wife." Er sagt:
Flugzeugs. «Die eine ist meine Gefangene, die andere ist
jɔlɔ [ɔ]̀ Nom. germe des plantes qui poussent
meine Frau». synonyme: sanjɔn, mɔgɔfɛmɔgɔ.
1
2 • être humain, individu (dans certains
(céréales); germ of growing plants (cereals);
Keim wachsender Pflanzen (Getreide). Ɲɔ jɔlɔ
contextes); human being, individual (in certain
contexts); Mensch, Individuum (in bestimmten
bɔra. Le mil a commencé à germer. The millet
Kontexten). jɔn o jɔn tout individu. any
has started to germinate. Die Hirse hat
individual. jede Einzelperson. ... jɔn si kana a
begonnen zu keimen.
fasiya bila mɔgɔ wɛrɛ ye. ... que personne
jɔlɔ [ɔ]́ Nom. 1 • ovaire fécondé des arachides
2 n'abandonne la tradition de ses pères pour une
descendant dans la terre; fertilized ovary of autre. ...let no one abandon the tradition of his
peanuts descending into the earth; fathers for another. ...Niemand soll die
befruchteter Eierstock von Erdnüssen, der in Tradition seiner Väter zugunsten eines anderen
die Erde absinkt. Tiga ye jɔlɔ jigin. Les aufgeben. Jɔn bɛɛ lajɛrɛlen ni i garisɛgɛ don.
arachides ont commencé à faire des racines. A chacun sa bonne fortune (proverbe). To each
The peanuts have started to take root. Die his own good fortune (proverb). Jedem sein
Erdnüsse haben begonnen, Wurzeln zu Glück (Sprichwort).
schlagen.
jɔn [ɔ̀] 1 • Verbe. dédaigner, mépriser, négliger,
2 • racines latérales des céréales descendant 3
sous-estimer, minimiser; to despise, scorn,
dans la terre; lateral roots of cereals
neglect, underestimate, minimize; verachten,
descending into the earth; Seitenwurzeln von
Getreide, die in die Erde absteigen.
vernachlässigen, unterschätzen, herabsetzen.
Fala bɛ jɔn ko min na, makaritɔ t'o to.
jɔlɔkɔ [ɔ-̀ ɔ̀-ɔ́] Emprunt de : arabe. Nom. 1 • chaîne,
L'orphelin dédaigne des choses que le
menottes; chain, handcuffs; Kette, miséreux ne dédaigne pas (proverbe). The
Handschellen. O tuma, jɔlɔkɔ de b'a muso orphan disdains things that the poor do not
tɔw sen na kɛ ? Donc, ses autres femmes disdain (proverb). Die Waise verachtet Dinge,
auraient des chaînes aux pieds ? So, his other die die Armen nicht verachten (Sprichwort).
women would have chains on their feet? Also, 2 • Verbe. avoir honte, se plaindre; be ashamed,
würden seine anderen Frauen Fußketten complain; sich schämen, beschweren.
tragen? 3 • Nom. dédain, mépris; contempt, scorn;
2 • enchaîner; to chain; anketten, fesseln. U ye Verachtung. Jɔn tɛ kɛ bonya na. On ne
a bolo jɔlɔkɔ. Ils lui ont enchaîné les mains. dédaigne pas un cadeau (proverbe). We do not
They chained his hands. Sie haben ihm die disdain a gift (proverb). Wir verachten ein
Hände gefesselt. Geschenk nicht (Sprichwort).
jɔlɔkɔmansin Nom. pylône; pylon, mast, tower; jɔn 4 [ɔ́] variante: ncɔn. Verbe. rabattre, coucher
Strommast, Pylone. (de l'herbe, du mil, un arbuste); to cut down, to
lay down (grass, millet, a shrub); fällen,
jɔn
1
[ɔ]̂ Jula: jɔɔn. variante: jɛn. inter. 1 • qui ?
niederlegen (Gras, Hirse, einen Strauch).
(interrogatif); who? (interrogative); wer?
Baganw donna án ka foro la, u y'a bɛɛ jɔn.
(Frage), wem, wen. A ni jɔn taara ? Avec qui
Le bétail est entré notre champ et a couché tout
est-il parti ? Who did he go with? Mit wem ist (le mil). The cattle entered our field and laid
er gegangen? synonyme: jɔni. down everything (the millet). Das Vieh kam
auf unser Feld und legte alles ab (die Hirse).
29/01/2026 323

jɔn jɔnkɛ
jɔn [ɔ]́ Nom. convocation pour demande jɔnfuru [ɔ̀] variante: jɔnfutu. Nom. palais, église,
5
d'explication (pour des paroles prononcées); mosquée; palace, church, mosque; Palast,
summons for request for explanation (for Kirche, Moschee. Category: Building.
words spoken); Vorladung zur Bitte um
jɔni [ɔ́] Déterminant. qui (interrogatif); who
Erklärung (für gesprochene Worte). U y'a sigi
(interrogative); wer (fragend). Wula in na
dugutigi fɛ yen jɔn na. Ils l'ont convoqué
baro bɛ jɔni kan ? Sur qui est la causerie de ce
chez le chef de village afin qu'il s'explique sur
ce qu'il a dit. They summoned him to the
soir ? Who is the talk about this evening? Um
wen geht es im Gespräch heute Abend?
village chief so that he could explain what he
had said. Sie riefen ihn zum Dorfvorsteher,
synonyme: jɔn
1
.
damit er erklären konnte, was er gesagt hatte. jɔnjago [ɔ ̀-á-ó] Nom. traite négrière; slave trade;
jɔn 6 [ɔ]́ Nom. muselière pour le bétail, bâillon; Sklavenhandel.
muzzle for livestock, gag; Maulkorb für jɔnjɔn [ɔ̀-ɔ́] synonyme: darapo, jɛnjɛn. Nom.
1
Nutztiere, Knebel. A ye jɔn siri a ka misi da
1 • drapeau, armoire, symbole; flag, symbol;
la. Il a mis une muselière à sa vache. He put a Flagge, Fahne, Wappen, Symbol. Jɔnjɔn bɛ
muzzle on his cow. Er legte seiner Kuh einen
finifananɛgɛbere kunna. Le drapeau flotte au
Maulkorb an. Category: Animal husbandry.
sommet du mât métallique. The flag flies at the
jɔn ko Ala expr. en vérité, de grâce; truly, in truth, by top of the metal pole. Die Flagge weht oben
God's grace; wahrlich, durch Gottes Gnade. auf der Metallstange. synonyme: sirifinin.
jɔn na [ɔ]́ variante: jɔn ma, jɔ na, jɔ ma. expr. au 2 • récompense, médaille, prix; award, medal,
prize; Auszeichnung, Medaille, Preis. A ye
courant, informé; be aware, informed; bewußt
sein, auf dem Laufenden sein, informiert. N jɔnjɔn sɔrɔ. Il a obtenu la récompense. He got
b'a jɔn ma. N b'a jɔn na. Je suis au courant. the reward. Er hat die Belohnung erhalten.
I'm aware. Ich bin mir dessen bewußt. ... ka a jɔnjɔn [ɔ́-ɔ́] Nom. 1 • précis, exacte; precise, exact;
2
sɔrɔ mɔgɔ ma bɔ a jɔn na. ... alors que genau, exakt. Jaabi jɔnjɔn ... Les réponses
personne n'était au courant. ...while no one exactes ... The correct answers ... Die richtigen
knew about it. ...während niemand davon Antworten ... ... a mago jɔnjɔn ... ... un besoin
wußte. précis ... ... a specific need ... ... eine bestimmte
jɔnbɔjɔnbɔ Nom. étamine; stamen; Staubblatt. Notwendigkeit ...
Category: Parts of a plant. synonyme: feeren 2 • particulier, véritable, authentique;
particular, true, authentic; einzigartig, echt,
cɛyayɔrɔ.
authentisch. taamaseere jɔnjɔn signe
jɔnfeerelɔgɔ Nom. marché d'esclaves; slave market; particulier. particular sign, special sign.
Sklavenmarkt. besonderes Zeichen, besonderes Merkmal.
jɔnforo [ɔ̀] Nom. 1 • champ personnel; personal field, 3 • bon, convenable, de bonne qualité; good,
suitable, good quality; gut, passend, gute
private field; persönliches Feld, privates Feld.
Qualität. bɔrɔ jɔnjɔn un bon sac. a good bag.
Foro min tɛ foroba ye, a bɛ fɔ o ma ko
ein guter Sack.
jɔnforo. Le champ qui n'est pas le champ
commun, on l’appelle jɔnforo. The field which
jɔnkanifɛn [ɔ̀-à-ì] Morphemes: jɔn-kani-fɛn.
is not the common field is called jɔnforo. Das variante: jɔnkɔrɔɲɔ, jɔnfuruɲɔ. Nom. bien
Feld, das nicht das gemeinsame Feld ist, heißt propre, bien privé, bien individuel; private
jɔnforo. Category: Agriculture, Land. property, individual property; Privateigentum,
2 • lieu de culture pour les femmes, proche du Einzeleigentum. Jɔnforofɛnw walima
village; field for women, close to the village; jɔnkanifɛnw Biens collectifs ou biens
Anbauort für Frauen, nah am Dorf. ... musow individuels. Collective goods or individual
bɛɛ n'u ka jɔnforonin tun don ... ... chaque goods. Kollektives oder individuelles
femme avait son propre lieu de culture ... Eigentum.
...each woman had her own place of jɔnkɛ Jula: jɔncɛ. Morphemes: jɔn-kɛ. Nom. esclave
cultivation... ...jede Frau hatte ihren eigenen
(homme); slave (man); Sklave, Gefangener.
Acker ...
Faama ka jɔnkɛ mandi tɛ wa ? N'est-ce pas le
3 • privé, personnel; private, personal; privat,
captif préféré du roi ? Is not this the king’s
persönlich. Mobili in ye a jɔnforola de ye.
favorite prisoner? Ist das nicht der
Cette voiture est son véhicule personnel. This
Lieblingsgefangene des Königs?
car is his personal vehicle. Dieses Auto ist
Category: Person. synonyme: sanjɔn.
sein Privatfahrzeug.
29/01/2026 324

jɔnkɔrɔmɛ jɔntɛfin
jɔnkɔrɔmɛ Nom. caste de griots; griot caste; Griot jɔnminteri [ɔ̀-ì] Nom. ami intime, ami inséparable;
Kaste. close friend, inseparable friend; enger Freund,
jɔnkunna [ɔ̀-ù] Morphemes: jɔ-n-kun-na. Nom. unzertrennlicher Freund. I jɔnminteri, o ye i
teri sɛbɛsɛbɛ ye, á ka gundo bɛɛ ye kelen
garde du corps, garde personnel; bodyguard,
personal guard; Leibwächter, persönlicher ye. Ton jɔnminteri, c'est ton véritable ami, vos
Wächter. secrets sont les mêmes. Your jɔnminteri is your
true friend, your secrets are the same. Dein
jɔnkunnandi [ɔ̀-ù-à] variante: jɔnninkunnandi.
jɔnminteri ist dein wahrer Freund, deine uns
Nom. 1 • homme qui jouit des faveurs divines; seine Geheimnisse sind die gleichen.
person who enjoys divine favours; Mensch,
synonyme: ɲin , joliminteri, baden .
der die göttlichen Gunst genießt. Ni mɔgɔ ko i
2 2
jɔnmuso [ɔ̀] Morphemes: jɔn-muso. Nom. esclave
bɛna jɔnkunnandi fili ko a ka bin a kan kan,
a bɛ jɔ a sen fila kan. Le chanceux, quand on (femme); slave (woman); Sklavin.
jɔnmusoladamulen une domestique parfaite.
le jette en l'air pour qu'il se fracasse le cou, il se
trouve sur ses jambes (proverbe). The lucky a perfect servant. eine perfekte Dienerin.
one, when he is thrown in the air so that he Category: Person. synonyme: sanjɔn.
breaks his neck, he is on his legs (proverb).
jɔnnɛgɛ [ɔ̀] Nom. grigri en forme de chaîne d'esclave;
Der Glückliche, wenn man ihn in die Luft
talisman in the shape of a slave chain;
wirft, damit er sich den Hals bricht, steht auf
seinen Beinen (Sprichwort).
Talisman in Form einer Sklavenkette.
antonyme: jɔnkunnango.
Jɔnnɛgɛ, nɛgɛ don, dɔw b'a siri kannasɛbɛn
na, marabaw b'a feere. C'est une chaîne, on
2 • chanceux, bienheureux; lucky, blessed;
glücklich, selig, gesegnet. Alijɛnɛ sɔrɔbaga
peut l'attacher à l/amulette portée au cou., elle
est vendu par les colporteurs de médicaments.
ye jɔnkunnandi ye. Bienheureux est celui qui
It is a chain, it can be attached to the amulet
gagne le paradis. Blessed is he who earns worn around the neck, it is sold by medicine
heaven. Selig ist, wer den Himmel gewinnt. peddlers. Es handelt sich um eine Kette, die an
jɔnkunnango [ɔ̀-ù-à] Nom. malchanceux, einem um den Hals getragenen Amulett
befestigt werden kann und von
malheureux; unlucky, unhappy; Pech,
Medizinhändlern verkauft wird.
unglücklich, erfolglos.
antonyme: jɔnkunnandi.
Category: Adornment, Religion.
jɔnnyɛrɛla [ɔ̀-ɛ̀-ɛ] Morphemes: jɔn-n-yɛrɛ-la. Nom.
jɔnkuntigi Morphemes: jɔn-kuntigi. Nom. chef des
1 • complexe d'infériorité; inferiority complex;
esclaves; slave master; Sklavenhalter.
Minderwertigkeitskomplex. jɔnnyɛrɛlani
Category: Person.
dannabaliya les complexes d'infériorité et le
jɔnmaya [ɔ ̀-à-á] variante: jɔnna, jɔnmaana.
manque de confiance. the inferiority
n.comp. manque de respect (envers autrui), complexes and lack of confidence.
mépris, dédain, irrespect; disrespect, Minderwertigkeitskomplexe und mangelndes
contempt, disregard, disdain; Selbstvertrauen. Category: Think.
Respektlosigkeit, Nichtachtung, Verachtung,
2 • personne complexée; person with complex;
Mißachtung, Hohn. A ka jɔnmaya Person mit Selbstmitleid.
damatɛmɛna. Son mépris a dépassé les
jɔnɔji [ɔ́-ɔ́-í] Nom. embryon; embryo; Embryo.
bornes. His contempt was beyond the mark.
Seine Verachtung ist zu weit gegangen.
synonyme: jolikuru, wolonugu, denkuru,
Jɔnmaya kɛ man di kɔtigi la. Il n'est pas jolikuturunin.
facile de minimiser celui qui a des appuis jɔnsɔngɔ [ɔ̀] Nom. prix élevé; high price; hoher Preis.
(proverbe). It is not easy to minimize someone
... jula bɛ jabasi bila jɔnsɔngɔ na. ... les
who has support (proverb). Es ist nicht
commerçants vendent la graine d'oignon à un
einfach, jemanden herunterzuspielen, der
Unterstützung hat (Sprichwort).
prix élevé. ... traders sell onion seed at a high
synonyme: ɲɛdonya.
price. ... Händler verkaufen Zwiebelsamen zu
einem hohen Preis. Category: Finance.
jɔnminɛ [ɔ̀] Nom. premier mois de l'année synonyme: dagoya, dagɛlɛn.
2
traditionnelle; first month of the traditional
jɔntɛfin [ɔ́] Nom. fièvre jaune; yellow fever;
year; erster Monat des traditionellen Jahres.
Gelbfieber. Boloci min bɛ jɔntɛfin kunbɛn.
La vaccination contre la fièvre jaune.
vaccination against yellow fever. Die
Gelbfieberimpfung. Category: Disease.
29/01/2026 325

jɔntugannin jɔrɔli
jɔntugannin [ɔ̀-ù-à] Nom. tourterelle du Cap; jɔɔsijɔɔsi variante: jɔsijɔsi. Verbe. s'entre-choquer; to
Namaqua dove ; Kaptäubchen. Category: Bird. shock each other; einander schockieren.
Oena capensis. synonyme: ngorobanin, jɔɔsili variante: jɔsili. Nom. 1 • nettoyage; cleaning;
koronbanin.
Reinigung.
jɔnya [ɔ- ̀ á] Morphemes: jɔn-ya. Nom. 1 • esclavage, 2 • petit boulot (ex. immigrés en Europe);
captivité; slavery, captivity; Sklaverei, casual job; Gelegenheitsarbeit.
Gefangenschaft. jɔnya wagati période jɔɔsilikɛlan Morphemes: jɔɔsi-li-kɛ-lan.
d’esclavage. slavery era. Zeit der Sklaverei. variante: jɔsilikɛlan. Nom. gomme, objet pour
Sɛgɛn ka fisa jɔnya ye. Mieux vaut la misère
nettoyer, tout ce qui sert à nettoyer / frotter /
que l'esclavage (proverbe). Better misery than essuyer; eraser, thing used to clean, cleaning
slavery (proverb). Besser Elend als Sklaverei tool; Radiergummi, Reinigungswerkzeug.
(Sprichwort). synonyme: mɔgɔfɛmɔgɔya. Category: Tool.
2 • réduire en captivité, devenir captif; reduce jɔɔsinan [ɔ̀-ì] Morphemes: jɔɔsi-nan.
to captivity, become captive; in
variante: jɔsinan. Nom. chiffon, serviette,
Gefangenschaft zu reduzieren, gefangen
werden.
serpillière, torchon, éponge; towel, cloth, tea
towel, sponge; Tuch, Geschirrtuch, Handtuch,
jɔnyɛrɛye [ɔ̀-ɛ̀-ɛ̀] Nom. indépendant, non-inscrit; Badetuch, Lumpen, Schwamm.
independent, non-registered; Selbständiger, synonyme: jɔsilan.
nicht eingetragen. jɔnyɛrɛyedepite député
jɔrɔ [ɔ̀] variante: jɔrɛ. 1 • vi. avoir peur, craindre,
non-inscrit. a non-attached member. ein
fraktionsloses Mitglied.
s’inquiéter, redouter, appréhender, s'alarmer;
worry, fear, be afraid; sich sorgen, sich
jɔɲɔgɔn [ɔ̀] Nom. être humain, semblable; human ängstigen, fürchten, befürchten, besorgt sein,
being, fellow men; Mensch, Mitmensch. I beunruhigt sein. Ne jɔrɔnin lo. Je suis inquiet.
kana i jigi da i jɔnɲɔgɔn kan. Ne mettons I’m worried. Ich bin besorgt. I kana jɔrɔ ! Ne
point notre espérance dans nos semblables t’inquiètes pas ! Don’t worry! Sei unbesorgt!
(proverbe). Let us not put our hope in our synonyme: masiran.
fellow men (proverb). Setzen wir unsere
2 • Nom. appréhension, inquiétude, crainte;
Hoffnung nicht auf unsere Mitmenschen
apprehension, worry, fear; Besorgnis, Sorge,
(Sprichwort).
Angst. Ko bɛɛ jɔrɔ bɛ ... Toute chose peut être
jɔɔ 1 [ɔɔ̀ ́] Jula: jɔ. Nom. filet; net; Netz. jɔɔ fili jeter sujet de crainte ... Anything can be a source of
le filet. throw out the net. das Netz auswerfen. fear... Alles kann eine Quelle der Angst sein ...
Category: Tool. jɔrɔbagatɔ [ɔ̀-ɔ-à-à] Morphemes: jɔrɔ-baga-tɔ.
jɔɔ 2 Emprunt de : français. Jula: jɔ. Nom. hamac; Nom. craintif, celui qui appréhende, celui qui
hammock; Hängematte. synonyme: dalijɔ. redoute quelque chose; fearful, he who
apprehends, he who dreads something;
jɔɔn
1
[ɔɔ ̀ ́] bambara: jɔn. Nom. 1 • esclave, captif;
ängstlich, wer sich vor etwas fürchtet. Mɔgɔ
slave, captive; Sklave, Gefangener.
min muso sara, jɔrɔbagatɔ don dɔ sɔrɔko
Category: Person.
la. Celui dont la femme est morte appréhende
2 • serviteur; servant; Diener.
de ne pas en retrouver une autre. The one
Category: Person.
whose wife is dead fears not finding another.
jɔɔn 2 [ɔ] ́ bambara: jɔn. pron. qui, pronom Derjenige, dessen Frau tot ist, hat Angst, keine
interrogatif; who, interrogative pronoun; wer, andere zu finden.
Fragepronomen. Jɔɔn kumana ? Qui a parlé ? jɔrɔli [ɔ̀] Morphemes: jɔrɔ-li. Nom. inquiétude,
Who spoke? Wer hat gesprochen? Jɔɔn ka biki
crainte; worry, fear; Sorge, Kummer, Angst. A
lo ? A qui est ce stylo ? Whose pen is it? Wem
fa tun ye jɔrɔli daminɛ. Son père avait
gehört der Schreiber?
commencé à s’inquiéter. His father had started
jɔɔnw [ɔ- ́ ù] variante: jɔnw. pron. qui (pl.); who to worry. Sein Vater hat angefangen sich
(pl.); wer (pl.) Jɔɔnw kunana? Qui sont ceux
Sorgen zu machen.
qui ont parlé ? Who are those who spoke? Wer
sind die, die gesprochen haben?
jɔɔsi bambara: jɔsi. vt. essuyer, astiquer, frotter,
nettoyer; wipe, mop, polish, scrub, rub;
abwischen, reinigen, trocknen, wischen,
putzen, reiben. synonyme: jɔsi.
29/01/2026 326

jɔrɔnanko jɔyɔrɔbatigi
jɔrɔnanko [ɔ̀-ɔ̀-à] Morphemes: jɔrɔ-nan-ko. 3 • colmater une brèche; to close a gap;
Schließen einer Lücke, ausstopfen. ka kurun
Variant: haminanko. n.comp. raison d'être
jɔsɔn colmater les trous d'une pirogue. fill the
inquiet, souci, préoccupations, sujet
d'inquiétude, crainte; worry, concern, anxiety, holes in a canoe. Löcher in einer Piroge
fear, reason to be worried; Sorge, Besorgnis, ausstopfen.
Anliegen, Unruhe, Angst, Grund zur Sorge. jɔsurun [ɔ̀] variante: dɔsurun. Nom. largeur; width;
Jɔrɔnankow dɔgɔyara dugu kɔnɔ. Les
Breite. ... a jɔsurun ye mɛtɛrɛ fila ni tila ye.
inquiétudes ont diminué dans le village.
... sa largeur est de 2,5 m. ... its width is 2.5 m.
Concerns have diminished in the village. Im
... die Breite beträgt 2,5 m.
Dorf sind die Bedenken zurückgegangen.
synonyme: panparan, fyɛ , lɔsurun.
1
jɔsen Morphemes: jɔ-sen. Nom. statut; statute;
jɔyili variante: dɔyili. Adverbe. tranquillement;
Statuten. An ka tɔn jɔsen ... Les statuts de
quietly, calmly; ruhig, leise. Faatu taara i sigi
notre association ... The statutes of our
association... Die Statuten unseres Vereins ...
jɔyili. Fatou alla s'asseoir tranquillement !
synonyme: jɔjiri, lɔyɔrɔ , sigisariyaw. Fatou went to sit quietly! Fatou ging ruhig
1
sitzen! synonyme: teku.
jɔsi [ɔ]̀ Jula: jɔɔsi. variante: jɔɔsi. Verbe.
jɔyɔrɔ [ɔ̀] Nom. 1 • place debout (par opposition à
1 • frotter, nettoyer; scrub, clean; schrubben,
reinigen. Marifa di n ma, n b'a jɔsi ka a jɛ. «sigiyɔrɔ»), emplacement; standing position,
Donne-moi le fusil, je vais bien le nettoyer.
location; Stehplatz, Standort. Sigiyɔrɔ banna,
Give me the gun, I'll clean it well. Gib mir die jɔyɔrɔ banna. Il n'y a plus une seule place
Waffe, ich werde sie gut reinigen. assise, plus une seule place debout. There is no
synonyme: jɔɔsi. longer a single sitting place, no more a single
standing place. Es gibt nicht mehr einen Sitz-
2 • affûter, aiguiser sur une pierre; sharpen,
und Stehplatz. kaariw jɔyɔrɔ l'emplacement,
sharpen on a stone; schärfen, auf einem Stein
schärfen. Muru da jɔsilen bɛ ka a diya. La l'arrêt des autocars. bus stop. Haltestelle der
lame du couteau est bien affûtée. The blade of
Busse. antonyme: sigiyɔrɔ; synonyme: lɔyɔrɔ
2
.
the knife is well sharpened. Die Klinge des 2 • place, rôle, situation; place, role, situation;
Messers ist gut geschärft. Platz, Rolle, Situation. Kɔrɔsyɛnni jɔyɔrɔ ka
3 • égorger; slaughter, slay; schlachten. N ye bon. Le rôle du sarclage est important. The
syɛnin jɔsi frrr ! J'ai égorgé le poulet, frrr ! I role of weeding is important. Die Rolle der
butchered the chicken, frrr! Ich habe das Rodung ist wichtig.
Huhn geschlachtet, frrr! 3 • part, participation; part, participation,
4 • frapper, fouetter, casser la figure; to hit, to share; Anteil, Beteiligung. A bɛ wari di, ko
whip; schlagen, peitschen. ... n y'o busan jɔsi nin ye ne ka jɔyɔrɔ ye. Il donne l'argent en
a kun. ... je l'ai frappée d'une coup de cette disant : «Voici ma participation». He gives the
badine. ...I hit her with this stick. ...Ich habe money by saying, "Here is my share." Er gibt
sie mit diesem Stock geschlagen. das Geld mit: «Hier ist mein Anteil».
jɔsilan [ɔ-̀ ì] Jula: jɔɔsinan. Nom. tout ce qui sert à 4 • utilité, intérêt; utility, interest; Nutzen,
Interesse. ... minnu bɛ jɔyɔrɔ ɲini u
nettoyer, frotter, essuyer..., outil de nettoyage;
yɛrɛkunnin kelen kama. ... qui cherchent des
anything used to clean, scrub, wipe..., cleaning
tool; alles, was zum Reinigen, Schrubben, places pour leur seul intérêt personnel. ... who
Wischen verwendet wird ..., seek places for their own personal gain. ... die
Reinigungswerkzeug. synonyme: jɔɔsinan. nur für sich selbst Plätze suchen.
jɔsinan variante: jɔsilan. Nom. touche d'effacement,
jɔyɔrɔbatigi [ɔ̀-ɔ̀-ɔ̀-à] Morphemes: jɔyɔrɔ-ba-tigi.
Nom. personne très importante, haut
tout ce qui sert à nettoyer; cancel button, delete
fonctionnaire, dignitaire; very important
key, all that helps to clean away; Rücktaste,
person, senior official, dignitary; sehr
Löschtaste, alles was zum Saubermachen
wichtige Person, hoher Beamter,
dient.
Würdenträger.
jɔsɔn [ɔ]́ variante: jɔsɔ, sɔsɔ, sɔnsɔn. Verbe.
1 • presser, serrer; squeeze; drücken, eng
beisammen. Mangorontusu jɔnsɔnnen bɛ.
Les mangues sont en grappes serrées.
Mangoes are in tight clusters. Mangos sind in
engen Trauben. synonyme: bisi.
2
2 • bourrer (un fusil); stuff (a gun); füllen (ein
Gewehr).
29/01/2026 327

jɔyɔrɔɲinina jubila
jɔyɔrɔɲinina Morphemes: jɔyɔrɔ-ɲini-na. Nom. jubagatɔ [ù-à-à] variante: jibagatɔ, jobagatɔ.
candidat; candidate, applicant; Kandidat, Nom. femelle qui vient de mettre bas, nouvelle
Bewerber, Antragsteller. Jɔyɔrɔɲinina minnu accouché; female that just gave birth; die
bɛ o sɛbɛn ɲuman ninnu kan ... Les gerade geboren hat. O tu fin jukɔrɔ,
candidats qui se trouvent sur ces listes agréées jaraminɛjara jubagatɔ n'a den saba bɛ yen
... the candidates on these approved lists ... die ... Sous ce bois touffu il y a une grande
Bewerber, die auf diesen anerkannten Listen panthère avec ses trois petits qui viennent de
stehen ... synonyme: kanbɔla, laɲinibaga. naître ... Under this thick wood there is a large
ju [ù] Jula: juu. Nom. cul, derrière, anus, utérus,
panther with its three little ones who have just
1 been born ...
sexe féminin; bottom, ass, anus, uterus, female
private parts, behind, back; Gesäß, Anus, jubagatɔya [ù-à-à-ɔ̀] Nom. relevailles, suite des
Uterus, weibliches Geschlechtsteil, hinter, couches, état ou période qui suit
hinten. Den y'i tɛnɛnku a ju kan ka na. Le l'accouchement; post-delivery period or
bébé est venu en glissant sur son derrière. The condition; Zustand oder Zeit nach der
baby came sliding down on her bottom. Das Entbindung. Gɛlɛya minnu bɛ se ka sɔrɔ
Baby rutschte auf dem Hintern herunter. jubagatɔya kɔnɔ ... Les problèmes qui
Banakisɛ bɛ se ka don sogonin ni ju fɛ ... peuvent apparaître à la suite de l'accouchement
Les germes de la maladie peuvent pénétrer par ... The problems that may arise as a result of
le sexe ou par l'anus ... The germs of the childbirth ... Probleme, die nach der Geburt
disease can enter through the genital parts or auftreten können ...
the anus... Die Krankheitserreger können über
jubaju [ù-à] Nom. fondement, raison profonde, base;
die sexual Organe oder den Anus eindringen...
julakɔnɔn ceinture de perles sur les hanches
foundation, deep reason, base, grounds;
Fundament, tiefer Grund, Basis. Nin ko in
des filles. pearl belt on girls' hips. Perlengürtel
an der Hüfte der Mädchen. synonyme: kɔda ,
yɛrɛ jubaju tɛ i ni i dɔgɔnin ka bɛnbaliya ye
1
kɔfɛtɔ.
wa ? Le fond de cette histoire, n'est-ce pas la
mésentente entre ton jeune frère et toi ? The
ju 2 [ù] variante: juu. Nom. 1 • base, fondement, bottom line of this story, isn’t it the
raison, cause, source, origine; base, disagreement between you and your younger
foundation, reason, cause, source, origin; brother? Ist der Kern dieser Sache nicht die
Basis, Fundament, Grund, Ursache, Quelle, Unstimmigkeit zwischen dir und deinem
Herkunft, Ursprung. Na bɛɛ lajɛrɛlen ju ye ji jüngeren Bruder? gɛlɛyaw jubaju la raison
ye. La base de toute sauce est l'eau (proverbe). profonde des difficultés. The root cause of the
The base of any sauce is water (proverb). Die difficulties. Der eigentliche Grund für die
Basis jeder Soße ist Wasser (Sprichwort). Schwierigkeiten.
2 • commencement; beginning, start, jubara [ù] Nom. 1 • fesse; buttock; Pobacke, Po.
commencement; Anfang, Beginn. kɔ in ju la
2 • abdomen des insectes; Insect abdomen;
source de ce marigot. the source of this river.
Unterleib der Insekten.
Die Quelle dieses Flusses.
jube [ù] Nom. 1 • cheval rouan ou bai; roan or bay
3 • fond, bout; bottom, end; Boden, Spitze. ka
horse; Roan oder Braunes Pferd.
buwatiw ju fan fila sɔgɔsɔgɔ ... percer les
synonyme: nkolonso.
deux fonds des boîtes ... drill through both
sides of the boxes ... Durchstechen der beiden 2 • cheval à tête et poitrail noirs; horse with
Böden der Schachteln ...
black head and chest; Pferd mit schwarzem
Kopf und schwarzer Brust. jube fin cheval bai
4 • crosse, tronc, pied (d'une plante); stem,
trunk, foot (of a plant); Schaft, Stamm, Fuß foncé. dark bay horse. dunkelbraunes Pferd.
(einer Pflanze). Nsira ju ka nugu, nka a den Category: Mammal.
ka ŋɛɲɛ. Le tronc du baobab est lisse, mais ses jubila [ù] Morphemes: ju-bila. Nom. fondations,
fruits sont rugueux (proverbe). The trunk of the soubassement; foundations, base;
baobab is smooth, but its fruits are rough Fundamente, Sockel. Ni dibi y'a jubila jɛ, a bɛ
(proverb). Der Stamm des Baobab ist glatt, bin. Si le four à karité délaisse ses fondations,
aber seine Früchte sind rauh (Sprichwort).
il s'écroule (proverbe). If the shea oven
5 • extrémité opposée à la pointe, chas, tête abandons its foundations, it collapses
(d'un clou); opposite end of the tip, head (of a (proverb). Wenn der Shea-Ofen sein
nail); Gegenende der Spitze, Kopf (von einem Fundament verliert, bricht er zusammen
Nagel). tamakala ju extrémité de la hampe de (Sprichwort). synonyme: bɔgɔbari, soju.
la lance. end of the spear shaft. Ende des
Speerschaftes.
29/01/2026 328

jubɔ jugu
jubɔ [ù] Morphemes: ju-bɔ. Verbe. entamer, jufasogo Nom. viande provenant d'un animal non
débuter, pointer, commencer; start, begin, égorgé suivant les rites musulman; meat (not
point; beginnen, starten, ansetzen. ... ko jubɔ kosher), meat of an animal that was not
man gɛlɛn, a sinsinni n'a laban de ka gɛlɛn.
slaughtered according to Muslim law; Fleisch,
dass nicht nach muslimischer Art getötet
... entamer quelque chose n'est pas difficile, ce
wurde. n'i ma ɲɛ jufasogo dumu kɔ, i k'a kɛ
qui est difficile, c'est de le mener à bien
jusqu’à son terme. ... starting something is not a tuluman ye Category: Food.
difficult, what is difficult is to carry it through.
juga [ù] Nom. naïf, niais, stupide; naive, stupid;
... Etwas zu beginnen ist nicht schwer, was
schwierig ist, ist es, es zu Ende zu bringen.
naiv, nichtig, dumm. So tɛ kɛ juga ye ka
yɛlɛnbaga kɛ juga ye. Le cheval ne peut pas
judon [ǔ-ò] Verbe. butter; hilling a plant; Erde um
être naïf et le cavalier naïf (proverbe). The
die Pflanze häufen. Judonni ye bɔgɔlayɛlɛnni
horse cannot be naive and the rider naive
de sɛnɛfɛnw ju fɛ. Le buttage consiste à (proverb). Das Pferd kann nicht naiv sein und
rapporter de la terre au pied de la plante. der Reiter naiv (Sprichwort). synonyme: kunjɛ.
2
Hilling consists of bringing soil to the base of
the plant. Beim diesem Hacken wird Erde an
jugaya [ù-à] Nom. sottise, bêtise, bouffonnerie;
den Fußboden der Pflanze gebracht. stupidity, buffoonery; Dummheit, Unsinn.
Category: Agriculture. jugɛn [ù] Verbe. faire avancer (une monture, en la
jufa 1 [ú-á] variante: dufa, gufa, tufa. Nom. frappant sur l'arrière-train); push forward (a
pagaie, rame; oar, paddle; Ruder, Paddel. ... horse or donkey, by hitting it on the rear
án b'o suma ni bɔ ni jufa ye. ... nous la
train); Vorwärtstreiben (ein Reittier, das auf
den Hinterzug geschlagen wird). ka fali jugɛn
faisons avancer avec une perche ou une pagaie.
... we move it with a pole or paddle. ... wir
faire avancer un âne. move a donkey forward.
treiben sie mit einem Stock oder Paddel voran.
einen Esel vorwärts bewegen.
Category: Tool. jugirin [ù] Morphemes: ju-girin. variante: jukuri.
jufa [ú-á] Emprunt de : arabe. variante: jifa. 1 • vt. Nom. fesses, derrière, grosses fesses; butt,
2
behind, big butt; Hintern, großer Hintern. Ni i
tuer, crever (pour un animal); kill, die (for
animal); töten, sterben, verrecken (Tier), ye dɔgɔ bɔ i jugirin na, i tɛna sigi i kunbere
verenden (Tier). a ye cɛ jufa synonyme: jifa. kan. Si tu es prit de dégoût pour tes fesses, tu
2 • Nom. bête qui n'a pas été tuée selon le rite ne pourras pour autant pas t'asseoir sur tes
musulman; animal that was not killed genoux (proverbe). If you are disgusted with
according to Muslim rites; Tier, das nicht nach your butt, you won't be able to sit on your
muslimischen Ritualen getötet wurde. knees (proverb). Wenn dir dein Hintern ekelt,
kannst du nicht auf den Knien sitzen
jufa [ú-á] Emprunt de : arabe. Nom. poche;
3 (Sprichwort). Category: Body.
pocket; Sack, Hosentasche, Jackentasche. A synonyme: jukoto.
b’a tigɛ donna jufa kɔnɔ. Il met les mains
jugu [ú] Nom. ennemi; enemy; Feind. Hali ni i jugu
dans ses poches. He has his hands in his 1
pockets. Er hat seine Hände in der Tasche. ye nsonsan ye, a fɔ a bɛ boli. Même si le
Category: Clothing. lièvre est ton ennemi, reconnais qu'il sait courir
(proverbe). Even if the hare is your enemy,
jufa [ú] comparer: jufasogo. Emprunt de : arabe.
4 recognize that he knows how to run (proverb).
Nom. animal mort non égorgé; dead animal Auch wenn der Hase Ihr Feind ist, erkennen
(without kosher butchering); totes Tier (nicht Sie, dass er laufen kann (Sprichwort).
geschächtet). synonyme: jifa. Category: Person.
jufada [ú] Nom. poche, entrée de la poche; pocket, jugu [ú-ú] comparer: juguman. adj.pred. 1 • être
2
pocket entrance; Tasche, Eingang der Tasche. mauvais, méchant, malveillant, maléfique;
Jufada dɔrɔn de bɛ makaran. Les gens ne se bad, evil, malicious; schlecht sein, böse sein,,
soucient que de leur poche. People only care boshaft. Mɔgɔ jugu ka fisa i gansan ye.
about their pockets. Die Leute kümmern sich Mieux vaut vivre avec quelqu'un de méchant
nur um ihre Taschen. que de rester tout seul (proverbe). It is better to
jufalatelefɔni [ú] Morphemes: jufa-la-telefɔni.
live with a bad person than to be alone
(proverb). Es ist besser, mit einem schlechten
Nom. téléphone portable; mobile phone, cell
Menschen zusammenzuleben, als allein zu
phone, cellphone, smartphone; Handy,
sein (Sprichwort). synonyme: farin.
Mobiltelefon. Category: Machine.
synonyme: kumajuru.
29/01/2026 329

jugujugu jukɛli
2 • être vilain, désagréable; to be ugly, 3 • vt. détester, faire du mal à quelqu'un; to
unpleasant; häßlich sein, unschön sein, hate, to hurt someone; jemanden hassen,
unangenehm. Cɛjuguya man jugu, verletzen.
sɔnjuguya de ka jugu. La laideur est moins 4 • vt. être extrême, être intense; to be extreme,
grave que la méchanceté (proverbe). Ugliness to be intense; extrem sein, intensiv sein. O
is less serious than wickedness (proverb). yɛrɛminɛ juguya kojugu kɛra sababu ye ka
Häßlichkeit ist weniger schwerwiegend als ... C'est à cause de cette extrême maîtrise de
Bosheit (Sprichwort).
lui-même ... It is because of this extreme
3 • malheureux, dangereux, grave, violent; self-control... Es liegt an dieser extremen
unhappy, miserable, dangerous, violent; Selbstbeherrschung...
unglücklich, gefährlich, gewaltsam.
Kɔnɔdimin jugu y'a minɛ. Il fut pris de
jujɔn [ǔ-ɔ̌] Jula: julɔn. variante: jujɔ. 1 • Verbe. se
violents maux de ventre. He suffered from fonder; to base oneself; sich stützen auf. Ni i
violent stomach aches. Er litt unter heftigen y'i jujɔn nkalon kan ... Si tu fondes ton
Bauchschmerzen. comportement sur le mensonge ... If you base
jugujugu [ú] Nom. tout jeune; very young; sehr jung.
your behavior on lies... Wenn Sie Ihr
Verhalten auf Lügen stützen... synonyme: julɔn.
U dɔgɔnin jugujugu tɛ. Ce n'est pas un de
leurs tout jeunes frères. It's not one of their
2 • Verbe. constituer, instituer, commencer;
constitute, establish, begin; konstituieren,
younger brothers. Es ist keiner ihrer jüngeren
begründen, beginnen.
Brüder.
3 • Nom. base, origine, début, fondement, point
juguman [ú-ú-ã́] Nom. méchant, mauvais, grave,
de départ, source; base, origin, beginning,
sévère, dangereux, laid, désagréable; evil, foundation, starting point, source; Basis,
mean, cunning, dangerous; böse, listig, Ursprung, Anfang, Fundament,
gemein, gefährlich. Ala k'an tanga juguman Ausgangspunkt, Quelle. Ni mɔgɔ ɲinɛna i
ma. Que Dieu nous protège du mal. May God jujɔn kɔ, laban tɛ ɲɛ. Celui qui oublie ses
protect us from the evil. Möge Gott uns vor origines finira mal (proverbe). He who forgets
bösem beschützen. Den juguman lo. C'est un his origins will end badly (proverb). Wer seine
enfant méchant. It's an evil child. Es ist ein Herkunft vergißt, wird schlecht enden
böses Kind. Juguman kɔfalen ye ɲuman ye. (Sprichwort).
Après la peine vient la joie (proverbe). After jujuju [ù-ù] variante: juju. Nom. hyène (surnom de
sorrow comes joy (proverb). Nach Trauer
l'); hyena (nickname); Hyäne (Spitzname).
kommt Freude (Sprichwort).
Jujuju mana na ... Quand l'hyène viendra ...
jugunin [ú-ù-í] Morphemes: jugu-nin. When the hyena comes ... Wenn die Hyäne
variante: njugunin. Nom. hérisson; hedgehog; kommt ... synonyme: namakɔrɔ, lagabure,
Igel. Category: Mammal. atelerix albiventris. walowalo 2 , konjo.
juguya [ú-ú-á] Morphemes: jugu-ya. 1 • Nom. juka [ù] variante: juga. Nom. plat à base de fonio et
méchanceté, haine, inimitié, mal, gravité, de graines d'arachides; Fonio and peanut seed
laideur; nastiness, hatred, enmity, evil; dish; Fonio und Erdnußsamen Gericht. I ka
Bosheit, Hass, Feindschaft, Böse. A ma
ɲɛnasisi tɛ yɔrɔ min juka tobili bali, fara
juguya, foli lo. Il n'y a pas de mal, c'est un tigawɔrɔlaw kan. Si ton mécontentement ne
bonjour. There is no problem, just a visit to
peut empêcher que l'on prépare le juka, donne
greet you. Kein Problem, ich bin nur
un coup de main à ceux qui décortiquent les
vorbeigekommen um zu grüssen.
arachides (proverbe). If your dissatisfaction
2 • vt. aggraver, faire empirer; make worse, cannot prevent the juka being prepared, give a
worsen, to be or become bad or wicked; hand to those who peel peanuts (proverb).
verschlimmern, schlecht oder böse sein oder Wenn deine Unzufriedenheit nicht verhindern
werden. Bana juguyara wa ? La maladie kann, daß der Juka zubereitet wird, hilf den
a-t-elle empiré ? Has the illness got worse? Ist Schälern von Erdnüssen (Sprichwort).
die krankheit schlimmer geworden? Nɛnɛ bi Category: Types of food.
bana juguya. Le froid empire la maladie. The jukɛ [ù-ɛ́] Verbe. baiser, avoir des relations
cold weather makes the illness worse. Die sexuelles, coucher avec une femme; kiss, have
Kälte verschlimmert die Krankheit. Ni dimi sexual relations, sleep with a woman; küssen,
juguyara, i ka taga dɔgɔtɔrɔso la. Si la Geschlechtsverkehr haben, mit einer Frau
douleur s’empire, il faut aller au centre schlafen.
médical. If the pain gets worse, go to the clinic. jukɛli [ù-ɛ̀-í] Nom. la baise; fuck, sexual intercourse;
Wenn die Krankheit schlimmer wird, geh ins
Geschlechtsverkehr.
Spital.
29/01/2026 330

jukoto jula
jukoto [ù] Nom. fesses, fessier; buttocks, butt; Gesäß, 2 • intention; intention; Absicht. N da man
Po. A muso jukoto ka bon. Sa femme a des fɛgɛn, nka n da jukɔrɔla ka magan. Mes
grosses fesses. His wife has a big butt. Seine paroles ne sont pas légères, mais mon intention
Frau hat einen großen Hintern. (littéralement : «le dessous de ma bouche»)est
Category: Body. synonyme: sigilan, bobara,
tendre (proverbe). My words are not light, but
my intention (literally: «the underside of my
sigilanmugu, jugirin, jukunan.
mouth») is tender (proverb). Meine Worte sind
jukɔrɔ [ù-ɔ́-ɔ̀] Morphemes: ju-kɔrɔ. postp. sous, en nicht leicht, aber meine Absicht (wörtlich:
«die Unterseite meines Mundes») ist zart
dessous de, au-dessous, en bas, au bas, au fond
(Sprichwort).
de, au pied de; under, underneath, below,
beneath; unter, unterhalb, unten. Kɔnɔnin bi 3 • parties sexuelles; sexual parts, genitals;
tabali jukɔrɔ. L'oiseau est sous la table. The
sexuelle Körperteile, Genitalien. Maɲaw y'a
bird is under the table. Der Vogel ist unter jukɔrɔla bɛɛ cin. Les fourmis l'ont piqué aux
dem Tisch. An bɛ siran na buralen na, tintin parties génitales. The ants stung him in the
bɛ dɔ ta jukɔrɔ. On craint la sauce épaisse,
genitals. Die Ameisen haben ihn in die
Genitalien gestochen.
alors qu'il peut y avoir un gros morceau en
dessous (proverbe). We fear thick sauce, even jukɔrɔmatintin [ù-ɔ̀-ɔ̀-à] Verbe. soutenir,
though there may be a big chunk underneath supporter, appuyer; support; unterstützen. ...
(proverb). Wir haben Angst vor dicker Soße,
k'an ka jamana jukɔrɔmatintin ... ... soutenir
auch wenn sich darunter vielleicht ein großer
notre pays ... ... support our country ... ... unser
Brocken befindet (Sprichwort).
Land zu unterstützen ...
jukɔrɔ ɲafara Nom. paupière inférieure; lower
jukɔrɔnumanbolo sɔnbara Nom. ventricule
eyelid; unteres Augenlid, unterer
gauche; left heart chamber; linke untere
Augendeckel. Category: Body.
Herzkammer. Category: Body.
synonyme: dugumaɲɛwolo.
jukɔrɔɲagwaga Nom. maxillaire inférieur; lower
jukɔrɔden [ù-ɔ̀-ɔ̀] Morphemes: ju-kɔrɔ-den. Nom.
jawbone; Unterkieferknochen.
tubercule; tuber; Knolle. Category: Types of Category: Body.
food. synonyme: lilidumuta.
jukunan [ù-ú-á] variante: jukunanmugu. Nom.
jukɔrɔdili [ù-ɔ̀-ɔ̀] Morphemes: ju-kɔrɔ-dili. Nom.
fesse, derrière; buttock, bottom; Hintern,
racine souterraine; underground root; Hinterbacke. Sigi tɛ jukunan ban, nka a b'a
unterirdische Wurzel. Category: Parts of a
pɛnpɛrɛn. Rester assis n'use pas les fesses,
plant.
mais ça les aplatit (proverbe). Sitting does not
jukɔrɔdon [ù-ɔ́-ɔ́-ǒ] variante: jukɔrɔmadon, wear the buttocks, but it flattens them
jukɔrɔmadondon. Verbe. aider, pousser (proverb). Sitzen macht den Hintern nicht
kaputt, aber es macht ihn flach (Sprichwort).
quelqu’un vers le haut; to help, push somebody
upwards; helfen, jemanden hoch-stossen. Na i Category: Body. synonyme: bobara, fɛngɛɲɛ,
dɔgɔkɛ jukɔrɔdon a ka jago daminɛ. Viens
jukoto.
aider ton cadet pour qu'il commence à faire du jukunantulo [ù-ù-à] Nom. fesse, partie supérieure
commerce. Come help your younger brother to
des fesses; buttock, upper part of the buttocks;
start trading. Komm, hilf deinem jüngeren
Po, oberer Po. A ka kulisi ka dɔgɔ, fo n'a y'a
Bruder, damit er mit dem Handel beginnt.
sigi, a jukunantulo bɛ bɔ. Son pantalon est
synonyme: madɛmɛ.
tellement étroit que lorsqu'il s’assoit, il a le
jukɔrɔkinibolo sɔnbara Nom. ventricule droit; haut des fesses qui sort. His pants are so
right heart chamber; rechte Herzkammer. narrow that when he sits down, he has the top
Category: Body. of his butt coming out. Seine Hose ist so eng,
daß er beim Hinsetzen den oberen Teil seines
jukɔrɔla [ù-ɔ̀-ɔ̀] Nom. 1 • dessous, fond; beneath,
Gesäßes sichtbar ist. Category: Body.
below, bottom, base; unten, unterhalb,
Unterboden, Unterseite, Boden, Grund. Mɔgɔ
jukuru [ù-ú-ú] Nom. croupe (cheval); croup (horse);
kana farinya ji la ko a jukɔrɔla man dun.
Kruppe (Pferd). Category: Parts of an animal.
Que personne ne fanfaronne dans l'eau, en jula 1 synonyme: mandeka, jagokɛla. Nom.
disant que ce n'est pas profond. Let no one commerçant, colporteur, pourvoyeur; trader,
boast in the water, saying it is not deep. merchant, dealer; Händler, Verkäufer.
Niemand soll im Wasser angeben, dass es synonyme: jura.
nicht tief ist.
jula Nom. ethnie dioula; Dioula people group;
2
Dioula Volk. synonyme: jura.
29/01/2026 331

jula jumɛnw
jula [ù] postp. à, au fond de, au cœur de; at, to, in julaya [ù-à-á] variante: juraya. 1 • Verbe.
3
the heart of; im Herzen von. ... jamako jula... commercer; trade, making business; Handeln,
... aux endroits où l'on se rassemble ... ... where Handel treiben. Mɔgɔ tɛ julaya diya dɔn
we gather ... ... an Orten, wo wir uns bulon kelen kɔnɔ. Le commerçant ambulant
versammeln ... kɔlɔn in jula au fond de ce ne peut réussir en restant dan uns seul vestibule
puits. at the bottom of this well. am Grund (proverbe). The travelling merchant cannot
dieses Brunnens. Ni i tɛ ɲɛli kɛ, i tɛ weele succeed by remaining in one vestibule
tiɲɛni jula. Si tu n'est pas capable d'arranger (proverb). Der Straßenhändler kann nicht
erfolgreich sein, wenn er nur in einem
les choses, on ne t'appellera pas là où il y a des
dégâts (proverbe). If you are not able to fix
Vorraum bleibt (Sprichwort).
things, we will not call you where there is 2 • Nom. commerce; trade; Handel.
damage (proverb). Wenn du nicht in der Lage julɔn Verbe. constituer, se fonder, instituer,
bist, die Dinge zu regeln, wirst du nicht
commencer; constitute, to found, establish,
gerufen werden, wo es Schaden gibt
institute, enact, set up; gründen, bilden,
(Sprichwort).
erstellen, anfangen. synonyme: jujɔn.
julajugu [ù-à] Morphemes: jula-jugu. Nom.
julujulu Adverbe. gluant; sticky, slimy; klebrig,
1 • impudique; shameless, immodest, indecent;
schamlos, unverschämt, unzüchtig. Cɛ
schleimig. A daji bɛ julujulu. Elle a la salive
gluante. She has slimy saliva. Sie hat
julajugu don. C'est un homme impudique. He
schleimigen Speichel. synonyme: bagabaga ,
is a shameless man. Er ist ein unzüchtiger 4
Mann.
yuluyulu.
2 • dégueulasse; disgusting; eklig, widerlich, juma [ú-á] Emprunt de : arabe. variante: juman.
ekelhaft.
Nom. vendredi; Friday; Freitag.
3 • personne obsédée par le sexe; person synonyme: wojuma, jumadon, gejuma.
obsessed with sex; Person mit Sexobsession.
jumadon Jula: jumalon. n.comp. vendredi; Friday;
julajuguya [ù-à-ù-ù] Nom. 1 • impudeur, débauche;
Freitag. synonyme: wojuma, gejuma, juma.
impudence, debauchery; Unzüchtigkeit,
Ausschweifung. jumaseli Morphemes: juma-seli. n.comp. prière de
2 • dégueulasserie; disgusting; ekelhaft, Ekel. vendredi à la mosquée; Friday prayers at the
Boci laban ye julajuguya ye, Le pet finit par mosque; Freitagsgebet in der Moschee.
la dégueulasserie (proverbe). The fart ends in jumɛ [ù-ɛ́] variante: jumɛfinba. Nom. marabout;
disgust (proverb). Der Furz endet im Ekel
Marabout Stork; Storch (Art). Category: Bird.
(Sprichwort).
leptoptilos crumeniferus.
julakan [ù-á] Morphemes: jula-kan. synonyme: jula.
jumɛfin Morphemes: jumɛ-fin. Nom. bec ouvert,
Nom. langue dioula; Dioula language;
espèce d'oiseau; kind of bird, African
Djula-sprache.
open-bill; Glanzklaffschnabel,
julakolon adj. nu (au moins des parties intimes); Mohrenklaffschnabe. Category: Bird.
naked (at least private parts); nackt anastomus lamelligerus.
(zumindest im Intimbereich). a julakolon jumɛjɛ [ù-ɛ̀] Morphemes: jumɛ-jɛ. Nom. tantale ibis;
ferekete complètement nu. completely naked. yellow-billed stork; Nimmersatt.
völlig nackt. Category: Bird. ibis ibis, Mycteria ibis.
julamɔbili comparer: lɔgɔlɔmobili. n.comp. véhicule synonyme: kamalencɛɲi.
de transport; vehicle for transporting; jumɛn [ú-ã̀] Jula: juman. variante: juman, jɛɛn.
Transportwagen, Transportfahrzeug. inter. lequel, laquelle, quel, quelle; which, that;
julata [ù-à-á] variante: jurɔta. Nom. sexe, parties welcher, welches, welche. Fani juman
sexuelles; sex, genitals; Geschlecht, tununa? Quel habit est perdu ? Which garment
Geschlechtsteil. Category: Body. is lost? Welches Kleid ist verloren gegangen?
julatigɛ [ù-á-ì] Verbe. commencer, entamer; begin; jumɛnw Jula: jumanw. inter. lesquels, lesquelles,
beginnen. An ka baara kura bɛ julatigɛ tuma quels, quelles ?; which ones?; welche? O ye
jumɛn ? Quand commence notre nouveau den jumɛnw ko ye ? De quels enfants
travail ? When does our new job start? Wann s'agit-il ? What children are they? Welche
beginnt unser neuer Job? Kinder sind das?
29/01/2026 332

juminɛ juru
juminɛ [ǔ-ì-ɛ́] Verbe. commencer, débuter, avoir son junkun [ú] variante: jɔnkɔn, jɔnkɔri. Nom. bosse
origine; to begin, to start, to have its origins; (animale); hump (animal); Buckel (Tier),
anfangen, beginnen, seine Ursprung haben. Höcker. misi junkunntanw les vaches sans
N'o tɛ, disɔngɔ kɔni juminɛna bonya kan. A bosses. cows without humps. Kühe ohne
part cela, l'impôt eut son origine dans des Höcker. Category: Parts of an animal.
contributions volontaires. Apart from this, the
jura [ù] Nom. 1 • commerçant, colporteur,
tax originated in voluntary contributions.
pourvoyeur; merchant, peddler, purveyor;
Abgesehen davon ging die Steuer auf
freiwillige Beiträge zurück.
Kaufmann, Hausierer, Lieferant, Händler.
Juraw ni worow tɛmɛtɔ filɛ ! Regardez les
juminɛkan [ù-ì-ɛ̀] Nom. introduction,
commerçants qui passent avec leurs colas !
commencement, préambule; introduction, Look at the merchants passing by with their
beginning, foreword; Einleitung, Anfang, colas! Schauen Sie sich die Händler an, die mit
Vorwort. Ko min juminɛkan ye i ju biri yan, ihren Colas vorbeikommen! synonyme: jula .
1
mɔgɔ b'o labancogo dɔn ? Quelque chose qui
2 • Dioula; Jula people; Jula Leute.
commence par «baisse son cul par ici», est-ce synonyme: jula .
2
qu-on sait comment ça va terminer (proverbe).
Something that starts with “get your ass down juradɔlɔki [ù-à] Nom. vêtement ouvert sur le côté;
here”, do you know how it will end (proverb). garment open on the side. Category: Clothing.
Etwas, das mit «Leg deinen Arsch hier»
jurajugu n.comp. personne à partenaire sexuels
beginnt, weiß man nicht, wie es enden wird
(Sprichwort).
multiples; person with several sexual
partners; Person, die mit mehreren Personen
jun 1 [ú] Jula: juun. Nom. pied-d'éléphant (arbre); sexuell verkehrt.
kind of tree; Baumart. Ji laban ye junkɔrɔla jurakɛ [ù-à] variante: julakɛ. Nom. commerçant,
ye. L'eau finit par se retrouver au pied de
dioula; trader; Händler. Category: Worker,
l'arbre jun (proverbe). The water ends up occupation.
finding itself at the foot of the jun tree
(proverb). Das Wasser landet schließlich am
juramɔbili comparer: nɔgɔnman. n.comp. simple, non
Fuße des Jun-Baums (Sprichwort). compliqué; simple, not complicated; einfach,
Category: Tree. Mitragyna inermis. nicht kompliziert, unkompliziert. cɛnin ti
jun [ú] Nom. 1 • partie de volaille cuite composée juramɔbili ye
2
des côtes et d'une aile; cooked poultry part jurancɔgɔn [ù-à] Nom. souchet comestible, pois
consisting of ribs and a wing; Geflügelteil aus
sucré; yellow nutsedge, sweet pea; gelbe
Rippen und Flügel. N b'a jun de fɛ. Je veux Nusspflanze, süße Erbse. cyperus esculentus.
l'aile du poulet. I want the chicken wing. Ich
jurasonkalanin [ù-à] variante: darasonkalanin.
will den Hühnerflügel.
Nom. millepertuis; tree species; Baumart.
2 • quartier avant (côtes et une patte) d'un
Category: Tree. feretia apodanthera.
animal; front quarter (ribs and one leg) of an
animal; vorderes Viertel (Rippen und Pfote) juru [ù-ú] Nom. 1 • corde, fil, lien, cordeau; rope,
1
eines Tieres. string, strap, line; Schnur, Strick, Faden,
junjun [ú] Verbe. bercer, secouer, tapoter, semer (en Band, Leine. fitinɛjuru mèche de lampe. lamp
1
laissant tomber); rock, shake, tap, sow wick. Lampendocht.
(dropping); wiegen, schaukeln, schütteln, 2 • serpent (surnom du serpent); snake (snake's
klopfen, säen (fallen lassen). ka den junjun : nickname); Schlange (Spitzname der
ka a yigiyigi dɔɔnin yalasa a bɛ sunɔgɔ Schlange). synonyme: kala 6 .
walima a b'a dade. bercer un enfant : le 3 • queue (d'un fruit); tail (of a fruit); Stiel
secouer doucement pour qu'il s'endorme ou se (einer Frucht).
taise. rock a child: shake him gently so that he juru [ù] synonyme: fɔlifɛn juruman. Nom.
2
falls asleep or remains silent. Wiegen Sie ein
instrument à corde, luth; string instrument,
Kind: Schütteln Sie es sanft, damit es
lute; Saiteninstrument, Laute. I ni juru !
einschläft oder schweigt.
(salutation d'encouragement à celui qui joue
junjun 2 [ú] variante: sunsun. Verbe. rythmer, d'un instrument à cordes). (greeting of
cadencer, ralentir le rythme; to pace, to slow encouragement to someone who plays a
down the rhythm; Tempo machen, den stringed instrument). (Ermutigender Gruß an
Rhythmus verlangsamen. A' ye dunun jemanden, der ein Saiteninstrument spielt).
junjun. Jouez doucement du tambour. Play Category: Musical instrument.
the drum gently. synonyme: kurusigi.
29/01/2026 333

juru jurukisɛ
juru [ù-ú] Nom. dette, crédit, redevance, créances, jurudonna [ù-ù-ò] variante: jnurumatigi,
3
débit; debt, credit, rental charge, fee; Schuld, jurudɔnɔnna. Nom. 1 • créancier, prêteur;
Verpflichtung, Miete, Kosten. ka juru don creditor, lender; Kreditgeber, Gläubiger,
sɛnɛkɛlaw la accorder un emprunt aux Geldverleiher. ... jiginna bɛ don jurudonnaw
agriculteurs. grant a loan to farmers. den ni jurutalaw cɛ. ... des ressentiments naissent
Landwirten einen Kredit gewähren. Ala ka entre prêteurs et emprunteurs. ...resentments
juru bɛ mɔgɔ bɛɛ la. Tous les hommes ont arise between lenders and borrowers. ...
une dette envers Dieu (proverbe). All men owe Zwietracht zwischen Kreditgebern und
a debt to God (proverb). Alle Menschen Kreditnehmern. synonyme: jurumantigi.
schulden Gott etwas (Sprichwort). ka juru 2 • emprunteur; borrower; Kreditnehmer.
tigɛ muso nɔfɛ. être amoureux d'une femme. jurufilen [ù-ù] Nom. 1 • ensemble constitué d'un
to be in love with a woman. in eine Frau
récipient et d'une corde pour puiser de l'eau;
verliebt sein. Category: Finance.
Set consisting of a container and a rope to
juru don variante: jurudon. vi. prêter, faire crédit; draw water; Behälter und Seil zum Schöpfen
lend (give); ausleihen, leihen, borgen. von Wasser. Jurufilen di yan n ka ji bɔ i ye.
Category: Finance. Donne-moi la puisette que je tire de l'eau pour
toi. Give me the bucket that I can draw water
juru kunko [ù-ú ù-ó] Nom. charge de la dette; debt
for you. Gib mir den Eimer, damit ich Wasser
burden; Schuldenlast. Category: Finance. für dich schöpfen kann. Category: Water,
juru mɛni Nom. durée du prêt; length of the loan, Container.
duration of the loan; Dauer der Geld-leihe, 2 • puisette, outre; bucket for drawing water;
Zeitraum der Geld-leihe. Category: Finance. Schöpfeimer.
juru sara vi. rembourser un prêt; to pay off a debt, to jurufiyɛ 1 [ù-ù-í-ɛ́] Nom. puisard; drain cover,
repay; eine Schuld abbezahlen, abzahlen, cesspool, sump, absorbing well; Sickergrube.
tilgen. Category: Finance. jurufiyɛ Morphemes: juru-fiyɛ. n.comp. puisette,
2
juru ta Verbe. emprunter, prêter, prendre (donner) en récipient et corde pour sortir de l’eau d’un
crédit; borrow, lend; ausleihen, entlehnen, puits; container and rope for drawing water
leihen, borgen. Category: Finance. from a well; Wasserschöpfer und Seil.
Category: Container.
juruden [ù-ù] Morphemes: juru-den. n.comp. corde,
ficelle; rope, string; Schnur, Strick. Nsira, a
jurukani n.comp. réclamation; complaint;
fu bɛ kɛ juruden ye fana. Le baobab, sa fibre
Beschwerde, Reklamation.
sert aussi à fabriquer de la ficelle. The baobab, jurukaniden Nom. commis chargé par les grands
its fiber is also used to make twine. Die Fasern commerçants de récupérer les dettes,
des Affenbrotbaums werden auch zur récupérateur les dettes; clerk charged by large
Herstellung von Bindfäden verwendet. merchants with recovering debts, clerk
jurudon [ù-ú-ǒ] Nom. 1 • crédit, emprunt; credit, recovering debts; Angestellter, der von
Großhändlern mit der Eintreibung von
loan, borrowing; Kredit, Anleihe,
Schulden beauftragt wird, Schuldeneintreiber.
Kreditaufnahme. Jurudon gɛlɛyara. Il est
Category: Worker, occupation.
difficile d’obtenir un crédit. It is difficult to
obtain credit. Es ist schwierig, einen Kredit zu
jurukanisɛbɛ n.comp. réclamation écrite; written
erhalten. Category: Finance. complaint; schriftliche Beschwerde.
2 • faire crédit, prêter; give credit, lend; Kredit jurukelen [ù-ù] Morphemes: juru-kelen.
geben, leihen. Ni i ye boci jurudon
variante: jurukelennin. Nom. monocorde,
kongosira la, i y'a jurudon a mɔgɔ la. Si tu
instrument de musique à une seule corde;
fais crédit d'un pet à la tortue, elle te le rendra monochord, single-stringed musical
bien (proverbe). If you give credit to the turtle instrument; Monochord, einsaitiges
for a fart, it will repay you (proverb). Wenn du Musikinstrument. Category: Musical
der Schildkröte Ehre für einen Furz gibst, wird instrument.
sie es dir zurückzahlen (Sprichwort).
jurukelennaman Nom. linéaire; linear, straight;
linear, geradlinig. Category: Mathematics.
jurukisɛ [ù-ù] Morphemes: juru-kisɛ. Nom. corde,
ficelle; rope, string; Seil, Tau, Strick, Schnur.
29/01/2026 334

jurukun juruta
jurukun Nom. le long de; along, alongside; entlang. jurumutɔ Morphemes: jurumu-tɔ. Nom. pécheur;
Baganmara bɛ sɛbɛkɔrɔ kɛ ba Joliba sinner; Sünder. synonyme: jurumukɛla,
jurukun fɛ. L'élevage est beaucoup pratiqué jurumutigi.
tout au long du fleuve. Livestock is widely
jurunaani [ù-ù] Nom. luth à quatre corde; lute with
practised along the river. Die Viehzucht wird
entlang des gesamten Flusses stark praktiziert.
four strings; Laute mit vier Saiten. Jurunaani
synonyme: lɔfɛ, jɔfɛ. gosila tɛ jurusaba filɛ fɔlifɛn gɛlɛn ye. Celui
qui joue du luth à quatre cordes ne considère
jurula [ù-ù] Nom. lien de descendance, lignée;
pas le luth a trois cordes comme un
descent, line of descent, lineage; instrument difficile (proverbe). He who plays
Abstammung, Linie. ... bana min don, a bɛ the four-stringed lute does not consider the
sɔrɔ jurula fɛ. ... c'est une maladie qu'on peut three-stringed lute a difficult instrument
avoir par sa lignée. ...it's a disease that you (proverb). Wer die viersaitige Laute spielt,
can have through your lineage. ...es ist eine hält die dreisaitige Laute nicht für ein
Krankheit, die Sie durch Ihre Abstammung schwieriges Instrument (Sprichwort).
haben können. Category: Kinship. Category: Musical instrument.
synonyme: juruya. juruninton Morphemes: juru-nin-ton. Verbe. 1 • être
jurumantigi [ù-ù-à] variante: jurumatigi. Nom. en file, aller en file indienne; to be in line,
cuing up; in einer Reihe stehen, in einer Reihe
1 • créancier; creditor, mortgagee; Gläubiger.
Ne ka jurumantigi bɛ na n kani. Mon
gehen,, Gänsemarsch. Mɛnɛmɛnɛ
créancier vient me réclamer son argent. My
jurunintonnen bɛ ɲɔgɔn kɔ. Les fourmis
creditor comes to ask me for his money. Mein vont en file indienne. The ants go in single file.
Gläubiger kommt und bittet mich um sein Die Ameisen gehen im Gänsemarsch.
Geld. Category: Finance. 2 • enfiler un à un; put on one by one; einzeln
synonyme: jurudonna, jurutala, jurutigi. anziehen.
2 • débiteur; debtor, mortgagor; Schuldner. jurusaba [ù-ú-à-á] Nom. luth à trois cordes;
jurumu comparer: hakɛ. Emprunt de : arabe. three-string lute; Laute mit drei Saiten.
2
variante: jurumi. Nom. péché, tort, faute; sin, a
Category: Musical instrument.
wrong, fault; Sünde, Vergehen, Verstoss, jurusara [ù-ù] Morphemes: juru-sara. Nom.
Unrecht. jurumu kɛ pécher. sin. sündigen. remboursement (de prêt ou dette);
Jurumu banna. Les fautes sont pardonnées. reimbursement, repayment; Rückzahlung,
Mistakes are forgiven. Fehler werden
Erstattung. I ni ma sɔn jurusara ma, ni i bɛ
vergeben. Ala de bɛ jurumu latɛmɛ. C'est to ka walinafolo kɛ k'i mago ɲɛ, tigɛna bɛ
Dieu qui pardonne les péchés. It is God who na. Si tu ne rembourses pas ta dette et que tu
forgives sins. Es ist Gott, der Sünden vergibt. continues à utiliser l'argent d'autrui pour tes
jurumukɛla comparer: jurumukokɛla.
propre besoins, alors vient la perte de
confiance. If you do not repay your debt and
Morphemes: jurumu-kɛ-la. n.comp. pécheur;
continue to use other people's money for your
sinner; Sünder. Category: Person. own needs, then comes the loss of confidence.
synonyme: jurumutɔ, jurumutigi. Wenn Sie Ihre Schulden nicht zurückzahlen
jurumuko n.comp. acte délictuel; criminal act;
und weiterhin das Geld anderer für Ihre
eigenen Bedürfnisse verwenden, kommt es zu
Kriminelle Aktion, Delikt.
einem Vertrauensverlust. Category: Finance.
jurumukokɛla comparer: jurumukɛla. n.comp. juruta [ù-ú-à] 1 • Verbe. emprunter, prendre ou
pécheur; sinner; Sünder. Category: Person.
donner en crédit, prêter; borrow, loan, lend;
jurumuta See main entry: hakɛ. vt. poser un acte ausleihen, leihen, borgen. Forobacakɛdaw bɛ
2
délictuel à l'endroit de quelqu'un, faire du mal nafolo dilenw ni jurutalen fusuku ... Les
à autrui, pécher; do wrong to somebody, sin services publics gaspillent l'argent qui a été
against; jemandem Unrecht tun, ein donné ou prêté ... Public services are wasting
Verbrechen begehen, sündigen. money that was donated or lent... Öffentliche
jurumutan Morphemes: jurumu-tan. adj. sans péché, Dienste verschwenden Geld, das gespendet
oder geliehen wurde...
innocent; sinless, innocent; ohne Sünde,
sündlos, unschuldig.
2 • Nom. emprunt; loan; Anleihe.
jurumutigi Morphemes: jurumu-tigi. n.comp.
pécheur; sinner; Sünder. Category: Person.
synonyme: jurumukɛla, jurumutɔ.
29/01/2026 335

jurutala k'an si
jurutala [ù-ù-à-á] Morphemes: juru-ta-la. Nom. jutugunin Nom. espèce de plante; kind of plant;
débiteur, emprunteur, créancier; debtor, Pflanze (Art). Category: Grass, herb, vine.
borrower, creditor; Schuldner, Kreditnehmer, biophytum apodiscias.
Gläubiger, Kreditor. Category: Finance. juu [ùú] variante: ju. Nom. cul, derrière, anus,
synonyme: jurumantigi.
1
utérus, sexe féminin; bottom, ass, anus, uterus,
jurutigi Nom. créancier, débiteur; creditor, debtor; female private parts, behind, back; Gesäss,
Gläubiger, Schuldner. Category: Finance. Anus, Uterus, weibliches Geschlechtsteil,
synonyme: jurumantigi. hinter, hinten. Category: Body.
synonyme: kɔda .
1
juruya [ù-ù] Nom. 1 • lignée; lineage. Nin ye án
juu variante: ju. Nom. 1 • base, fondement, raison,
juruya ye, án bɛ bɔ yan. Ceci est notre lignée, 2
cause, source, origine; base, foundation,
nous sommes originaires d'ici. This is our
reason, cause, source, origin; Basis,
lineage, we were born here. Das ist unsere
Fundament, Grund, Ursache, Quelle,
Abstammung, wir sind hier entstanden.
Herkunft, Ursprung.
Category: Kinship. synonyme: kabila, bulonda,
2 • commencement, fond, bout; beginning,
gwa, jurula.
bottom, tip, end; Anfang, Beginn, Grund,
2 • descendant; descendant; Nachkomme, Spitze, Ende.
Nachfahre.
juun bambara: jun. Nom. pied d'éléphant (arbre);
jusiginan Nom. fondement, fondation; foundation;
tree sp; Baumart. Category: Tree. mitragyna
Fundament, Grund, Grundlage. inermis.
juta [ǔ-à] Verbe. commencer, entamer, débuter; juura [ú] Emprunt de : arabe. variante: joora,
start, begin; anfangen, beginnen. ka baro juta yajuura. Verbe. 1 • visiter une mosquée, un lieu
commencer une causerie. start a chat or saint, une tombe; visit a mosque, a holy place,
conversation. ein Gespräch beginnen. a grave; Besuchen Sie eine Moschee, einen
synonyme: jutigɛ. heiligen Ort, ein Grab.
jutigɛ 1 • Verbe. entamer, commencer, débuter, 2 • se recueillir (sur une tombe); to collect (at a
grave); sich sammeln (an einem Grab),
entreprendre, aborder; to start, begin,
Einkehr (auf einem Grab). ... u kaburu juurali
undertake; anfangen, beginnen, unternehmen,
sich zuwenden. O ye ko de jutigɛlen ye ... ... ... le recueillement sur leurs tombes ... ... the
C'est une chose qui ne fait que débuter ... It’s contemplation on their graves ... ... Andacht an
just beginning to be ... . Das ist erst der Anfang ihren Gräbern ...
... ka foro kura jutigɛ entreprendre la culture juuraya [ú] variante: juuruya. Nom. descendance;
d'un nouveau champ. Start growing a new offspring, descent, descendants;
field. den Anbau eines neuen Feldes in Angriff Nachkommenschaft. A ka juuraya tun ka ca
nehmen. synonyme: juta.
... Sa descendance était très nombreuse ... His
2 • Verbe. ruiner, saper, démolir; ruin, descendants were very numerous ... Seine
demolish; ruinieren, kaputt machen. Nachkommenschaft war sehr zahlreich ...
3 • Nom. début, commencement; beginning; Category: Kinship.
Anfang. ... kabi a jutigɛ fo ka taa a laban. ... juwɛnkalo Nom. juin; June; Juni. Category: Weather.
du début à la fin. ... from start to finish. ... von
synonyme: dannikalo, zuwɛnkalo.
Anfang bis Ende.
K - k
k'a dɔgɔ ni ... ye expr. plus petit que; smaller than; k'an b'u fo expr. que nous les saluons (salutation à
kleiner als. Category: Mathematics, Sign, quelqu'un qui s'en va); give them our greetings
Symbol. (greeting to someone leaving); wir lassen sie
k'a la ka kan See main entry: . expr. sur cette base; on
grüssen.
that base; aus diesem Grund. k'án bɛn interj. au revoir (salutation); goodbye
k'an [á] expr. que nous; that we; daß wir, daß uns.
(greeting); auf Wiedersehen (Gruss).
Ala k'an tanga juguman ma. Que Dieu nous k'an si expr. bonne nuit (à celui qui part se coucher);
préserve du mal. May God protect us from evil. good night (to someone going to sleep); gut
Möge Gott uns vom bösen bewahren. Nacht (wenn jemand schlafen geht).
29/01/2026 336

k'aw ni hɛɛrɛ bɛɛn ka
k'aw ni hɛɛrɛ bɛɛn expr. bon appétit à vous; enjoy ka [á] comparer: kana. synonyme: ma.
4
your food; guten Appetit, geniesst das Essen. variante: ye. part. marque de souhait ou ordres,
k'i expr. que te; may you; möge dich. Ala k'i kisi a le projectif, optatif; marking of a wish or
commands; Markierung eines Wunsches oder
ɲɔgɔn ma. Que Dieu t'épargne des choses
Befehls. Ala ka baraka don den na. Que
semblables. . May god protect you from
Dieu bénisse l'enfant. May God bless this
similar things. Möge Gott dich vor
desgleichen schützen.
child. Möge Gott dieses Kind segnen. A ko
Musa ka na. Il dit que Moussa vienne (doit
k’a ta prepos. à partir de; from; seit, ab, von, vom. N
venir). He said that Moussa should come. Er
ye mobili boli k’a ta Bobo fo Ouaga. J’ai sag das Moussa kommen soll. An ka julakan
conduit la voiture de Bobo à Ouagadougou. I
fɔ. Parlons dioula. Let's speak Dioula.
drove from Bobo to Ouagadougou. Ich fuhr
Sprechen wir Dioula. Ala k'a balo. Que Dieu
von Bobo bis nach Ouagadougou. k’a ta
lui donne une longue vie. May God give him a
sɔgɔma fo suu du matin jusqu’au soir. from
long life. Möge Gott ihm ein langes Leben
morning until night. vom Morgen bis zum
geben.
Abend.
ka [á] comparer: ye (yi). aux. marque de
ka [á] comparer: taa. conj. marque du possessif; 5
1 l'impératif pour la deuxième personne pluriel;
possessive marker; Besitz Markierung, von.
imperative marker for first person plural;
Ne ka so. Ma maison. My house. Mein Haus. Befehls Markierung für erste Person
An ka jamana. Notre pays. Our country. Mehrzahl. Án ka ji min! Buvons l'eau ! Let's
Unser Land. U yɛrɛ ka kan. Leur propre drink the water! Trinken wir doch das Wasser!
langue. Their own language. Ihre eigene ka [à] Verbe. 1 • épargner; spare; verschonen.
Sprache. Den ka fani. A ka fani. L'habit de
6
Bana kara Amadu la dɛ! La maladie a
l'enfant. Son habit. The clothe of the child. His
épargné Amadou. The sickness spared
clothe. Das Kleid des Kindes. Sein Kleid.
Amadou. Die Krankheit hat Amadou
ka 2 [á] part. particule reliant un sujet et un adjectif verschont.
prédicat; particle linking subject and 2 • échouer, buter, achopper; fail, stumble;
predicative adjective; bejahender Wert in versagen, durchfallen, mangeln, stolpern,
Adjektiv Sätzen (es ist ...) A ka ɲi. C’est bien. straucheln. A kara a ka fali la dɛ ! Il a échoué
It’s good. Es ist gut. O ka kɛnɛ. Ils vont bien. à dresser son âne. He failed to train his donkey.
They are well. Es geht ihnen gut. A ka di Es gelang ihm nicht, seinen Esel zu dressieren.
kosɛbɛ ! C'est très bon ! It's very good! Es ist 3 • nier, ne pas avouer; deny, not confess;
sehr gut! leugnen, nicht gestehen, bestreiten. Ni
dosokɔrɔ ye i ka a myɛ na, kolokuru caman
ka [à] part. 1 • marque de l'infinitif, marque de
3
bɛ a majɛ. Si le gros chien ne veut pas avouer
citation de verbes ; infinitive marker, to ..;
qu'il raffole de viande, il se privera de
Infinitiv Marker. ka taga, ka kuma, ka
beaucoup d'os (proverbe). If the big dog
tagama aller, parler, marcher. to go, to speak,
doesn't want to admit that he loves meat, he
so walk. gehen, sprechen, marschieren. will deprive himself of a lot of bones (proverb).
2 • connecteur verbal, lien entre des verbes Wenn der große Hund nicht zugeben will, daß
successifs , et ... et ... et ..; link between verbs, er Fleisch liebt, wird er sich viele Knochen
and ... and ..; Bindewort zwischen Verben ... entziehen (Sprichwort). A y'i ka sonyɛni na. Il
und ... und. A taamana ka bin, ka wuli, ka a nié le vol. He denied the theft. Er bestritt den
boli. Il (ou elle) a marché, est tombé, s'est levé, Diebstahl.
a couru. He walked, fell, stood up and ran. Er ka [à] Verbe. finir, cesser, terminer; finish, cease,
7
ging, stürzte, stand auf und rannte.
stop, end; aufhören, beenden, fertig machen,
3 • valeur affirmative hortative, élément fertig sein. A kara. C'est fini. It is finished. Es
connectif permettant de coordonner plusieurs
ist fertig.
énoncés ayant le même sujet, continuation des
événements; connective for sentences with the ka 8 [á] Adverbe. complètement, juste, exactement, à
same subject, continuation of events; fond; completely, right, exactly, to the full;
Bindewort um Sätze mit dem selben Subjekt ganz und gar, völlig, genau, bis zum letzten. U
zu verbinden, Fortgang der Ereignisse. A y'a
ye ji min ka! Ils ont bu toute l'eau. They drank
ye k'a fo. Il l'a vu et l'a salué. He saw him and
all the water. Sie haben das ganze Wasser
greeted him. Er sah ihn und grüßte ihn. getrunken. ... k'o kɛ ka ! ... le faire
exactement ! ... do it exactly! ... genau das tun!
29/01/2026 337

-ka ka kan ni ... ye
-ka variante: -kan. suf. suffixe qui indique ka ban Adverbe. déjà; already; schon, bereits. A
2
l’origine; suffix marking origin; Suffix, das die tagara ka ban. Il est déjà parti. He has
Herkunft anzeigt, Bewohner von. Bobokaw ka already left. Er ist schon gegangen. Ne tigɛ
kɛnɛ ? Comment vont les gens de Bobo ? How kora ka ban. Je me suis déjà lavé les mains. I
are the people in Bobo? Wie geht es den have already washed my hands. Ich habe
Leuten von Bobo? yannɔkaw les gens d'ici meine Hände schon gewaschen. Nɛnɛ banna
même. people right here. Leute hier. ka ban. Le temps froid a déjà fini. The cold
ka ... to ... expr. pendant, lorsque; while; während, weather has already finished. Die kalte
als. Ka n to Lɔnduru... Lorsque j’étais à
Jahreszeit ist bereits zu Ende.
Londres... While I was in London... Als ich in ka bon walima ka dɔgɔ expr. plus ou moins; more
London war... K'a to yen Pendant qu’il y était. or less; mehr oder weniger.
While he was there. Während er dort war. Ne Category: Mathematics.
ye lakɔli daminɛ ka n si to san 5 la. J’ai ka fara o kan comparer: fara . conj. en plus, de plus;
2
commencé à aller à l’école quand j’avais 5 ans. in addition; mehr noch, dazu, zudem.
I started school when I was 5 years old. Ich
begann die Schulzeit als ich fünf war. K’i to
ka fisa comparer: o ka fisa. expr. vaut mieux; is better
dumuni na, Seyidu bɔra. Pendant que tu than; ist besser als. Den wolo ka fisa ni jɔn
mangeais, Seidou est sorti. While you were san ye. Proverbe: Mettre au monde un enfant
eating, Seidou went out. Während du saßest, vaut mieux qu'acheter un esclave. Proverb: To
ging Seidou hinaus. give birth to a child is better than to buy a
slave. Sprichwort: ein Kind gebähren ist besser
ka a da a kan conj. parce que, à cause de, car;
als einen Sklaven zu kaufen.
because; weil, wegen. O kɛlen, fa jɔrɔla
ka jan ni ... ye expr. plus grand que; bigger than;
dɔɔnin, ka a da a kan, a bɛ so in cogoya
grösser als. Category: Mathematics, Sign,
dɔn. Alors, le père s'inquiéta un peu, car il
Symbol.
savait comment était ce cheval. Then the father
ka kan expr. égal; equal, same; dasselbe, gleich. Son
became a little worried, because he knew what 1
this horse was like. Da war der Vater ein wenig ni nanbaramɔgɔ bɛɛ ka kan. Un voleur et un
besorgt, denn er wußte, wie das Pferd sich méchant sont égales. A thief and evildoer are
benahm. synonyme: ka la a kan. the same. ein Dieb und ein Übeltäter sind
ka a sɔrɔ [à à ɔ̀] conj. alors que, sans que, avant que, et
dasselbe. synonyme: bi bɛn.
que; while, without that, before that, and; ka kan 2 [á ã́ à] variante: kan ka. expr. il faut que,
während, ohne daß, und daß. Jamayɔrɔ o devoir, doit (exprime l'obligation); it has to, it
jamayɔrɔ, Musa de bɛ ɲɛkun nɔfɛ, ka a sɔrɔ must, should; müssen, nötig sein, sollen. A ka
ale yɛrɛ ye mɔgɔ sɔnjugu ye. Dans toutes les kan ka bɔ. Il doit sortir (il faut qu'il sorte). He
manifestations publiques, Moussa est derrière has to get out. Er muss rausgehen.
les gens importants, alors que c'est un homme ka kan ka [á ã́ à] expr. avoir droit, mériter, devoir,
mauvais. In all public demonstrations, Moussa
falloir, s'attendre à; have the right on, deserve,
is behind the important people, while he is a
must have to, should, ought to, expect; das
bad man. In allen öffentlichen
Recht haben auf, verdienen, müssen, sollen,
Demonstrationen steht Musa hinter den
erwarten dass. A ka kan ka na. Il doit venir.
wichtigen Leuten, obwohl er ein böser Mann
ist. Dɔ bɛ mɔɔsi ka bɔ ka a sɔrɔ e ma bɔ o He has to come. Er muss kommen.
bɔtuma kala ma. L'un sort tout doucement ka kan ni ... ye comparer: kan 2 . expr. mériter; merit,
sans que tu t'aperçoives qu'il est sorti. One deserve; verdienen. A ka kan ni saya ye. Il
comes out slowly without you noticing that it mérite la mort. He deserves to die. Er verdient
has come out. Einer kommt langsam heraus, den Tod. I ka kan ni nɔɔrɔ ni bonya ni
ohne dass du merkst, dass er herauskam.
sebagaya ye. Tu es digne de recevoir la
ka a ta... ka a bila... expr. de... jusqu'à..; from... gloire, l’honneur et la puissance. You are
until..; von... bis zu... Ka a ta a tenda la ka na worthy to receive glory and honour and power.
a bonbon la... Du front jusqu'au menton...
Du verdienst Herrlichkeit und Ehre und
Macht. Note: Bible: Jirali 4.11
From the forehead to the chin... Von der Stirn
bis zum Kinn...
ka ban expr. et fini; and finished; und beendet. A ye
1
baara kɛ ka ban. Il a fini de travailler. He
finished working. Er hat aufgehört zu arbeiten.
29/01/2026 338

ka kɛɲa ni ... ye kaalakaala
ka kɛɲa ni ... ye expr. selon; in accordance with, kaadɔkan variante: kadɔkan. Variant: dɔgɔnɔkan.
according to; laut, nach, gemäss, n.comp. langue des Dogon; Dogon language;
entsprechend. ka kɛɲa ni laada ye selon la Sprache des Dogon Volkes.
tradition. according to tradition. Gemäss der Category: Language.
Tradition. ka kɛɲa ni sariya ye selon la loi. kaafiri [á] Emprunt de : arabe. variante: kafiri. Nom.
according to the law. Laut Gesetz. ka kɛɲa ni 1 • cafre, païen, mécréant, non-musulman,
Ala ka kuma ye selon la parole de Dieu. animiste, infidèle; pagan, unbeliever,
according to God’s word. Nach Gottes Wort. non-Muslim, animist; Heide, Ungläubiger,
nicht-muslimisch, Animist. Silamɛ ni kaafiri
ka kɔrɔ Adverbe. autrefois, auparavant; before, in the
man di. Les musulmans et les païens ne
past; früher, damals.
s'entendent pas. Muslims and pagans do not
ka la a kan expr. parce que, car, à cause de; because, get along. Muslime und Heiden verstehen sich
than, for; weil, wegen, denn, da. O kɛlen, fa nicht. Category: Religion.
jɔrɔla dɔɔnin, ka la a kan, a bɛ so in cogoya 2 • costaud; strong, tough; kräftig, groß. wulu
dɔn. Alors, le père s'inquiéta un peu, car il kaafiri chien énorme et costaud. huge and
savait comment était ce cheval. Then the father sturdy dog. Riesiger und kräftiger Hund.
became a little worried, because he knew what 3 • toute personne portant l'uniforme
this horse was like. Da war der Vater ein wenig (douaniers, policiers...); any person wearing a
besorgt, denn er wußte, wie das Pferd sich uniform (customs, police...); Personen in
benahm. synonyme: ka a da a kan, jango, Uniform (Zollbeamte, Polizisten...)
sabu la, barisa, sabu 1 , bawo, bari 1 . kaafiriya [á] 1 • Verbe. être ou devenir païen; be or
ka man ka [á ã́ à] expr. il ne faut pas; must not, become a pagan; Heiden sein oder werden.
should not; soll nicht. A man kan ka taga. Il Ala ko án kana kaafiriya. Dieu nous demande
ne faut pas qu'il parte. He should not go away.
de ne pas être païens. God asks us not to be
Er soll nicht fortgehen.
pagans. Gott verlangt von uns, nicht heidnisch
zu sein.
ka ɲi juste; right; richtig. synonyme: bɛnnin lo, ten
2 • Nom. paganisme, animisme, état de celui qui
don. refuse ou ne connaît pas l'Islam; paganism,
ka taa a fɛ expr. de plus en plus, de plus belle,
animism, state of the one who refuses or does
not know Islam; Heidentum, Animismus,
progressivement; more and more, more
Zustand des Ablehnenden oder Unwissenden.
beautiful, gradually; immer mehr, nach und
Category: Religion.
nach. Den mana san kelen sɔrɔ, i ka sindili
kaajibina [à-ì-ì-á] Emprunt de : arabe. Nom. fausse
dɔgɔya ka taa a fɛ. Quand l'enfant atteint une
année, diminue-lui le sein progressivement.
accusation, mensonge; false accusation, lie;
falsche Anschuldigung, Lüge. A ye kaajibina
When the child reaches one year, gradually
decrease his breast. Wenn das Kind ein Jahr tigɛ. Il a gravement menti. He lied gravely. Er
alt ist, sollte das Stillen schrittweise reduziert hat uns ernsthaft angelogen.
werden. A kilo sɔngɔ bɛ jaasi ka taa a fɛ. Le kaakaan [àá-àá] variante: kaakaa. num. petit calao à
prix au kilo diminue de plus en plus. The price
bec rouge; African Pied Horn-bill; Vogel
per kilo is decreasing more and more. Der
(Art). Category: Bird. synonyme: ntolen.
Preis pro Kilo sinkt immer weiter.
kaabɔ synonyme: gaala. Nom. huître; oyster; Auster. kaako [á] variante: kaakɔ, kaanko, kaankɔ. Nom.
Category: Small animals. synonyme: gaala ,
coquillage bivalve, huître, moule; bivalve
1
shell, oyster, mussel; Muschel, Auster. Daga
kaako.
sɛnɛ bɛ siɲɛ ni kaako ye. On gratte le dépôt
kaabɔ siya dɔ [á-ɔ́ í-á ɔ́] Nom. moule; mussel; de la marmite avec un coquillage. Scrape the
Muschel. Category: Small animals. pot deposit with a shell. Der Topf wird mit
kaadɔ [á] variante: kadɔ. Nom. Dogon (ethnie); einer Muschel ausgekratzt. synonyme: kaabɔ.
Dogon (ethnic group); Dogon Volksgruppe. ... kaalakaala [à-à] Verbe. 1 • se promener en flânant,
kaadɔw ka mara la. ... dans la région des marcher en traînant; strolling around, walking;
Dogons. ... in the Dogon region. ... in der Spaziergänge. A bɛ kaalakaala la yɔrɔw la. Il
Dogon-Region. Category: Community. Name traîne à gauche et à droite. It drags left and
given to Dogon by Peuls - meaning ’piment’, right. Er spaziert nach links und rechts.
strong and malicious. synonyme: dɔgɔnɔ. 2 • flânerie; strolling; Bummel.
29/01/2026 339

kaale kaana
kaale [à] variante: nkaale. Nom. quenouille; distaff, kaama [á] variante: nkaama. Nom. non décortiqué
tassel; Spindel. ka kɔɔrimugu meleke kaale (riz, fonio); unpeeled (rice, fonio); ungeschält
la enrouler du fil de coton autour d'une (Reis, Fonio). O finin kaama ka ca a kisɛ ye,
quenouille. wrap cotton thread around a mɔgɔ t'o dɔn. Personne ne sais si le «fonio»
distaff. Wickeln Sie einen Baumwollfaden um non décortiqué est en plus grande quantité que
einen Spinnrocken. le «fonio» décortiqué (proverbe). No one
kaalenin [à-è] Nom. pagne noir et blanc des femmes;
knows if the unpeeled «fonio» is in greater
quantity than the peeled «fonio» (proverb).
women's black and white cloth;
Niemand weiß, ob das ungeschälte «fonio» in
Schwarz-weißer Stoff für Damen.
grösserer Menge vorhanden ist als das
kaalimu [á] variante: kaalima. Nom. chants de geschälte «fonio» (Sprichwort).
1
louange à Dieu; songs of praise to God; Lieder kaan [ã́] bambara: kan. Nom. 1 • cou, gorge, col;
zum Lob Gottes. Silamɛw bɛ kaalimu da neck, throat; Nacken, Genick, Hals, Kehle.
ntɛnɛnsu ni jumasu. Les musulmans font des Category: Body.
chants de louange à Dieu les nuits du dimanche 2 • voix, chant; voice, song; Stimme, Lied. I
au lundi et du jeudi au vendredi. Muslims sing
kan bɛ cɛ juman ma ? Tu parles de quel
songs of praise to God on the nights of Sunday
homme ? Which man are you talking about?
to Monday and Thursday to Friday. In den
Von welchem Mann sprichst du?
Nächten von Sonntag auf Montag und von
Donnerstag auf Freitag singen Muslime 3 • langue, parole, le parler; language, speech;
Loblieder auf Gott. Sprache, das Reden, Sprechen, Rede. Kaan
kaalimu [á] variante: kaalima. Nom. porte-plume,
caman bi fɔ Burukina kɔnɔ. On parle
2
beaucoup de langues au Burkina Faso. Lots of
calame, plume ou stylet pour écrire (à l'école
languages are spoken in Burkina Faso. In
coranique); pen holder, quill or stylus for
Burkina Faso werden viele Sprachen
writing (at the Koranic school); Stifthalter,
gesprochen.
Feder oder Griffel zum Schreiben (in der
Koranschule). A ye kaalimu ta, a y'a su daba
4 • son, bruit; sound, noise; Ton, Schall, Lärm.
la. Il prit le porte-plume, il le trempa dans kaana 1 [á] Verbe. 1 • stupéfier par un excès de, se
l'encre. He took the pen holder, and dipped it montrer supérieur à quelqu'un, être trop fort
in ink. Er nahm den Federhalter, und tauchte pour échouer; be stunned by an excess of, show
ihn in Tinte. superior to someone, be too strong to fail;
verblüffen durch übertriebene Leistung, sich
kaalokaala Verbe. fureter, aller de çà de là en
überlegen zeigen, zu stark sein, um zu
regardant; to browse, to go here and there versagen. Ɲɔ y'án kaana. Le mil nous a
looking; stöbern, hierhin und dorthin gehen
stupéfiés par sa quantité. Millet amazed us
und suchen. Muso donna so kɔnɔ, k'i
with its quantity. Hirse überraschte uns mit
kaalokaala, ka bɔ. La femme entra dans la seiner Menge.
maison, fit semblable de chercher puis sortit. 2 • forcer, surpasser les forces de; force,
The woman entered the house, looked around surpass the forces of; erzwingen, Übertreffen
and then went out. Die Frau betrat das Haus, der Kräfte.
sah sich um und ging dann hinaus.
3 • humilier (par un excès de zèle), empêcher
kaalokaalo [à-ò] Nom. paroles insensées, paroles quelqu’un d'obtenir quelque chose; humiliate
sans queue ni tête, bobard; senseless words, (by over-zeal), prevent someone from getting
nonsense words; sinnlose Worte, unsinnige something; demütigen (durch übermäßigen
Worte, Unsinn, Blödsinn. ... nka a ma se ka
Eifer), jemanden davon abzuhalten, etwas zu
bekommen. A fa y'a kaana. Son père l'en a
fosi fɔ kaalokaalo kɔ. ... mais il n'a rien dit
empêché. His father stopped him. Sein Vater
d'autre que des bobards. ... but he has said
hielt ihn auf.
nothing but nonsense. ... aber er hat nichts als
Blödsinn gesagt. synonyme: kɔnɔsutɔmɔnkan. kaana 2 [á] variante: kanna. Nom. 1 • signe, marque à
valeur thérapeutique tracée sur le corps; sign,
mark with therapeutic value traced on the
body; Zeichen, Markierung mit
therapeutischem Wert, die auf den Körper
aufgetragen wird. A taara kaana kɛ ka a
kunkolo kan. Il est allé lui faire des marques
sur la tête. He went to make marks on his head.
Er ging, um sich Markierungen auf dem Kopf
zu machen.
29/01/2026 340

kaana kaari
2 • massage, pommade magique; massage, kaaniba Nom. thé de Gambie; kind of shrub; Pflanze
magic ointment; Massage, Zaubersalbe.
(Art). Category: Bush, shrub. lippia
3 • onguent; ointment; Salbe. Ni i ye kaana in chevalieri; lippia advensis ; lippia multiflora.
mun a da la... Si tu mets cet onguent à synonyme: nkaaninba.
l'endroit de la morsure... If you put this
kaaninmugubara Nom. poivrière; pepper pot,
ointment on the bite site... Wenn Sie diese
Salbe auf die Bissstelle auftragen... pepper shaker; Pfefferstreuer.
Category: Container.
kaana [á] Jula: kagana. Nom. varan du Nil, varan
3 kaankaan [ã̀ã́-ã̀ã]́ synonyme: kɔnɔfin.
d'eau, gueule-tapée; Nile monitor lizard, water
monitor lizard; Nilwaran, Wasserwaran. Fɛn variante: kaakaa. Nom. corbeau d'Afrique,
min ka fisa kooro ma, o tɛ kaana tana ye.
corbeau pie; raven, crow; Rabe.
Category: Bird. corvus albus. synonyme: kaka.
Ce qui est bon pour le varan d'eau n'est pas 3
forcément interdit au varan de terre (proverbe). kaanw kabilasigi Nom. classification des langues;
What is good for the water monitor is not
classification of languages; Sprachen
necessarily forbidden for the land monitor
Klassifikation, Spracheineinteilung.
(proverb). Was für den Nilwaran gut ist, ist für
Category: Language and thought.
den Steppenwaran nicht unbedingt verboten
(Sprichwort). varanus niloticus. kaara 1 [à] variante: karata. Nom. natte grossière,
synonyme: kagana. sécot; coarse mat; grobe Matte. Jiginɛ
kaanagɛlɛn [à-à] variante: kaarɔgɛlɛn. Nom. 1 • dur lankolon, o ye kaara ye. Un grenier vide, ce
n'est que de la paille (proverbe). An empty
(pour quelqu'un), difficile à convaincre,
grain storage is just straw (proverb). Ein
tenace; hard (for someone), hard to convince,
leerer Kornspeicher ist nur Stroh (Sprichwort).
tenacious; hart (für jemanden), schwer zu
überzeugen, hartnäckig.
synonyme: karata.
2 • inflexible, inexorable, entêté, insoumis, kaara [á] Nom. liane à fraise; African peach;
2
indiscipliné; unyielding, inexorable, stubborn,
Afrikanische Pfirsich. Category: Tree. Nauclea
in-submissive, unruly; unnachgiebig, latifolia.
unerbittlich, stur, unbeugsam, ungehorsam.
kaare Emprunt de : français. Nom. car, autocar; bus,
3 • impitoyable, cruel, sadique, insensible; 1
merciless, cruel, sadistic, insensitive; coach; Bus, Reisebus. Category: Travel.
gnadenlos, grausam, sadistisch, unsensibel. kaare Emprunt de : français. synonyme: see fila. Nom.
2
Mɔgɔ kaanagɛlɛn bɛ iko a ma sin min. Les
carré; square; Quadrat.
gens cruels, c'est comme s'ils n'avaient jamais Category: Mathematics.
tété leur mère. Cruel people are as if they had synonyme: naanikɛɲɛjɔlen.
never suckled their mother. Grausame
Menschen sind wie wenn sie nie von ihren kaarebolila Morphemes: kaare-bòli-la. Nom.
Mütter gestillt worden wären. chauffeur de bus; bus driver; Busfahrer.
kaanagɛlɛya [à-à-ɛ̀-ɛ̀] variante: kaarɔgɛlɛya. Nom. Category: Travel, Person.
1 • dureté (d'une personne); hardness (of one kaari 1 [à] variante: kaaki, kaani, kaanki, kaanri.
person); Härte (einer Person). Dennin tɛ a ba Nom. glaires; mucus, phlegm; Schleim. ...
ka kaanagɛlɛnya dɔn, fo n'a ye a ɲamɔgɔkɛ walasa a kaariw ka lajɛ. ... afin d'examiner
sɔnkinin bɔn. La fillette ne connaît la dureté ses glaires. ... to examine his mucus. ... um
de sa mère que le jour où elle renverse le plat ihren Schleim zu untersuchen.
du riz destiné à son amant (proverbe). The girl synonyme: yirikiyiriki, yiriyara 1 .
only knows her mother’s hardness when she
kaari [á] interj. pas du tout !, absolument pas !; Not at
overturns the rice dish intended for her lover 2
(proverb). Das Mädchen kennt die Härte ihrer
all! Absolutely not!; gar nicht! ganz und gar
nicht! Kamalen ko kaari ! Ne tɛ sɔn ka muso
Mutter erst, wenn sie den Reisteller für ihren
Liebhaber umkippt. (Sprichwort). wɛrɛ da n ka dalan na ni e tɛ. Le jeune
2 • opiniâtreté, entêtement, obstination; homme dit : «Non, jamais aucune femme
stubbornness, obstinacy; Hartnäckigkeit, excepté toi ne s'allongera sur ma couche !».
Sturheit, Eigensinn. The young man said, "No, no woman except
you will ever lie on my bed!" Der junge Mann
3 • cruauté, insensibilité, inflexibilité; cruelty,
sagte: «Nein, niemals wird sich außer dir eine
insensitivity, inflexibility; Grausamkeit,
Gefühllosigkeit, Unnachgiebigkeit.
Frau auf meiner Liege legen!».
kaani Nom. poivrier de Guinée, poivre noir; kind of
tree, pepper tree; Strauch (Art).
Category: Bush, shrub. xylopia aethiopica.
29/01/2026 341

kaari kaba
kaari [á] variante: kaariya. 1 • Verbe. être généreux, kaaro [á] Verbe. hurler; scream, yell, howl; schreien,
3 2
être prodigue; be generous, be lavish; heulen. Cɛkɔrɔba kaarola. Le vieux s'est mis
großzügig sein, verschwenderisch sein. à hurler. The old man started to scream. Der
Nafolo bɛ mɔgɔ caman bolo i kaarilen tɛ. alte Mann fing an zu schreien.
Bien des gens sont riches, qui ne sont pas synonyme: kooro .
3
généreux. Many people are rich, but not
generous. Viele Leute sind reich, aber nicht
kaba
1
[á-á] Nom. pierre, roche; stone, rock; Stein,
großzügig. Fels. Kulu fan bɛɛ kaba. La montagne, c'est
2 • Verbe. renoncer; renounce, give up, waive; partout de la roche. The mountain is
verzichten, aufgeben. N tɛ kaari n ka juru kɔ. everywhere rock. Der Berg ist überall aus Fels.
Je ne renonce pas à recouvrer mes crédits. I do kaba comparer: kabanɔgɔ .[à-á] Nom. ciel, nuage;
2 1
not waive my claim. Ich verzichte nicht auf die
sky, cloud; Himmel, Wolke. Kaba finnin lo
Einziehung meiner Kredite.
wa ? Est-ce qu’il va pleuvoir ? (lit. les nuages
3 • Verbe. s'investir totalement, se donner
sont-ils noirs ?) Is it going to rain? (lit. are the
complètement à quelque chose; to be fully
clouds darkened?) Wird es regnen (hat es hat
invested, to give oneself completely to
dunkle Wolken)? Category: Sky, Weather.
something; sich voll und ganz engagieren, sich
voll und ganz auf etwas konzentrieren.
synonyme: ŋala
2
, muranga.
4 • Nom. renoncement, effort, générosité, kaba [à-á] Nom. teigne, maladie de peau se
3
libéralité; renunciation, effort, generosity, caractérisant par des taches; skin disease
liberality; Aufopferung, Anstrengung, characterized by spots; Hautkrankheit,, eine
Großzügigkeit, Freigebigkeit. O tɛ se ka kɛ fleckige Hautkrankheit. Kababana tun b'a la.
habada kaari ani limaniya kɔ. Cela ne peut Elle avait la teigne. She had ringworm. Sie
aucunement se faire sans générosité et hatte einen Ringwurm. Category: Disease.
confiance. This cannot be done without
kaba [à-á] synonyme: mɔnsɔŋɔ, maaɲɔ. Nom.
generosity and trust. Das geht nicht ohne 4
Großzügigkeit und Vertrauen. maïs; maize, corn, sweetcorn; Mais. Kaba tɛ
synonyme: kaarinciya. bilen ka sɔn. Quand le maïs a roussi, il ne
donne plus rien. (proverbe). When the corn is
kaarinci [á] Nom. 1 • généreux, prodigue, libéral, large;
scorched, it gives nothing. (proverb). Wenn
generous, lavish, liberal, broad; großzügig, der Mais verbrannt ist, gibt er nichts mehr.
verschwenderisch, liberal, breit. Ne ka fulakɛ (Sprichwort). Category: Food. zea mais.
kaarinci nana. Mon Peul généreux est revenu. synonyme: maaɲɔ.
My generous Fulani person has returned.
kaba [á-á] vi. s'étonner, stupéfier; be astonished,
Mein großzügiger Fulani ist zurückgekehrt. 5
amazed; erstaunt sein, überrascht sein. A tɛ
2 • qui dit toujours la vérité; who always tells
the truth; der immer die Wahrheit sagt. kaba mɔgɔ ma... Personne ne l'étonne... No
one surprises him... Niemand überrascht ihn...
kaarinciya variante: kaarilenya. Nom. générosité,
synonyme: manwu.
prodigalité, libéralité, largesse; generosity,
lavishness; Großzügigkeit, Verschwendertum, kaba 6 Nom. kobo des savanes, figuier (espèce de);
Freigebigkeit. Ala ye nafolotigiya da ka kind of fig tree; Feigenbaum (Art).
kaarinciya fisaya a ye. Dieu créa la richesse Category: Tree. ficus platyphylla.
et la générosité qui la surpasse. God created kaba Nom. pile électrique, batterie; battery; Batterie.
7
the wealth and generosity that surpasses her.
A kaba tɛna ban ? Les piles ne vont pas être
Gott schuf den Reichtum und die
déchargées? The batteries will not be
Großzügigkeit, die sie übertrifft.
discharged? Werden die Batterien nicht
synonyme: kaari .
3 entladen?
kaaro 1 Verbe. racler, traîner au fond; scrape, drag to kaba [à] Nom. côté, flanc (d'une pirogue); side, flank
8
the bottom; schaben, am Boden liegen. ... fo u (of a canoe); Seite, Flanke (einer Piroge).
ka koro bɛ kaaro faga jula ... ... de sorte que
leur calebasse-louche racle le fond du grand
canari ... ... so that their spoon-of-calabash
scrapes the bottom of the great pot ... ... damit
ihr Kalebassen Löffel den Boden des großen
Topfes abschrubbt ...
29/01/2026 342

kaba kabakoya
kaba [á] Verbe. être arrogant, être fier, se montrer kabafiɲɛ [à-à] Morphemes: kaba-fiɲɛ. Nom.
9
supérieur, avoir une attitude hautaine; be violente bourrasque qui précède la pluie;
arrogant, be proud, be superior, have a violent storm that precedes the rain; heftige
high-minded attitude; arrogant sein, stolz sein, Sturmböen vor dem Regen.
überlegen sein, überheblich sein. Ni faantan kabaforo [à-à-ó-ó] Morphemes: kàba-foro.
kabara, i kunko tɛ dɔgɔya. Quand un pauvre
n.comp. champ de maïs; cornfield, field of
est orgueilleux, ses problèmes ne diminueront maize; Maisfeld.
pas. (proverbe). When a poor man is proud, his
problems will not diminish. (proverb). Wenn
kabafyɛ [à-à] Nom. alentours immédiats du village (où
ein Armer stolz ist, werden seine Probleme l'on sème le maïs); immediate vicinity of the
nicht abnehmen. (Sprichwort). village (where corn is sown); Unmittelbare
Umgebung des Dorfes (wo der Mais gesät
kaba [á] Verbe. 1 • crier, parler d'une voix forte;
10 wird). Kabafyɛ de ye u ka bokɛyɔrɔ ye. C'est
shout, speak in a loud voice; schreien, mit
dans les champs de maïs autour de village
lauter Stimme sprechen. E dun bɛ kaba ne
qu'ils font leurs besoins. It is in the corn fields
kunna munna tan ? Pourquoi cries-tu comme around the village that they go to the toilet. In
ça sur moi ? Why are you shouting at me like den Maisfeldern rund um das Dorf haben sie
that? Warum schreist du mich so an? ihre Toiletten.
2 • crier (pour un animal); scream (for an kabajan Nom. piles cylindriques; cylindrical batteries;
animal); schreien (nach einem Tier). Fali
zylindrische Batterien.
kabara. L'âne s'est mis à braire fort. The
kabako [á] Nom. miracle, prodige, chose
donkey started braying loudly. Der Esel
begann laut zu schreien. extraordinaire, merveille; wonder, miracle,
marvel; Wunder, aussergewöhnliche Sache. O
kaba dɔ [à-á ɔ̀] synonyme: talen. Nom. herpès;
ye kabako ye ! Ça c’est étonnant ! That’s
herpes; Herpes, Bläschenausschlag.
amazing!
Category: Disease.
kabakolo [à-à] Morphemes: kaba-kolo. Nom. ciel,
kababana [à-à-á-á] Nom. candida; candidose;
voûte céleste; sky; Himmel, Himmelsgewölbe.
Candida. Category: Disease.
I b'a fɔ dugukolo nɔrɔlen don kabakolo la
kabaden Morphemes: kaba-den. Nom. meule;
ɲɛdan na. On dirait que la terre touche le ciel
grindstone, millstone, grinder; Mahlstein. à l’horizon. It seems that the earth touches the
Kabaden in bɛɛ nɛmuna. Cette meule est sky on the horizon. Es sieht so aus, als ob die
toute usée. This grindstone is all worn out. Erde den Himmel am Horizont berührt.
Dieser Mühlstein ist abgenutzt. Category: Sky. synonyme: ŋala , alakolo.
2
kabadensa [á] Nom. serpent (espèce); snake sp; kabakoma [á] variante: kabakoman. adj.
Giftschlangenart. Category: Reptile. merveilleux, extraordinaire, prodigieux,
leptotyphlops sp. étonnant; amazing, marvellous, wonderful,
kabadoso [à-à] Morphemes: kaba-doso. Nom. fabulous; wunderbar, aussergewöhlich,
erstaunlich, sagenhaft, fabelhaft. ...
chien tacheté (à taches larges); spotted dog
(with broad spots); Fleckenhund (mit breiten sagamuso ye den kabakoma dɔ wolo... ... la
Flecken). brebis a mis au monde un agneau
kabafin [à-à] Morphemes: kaba-fin. Nom. nuages,
extraordinaire... ...the ewe gave birth to an
extraordinary lamb... ...das Mutterschaf hat
gros nuages noirs; clouds, big black clouds;
ein außergewöhnliches Lamm zur Welt
Wolken, große schwarze Wolken. Fiyentɔ
gebracht...
kanakabafin ye, o ye tiɲɛ ye, nka i tɛ
kabakoya [á-á-ó-á] Morphemes: kabako-ya.
kabapɛrɛnkan fana mɛn, o ye tugu ye. Que
1 • Nom. étonnement, stupéfaction; wonder,
l'aveugle ne voit pas les nuages, d'accord, mais
amazement; Erstaunen, Verblüffung.
s'il prétend ne pas entendre non plus le
synonyme: manwu.
tonnerre, c'est qu'il fait exprès. (proverbe).
That the blind man does not see the clouds, all 2 • vt. étonner, émerveiller, stupéfier; amaze;
right, but if he claims not to hear thunder erstaunen, verblüffen. U bɛɛ kabakoyara
either, then he is doing so on purpose. kosɛbɛ ka Ala bonya. Tous étaient très
(proverb). Daß der Blinde die Wolken nicht étonnés et rendaient gloire à Dieu. They were
sieht, ja, aber wenn er behauptet, auch den all amazed and glorified God. Sie waren alle
Donner nicht zu hören, so tut er es absichtlich. erstaunt und lobten Gott. Note: Bible: Marka
(Sprichwort). Category: Sky. 2.12
synonyme: muranga.
29/01/2026 343

kabakulu kabasogolon
kabakulu Nom. tonnerre; thunder; Donner. kabanɔgɔ comparer: kaba .[à-à] Nom. 1 • nuage (qui
1 2
Tulogeren bilen ye kabakulu kan mɛn, ni n'apporte pas la pluie); cloud (which does not
san binna a kan, a b'o mɛn. Si le sourd bring rain); Wolke (die keinen Regen
bringt). Kabanɔgɔ mana caya cogo dɔ la, a
n'entends pas le grondement du tonnerre,
quand viendra la pluie, il la sentira. (proverbe). bɛ laban ka kɛ sanji ye, ka bin. Si les nuages
If the deaf do not hear the rumble of thunder, s'accumulent, ils finissent par produire de la
when the rain comes, he will feel it. (proverb). pluie. If clouds accumulate, they will
Wenn der Taube das Grollen des Donners eventually produce rain. Wenn sich Wolken
nicht hört, wird er es spüren, wenn der Regen ansammeln, wird es irgendwann regnen.
kommt. (Sprichwort). Category: Sky, Weather. Category: Sky, Weather, colour.
synonyme: kabapɛrɛnkan, kulukan. synonyme: muranga.
kabakuru [á-á-ú-ú] variante: bɛrɛkuru, 2 • gris; grey, gray; grau. Category: colour.
kabakurun. Nom. pierre, caillou; stone, rock; kabanɔgɔ 2 [à-à] Nom. engrais pour le maïs; fertilizer
Stein, Fels. for corn; Mais Dünger. Category: Agriculture.
kabalenya [á] Nom. arrogance, suffisance; arrogance, kabapɛrɛn [à-à-ɛ́-ɛ́] variante: kabaseli, kabasoli.
conceit; Arroganz, Einbildung. Muɲu ni Nom. foudre; lightening; Blitz. Kabapɛrɛnba
sabali ma min di mɔgɔ ma, kabalenya t'a jiginna a ka buguso fila kan. La foudre
di. Ce que la résignation et la patience n'ont tomba sur ses deux paillotes. Lightning struck
pas obtenu, l'arrogance ne l'obtiendra pas. his two huts. Der Blitz schlug in seine beiden
(proverbe). What resignation and patience Hütten ein. Category: Sky, Weather.
have not achieved, arrogance will not achieve. synonyme: sanpɛrɛn.
(proverb). Was Resignation und Geduld nicht
kabapɛrɛnkan Morphemes: kaba-pɛrɛn-kan. Nom.
erreicht haben, wird auch Arroganz nicht
erreichen. (Sprichwort).
tonnerre; thunder; Donner. Category: Weather.
synonyme: sankalama, kabakulu,
kabalidaɲɛ Morphemes: kaba-li-daɲɛ. Nom. mot
sanpɛrɛnkan, kulukan, sankulu.
exclamatif; exclamatory word; Ausrufe Wort.
Aw bɛ koori kɛ kabalidaɲɛw la. Entourez les kabaru [à-à] Emprunt de : arabe. Nom. posture de
mots exclamatifs. Circle the exclamatory prière (debout); prayer posture (standing);
words. Kreisen Sie die ausrufenden Wörter Gebetshaltung (stehend). ka kabaru bila en
ein. Category: Grammar. posture debout pour prier. standing to pray.
kabalikumasen n.comp. phrase exclamative;
stehen, um zu beten.
exclamatory sentence; Ausrufesatz. kabasen [à-à-é] Morphemes: kaba-sen.
Karamɔgɔ bɛ kabalikumasen dɔ fɔ... Le variante: kaba, kabanɔgɔ. Nom. 1 • nuage;
maître donne une phrase exclamative... The cloud; Wolke. Kabasen bɛ sanfɛla fin. Les
teacher gives an exclamatory sentence... Der nuages obscurcissent le ciel. Clouds obscure
Lehrer macht einen Ausrufesatz... the sky. Wolken verdecken den Himmel.
Category: Grammar. synonyme: muranga.
kabalitomi [á-á-í-ó-í] Morphemes: kabali-tomi. 2 • averse qui tombe d'un seul côté du ciel;
Nom. point d’exclamation; exclamation mark; downpour falling on one side of the sky;
Ausrufezeichen. O kosɔn, o kumasenw bɛ Regenguß, der auf eine Seite des Himmels
laban ni kabalitomi ye. C'est pourquoi ces fällt. E ka kabasen wulilen filɛ yan fɛ.
phrases se terminent par un point Regarde l'averse qui tombe là-bas. Look at the
d'exclamation. That's why these sentences end downpour falling over there. Schauen Sie sich
with an exclamation point. Deshalb enden den Regenguß an, der dort drüben fällt.
diese Sätze mit einem Ausrufezeichen. Category: Weather.
Category: Grammar. kabasogolon [á] Nom. 1 • tombe; grave ; Grab.
kabamɛgɛmɛgɛ variante: kabayɛgɛyɛgɛ. Nom. 2 • entassement de pierres servant de tombeau
éclair; lightning; Blitz. synonyme: kabayegeru, pour certains morts (suicidés, noyés); pile of
sanmuru, sanpɛrɛn, sanmɛgɛmɛgɛ.
stones serving as a tomb for certain dead
people (suicides, drowned); Steinhaufen, der
als Grabstätte für bestimmte Tote
(Selbstmörder, Ertrunkene) dient.
29/01/2026 344

kabasu kaburuden
kabasu [á-á-ú] Emprunt de : arabe. kabila [à-í-á] Emprunt de : arabe.
Morphemes: kaba-su. Nom. craie; chalk; synonyme: denbaya. Nom. 1 • famille, grande
Kreide. ka kabasu daji ka so seri n'a ye. famille, lignage; family, enlarged family,
mettre de la craie à tremper puis en lineage; Familie, Großfamilie, Geschlecht,
badigeonner la maison. put chalk to soak then Stammbaum. U fa sara k'u ba sa k'u kabila
brush the house with it. synonyme: gaala . bɛɛ sa. Leur père mourut, leur mère mourut, et
1
kabatigɛ [à-à] Morphemes: kaba-tigɛ.
toute la famille aussi. Their father died, their
mother died, and so did the whole family. Ihr
variante: kabawulu. Nom. 1 • chien tacheté; Vater starb, ihre Mutter starb und auch die
spotted dog; gefleckter Hund. ganze Familie starb. Category: Kinship.
2 • chien non mono-colore; synonyme: juruya.
non-mono-coloured dog; nicht einfarbiger
2 • région, province; region, province, district;
Hund. Ni wulu tɛna danfin wolo, a dan ye
Region, Provinz. Ne ye Bɛlɛdugu kabilamɔgɔ
kabatigɛ ye. Même si elle n'a pas un petit
ye. Je suis de la région du Bèlèdougou. I am
tout noir, avec son chiot à taches noires, la
from the Bèlèdougou region. Ich komme aus
chienne a déjà fait quelque chose. (proverbe).
der Region Bèlèdougou. Category: Region.
Even if she doesn’t have a little black, with her
black-spotted puppy, the bitch has already kabinɛ Emprunt de : français. Nom. W.C; water closet,
done something. (proverb). Auch wenn sie toilette; Wasserklosett, WC.
kein ganz schwarzes Hündchen hat, mit ihrem Category: Building.
schwarz gefleckten Welpen hat die Hündin
kabini [à-í-í] variante: kabi. prepos. 1 • depuis que,
schon etwas getan. (Sprichwort).
dès que, avant que; since, as soon as, from then
kabawugu Morphemes: kaba-wugu. Nom. meule de on, before; seit, von da an, seither. N bi
pierre; millstone; Mühlstein. Ɲɔ bɛ si Burukina kabini san saba. Je suis au Burkina
kabawugu la, tigadɛgɛ fana bɛ si a la. On depuis trois ans. I have been in Burkina for
écrase le mil à la meule de pierre, et aussi la three years. Ich bin seit drei Jahren in Burkina.
pâte d'arachide. We crush the millet with a Kabini sisan. Dès maintenant. From now on.
stone mill, and also the peanut paste. Wir Von jetzt an. Kabini a ɲɛ ka olu ye, a y'i
zerkleinern die Hirse mit einer Steinmühle,
kunkolo suuli. Dès qu'il les vit, il baissa la
ebenso die Erdnußpaste.
tête. As soon as he saw them, he lowered his
kabayegeru [à-à] variante: kabayɛgɛru. Nom. head. Sobald er sie sah, senkte er den Kopf.
éclair; lightning,, flash; Blitz. Kabayegeruba 2 • alors que; while, whereas; während. ... ji
tigɛra. Il y a eu un grand éclair. There was a tigɛra kabini ɲɔw ma kisɛ ta. ... les pluies ont
big flash of light. Es gab einen großen Blitz. cessé alors que le mil n'était pas encore formé.
Category: Sky, Weather. ...the rains stopped while the millet was not yet
synonyme: kabamɛgɛmɛgɛ, sanmuru, formed. ...der Regen hörte auf, als sich die
sanmɛgɛmɛgɛ. Hirse noch nicht gebildet hatte.
kabi [à-í] variante: kabini. prepos. depuis, dès que,
3 • depuis; since, for; seit. kabini hii depuis
1
très longtemps. for a very long time. schon
avant que, alors que; since, as soon as, from
sehr lange. Kabini tuma juman ? Depuis
then on, before; seit, von da an, seither. Musa
quand ? Since when? Seit wann?
bɔra kabi sɔgɔma. Moussa est sorti depuis le
matin. Moussa has gone out since the
kaburu [á] Emprunt de : arabe. Nom. tombeau,
morning. Moussa ist seit dem Morgen weg. tombe, cimetière; tomb, grave, graveyard;
kabi [á] Verbe. 1 • puiser pour verser; draw to pour;
Grab, Grabmal, Grabstätte, Friedhof. Mɔgɔ
2
sɛbɛ kaburu bɛ jira ni bolo ye, mɔgɔ
ausschöpfen zum ausgießen.
lankolon kaburu bɛ jira ni bonbon ye. On
2 • assécher; dry out, dry up; austrocknen.
montre la tombe d'un honnête homme avec le
3 • pêcher en retirant l'eau d'une mare; fish by
bras, mais celle d'un vaurien avec le menton
taking water from a pond; Fischen, indem man
(proverbe). We show the grave of an honest
das Wasser aus einem Teich entfernt. Suruku,
man with the arm, but that of a scoundrel with
wulu ani bakɔrɔn taara kɔ kabi. Hyène, the chin (proverb). Wir zeigen das Grab eines
Chien, et Bouc partirent puiser l'eau au ehrlichen Mannes mit dem Arm, das eines
marigot. Hyena, Dog, and Goat went to draw Schurken aber mit dem Kinn (Sprichwort).
water from the river. Hyäne, Hund und Bock
kaburuden n.comp. chambre mortuaire d'une tombe;
gingen aus dem Fluß Wasserschöpfen.
Category: Hunt and fish. mortuary chamber of a tomb; Leichenraum
eines Grabes.
29/01/2026 345

kaburudo kafari
kaburudo [á] Jula: kaburulo. variante: kaburudon. 2 • Verbe. être orgueilleux, être arrogant, être
présomptueux; to be proud, to be arrogant, to
Nom. cimetière; cemetery; Friedhof.
be presumptuous; stolz sein, arrogant sein,
Kaburudo sira tɛ den sarama dɔn. Le
anmaßend sein. U kafara k'u bɛ fanga bɔsi
chemin qui mène au cimetière ne reconnaît pas
l'enfant charmant. (proverbe). The path that
dugulenw na, olu fana y'u gɛn. Ils devinrent
leads to the cemetery does not recognize the présomptueux au point de prétendre ravir le
charming child. (proverb). Der Weg, der zum pouvoir aux autochtones, mais ceux-ci les
Friedhof führt, erkennt das bezaubernde Kind chassèrent. They became presumptuous to the
nicht. (Sprichwort). point of claiming to wrest power from the
natives, but the natives chased them out. Sie
kabusi Emprunt de : arabe. variante: kabuusi,
wurden so anmaßend, daß sie beanspruchten,
kabugusi. Nom. pistolet; gun, pistol, handgun; den Eingeborenen die Macht entreißen zu
Pistole. wollen, aber die Eingeborenen verjagten sie.
kacon [á] adj. 1 • industrieux, habile en tout; 3 • Verbe. être têtu, être désobéissant; to be
stubborn, to be disobedient; stur sein,
industrious, skilled in everything; fleißig,
ungehorsam sein. synonyme: kanmɛnbali.
geschickt in allem.
2 • fourbe; devious; hinterlistig.
4 • Nom. témérité, orgueil, arrogance;
recklessness, pride, arrogance;
3 • bandit; bandit; Bandit. Nin cɛ in ye kacon
Rücksichtslosigkeit, Stolz, Arroganz. Kafa de
ye dɛ ! Ce type est un bandit ! This guy is a
y'a bila kɛlɛ la. C'est l'orgueil qui l'a poussé à
bandit! Dieser Typ ist ein Bandit!
la guerre. It was pride that pushed him to war.
kadara [á] Emprunt de : français : cadre. Nom. dans Es war Stolz, der ihn in den Krieg trieb.
le cadre de, dans le contexte de, dans le kafa [á] variante: kaba. Nom. peigne de tisserand;
2
domaine de; in the context of, in the field of; im
weaver's comb; Weberkamm. Bolo bɛ kɛ ka
Kontext von, im Bereich von. An ka tɔn
kafa gosi, a bɛ kɛ ka kurunnin fili. La main
kadara kɔnɔ ... Dans le cadre de notre
actionne le peigne, elle lance la navette. The
association ... In the context of our association
hand activates the comb, it launches the
... Im Rahmen unserer Partnerschaft ...
shuttle. Die Hand aktiviert den Kamm und
kadarama [á] Nom. qui se soumet à un cadre : bien startet das Schiffchen. Category: Tool.
éduqué, bien élevé, digne, respectable..; who kafaara [à-à] Emprunt de : arabe. variante: kafara.
submits to a framework: well educated, well
Verbe. expier les fautes, pardonner; atone for
behaved, worthy, respectable..; Er unterwirft
faults, forgive; Fehler büßen, vergeben. ka
sich einem Umfeld: gut erzogen, gebildet,
würdig, respektabel... Denmisɛn kadarama
kafaara bɔ / ka kafaara sara faire une
don. C'est un enfant bien élevé. He is a
offrande réparatrice. make a reparative
offering. ein Wiedergutmachungsopfer
well-behaved child. Er ist ein braves Kind. ...
darbringen. synonyme: kafari.
mɔgɔ kadarama don. ... c'est une personne
respectable. ...he is a respectable person. ...er
kafalenya [á] Nom. fierté, arrogance, morgue; pride,
ist ein respektabler Mensch. arrogance, morbid; Stolz, Arroganz,
Selbstgerechtigkeit. Musa ka kafalenya de
kadawu [á-á-ú] Adverbe. tout le temps, chaque fois,
y'a negebɔ. C'est son arrogance qui l'a rendu
toujours; every time, always; jedesmal, immer.
A bɛ nɛgɛso boli kadawu ! Il est tout le temps
indésirable. It was his arrogance that made
him undesirable. Es war seine Arroganz, die
sur son vélo ! He's on his bike all the time! Er
ihn unerwünscht machte.
ist die ganze Zeit auf seinem Fahrrad!
kafari Emprunt de : arabe. 1 • n.comp. absolution,
kadiri Nom. cercle (de luettes); eye wires, eye brims;
pardon, expiation; absolution, pardon,
Brillenrahmen.
expiation; Absolution, Begnadigung,
kafa 1 [á] 1 • Verbe. être téméraire, être audacieux; to Freisprache, Vergebung. Ala ka bana nin kɛ
be reckless, to be daring; rücksichtslos sein, jurumukafari ye
mutig sein. synonyme: kuncɛbaya.
29/01/2026 346

kafe kafoɲɔgɔnya
2 • Verbe. expier, absoudre, pardonner; 3 • division administrative (cercle), région,
exculpate, absolve, forgive; sühnen, Buße tun, canton, partie; administrative division, region,
vergeben. Karamɔgɔ ka bugɔli bɛ jurumu party; administrative Unterteilung, Region,
kafari. La bastonnade donnée par le maître fait Kanton, Partei. ... kafow ni duguw kɔnɔ. ...
expier la faute. (proverbe). The beating given dans les cantons et les villages. ...in the
by the master makes the fault expiated. cantons and villages. ...in den Kantonen und
(proverb). Die vom Meister gegebene Dörfern. Mali kafo wolonwulanan la
Prügelstrafe läßt die Schuld sühnen. septième région du Mali. the seventh region of
(Sprichwort). synonyme: latɛmɛ, yafa, sabari, Mali. die siebte Region Malis. Syɛso kelen ka
kafaara. kan ka kɛ kafo wɔɔrɔ ye. Un poulailler doit
kafe Emprunt de : français. Nom. 1 • café; coffee;
être divisé en six parties. A chicken coop must
be divided into six parts. Ein Hühnerstall muß
Kaffee. I bi kafe min ? Tu veux un café ?
in sechs Teile geteilt werden.
Would you like a coffee? Willst du etwas
Kaffee? Category: Types of food.
kafolan [à-ò] Jula: kafonan. Nom. coordination,
2 • café fruit; coffee fruit; Kaffee Frucht.
connecteur, relateur, signe de l'addition, plus;
coordination, connector, plus sign;
kafe tasanin Emprunt de : français. Nom. tasse à café; Koordination, Verbindungsglied,
coffee cup; Kaffee Tasse. Category: Container. Additionszeichen, Pluszeichen. Daɲɛ min bɛ
kafefeerela Morphemes: kafe-feere-la. Nom. ka daɲɛ wɛrɛw kafo, a bɛ fɔ o ma ko
vendeur de café; coffee seller; Kaffee kafolan. «Ni» ye kafolan ye. Les mots qui
Verkäufer. Category: Worker, occupation. servent à associer d'autres mots, on les appelle
des connecteurs, «Ni» est un connecteur.
kafetasijan Nom. chope à café; coffee mug; große
Words that are used to associate other words
Kaffeetasse. Category: Container. are called connectors, “Ni” is a connector.
kafetobimansin Nom. cafetière filtre; coffee maker; Wörter, die zur Verknüpfung anderer Wörter
Kaffeemaschine. Category: Household
verwendet werden, werden Konnektoren
equipment.
genannt, „Ni“ ist ein Konnektor.
Category: Grammar.
kafinɛ [ǎ-ì-ɛ́] variante: kafunɛ. Nom. 1 • graines
kafolen [à-ò] part. plus (signe +); plus (+ sign);
aromatiques utilisé dans la cuisine et comme
médicament (toux); aromatic seeds used in Pluszeichen (+). fila kafolen fila, o ye naani
cooking and as medicine (cough); aromatische ye. Deux plus deux égale quatre. Two plus
Samen, die zum Kochen und als Medizin two equals four. Zwei plus zwei ergibt vier.
(Husten) verwendet werden. xylopia Category: Mathematics, Sign, Symbol.
aethiopica.
kafoli [à-ò] variante: kafɔli. Nom. addition,
2 • sorte d'épice; kind of spice; Art Gewürz.
coordination, assemblage, association;
kafiri Emprunt de : arabe. synonyme: alalɔnbali. addition, coordination; Addition, Ergänzung,
variante: kaafiri. Nom. non-croyant, cafre, Hinzufügung, Koordinierung. Ni i bɛ kafoli
païen, animiste, mécréant, non-musulman, kɛ, walima dɔbɔli... Si tu fais une addition, ou
infidèle; unbeliever; Ungläubiger. une soustraction... If you add or subtract...
Category: Religion, Person. Wenn man addiert oder subtrahiert...
antonyme: dannatigi. Category: Mathematics, Sign, Symbol.
kafo [à-ó] synonyme: don ɲɔgɔn na.
synonyme: donɲɔgɔnnali, farankan.
variante: kafu. Verbe. 1 • réunir, rassembler, kafoɲɔgɔn [à-ò] Nom. 1 • camarade, ami; comrade,
additionner, coordonner; unite, gather, add, friend; Kamerad, Freund.
coordinate; versammeln, zusammenbringen, 2 • partenaire sexuel; sexual partner;
ergänzen, hinzufügen, zusammenfügen, Sexualpartner.
koordinieren. ka foro ɲɔnsɔn kafo ɲɔgɔn na kafoɲɔgɔnya [à-ò-ɔ̀-ɔ̀] Nom. relations sexuelles;
rassembler les branches et brindilles du
sexual relations; sexuelle Beziehungen. ... u
champ. gather branches and twigs from the
field. Äste und Zweige vom Feld sammeln. kana kafoɲɔgɔnya kɛ jalo wɔɔrɔ kɔnɔ... ...
synonyme: lajɛrɛ. qu'elles n'aient pas de relations sexuelles
pendant six mois... ...that they not have sex
2 • avoir des relations sexuelles; have sexual
for six months... ...daß sie sechs Monate lang
relations; Sex haben. Ni cɛ ni muso kafora...
keinen Sex haben... synonyme: musonicɛya.
Si un homme et une femme s'unissent... If a
man and a woman unite... Wenn ein Mann und
eine Frau sich vereinen...
29/01/2026 347

kafotigi kala
kafotigi [à-ò] Nom. chef de canton; canton chief; kakala [à-à-á] Nom. 1 • débauché (insulte), vicieux,
Kantonsvorsteher. Segu lamini dugutigi n'a libertin; debauchee (insult), pervert, libertine;
kafotigi... Les chefs du village et les chefs de Wüstling, Unhold, perverser Typ.
canton des environs de Ségou... The village
Kakalamuso don. C'est une femme
chiefs and the canton chiefs of the débauchée. She’s a debauched woman. Sie ist
surroundings of Ségou... Die Dorfvorsteher eine verdorbene Frau.
und die Kantonsvorsteher der Umgebung von 2 • lâche; coward; Feigling. Warabilen tɛ
Ségou... Category: Government. wulu kakala dɔn. Le singe rouge ne sait pas
kafoyɔrɔ n.comp. espace de rassemblement; meeting reconnaître le chien qui est lâche. (proverbe).
place; Versammlungsort. The red monkey does not know how to
recognize a dog that is cowardly. (proverb).
kafula [á] variante: kafura. Nom. 1 • boules de
Der rote Affe weiß nicht, wie er einen feigen
naphtaline; mothballs; Mottenkugeln. A ye Hund erkennen soll. (Sprichwort).
kafula bila a ka fininw kan. Il a mis de la 3 • incapable; incapable; unfähig.
naphtaline sur ses vêtements. He put mothballs 4 • pauvre type, paresseux; poor guy, lazy
on his clothes. Er hat Mottenkugeln auf seine person; armer Kerl, fauler Mensch. Ne mago
Kleidung gelegt. tɛ nin kakala in na, a ma foyi ɲɛ n ye. Je me
2 • sorte d'encens; kind of incense; Art moque de ce pauvre type, qui n'a rien fait pour
Weihrauch. moi. I don’t care about this poor guy, who did
kafunisɔngɔ Nom. total (prix); total price, sum total; nothing for me. Ich lache über diesen armen
Total, Gesamtpreis. Category: Finance.
Kerl, der nichts für mich getan hat.
kagala Nom. fruit; fruit; Frucht. synonyme: jirimɔ. kakalaya [à-à-à-á] Nom. adultère, débauche, vice,
libertinage; adultery, debauchery, indecent
kagana [á-á-á] bambara: kaana. Nom. varan du Nil, action; Ehebruch, Ausschweifung. A y'a yɛrɛ
varan d'eau, gueule-tapée; Nile Monitor; Nil bila kakalaya la. Il se laisse aller à la
Waran. Category: Reptile. varanus niloticus.
débauche. He indulges in debauchery. Er gibt
synonyme: kaana
3
.
sich der Ausschweifung hin.
kagatiwi falenfalencogo Nom. cycle des saisons; kakawo Nom. cacao; cocoa fruit; Kakao.
cycle of seasons; Jahreszeiten Zyklus. Category: Food.
Category: Sky.
kaki Nom. tissu de couleur kaki; khaki color; das
kaka
1
[á-á] variante: kanga, kankan. vi. caqueter,
Khaki, erdfarben, graugelb.
bégayer; cackle, stutter; gackern, schnattern,
kakialaka Jula: kakalaka. Nom. poule de pharaon,
stottern. Syɛba bɛ kaka dɔgɔkun o
dɔgɔkun... La mère poule caquette chaque
outarde à ventre noir; Senegal bustard; Trappe
(Art), Schwarzbauchtrappe. Category: Bird.
semaine... The mother hen cackles every
eupodotis senegalensis. synonyme: katilaka.
week... Die Glucke gackert jede Woche... A da
bɛ kaka. Il bégaie. He stutters. Er stottert. kako [à] Nom. noix de coco; coconut; Kokosnuss.
synonyme: kumakuma. Category: Food.
kaka [à-á] comparer: jirikakala. Jula: kaga. kakoji [à] Nom. lait de coco; coconut milk; Kokosnuss
2
1 • Nom. lime; file; Feile. Category: Tool.
Milch. Category: Food.
2 • Nom. scie; saw; Säge. kala 1 [à-á] Nom. 1 • poignée, manche (d’un outil),
3 • Verbe. limer, scier; to file down, saw; feilen, bâton; handle, stick, shank, shaft; Stiel, Griff
sägen. eines Werkzeugs, Stock. Murunin dadiyara
kaka [ǎ-ǎ] variante: [kaaka]. Nom. corbeau pie; cogo o cogo, a tɛ se k'a yɛrɛ kala dɛsɛ. Si
3
magpie crow; Elsterkrähe. Category: Bird.
aiguisé que soit le couteau, il ne peut sculpter
corbus albus. synonyme: kaankaan.
son propre manche. (proverbe). As sharp as
the knife is, it cannot carve its own handle.
kakaka [á] Adverbe. à gorge déployée (rire), aux éclats (proverb). So scharf das Messer auch sein
(rire); full-throated (laughter), out loud mag, er kann sich doch nicht seinen eigenen
(laughter); mit voller Kehle (Lachen), laut Griff formen. (Sprichwort).
(Lachen). U bɛ sin k'u jan ka yɛlɛ kakaka ! Ils 2 • tige; stem, stalk; Stamm, Stengel. Ŋɔnɔ
se tordent de rire. They burst into laughter. Sie ɲuman bɛ dɔn a kala fɛ. Une bonne fleur
brachen in Gelächter aus. d'hibiscus se reconnaît à sa tige. (proverbe). A
good hibiscus flower is recognized by its stem.
(proverb). Eine gute Hibiskusblüte erkennt
man am Stiel. (Sprichwort).
29/01/2026 348

kala kalajugu
3 • verge (populaire); penis (popular); Penis kalabaganciya [á] Nom. 1 • entêtement, obstination
(Volksmund).
forcenée; stubbornness, frenzied obstinacy;
4 • remède; remedy, cure; Heilmittel.
Sturheit, rasender Eigensinn. Kalabaganciya
Lenburukumun ye kɔnɔtɔn kala ye. Le jus
bɛ kɔ tigɛ, nka a tɛ ngomi yaara. Le
de citron est le remède contre les
mensonge peut traverser un marigot, mais il est
ballonnements. Lemon juice is the cure for
incapable de faire tomber les gouttes de rosée.
bloating. Zitronensaft ist das Heilmittel gegen
(proverbe). The lie can cross a river, but it is
Blähungen.
unable to drop dew drops. (proverb). Die
5 • raison, cause, sens; reason, ground, cause,
Lüge kann einen Fluß durchqueren, aber sie ist
sense; Grund, Ursache, Sinn. A tɛ kala dɔn unfähig, die Tautropfen fallen zu lassen.
Musa ka dugutaa la. Il ne comprend pas la (Sprichwort).
raison du voyage de Moussa. He does not 2 • mensonge; lie; Lüge.
understand the reason for Moussa's trip. Er
kalabakalaba [á] Verbe. se précipiter, se dépêcher; to
versteht den Grund für Moussas Reise nicht.
rush, hurry; sich beeilen. ka baara
kala Nom. descendant d'un même ancêtre (famille);
2 kalabakalaba faire rapidement un travail. do a
descendant of the same ancestor; Nachkomme
job quickly. eine Arbeit schnell erledigen. ka
des selben Vorfahren. mɔgɔɲuman bi lɔn a
fɛn dɔ kalabakalaba kɛ faire quelque chose
kala fɛ
à la hâte. do something in a hurry. etwas in
kala 3 [á-á] Nom. arc, parenthèse, arc de cercle; bow, Eile tun.
bracket; Bogen, Klammer. ( ... ) ... áw bɛ kala kalabiɲɛ variante: kalakisɛ. Nom. flèche; arrow; Pfeil.
dila... ... nous fabriquons des arcs... ...we synonyme: biɲɛ , biɲɛkisɛ.
1
make bows... ...wir machen Bögen...
Category: Mathematics.
kalacɛ [à-à] Nom. nettoyage des champs avant les
semis; cleaning fields before sowing;
kala variante: kalan. Verbe. 1 • coudre, recoudre,
4 Reinigung der Felder vor der Aussaat.
raccommoder; sew, stitch up, mend, darn;
Category: Agriculture.
nähen, annähen, flicken. Fininfara bɛ kala,
kalaci [à-à] variante: kalafɔnna, kalafonna. Nom.
finin kɔrɔ tɛ se ka kala. L'accroc se répare,
petits serpents inoffensifs; Spotted Blind
mais le vêtement usé ne peut se réparer.
Snake; Blindschleiche. Category: Snake.
(proverbe). The tear can be repaired, but the
typhlops punctatus, leptotyphlops.
worn garment cannot be repaired. (proverb).
Der Riß kann repariert werden, das abgenutzte kalada [á] Morphemes: kala-da. variante: kalasira.
1
Kleidungsstück jedoch nicht. (Sprichwort). Nom. couture; seam, sewing; Naht. Kalada t'a
synonyme: baratu, kalan
3
.
ka finin na. Son étoffe n'a pas de couture. His
2 • réconcilier; reconcile; versöhnen. ka sinjiw fabric has no seams. Sein Stoff hat keine
kala réconcilier les parents. reconcile parents / Nähte.
relatives. Eltern / Verwandte versöhnen. kalada [à-à] Morphemes: kala-da. Nom. tirage au
2
kala [à] Nom. voix, vote; voice, vote; Stimme, sort, vote, élection; draw, vote, election;
5
Abstimmung. ka kala da tirer au sort, voter. Auslosung, Abstimmung, Wahl.
draw lots, vote. das Los ziehen, abstimmen. ka kalafili [à-à-í-í] Morphemes: kala-fili.
kala fili voter. vote, cast a vote, poll. synonyme: votecogo, vote, wotecogo, wote.
abstimmen. variante: kalada. Nom. vote, élection; vote,
kala [à] Nom. serpent (surnom du serpent); snake election; Stimme, Wahl. kalafili nataw les
6
(snake's nickname); Schlange (Spitzname prochaines élections. the next elections. die
der Schlange). synonyme: juru , dugumafɛn. nächsten Wahlen. Category: Government.
1
synonyme: wote.
kala ma [à-á à] expr. au courant de; aware of, know
kalajugu [à-à] Nom. mal élevé, de mauvais caractère;
about; bewußt, auf dem Laufenden sein,
wissen. Mɔgɔ si tɛ bɔ a kala ma. Personne ill-mannered, bad-tempered; schlecht erzogen,
n'est au courant. Nobody knows. Niemand
schlecht gelaunt. Ba kalajugu, o den tɛ
weiß es. Ayi, n t'o kala ma. Non, je ne suis dagalafilɛ to. Le petit d'une chèvre vicieuse
pas au courant. No, I don't know about it. Nein, ne cesse de regarder l'intérieur des marmites.
ich weiß es nicht. synonyme: seere ma. (proverbe). The little one of a vicious goat
keeps looking inside the pots. (proverb). Der
Kleine von einer bösartigen Ziege schaut
ständig in die Töpfe. (Sprichwort).
29/01/2026 349

kalajuguya kalalafili
kalajuguya Nom. mauvaise éducation, mauvais kalakala [à-à-á-á] Nom. impureté, saleté, débris,
3
comportement, mauvais caractère; bad brindilles de paille; impurity, dirt, rubble,
education, bad behaviour, bad character; twigs of straw; Unreinheit, Dreck, Schutt,
schlechte Erziehung, schlechtes Benehmen, Trümmer, Strohhalme. Jɛgɛ ni kalakala, u bɛ
schlechten Charakter. Delinafɛndun tɛ minɛ ɲɔgɔn fɛ, nka u tɛ dun ɲɔgɔn fɛ. Le
kalajuguya ye. Manger des aliments dont on a poisson et les débris sont pêchés ensemble,
l'habitude d'est pas de la mauvaise éducation. mais on ne les mange pas ensemble.
(proverbe). Eating foods that we are used to is (proverbe). Fish and debris are caught
not bad education. (proverb). Essen, das man together, but they are not eaten together.
gewohnt ist, ist keine schlechte Erziehung. (proverb). Fisch und Schrott werden
(Sprichwort). Wulu n'a tigi jɛ tɛ kalajuguya zusammen gefangen, aber nicht gemeinsam
ye. Le propriétaire du chien n'est pas complice gegessen. (Sprichwort).
de son mauvais comportement. (proverbe). kalakala [á] Verbe. coudre, attacher ou assembler
4
The dog owner is not complicit in his bad plusieurs pièces de même nature; sew, attach
behaviour. (proverb). Der Hundebesitzer ist or assemble several pieces of the same nature;
kein Mittäter seines schlechten Verhaltens. mehrere gleichartige Teile nähen, befestigen
(Sprichwort). synonyme: marabaliya. oder zusammenfügen. Fininkɔnɔ caman bɛ
kalaka [á] Nom. lit en bambou, lit de tiges; bamboo kalakala ɲɔgɔn na ka kɛ taafe ye. De
bed, bed of stems; Bambus Bett, Stängelbett. nombreuses bandes de tissu sont cousues
Category: Household equipment. ensemble pour faire un pagne. Many strips of
fabric are sewn together to make a cloth. Viele
kalakadulon [á] Morphemes: kala-ka-dulon. Nom.
Stoffstreifen sind zu einem Stofftuch
vêtement acheté en prêt-à-porter au marché; zusammengenäht.
garment bought off the peg, ready-to-wear
kalakala [á] variante: kilakila. Adverbe. excessif, à
garment; Fertigkleid, das man kaufen kann. 5
Kalakadulon ka fisa gansan ye. Mieux vaut
propos de la parole; excessive, about the
du prêt-à-porter que rien du tout.
speech; übertrieben, über Sprache. A nɛn bɛ
Ready-to-wear is better than nothing at all. kalakala ! Il parle très bien ! ( et : «il parle très
Konfektionskleidung ist besser als gar nichts. vite»). He speaks very well! ( and: «he speaks
Category: Clothing. very fast»). Er spricht sehr gut! ( und: «Er
kalakajalan See main entry: . n.comp. lit en bambou;
spricht sehr schnell»).
bamboo bed; Bambus Bett. kalakala 6 Adverbe. très amer; very bitter; sehr bitter. A
kalakakunkɔrɔsigi ka kunan, o ye tiɲɛ ye, nka a bɛ kalakala, i
[á] variante: kalakakunkɔrɔmuso. Nom.
bɛ k'o lajɛ. Dire que c'est amer, c'est normal,
mais dire que c'est amer comme du fiel, c'est
1 • appuie-tête; headrest; Kopfstütze.
que tu es en train d'en goûter. (proverbe). To
2 • épouse préférée (populaire); favorite wife
say that it is bitter is normal, but to say that it
(popular); Lieblingsfrau (Volksmund). Musa
is bitter as gall is that you are tasting it.
ka kalakakunkɔrɔsigi y'a ka gaci. L'épouse (proverb). Zu sagen, daß es bitter ist, ist
préférée de Moussa a détruit son foyer. normal, aber zu sagen, daß es bitter ist,
Moussa's favourite wife destroyed her home. bedeutet, daß man es schmeckt. (Sprichwort).
Moussas Lieblingsfrau zerstörte ihr Haus.
kalakari Nom. arbre (espèce); tree sp; Baumart.
kalakala 1 [á] Nom. oiseau (espèce); bird sp; Vogel Category: Tree. hymenocardia acida.
(Art). Category: Bird. kalakarijɛ Jula: kalakarigwɛ. Nom. espèce d'arbre;
kalakala 2 adj. tacheté; speckled, spotted; gefleckt, kind of tree; Baumart. Category: Tree.
getüpfelt, gesprenkelt. hymenocardia heudelotii.
kalalafili [à-à-à] Morphemes: kala-la-fili. Verbe.
faire semblant d'ignorer, être de mauvaise foi;
pretend to be ignorant, be in bad faith, pretend
to be unaware; vorgeben, unwissend zu sein,
in böser Absicht sein,, vortäuschen, nicht zu
wissen, unehrlich sein. A y'i kalalafili ne ma.
Il a fait semblable de ne pas me connaître. He
acted like he didn't know me. Er tat so, als
würde er mich nicht kennen.
29/01/2026 350

kalalikɛla kalan
kalalikɛla [á] Morphemes: kala-li-kɛ-la. Nom. 2 • leader, porte-drapeau; leader, flag bearer;
Leader, Fahnenträger. An ka ntolatantɔn
couturier, tailleur; clothes maker, tailor;
Kleidermacher, Schneider, Modeschöpfer. kalamɛnɛ dɔ don. C'est un des porte-drapeau
Category: Person. de notre équipe de football. He is one of the
flag bearers of our football team. Er ist einer
kalalikɛnan Morphemes: kala-li-kɛ-nan. Nom.
der Fahnenträger in unserem Fußballteam.
machine à coudre; sewing machine;
Nähmaschine. kalamisɛnw Nom. baguettes; wooden sticks, beaters;
kalama [à-à] Nom. 1 • bâtonnet, tige, paille; stick,
Schlegel. Category: Musical instrument.
stem, straw; Stäbchen, Stiel, Stroh. Bolo ka ɲi
kalamɔɲɔ [à-à] Nom. torche, flambeau; torch; Fackel.
ɲɛ kɔrɔ kalama ye. Mieux vaut une main U nana ni kalamɔɲɔ ye bulonkɔnɔ lajɛ. Ils
proche de l’œil qu'une paille. (proverbe). allèrent voir avec des torches l’intérieur du
Better a hand close to the eye than a straw. vestibule. They went to see the interior of the
(proverb). Besser eine Hand nah am Auge als vestibule with torches. Sie gingen mit Fackeln
ein Strohhalm. (Sprichwort). ins Innere des Vestibüls. synonyme: kalamɛnɛ,
2 • qui possède une tige, une manche; which dibisɔgɔ.
has a stem, a handle; das einen Stiel hat.
kalamu Nom. plume; feather; Feder. Category: Parts
Falenfɛn dɔw ju ye jirima ye... dɔw ju ye
of an animal. synonyme: kalamukala.
kalama ye... Certaines plantes ont des troncs,
d'autres ont des tiges... Some plants have kalamukala Nom. plume; feather; Feder.
trunks, others have stems... Manche Pflanzen Category: Parts of an animal.
haben Stämme, andere haben Stängel ... synonyme: kalamu.
Category: Parts of a plant.
kalan [à-ã̀] Emprunt de : arabe. synonyme: degi. vt.
kalamada [á-á-à-á] Verbe. 1 • éviter, changer de;
1
1 • lire; read; lesen. Sɔgɔma o sɔgɔma, an bi
avoid, change; vermeiden, ändern. A tun b'a
Ala ka kuma kalan ɲɔgɔn fɛ. Chaque matin,
fɛ ka kɛ dɔkɔtɔrɔ ye, a y'a kalamada. Il
nous lisons la parole de Dieu ensemble. Every
voulait devenir médecin, il a changé d'idée. He morning, we read the Word of God together.
wanted to become a doctor, he changed his Category: Learn.
mind. Er wollte Arzt werden, überlegte es sich
2 • étudier, apprendre; study, learn; studieren,
aber anders.
lernen. N bi julakan kalan. J’étudie la langue
2 • se détourner de; turn away from; abwenden.
dioula. I am studying Dioula. Ich lerne Dioula.
3 • prétexter; give as pretext; Vorwand geben. Mɔgɔ tɛ kɔrɔ kalan ma. On n'est jamais trop
Musa banna ka na, ka a kalamada ko bana
vieux pour s'instruire. (proverbe). One is never
b'a la. Moussa a refusé de venir, en prétextant too old to learn. (proverb). Man ist nie zu alt,
qu'il est malade. Moussa refused to come, um sich zu bilden. (Sprichwort).
claiming that he is ill. Moussa weigerte sich zu 3 • enseigner, former, instruire; teach, train,
kommen und behauptete, er sei krank. instruct; lehren, unterrichten, ausbilden,
kalamanfɛnw Nom. produit non ligneux; non-wood instruieren. Nne tun bi denmisɛnw kalan
forest product, non-timber forest product; salon. J’enseignais aux enfants l’année
nicht-forstlicher Anpflanzungen, passée. I was teaching the children last year.
Waldnebenerzeugnisse. Letztes Jahr unterrichtete ich die Kinder.
kalamanin Nom. bâtonnet, tige; stick, rod; Knüppel, Category: Learn. synonyme: lakalan.
Stock, Stecken, Stab. kalan [à-ã́] Nom. 1 • étude, cours, instruction,
2
kalamɛnɛ [à-à] variante: kalamana, kalamɔɲɔ. apprentissage, enseignement; study, course,
education, teaching; Studie, Kurs, Unterricht,
Nom. 1 • torche, flambeau; torch; Fackel.
Dunan ɲɛkalamɛnɛ ye a jatigi ye. Pour
Ausbildung. Kalan kun fɔlɔ première partie
des études, enseignement fondamental. Part 1
l'étranger, l'hôte est comme une torche qui
of the studies, basic education. Teil 1 der
éclaire. (proverbe). For the stranger, the host
is like a torch that lights. (proverb). Für den
Studien, Grundbildung. Category: Learn.
Fremden ist der Gastgeber wie eine Fackel, die 2 • lecture; reading, literature; das Lesen,
leuchtet. (Sprichwort). synonyme: kalamɔɲɔ,
Lesematerial, Lesestoff.
dibisɔgɔ. kalan
3
[á-ã́] variante: kala. vt. coudre; sew, stitch;
nähen. synonyme: kala , baratu.
4
29/01/2026 351

kalan kalankalan
kalan [á] adj. bariolé, zébré, multicolore; colourful, kalandenba [à-à-è] Nom. étudiant, élève des
4
striped, multicolour; bunt, gestreift, grandes écoles; student, student of Major
mehrfarbig. A y'a ka koso kalan fɛnsɛn. Il Schools; Student, Schüler der Hauptschulen.
étala sa couverture bariolée. He spread out his Category: Learn.
colourful blanket. Er breitete seine bunte kalandengafe Nom. cahier de l'élève, livre / livret de
Decke aus.
l'élève; pupil's book, booklet; Schüler Heft,
kalan [á] adj. 1 • chaud; hot; heiß. dumuni kalan Buch, Büchlein. Category: Learn.
5
nourriture chaude. hot food. warmes Essen. kalandensomɔgɔ Nom. parent d'élève; student's
2 • vif, rapide; lively, fast; lebhaft, schnell. A parent; Eltern des Schülers.
senna ka kalan be. Il est rapide aujourd'hui. kalandensomɔgɔw ka tɔnw les associations
He's fast today. Er ist heute schnell. de parents d'élèves. parents' associations.
3 • irréfléchi; thoughtless; gedankenlos. Vereinigungen von Eltern von Schülern.
kalanba Nom. animatrice de centre d'alphabétisation; kalandiriye Emprunt de : français. Nom. calendrier;
literacy teacher (female); calendar; Kalender. synonyme: lonjatelan.
Alphabetisierungslehrerin. Category: Learn,
kalanfa comparer: balikukalanfa. Nom. animateur des
Worker, occupation.
centres d'alphabétisation, alphabétiseur,
kalanbaga [à-à-á-á] Nom. entraîneur, enseignant,
maître; literacy teacher, teacher;
étudiant, lecteur; coach, trainer, instructor, Alphabetisierungslehrer, Leselehrer. Kalanfa
teacher, student, reader; Trainer, Coach,
yɛrɛyɛrɛ sɔrɔ man di. Un vrai maître est
Lehrer, Student, Leser. Kalanbaga jumɛnw
difficile à trouver. A true master is hard to
de bɛ yan ? Quels sont les étudiants qui sont find. Ein echter Meister ist schwer zu finden.
ici ? Who are the students who are here? Wer Category: Learn, Worker, occupation.
sind die Studierenden, die hier sind?
kalanfa ka siginan Nom. chaise du maître;
Category: Learn, Worker, occupation.
teacher's chair; Stuhl des Lehrers.
kalanbali Morphemes: kalan-bali. adj. analphabète,
Category: Household equipment.
illettré, non instruit; illiterate; Analphabet,
kalanin [á] Nom. parenthèse; bracket; Klammern.
ungebildet, des Lesens und Schreibens
unkundig. Muso kalanbali ka ca ni muso Kalanin fɔlɔ bɛ kɛ kunnafoni daminɛ na,
kalannen ye. Les femmes sans instruction filanan bɛ kɛ a laban na. ( ... ) La première
parenthèse se place au début de l'information,
sont plus nombreuses que celles qui sont
instruites. Uneducated women outnumber la seconde à la fin. The first parenthesis is
educated women. Ungebildete Frauen sind placed at the beginning of the information, the
zahlreicher als gebildete Frauen.
second at the end. Die erste Klammer wird am
Category: Learn. Anfang der Information, die zweite am Ende
gesetzt. Category: Grammar.
kalanbaliya Morphemes: kalan-bali-ya. Nom.
kalanjɛ [à-ã̀-ɛ́] Jula: kalangwɛ.
analphabétisme; illiteracy; Analphabetentum,
Unwissenheit. Kalanbaliya bɛ mɔgɔ to kɔfɛ. Morphemes: kalan-gwɛ. Nom. lecture du texte;
L'analphabétisme est responsable du retard des reading of the text; Lektüre, Vorlesen, Text
gens. Illiteracy is responsible for people's Lesung. U tɛ se kalanjɛ ra. Ils ne savent pas
backwardness. Analphabetismus ist für die lire. They can’t read. Sie können nicht lesen.
Rückständigkeit der Menschen verantwortlich. ... kalanjɛ, sɛbɛnni ani jate... ... la lecture,
Category: Learn. l'écriture et le calcul... ... reading, writing and
kalanbon [à-à] Nom. salle de classe; classroom; calculating... ... Lesen, Schreiben und
Rechnen... Category: Learn.
Klassenzimmer. Category: Building.
kalankalan Verbe. raccommoder; mend, darn;
kalanden [à-à] Morphemes: kalan-den. Nom. élève, 1
ausbessern, flicken, reparieren.
étudiant, apprenti; student, pupil, trainee,
apprentice; Schüler, Student, Lernender,
Lehrling. Category: Learn, Person.
synonyme: lekɔliden.
kalanden ka sigilan expr. table-banc; table-bench;
Schulbank mit Tisch. Category: Household
equipment.
29/01/2026 352

kalankalan kalansoba
kalankalan Verbe. bigarrer, barioler, teindre en kalanman [á] Nom. bariolé, rayé, multicolore;
2 2
plusieurs couleurs, rayé; variegate, dye in variegated, striped, multi-coloured; bunt,
different colours; bunt gestalten, beleben, gestreift, mehrfarbig. finin kalanman tissu
abwandeln, in verschiedenen Farben färben. bariolé. colourful fabric. bunter Stoff. misi
Garankew bɛ finin kalankalan. Le
kalanman vache multicolore. multicoloured
cordonnier teint les étoffes de divers couleurs.
cow. mehrfarbige Kuh. Category: colour.
The cobbler dyed the fabrics in various
colours. Der Schuster färbt die Stoffe in kalannen [à-à] Jula: kalanni. Nom. enseignement,
verschiedenen Farben. A ɲɛ kalankalannen instruction, connaissance, instruit; teaching,
don. Il est multicolore. It is multicoloured. Es instruction, knowledge, educated; Unterricht,
ist bunt.
Instruktion, das Wissen, die Kenntnis,
gebildet. Kunfinw o, mɔgɔ kalannenw o...
kalankalanma [á] Nom. rayé; striped; gestreift. Fali
Que ce soit les illettrés ou les gens instruits...
kalankalanma ? N m'o ye. Un âne rayé ? Je Whether illiterate or educated people... Ob
n'en ai jamais vu. A striped donkey? I’ve never Analphabeten oder gebildete Menschen...
seen one. Ein gestreifter Esel? Ich habe noch Category: Learn.
nie einen gesehen.
kalanni Nom. couture; sewing; Nähen, Schneiderei.
kalankɛla [à-à-ɛ̀] Nom. stagiaire, étudiant, Category: Worker, occupation.
enseignant; trainee, intern, student, teacher,
kalannimansin kuranta Nom. machine à coudre
instructor; Praktikant, Student,
Auszubildende, Ausbilder, Lehrer. Wari t'a
électrique; electric sewing machine;
elektrische Nähmaschine.
bolo, kalankɛla don. Il n'a pas d'argent, il est
étudiant. He has no money, he is a student. Er
kalannin [à-à] Nom. 1 • intellectuel, personne
hat kein Geld, er ist Student. Category: Learn, instruite; intellectual person; Intellektuelle.
Worker, occupation. 2 • connaissance, instruction; knowledge,
kalankɛɲɛ [à-à] Nom. élève qui a échoué dans les
instruction; Kenntnis, Wissen, Unterricht.
études; pupil who failed in his studies; Schüler, kalansen [à-à-ẽ́] Morphemes: kàlan-sen. Nom.
der seine Studien nicht bestanden hat. Mɔgɔ leçon; lesson; Lektion. ... gafe in kɔnɔ
min dɛsɛra kalan na, o ye kalankɛɲɛ ye. On kalansenw ... ... les leçons de ce livre ...
appelle kalankɛɲɛ celui qui a échoué dans les ...the lessons of this book... ...die Lehren /
études. We call kalankɛɲɛ someone who failed Lektionen aus diesem Buch... Category: Learn.
in studies. Wir nennen jemanden, der im
kalansira [à-à] Nom. enseignement, éducation;
Studium versagt hat, Kalankɛɲɛ.
Category: Learn.
teaching, education; Unterricht, Ausbildung.
kalansira minisiri Ministre de l’Éducation.
kalanlandi [à-à] Nom. qui aime l'étude; who loves
Minister of Education. Bildungsminister.
study; der das Lernen liebt. Musa ye Category: Learn.
kalanlandi ye. Moussa aime étudier. kalanso [à-à-ó] Morphemes: kàlan-so. Nom. école,
1
(littéralement: «il est facile à instruire»).
salle de classe, salle de cours; school,
Moussa likes to study. (literally: “he is easy to
classroom; Schule, Klassenzimmer. Kalanso
teach”). Moussa lernt gern. (wörtlich: „er ist
leicht zu unterrichten“). fitinin/fɔlɔ. École primaire. Primary school.
Primarschule. ... ka kalanso kura jɔ... ...
kalanman [á] variante: kalaman. Nom. 1 • chaud,
1
construire de nouvelles classes... ... build new
brûlant; hot, burning; heiß, brennend. Ni ntori
classrooms... ... neue Klassenzimmer bauen...
ma bin ji kalanman na, a t'a dɔn ko ji sugu Category: Learn, Building. synonyme: lekɔli.
fila bɛ yen. Tant que le crapaud n'est pas
kalanso [á] variante: kaanso, kalanson, kulensen,
tombé dan l'eau chaude, il ignore qu'il y a deux 2
sortes d'eau. (proverbe). Until the toad falls kaanson. Verbe. entrecroiser, tresser, croiser,
into hot water, it does not know that there are entrelacer; intertwine, intersect, cross,
two kinds of water. (proverb). Bis die Kröte in intertwine sth., braid, plait; kreuzen,
heißes Wasser fällt, weiß sie nicht, dass es verflechten, flechten. k'i bolo kalanso croiser
zwei Arten von Wasser gibt. (Sprichwort). les bras. cross your arms. sich die Arme
2 • rapide; fast; schnell. verschränken. synonyme: kolonso.
3 • vitesse; speed; Geschwindigkeit. Mobili kalansoba [à-ã̀-ó-á] Morphemes: kalanso-ba.
fana ni kalanman tɛmɛna. La voiture passa à
Nom. université; university; Universität.
toute allure. The car passed at full speed. Das Category: Learn, Building.
Auto fuhr mit voller Geschwindigkeit vorbei. synonyme: sannayɛlɛnkalanso.
29/01/2026 353

kalansonan kalenni
kalansonan [á-ã́-ó-ã́] n.comp. conjonction de kalaya [á] variante: kalanya. 1 • Verbe. faire
coordination; coordination conjunction; chauffer, chauffer; to heat; erhitzen. ... u ka ji
Konjunktion. Category: Grammar. kalaya... ... qu'elle fasse chauffer de l'eau...
synonyme: kumasentugulan.
...let her heat some water... ..laß sie etwas
kalansɔlinɔna Nom. pronom relatif; relative Wasser erhitzen... A fari bɛ kalaya. Elle a le
pronoun; relativ Pronomen. corps qui s'échauffe. Her body is heating up.
Category: Grammar. Ihr Körper erwärmt sich.
kalanta [à-à] Nom. 1 • à lire, pour la lecture, lisible; for
2 • Verbe. se dépêcher; hurry up, hasten; sich
beeilen. I kalaya ka a kɛ ! Dépêche-toi de le
reading, readable; zum lesen, lesbar.
faire ! Hurry up and do it! Beeilen Sie sich und
2 • thème; topic, subject, theme; Thema.
machen Sie es!
3 • rentrée des classes; start of school,
3 • Nom. chaleur; heat; Hitze, Wärme. Farikolo
back-to-school season; Schulanfang,
Schulbeginn. Category: Learn.
ɲɛnama kalaya tɛ tɛmɛ 42 kan. La chaleur
du corps humain vivant ne peut dépasser 42
kalantan [à-à] Morphemes: kala-ntan. Nom. 1 • sans
degrés. The heat of the living human body
intérêt, insignifiant, dénué de sens; cannot exceed 42 degrees. Die Wärme des
uninteresting, insignificant, meaningless, lebenden menschlichen Körpers darf 42 Grad
nonsense; belanglos, unbedeutend, nicht überschreiten.
bedeutungslos, Unsinn. ... kabi dugu jɛra e
kale [á-é] synonyme: wolo, dabu. Nom. cheval
1
bɛ kuma kalantan na. ... depuis ce matin, tu
blanc à naseaux roux; white horse with pink
ne dis que des balivernes. ... since this
nose; weisses Pferd mit rosa Nüstern.
morning, you’ve been talking nonsense. ... seit
heute Morgen redest du nur Unsinn. kale 2 [á-é] Emprunt de : arabe. Nom. sulfure
2 • au comportement asocial; antisocial d'antimoine, servant de cosmétique et de
behavior; asoziales Verhalten. mɔgɔ collyre, khôl, fard; Antimony sulphide, used as
kalantan personne au comportement asocial.
cosmetic; Antimon Sulfid, als Kosmetik. Ni i
person with antisocial behavior. Person mit
ye kunatɔ muso ye ka kale da, a ɲɛ bɛ mɔgɔ
asozialem Verhalten. wɛrɛ la. Si tu vois l'épouse du lépreux se
kalanyɔrɔ [à-ã̀-ɔ́-ɔ́] Morphemes: kalan-yɔrɔ.
farder, c'est qu'elle convoite un autre homme.
(proverbe). If you see the leper's wife putting
variante: kalankɛyɔrɔ. Nom. école, salle de
on make-up, it is because she is coveting
classe, salle de cours, centre d’enseignement; another man. (proverb). Wenn Sie sehen, wie
school, classroom; Schule, Schulklasse. die Frau des Aussätzigen sich schminkt, dann
Category: Learn, Building. synonyme: lekɔli. deshalb, weil sie einen anderen Mann begehrt.
(Sprichwort).
kalanyɔrɔkuntigi [à-ã̀-ɔ̀-ɔ̀-ṹ-í-í] Nom. directeur,
directrice (d’école); head-teacher, kalekale [à-è] variante: kalikali. Nom. escalier;
headmaster, headmistress; Schuldirektor. staircase, stairs; Treppe. A ye kalekale dila
Category: Learn, Person. kɔlɔn na ka yɛlɛn. Il a aménagée un escalier
kalasira [á] Nom. couture; sewing, seam, stitching; pour remonter du puits. He has built a
Naht. Kalasira t'a ka finin na. Il n'y a pas de
staircase to go up from the well. Er hat eine
Treppe gebaut, um vom Brunnen aufzusteigen.
couture à son étoffe. There is no seam to his
synonyme: yɛlɛnyɛlɛnnan.
fabric. Es gibt keine Nähte an seinem Stoff.
kalata [à-à-á] Nom. élection, scrutin; election; Wahl, kalemurunin [á] Nom. couteau pliant; folding knife;
Abstimmung. Kalata ko filanan deuxième
Klappmesser.
tour des élections. second round of elections. kalen [à-ẽ́] variante: kali. vi. jurer, prêter serment;
zweite Wahlrunde. Category: Government. swear, take an oath; schwören, Eid ablegen.
kalatala [à-à-à] Nom. électeur; voter, elector; synonyme: dafalen 2 .
Wähler, Stimmberechtigter. Kalatala ye mɔgɔ kalenkan [à-ẽ̀-ã́] Nom. promesse, parole donnée,
miliyɔn duuru ye... Il y a cinq millions serment; promise, given word, oath, vow;
d'électeurs... There are five million voters... Es Versprechen, Eid, Schwur. synonyme: kali ,
1
gibt fünf Millionen Wähler... dalakan.
kalatasɛbɛ [à-à-à] Morphemes: kalata-sɛbɛ. Nom. kalenni [à-è-í] Nom. serment; oath; Eid, Schwur.
1
carte d’électeur; voting card;
Stimmrechtsausweis.
29/01/2026 354

kalenni kalisiyɔmu
kalenni [à-è] Nom. saut périlleux; somersault; Salto. kalifa [à-ì-à] Emprunt de : arabe. 1 • vt. confier;
2 1
Kalenni farati ka bon gengelen kan. Le saut entrust, commit; anvertrauen, betrauen mit.
périlleux est dangereux sur la terre ferme. The Mɔgɔ tɛ sogosu kalifa sukuru ma. On ne
somersault is dangerous on land. Der Salto ist confie pas à l'hyène le cadavre d'un animal.
gefährlich auf dem Festland. synonyme: kali . (proverbe). You don't entrust the hyena with
2
the corpse of an animal. (proverb). Man
kalennidunun [à-è-ì] Nom. danse acrobatique (et
vertraut der Hyäne nicht die Leiche eines
musique jouée pour cette danse); Acrobatic Tieres an. (Sprichwort).
dance (and music for this dance);
2 • vt. ce qui est confié, chose confiée, personne
Akrobatiktanz (und dazu gespielte Musik),
confiée; what is entrusted, thing entrusted,
akrobatische Tänze. U tilala ka dunun yɛlɛma person entrusted; was anvertraut wird,
ka a kɛ kalennidunun ye. A la fin ils anvertraute Sache, anvertraute Person. Ne ka
changèrent de rythme et proposèrent des kan ka siran, sabu la kalifa ka gɛlɛn. Je dois
danses acrobatiques. At the end they changed
bien avoir peur, car ce qui est confié rend
their rhythm and proposed acrobatic dances.
responsable. I must be afraid, because what is
Am Ende wechselten sie den Rhythmus und
entrusted makes one responsible. Ich muß
boten akrobatische Tänze an.
Angst haben, denn was anvertraut wird, macht
kali [à-í] variante: kalen, kale. 1 • v.ref. jurer, einen verantwortlich.
1
faire un serment; swear, give an oath, promise; 3 • Nom. vie, âme (ce que Dieu nous a confié);
schwören, versprechen. Ne ye n kali, o bɛ kɛ life, soul (what God has entrusted to us);
habada. Je l'ai juré, cela se fera, absolument !
Leben, Seele (was Gott uns anvertraut hat).
Ala y'a ka kalifa minɛ a la... Dieu a repris son
I swore, it will happen, absolutely! Ich habe
âme... God took back his soul... Gott nahm
geschworen, daß es passieren wird, auf jeden
Fall! synonyme: dafalen, layiduɲɔgɔnya.
seine Seele zurück ...
2
2 • Nom. serment, promesse; oath, promise; kalifa 2 [à-ì-á] Nom. objet confié, ce qui est confié,
Eid, Versprechen. Ni n ye nin kɛ, kali ka siɲɛ personne confiée; entrusted object or person;
ka n faga ! Si je fais ceci, que je meure de
anvertrautes Objekt / Ding / Sache / Person.
n'avoir pas respecté mon serment ! If I do this, Kalifa n.pro. Prénom de garçon; name of a boy; Name
may I die for breaking my oath! Wenn ich das für ein Knabe.
tue, möge ich sterben, weil ich meinen Eid
kalikali [à-ì] Verbe. s'énerver facilement, s'irriter, être
gebrochen habe! synonyme: dadi, dafalen ,
2
irascible; get angry easily, get irritated, being
sarati, kalenkan, dafanin , layidu, kandi.
2 3 petulant; schnell wütend werden, irritiert
kali [à] variante: kale, kalen. 1 • Verbe. faire un werden, unruhig sein, jähzornig sein. A
2
saut périlleux, se renverser, se retourner diminen f'a bɛ kalikali. Il s'énerve au point
complètement; take a somersault, flip over, qu'il ne tient plus en place. He gets so upset
turn completely; einen Salto machen, drehen that he can’t hold on. Er wird so wütend, daß
Sie sich auf den Kopf, drehen Sie sich er nicht mehr an seinem Platz bleibt.
vollständig um. O sinna ka kali ka bɔ nsira
kalikan See main entry: .[à-ì] variante: kalenkan.
bala. Il se mit à descendre du baobab en
n.comp. serment, promesse, parole donnée;
faisant un saut périlleux. He began to climb
oath, promise, commitment; Eid, Schwur,
down from the baobab tree, doing a
Versprechen, Verpflichtung. A ye kalikan ta.
somersault. Er begann vom Affenbrotbaum
herunterzuklettern und machte einen Salto.
Il a pris un engagement. He made a
commitment. Er hat sich verpflichtet.
synonyme: ŋalaka.
2 • Nom. saut périlleux; somersault; Salto.
kalima [á] Emprunt de : arabe. Nom. parole, mot;
synonyme: kalenni. word; Wort. Hali kalima kelen, i kana a fɔ a
2
ye. Même un seul mot, ne le lui dis pas. Even a
kali [á] Adverbe. très fort de goût (salé, amer); very
3
single word, don’t tell him. Sag ihm nicht ein
strong taste (salty, bitter); sehr starker
einziges Wort. synonyme: kumaden.
Geschmack (salzig, bitter). Kɔgɔ gannen b'a
la kali ! C'est drôlement salé ! It's really salty! kalisiyɔmu Emprunt de : français. Nom. calcium;
Es ist wirklich salzig! calcium; Calcium.
29/01/2026 355

kaliwa kalolɔ
kaliwa [á] variante: kaluwa. Nom. retraite, temps de 3 • règles, menstrues; period, menstruation;
Menstruation, Monatsblutungen. I man kɛnɛ, i
solitude et de méditation; retreat, time of
solitude and meditation; sich zurückziehen, bɛ kalo la. Tu n'est pas bien, tu as tes règles.
absondern, Zeit der Einsamkeit und You're not well, you have your period. Dir geht
Meditation. Ne y'a kaliwa de kɛ, ne yɛrɛ... es nicht gut, du hast deine Periode.
Moi-même, je suis entré en méditation... I synonyme: hayida, laada.
myself have entered into meditation... Ich kalo kunlaban [á-ó ù-á-á] Nom. dernier croissant;
selbst bin in Meditation... Category: Religion.
the moon's last quarter; abnehmende
kaliya [á-í-á] n.comp. douleur interne violente, Mondsichel. Category: Sky.
maladies comme hernies et kystes etc; violent kalo munumunusira Nom. orbite lunaire; lunar
internal pains, illnesses such as hernias and
orbit; Mondlaufbahn. Category: Sky.
cysts ; stechende inneren Schmerz,
Beschwerden wie Zysten usw. Kaliya ye n kalo yɛlɛmayɛlɛmacogo Nom. phase de la lune;
sɔgɔ n kɛrɛ la. J'ai eu une douleur au flanc très phase of the moon; Mond Phase.
violente. I had a very severe pain in the side. Category: Sky.
Ich hatte sehr starke Schmerzen in meiner kalobɔ [á-ó-ɔ́] variante: kalolabɔ. Nom. règles,
Seite. kaliya jiginta hernie étranglée.
menstruation; menstrual period;
strangulated hernia. strangulierter Monatsblutung, Menstruation.
Leistenbruch. Category: Disease. Category: Body. synonyme: kalolaada, kooli,
kaliyabonbon [á] n.comp. point de coté, boutons qui landa .
2
démangent, urticaire; splenalgia, aching
kalodibi [á] Morphemes: kalo-dibi. Nom. nuit noire;
pimples; Seitenstechen, schmerzvolle Knoten.
dark night; dunkle Nacht.
A farikolo ngurumangurumanen don
kaliyabonbon fɛ. Son corps est tout déformé kalogwɛ Morphemes: kalo-gwɛ. Nom. clair de lune;
par des gros boutons. His body is all distorted moonlight; Mondlicht. Category: Sky.
by big pimples. Sein Körper ist von großen kalojɛ [á] Jula: kalogwɛ. n.comp. pleine lune, clair
Pickeln verzerrt. Category: Disease.
de lune; full moon, moonlight; Vollmond,
kaliyakisɛ [á] Nom. 1 • ténia; tapeworm; Bandwurm. Mondlicht. Kalojɛ bɛ su kɔrɔ mɔgɔ ɲinɛ ma.
Category: Small animals, Disease. La pleine lune fait veiller tard, sans qu'on s'en
synonyme: kɔnɔnatumunin, kɔnɔnatumu, aperçoive. (proverbe). The full moon makes
sɛbɛrɛ , tɔnɔnkɔ, nsɛbɛrɛ. you stay up late, without us noticing it.
1
(proverb). Der Vollmond läßt Sie lange
2 • ankylostome; hookworm; Hakenwurm.
aufbleiben, ohne daß wir es merken.
3 • ver parasite; parasitic worm; parasitärer
(Sprichwort). Category: Sky.
Wurm. Kaliyakisɛ bɛ don wolo. Le ver
kalojugunin [á] Nom. mois entre celui de Tabaski et
parasite pénètre par la peau. The parasitic
worm enters through the skin. Der parasitäre Ramadan; month between Tabaski and
Wurm dringt durch die Haut ein. Ramadan; Monat zwischen Tabaski und
Ramadan.
kaliyakuru [á] Nom. 1 • vésicule biliaire; gallbladder;
Gallenblase. Category: Body.
kalokunbɛn [á] Nom. un mois après; one month later;
synonyme: kunankunanbara, fye, einen Monat später. A ka taali kalokunbɛn
kunakunabara. sera. Il y a un mois qu'il est parti. It's been a
month since he left. Es ist einen Monat her, seit
2 • ganglion; ganglion, node; Ganglion,,
Lymphknoten.
er gegangen ist.
3 • tumeur, kyste, grosseur; tumour, cyst, lump; kalokura Nom. nouvelle lune; new moon; Neumond.
Tumor, Zyste, Geschwulst. Category: Disease. Category: Sky.
kalo comparer: sunkalo, suun 1 .[á-ó] Nom. 1 • lune; kalolaada Jula: kalolanda. Morphemes: kalo-laada.
moon; Mond. kalo jɛ pleine lune. full moon. variante: kalolabɔ. Nom. règles, menstrues;
Vollmond. Category: Sky. menstruation; Monatsblutung, Menstruation.
2 • mois; month; Monat. kalo o kalo chaque Muso min tɛ kalolaada ye... Une femme qui
mois. every month. Jeden Monat. kalo wɛrɛ / n'a pas ses règles... A woman who doesn't have
kalo kura le mois prochain. next month.
her period... Eine Frau, die ihre Periode nicht
hat... synonyme: laada, kalobɔ, landa , hayida.
Nächsten Monat. kalo tɛmɛnin le mois 2
dernier. last month. Letzten Monat. kalolɔ [á] Nom. nouvelle lune; new moon; Neumond.
Category: Sky.
29/01/2026 356

Kalomuso kamalenɲuman
Kalomuso Nom. Vénus (étoile); Venus (star); Venus kamalen [á] comparer: cɛbalen.
(Stern). Category: Sky. variante: kamalenba. Nom. 1 • jeune homme,
kalonɔɔrɔminɛ dafanin Nom. éclipse totale; total jeune et vigoureux (également pour un
animal); young man, young and vigorous
eclipses; Totale Eklipse. Category: Sky.
(also for an animal); junger Mann, jung und
kalonɔɔrɔnmina Nom. éclipse de lune; lunar kräftig (auch für ein Tier). kamalen fɛntigi
eclipses; Mondfinsternis. Category: Sky. jeune homme riche. rich young man. reicher
kaloɲɛnin [á] Nom. premier quartier de la lune; first junger Mann. Kamalen kɔrɔ homme jeune, en
quarter of the moon; Erste Viertel des Mondes.
pleine force. young man, in full strength.
Kaloɲɛnin bɔra. La lune est à son premier
junger Mann, in voller Kraft.
synonyme: kanbele.
quartier. The moon is in its first quarter. Der
Mond ist im ersten Viertel. Category: Sky, 2 • gaillard; fellow; Gefährte. donso kamalen
Weather. synonyme: tilancɛfɔlɔ. jeune chasseur. young hunter. junger Jäger.
kalosabasara [á] Morphemes: kalo-saba-sara. 3 • amant; lover; Liebhaber. Mɔgɔ t'a fɛ ka
mɔgɔ fila ye: i muso ka kamalen ani i ka
Nom. pension trimestrielle; quarterly pension;
vierteljährliche Rente. Category: Finance. jurumantigi. Il y a deux personnes qu'on
n'aime pas rencontrer : l'amant de sa femme et
kalosabasɔgɔsɔgɔ [á] variante: kalosabanin.
son créancier. (proverbe). There are two
Nom. coqueluche; whooping cough; people you don't like to meet: your wife's lover
Keuchhusten. Category: Disease. and your creditor. (proverb). Es gibt zwei
synonyme: kulekulenin, keteketenin, Menschen, die Sie nicht gerne treffen: den
kɛtɛkɛtɛ 1 . Liebhaber Ihrer Frau und ihren Gläubiger.
(Sprichwort).
kalosara [á] Nom. salaire mensuel; monthly salary;
Monatslohn. Category: Finance.
kamalenbatɔgɔ [á] Nom. surnom de jeune homme
(ou parfois de jeune fille); nickname of a young
kalowɔɔrɔjolida synonyme: wagademili. Nom.
man (or sometimes a young girl); Spitzname
leishmaniose; leishmaniasis; Leishmaninose.
eines jungen Mannes (oder manchmal eines
Category: Disease.
jungen Mädchens). Ali kamalenbatɔgɔ ye
kama [á-ǎ] postp. 1 • pour, au bénéfice de; for, for the Ngɔlɔn. Le surnom d'Ali, c'est Ngolon. (: »le
benefit of; für, zugunsten von. N nana wari tordu»). Ali's nickname is Ngolon. (: »the
kama. Je suis venu pour l'argent. I came for crooked»). Alis Spitzname ist Ngolon. (: »der
the money. Ich bin wegen des Geldes
Krumme«).
gekommen. ... ka taa sigi kungo kɔnɔ cikɛ kamalenbaya [á] Nom. gaillardise, habitude de courir
kama. ... aller s'installer en brousse pour les filles, débauche; gaudiness, habit of
cultiver. ... go and settle in the bush to farm. chasing girls, debauchery; Fröhlichkeit,
... geh und laß dich im Busch nieder, um Gewohnheit, den Mädchen nachzulaufen,
Landwirtschaft zu betreiben. Ausschweifung. Tilematuma, a tɛ fosi ɲɛ fo
synonyme: kanma. kamalenbaya jalan. A la saison sèche, il ne
2 • à cause de; due to, because of, on account fait rien que courir les filles. In the dry season,
of; wegen. ... a ka cɛɲiya kama. ... à cause de all he does is chase the girls. In der
sa beauté. ...because of her beauty. ...wegen Trockenzeit jagt er nur die Mädchen.
ihrer Schönheit. kamalencɛɲi [á] Nom. tantale ibis; Wood Ibis;
3 • contre; against; gegen. Ni áw ye marifa de Vogelart. Category: Bird. ibis ibis.
sɔsɔ nin kama... Si vous chargez vos fusils synonyme: jumɛjɛ.
contre lui... If you charge your guns against
kamalennkɔnin [á] Nom. luth à six cordes; six-string
him... Wenn Sie Ihre Waffen gegen ihn
richten...
lute; sechssaitige Laute. Category: Musical
instrument.
4 • vers, à l'endroit de; towards, at the place of;
hin, an der Stelle von. ... u bɛ taa nsonsannin kamalenɲuman
ba kama... ... ils vont vers la mère du Lièvre... [á] Morphemes: kamalen-ɲuman. Nom.
...they go to the Hare's mother... ...sie gehen jabiru du Sénégal; saddle billed stork,
zur Mutter des Hasen... saddlebill; Sattelstorch. Category: Bird.
ephippiorhynchus senegalensis.
synonyme: npɔlɔnsama, pɔlɔnsama,
konkanu.
29/01/2026 357

kamalensamara kamankɔrɔla
kamalensamara 2 • aile; wing; Flügel. ... ne bɛna kɔnɔba
[á] Morphemes: kamalen-samara. Nom. kaman kari... ... je vais casser les ailes du
plante utilisée dans le traitement des maladies grand oiseau... ... I will break the wings of the
infantiles; plant used in the treatment of big bird... ... ich breche dem großen Vogel die
childhood illnesses; Pflanze zur Behandlung Flügel... Category: Parts of an animal.
von Kinderkrankheiten. Category: Grass, synonyme: kamanfura.
herb, vine. alternanthera repens. 3 • pétale; petal; Blütenblatt. Category: Parts
kamalenya [á] Nom. 1 • âge et état de jeunesse; age of of a plant.
youth; Jugendalter. kaman 2 [á] variante: kaban. Nom. neuf (uniquement
2 • impudence, indécence de comportement pour les calebasses); new (only for
(exagération, forfanterie, manque de calabashes); neu (nur für Kalebassen). A ye ji
vergogne...); impudence, indecency of kɛ filen kaman kɔnɔ. Il mit de l'eau dans
behaviour (exaggeration, boasting, lack of
une calebasse neuve. He put water in a new
shame, etc.); Unverschämtheit,
calabash. Er füllte Wasser in eine neue
Unanständigkeit des Verhaltens
Kalebasse. Category: Container.
(Übertreibung, Prahlerei, Mangel an Scham
usw.) Kamalenya tɛ dugu tɛmɛ. La kamanagan [à-à-á-à] 1 • Verbe. inquiéter,
forfanterie ne dépasse pas les limites du préoccuper, tracasser; worry, trouble;
village. (proverbe). The boasting does not go beunruhigen. N dɔgɔw minɛcogo ye n
beyond the limits of the village. (proverb). Die kamanagan. Ce qui m'inquiète est la façon
Prahlerei geht nicht über die Grenzen des dont je dois m'occuper de mes cadets. What
Dorfes hinaus. (Sprichwort). Jurusarabaliya worries me is how I should take care of my
tɛ kamalenya ye, ka juru to i la ka dɔ sɔrɔ, o siblings. Was mich beunruhigt, ist, wie ich für
de ye kamalenya ye. L'impudence n'est pas meine jüngeren Geschwistern sorgen soll.
de ne pas s’acquitter de ses dettes, mais d'en 2 • Nom. inquiétude, angoisse, préoccupation,
contracter une nouvelle sans être acquitté des tracas; worry, anxiety, concern, hassle; Angst,
autres. (proverbe). Impudence is not in not Sorgen. ... o de kamanagan bɛ ale la bi. ...
paying one's debts, but in contracting a new c'est cette inquiétude-là qu'il a aujourd'hui.
one without being acquitted of the others. ...that's the worry he has today. ...das ist die
(proverb). Unverschämtheit besteht nicht Sorge, die er heute hat.
darin, seine Schulden nicht zu bezahlen,
kamanaganbagatɔ
sondern darin, eine neue aufzunehmen, ohne
[à-à-à-à-à-à] variante: [kamanagwanbaat
von den anderen freigesprochen zu werden.
(Sprichwort). ɔ]. Nom. inquiet, angoissé; worried, anxious;
3 • devenir adulte; become an adult; erwachsen besorgt, ängstlich.
werden. A ka kamalenya dafara, a bɛ san kamanfura [à-à] Nom. aile; wing; Flügel. A ka
bisaba bɔ. Il devint adulte, il eut trente ans. kamanfura fila bɛɛ ɲiginna. Ses deux ailes se
He became an adult, he was thirty years old. sont mouillées. Both of his wings got wet.
Er wurde erwachsen, er war dreißig Jahre alt. Beide Flügel wurden nass. Category: Parts of
kamalenyatɔgɔ [á] Nom. surnom de jeune homme, an animal. synonyme: kaman 1 .
surnom; nickname for a young man, nickname; kamanfyɛfyɛ [à-à] Nom. omoplate; shoulder blade,
Spitzname für einen jungen Mann, Spitzname.
scapula; Schulterblatt. Category: Body.
Alu kamalenyatɔgɔ tun ye Nɔsɛri ye. Le
synonyme: gamankolo, gamankun.
surnom d'Alou était Noceur. Alou's nickname
was Noceur. Alous Spitzname war Noceur. kamankɔrɔbɔ
kaman [à] Nom. 1 • épaule; shoulder; Schulter. Ni i [à-à-ɔ̀-ɔ̀] Morphemes: kaman-kɔrɔ-bɔ.
1
m'i ɲun woro la, i tɛ kaman sɔrɔ. Si tu ne te variante: kamankɔrɔden. Nom. bourgeon
axillaire; axillary bud; Achselknospe.
charges pas de la cuisse, tu n'auras pas l'épaule.
(proverbe). If you do not care for the thigh, you Nakɔtigi bɛ tamati sun kamankɔrɔbɔw bɛɛ
will not have the shoulder. (proverb). Wenn du kari. Le jardinier coupe tous les bourgeons
nicht mit dem Schenkel aufpasst, wirst du axillaire sur le pied de tomate. The gardener
keine Schulter haben. (Sprichwort). cuts all the axillary buds on the tomato plant.
Category: Body. synonyme: kamankun, Der Gärtner schneidet alle Achselknospen der
gaman, fɛfɛ. Tomatenpflanze ab. Category: Parts of a plant.
2
kamankɔrɔla [à-à-ɔ̀-ɔ̀] Nom. aisselle; armpit;
Achsel. synonyme: gamankɔrɔ, gamankɔrɔla.
29/01/2026 358

kamankɔrɔsii kami
kamankɔrɔsii kamanmafɛn
[à-à-ɔ̀-ɔ̀] Morphemes: kaman-kɔrɔ-sii. [à-à-à] Morphemes: kaman-ma-fɛn. Nom.
Nom. poils de aisselle; armpit hair; créature ailée, oiseau, volatile, volaille; winged
Achselhaare. Ni ɲɔsusulaw y'u kamankɔrɔsii creature, bird, volatile, poultry; geflügelte
dogo ɲɔgɔn na, ɲɔ tɛ jɛ. Si les pileuses se Kreatur, Vogel, Geflügel. ... kamanmafɛnw :
cachent mutuellement les poils qu'elles ont syɛ, kami, tɔnlɔnɔ... ... la volaille : poules,
sous les bras,, le mil ne sera pas bien pilé. pintades, canards... ... poultry: chickens,
(proverbe). If the women who pound millet, guinea fowl, ducks... ... Geflügel: Hühner,
hide the hairs they have under their arms from Perlhühner, Enten... Category: Animal
each other, the millet will not be crushed well. husbandry, Bird. synonyme: gamanmafɛn.
(proverb). Wenn die Frauen beim
kamansii [à-à] Nom. plume de l'aile; wing feather;
Hirsestampfen ihre Haare, die sie unter den
Armen haben, voreinander verstecken, wird Feder des Flügels. Category: Parts of an
die Hirse nicht gut zerkleinert. (Sprichwort). animal. synonyme: gamansi.
Category: Body. synonyme: gamankɔrɔsi. kamaɲa Nom. arbre (espèce); tree sp; Baumart.
kamankɔrɔsɔgɔ Category: Tree. celtis integrifolia.
[à-à-ɔ̀-ɔ̀] Morphemes: kaman-kɔrɔ-sɔgɔ. kamari [à] variante: kamali, kamani. Verbe.
variante: kamankɔrɔsɔgɔsira. 1 • Verbe. rassembler, réunir; gather, bring together;
prendre un raccourci; take a shortcut; eine zusammenbringen, zusammenführen. ka wari
Abkürzung nehmen. Ni i kɔrɔtɔlen don, i tɛ kamari rassembler l'argent. collect money,
sira kamankɔrɔsɔgɔ wa ? Si tu es pressé. tu raise the money. Geld sammeln. Tuma min
ne peux pas prendre un raccourci ? If you're in
jama kamarila... Quand les gens furent
a hurry. can't you take a shortcut? Wenn du es
réunis... When the people were gathered... Als
eilig hast, kannst du nicht eine Abkürzung
die Leute zusammenkamen...
nehmen?
synonyme: dalajɛ.
2 • Nom. raccourci; shortcut; Abkürzung.
kamaro [á-à-ó] Nom. gomme arabique; gum arabic;
kamankɔrɔwo [à-à-ɔ̀-ɔ̀] Nom. creux d'aisselle;
underarm hollow; Achselhöhle.
Gummi arabicum. ka kamaro kɛ daba la
Category: Body. mettre de la gomme arabique dans l'encre. put
gum Arabic in the ink. Gummi arabicum in die
kamankun [à-à] Morphemes: kaman-kun.
Tinte geben.
variante: kamankuru. Nom. 1 • épaule; kamasen synonyme: torisen. Nom. herbe aux fleurs
shoulder; Schulter. ɲɛmunun dan ye
d'or; Milk thistle-Chrysantellum; Pferdestau.
kamankun ye. La limite jusqu'où peut tourner Category: Grass, herb, vine. chrysanthellum
l’œil, c'est l’épaule. (proverbe). The limit of americanum.
how far the eye can turn is the shoulder.
kamasɔrɔ variante: kasɔrɔ. conj. alors que, depuis;
(proverb). Die Grenze, wie weit das Auge sich
bewegen kann, ist die Schulter. (Sprichwort). while, since; während, solange als.
synonyme: gamankun, kaman 1 , fɛfɛ 2 , gaman. Kameruni Nom. Cameroun; Cameroon; Kamerun.
2 • costaud; strong, tough, big guy; stark, Category: Country.
kräftig. Kamalen ni kamankun tɛ kelen ye. kami [à-í] variante: kanmi, kimi. Nom. pintade;
1
Un jeune homme et un costaud ce n'est pas la
guinea fowl; Perlhuhn. Ni kungowulunin min
même chose. (proverbe). A young man and a
big guy are not the same thing. (proverb). Ein ye i ta kɛ sunɔgɔ ye, o tɛ kami minɛ. Le
junger Mann und ein kräftiger sind nicht das chacal qui passe son temps à dormir n’attrape
Gleiche. (Sprichwort). pas de pintade. (proverbe). The jackal who
spends his time sleeping does not catch guinea
kamanma [à-à] Nom. pourvu d'ailes; with wings; mit
fowl. (proverb). Der Schakal, der seine Zeit
Flügeln. mit Schlafen verbringt, fängt keine Perlhühner.
(Sprichwort). Category: Bird. numida
meleagris.
kami [à] Nom. 1 • braise; live embers; glühende
2
Asche, glühende Kohle. ka sogo jeni
tasumakami la. griller de la viande sur la
braise. grill meat on the coals. Fleisch auf
den Kohlen grillen.
29/01/2026 359

kami kan
2 • être ardent, intense, se quereller, se fâcher; kan [ã̀] postp. 1 • sur, à, chez; on, at; auf, bei.
1
be burning, be intense, to quarrel, be upset;
Liburu bi sigilan kan. Le livre est sur la
brennen, intensiv sein, sich streiten. Baara
chaise. The book is on the chair. Das Buch ist
kamina. Le travail bat son plein. Work is in
auf dem Stuhl. sira kan sur la route. on the
full swing. Die Arbeiten sind in vollem Gange.
road. auf der Strasse. Olu bɛ sira kan. Ils sont
kami 3 [á] Verbe. cligner (d’œil), trembler; screw up sur la route. they're on the road. Sie sind
one's eyes, blink, tremble; mit den Augen unterwegs.
zwinkern, blinken, zittern, blinzeln. Mɔgɔ 2 • à propos de, sur; about; über. Tɔnsigi tun
ninagɛlɛn don, hali a ɲɛ tɛ kami. C'est bi furusiri kan. Le réunion a été sur le
quelqu'un d'insensible, son œil ne tremble pas. mariage. The meeting was about the marriage.
He is a callous man, his eye does not tremble. Das Treffen war über das Heiraten. Nin gafe
Er ist ein unsensibler Mensch, sein Auge zuckt
bi julakan kan. Ce livre est sur la langue
nicht.
dioula. This book is about the Dioula
kamibin Nom. espèce d'herbe; kind of grass; Grasart. language. Dieses Buch ist über die Dioula
Category: Grass, herb, vine. brachiaria Sprache.
stigmatisata.
kan comparer: ka kan ni ... ye.[ã́] adj.pred. 1 • égal,
2
kamiden Nom. pintadeau; chick of guinea fowl; identique, pareil; equal, identical, same
Perlhuhn Kücken. similar; gleich, egal, entsprechen, ebenbürtig,
kamifan Nom. œuf de pintade; guinea fowl egg; identisch. A bɛɛ ka kan n ye. Pour moi, c’est
égal. It’s all the same for me. I don’t mind. Für
Perlhuhn Ei.
mich ist es egal.
kamikami [à-ì-á-í] variante: kɔmikɔmi, kankamu. 2 • nécessaire, devoir, obligatoire; necessary,
1 • Verbe. clignoter, trembler, émouvoir, should, must, obligatory; erforderlich, nötig,
affliger; to blink, twinkle, tremble, move, notwendig, unvermeidlich, wichtig, muß,
distress; blinken, blinzeln, zittern, bewegen, müssen, soll, sollen, sollten. Denmisɛnw ka
kümmern. O ye ne dusukun kamikami kan ka nɔnɔ min. Il faut que les enfants
kosɛbɛ. Ça m'a beaucoup ému. It moved me a boivent du lait. The children should drink milk.
lot. Es hat mich sehr bewegt. Kinder sollten Mich trinken. An man kan ka
2 • Verbe. sangloter; sob; schluchzen. ka fɛn gɛlɛnw kari n’an ɲinw ye. Nous ne
kamikami jatigɛ fɛ sangloter de peur. sob in devons pas casser des choses dures avec les
fear. schluchze vor Angst. dents. We should not break hard objects with
our teeth. Wir sollten nicht hart Sachen mit
3 • Nom. grande affliction, sanglot; great
affliction, sobbing; große Trauer, Schluchzen. den Zähnen verbeissen. U ko o ka kan. Ils
disent que cela est nécessaire. They say this is
kaminbin [à-ì] Nom. espèce d'herbe; grass species;
necessary. Sie sagen, das sei notwendig.
Art von Gras. Category: Grass, herb, vine.
3 • avoir droit, mériter, devoir, falloir; to have
brachiaria stigmatisata.
the right, to deserve, to have, to have to,
kamiɲadonkalo Nom. mai (mois); May; Mai. should; das Recht haben, verdienen, haben,
Category: Weather. synonyme: mɛnkalo. müssen. ... a ka kan ni ɲangili ye. ... il mérite
d'être puni. ...he deserves to be punished. ...er
kamitulu [à] Nom. crête de pintade; comb of a guinea
verdient es, bestraft zu werden. A ko o man
fowl; Kamm eines Perlhuhns. Category: Parts
kan koyi ! Il dit : «Il ne faut pas faire cela!».
of an animal.
He said: “You must not do that!” Er sagte:
kamiyɔn Emprunt de : français. variante: kamiɲɔn. „Das darfst du nicht tun!“. A ka kan ka na. Il
Nom. camion; truck, lorry; Lastwagen. doit venir. He must come. Er muß kommen.
Category: Travel. synonyme: donitamobili.
kan [ã̀] variante: kaan. vt. 1 • couper, faucher,
3
kamusi [à-ù] Nom. dictionnaire, lexique; dictionary, récolter en fauchant; cut, scythe, harvest by
lexicon; Wörterbuch, Lexikon. cutting; schneiden, abmähen, ernten. Malo ni
Category: Language and thought. fini bi kan. On fauche le riz et le fonio. Rice
synonyme: daɲɛgafe. and fonio are cut (i.e. with a sickle). Reis und
Fonio werden (mit der Sichel) geschnitten.
Category: Agriculture.
2 • coiffer, tondre; do someone's hair, cut hair,
shear, shave; Haare schneiden, abscheren,
mähen. ka kunsigi kan couper les cheveux.
cut hair. die Haare schneiden.
29/01/2026 360

kan kanbelenin
kan [ã]́ variante: kaan. Nom. 1 • cou, gorge, col; kana [à-â] comparer: ka. part. valeur prohibitive
4 2
neck, throat; Hals, Kehle. Mamurukanjan (ne ... pas !), marque du souhait négatif;
dulonnen bɛ a ka dɔlɔkikan na. Une mante forbidding to, marking of a negative wish,
don't; verbieten zu (mach nicht ..., mach kein
religieuse est accrochée au col de son boubou.
...), negative Wunschmarkierung. Ala kana
A praying mantis hangs from the collar of her
dress. Am Kragen ihres Kleides hängt eine baraka don son na. Que Dieu ne bénisse pas
Gottesanbeterin (Insekt). Category: Body. le voleur. May God not bless this thief. Möge
2 • son, bruit chant, voix; sound, noise, song, Gott diesen Dieb nicht segnen. Kana kasi ! Ne
voice; Geräusch, Lärm, Lied, Stimme. pleurs pas ! Don't cry! Weine nicht!
kasikan chant (d'oiseau), cri (d'un animal), kanabaga [á] Nom. protecteur, policier; protector,
pleurs. song (of a bird), cry (of an animal),
police officer; Beschützer, Polizist.
crying. Gesang (eines Vogels), Schrei (eines
Category: Worker, occupation.
Tieres), Weinen. A kan ka di dɛ ! Elle a une
très belle voix ! She has a very beautiful voice!
kanan [á] variante: kana. Verbe. ébrancher,
Sie hat eine sehr schöne Stimme! émonder, tailler; prune; beschneiden. ka jiri
3 • langue, parole; language, speech; Sprache, kanan, ka dɔgɔ kanan ébrancher un arbre,
das Reden. ... cɛ kan y'o bɛɛ ye. ... tout ça, tailler du bois pour le feu. prune a tree, cut
c'est ce que dit le mari. ...all that is what the wood for the fire. Einen Baum beschneiden,
husband says. ...das alles sagt der Ehemann. Holz für das Feuer schlagen, Holz für das
Kan si tɛ mɔgɔ yɛrɛ ka kan bɔ. Aucune Feuer schneiden.
langue ne vaut sa propre langue. No language Kanari Nom. Canaries; Canary Islands; Kanarische
is better than its own language. Keine Sprache
Inseln. Category: Country.
ist besser als die eigene.
kanba [á] Nom. 1 • long, haut; long, high; lang, hoch.
kan [á] Jula: kaan. Nom. cou; neck; Hals.
5
Sama sen kanba ani sama bolo kanba.
Category: Body, Parts of an animal.
L'éléphant aux grandes jambes, l'éléphant aux
kan 6 variante: kaan. Nom. 1 • cou, gorge, col; neck, grands bras. The elephant with the big legs, the
throat; Nacken, Genick, Hals, Kehle. elephant with the big arms. Der Elefant mit
Category: Body. den großen Beinen, der Elefant mit den großen
2 • voix, chant; voice, song; Stimme, Lied. Armen.
3 • langue, parole, le parler; language, speech; 2 • personne à la voix forte; person with loud
Sprache, das Reden, Sprechen, Rede. voice; Person mit lauter Stimme. Karisa ye
-kan [á] suf. suffixe qui indique une langue; suffix kanba ye dɛ ! Untel a une voix forte !
So-and-so has a loud voice! Der und der hat
indicating language; Suffix, das eine Sprache
eine laute Stimme!
angibt. julakan le dioula, la langue des Dioula.
Dioula, the language of the Jula people. die kanbele [á-é-é] Nom. 1 • jeune homme; young man;
Dioula Sprache. tubabukan le français, la junger Mann. synonyme: kanbelenin,
langue des ’tubabu’. French, the language of kamalen.
the ’tubabu’. Französisch, die Sprache der
2 • copain, petit ami; boyfriend; Freund. Kaja
Weissen. bamanankan ani fulakan la langue
kamalen ye Nuhun ye. Le copain de Kaja est
bambara et la langue peule. the Bambara
Nuhun. Kaja’s boyfriend is Nuhun. Nuhun ist
language and the Fulani language. die
Bambara- und die Fulani-Sprache.
Kjas Freund. Category: Person.
kana [á-á] Verbe. 1 • protéger, veiller sur; protect,
kanbeleba Nom. play-boy; playboy; Playboy.
1
watch over; beschützen, wachen über. Bɔnɛ tɛ kanbelegɔnin Nom. bolon; kind of bass harp; Harfe.
kana. On ne peut se protéger contre le Category: Musical instrument.
malheur. (proverbe). One cannot protect synonyme: donsogɔnin.
oneself from misfortune. (proverb). Man kann
kanbelenin Nom. jeune homme; young man; junger
sich nicht vor dem Unglück schützen.
(Sprichwort).
Mann. Category: Person. synonyme: kanbele.
2 • protection, sécurité; protection, security;
Schutz, Sicherheit.
29/01/2026 361

kanbɛn kandi
kanbɛn [á-ɛ̌] Morphemes: kan-bɛn. 1 • Verbe. 2 • s'adresser à, déclarer, se présenter à; to
speak to somebody, declare, to introduce to;
s'entendre, être d'accord, réconcilier; to agree,
mit jemandem sprechen, erklären, sich
be in agreement, reconcile; einverstanden
jemandem vorstellen. A y'i kanbɔ a ka
sein, übereinstimmen, versöhnen. Olu kɔni
jɔnmuso ma. Il s'adressa à sa captive. He
ma se ka kanbɛn a la. Eux en tout cas n'ont
addressed his captive. Er sprach seinen
pas réussi à s'entendre. In any case, they did
Gefangenen an. Nin ye a siɲɛ filanan ye, a ka
not manage to come to an agreement.
Jedenfalls gelang es ihnen nicht, eine Einigung a kanbɔ jamanakuntigiya nɔfɛ. C'est la
zu erzielen. synonyme: bɛnkan. deuxième fois qu'il se présente à l'élection
présidentielle. This is the second time he is
2 • Nom. accord; agreement; Übereinkunft.
running for president. Dies ist das zweite Mal,
Ninnu ka kanbɛn ye sɛbɛba de ye. Leur
dass er für das Präsidentenamt kandidiert.
accord est vraiment quelque chose de sérieux.
Their agreement is really something serious. kanbɔla [á-ɔ́-á] Morphemes: kan-bɔ-la. Nom.
Ihre Vereinbarung ist wirklich etwas Ernstes. candidat; candidate; Kandidat.
kanbɛrɛnin timbre de la voix; accent, cadence, synonyme: laɲinibaga, jɔyɔrɔɲinina.
intonation; Tonfall. Category: Grammar. kancaamanfɔla See main entry: .
kanbila [á-ì-á] Verbe. appeler, héler, faire appel, variante: kancamanfɔla, kancaamanmɛla.
convoquer; call, hail, appeal, summon; rufen, n.comp. polyglotte; polyglot; mehrsprachig,
appellieren, vorladen. Dugutigi y'i kanbila a vielsprachig.
ka dugudenw ma. Le chef de village a kancaamanmɛla variante: kancamanmɛnla.
convoqué les gens du village. The village chief n.comp. polyglotte; polyglot; mehrsprachig,
summoned the people of the village. Der vielsprachig.
Dorfvorsteher rief die Dorfbewohner
kancɛ [á-ɛ̌] Morphemes: kan-cɛ. Verbe. attraper au
zusammen. synonyme: kanbɔ.
collet, attraper; to catch by the collar, to
kanbilali [ã́-í-á-í] Morphemes: kan-bila-li. Nom. catch; am Kragen fangen, fangen, schnappen.
désobéissance, trahison, manquement à la Polisiw ye nson kancɛ. Les policiers ont
parole; disobedience, treason, treachery; attrapé le voleur. The police caught the thief.
Ungehorsam, Verrat. kanbilali kɛ désobéir. Die Polizei hat den Dieb geschnappt.
disobey. nicht gehorchen, ungehorsam sein. kancida [á] Morphemes: kan-ci-da. Nom. encolure,
kanbolofara [á] variante: kanbolofaran. n.comp. cou (d'un vêtement); neckline, neck (of a
dialecte; dialect; Dialekt, Mundart. A bɛ se ka garment); Ausschnitt, Halsausschnitt (eines
Kleidungsstücks). Kunkolo bɛ bɔ wo min fɛ,
kɛ, fɛn kelen tɔgɔ tɛ kelen ye kanbolofara
fila la... Il est possible qu'une même chose
a bɛ fɔ o ma kancida. C'est l'orifice du
vêtement par où passe la tête. This is the
n'ait pas le même nom dans deux dialectes
opening in the clothing through which the
différents... It is possible that the same thing
head passes. Dies ist die Öffnung in der
does not have the same name in two different
Kleidung, durch die der Kopf hindurchgeht.
dialects... Es ist möglich, daß dasselbe Ding in
Category: Clothing.
zwei verschiedenen Dialekten nicht den
gleichen Namen hat ... Category: Grammar, kanda [á] Morphemes: kan-da. Nom. ouverture;
Language. opening; Öffnung. kulusi kanda l'ouverture
kanbolofarankalan n.comp. dialectologie; du pantalon (: par quoi on l'enfile). the opening
dialectology; Dialektologie. of the pants (how you put them on). die
Category: Grammar, Language, Language Öffnung der Hose (wie man sie anzieht).
and thought. kandi [ã́-í] Morphemes: kan-di. Variant: dadi.
kanbɔ [ã-́ ɔ́] Verbe. 1 • appeler, convoquer; call, 1 • Verbe. promettre, s'engager; promise,
summon; rufen, einberufen, vorladen. commit; versprechen, sich verpflichten. ... a cɛ
synonyme: kanbila. baarakɛɲɔgɔn dɔ y'a kandi a ma k'a b'a
furu. ... un collègue de son mari lui a promis
qu'il l'épouserait. ...a colleague of her husband
promised her that he would marry her. ...ein
Kollege ihres Mannes versprach ihr, dass er sie
heiraten würde. synonyme: layiduɲɔgɔnya.
2 • Nom. promesse; promise; Versprechen.
synonyme: kali .
1
29/01/2026 362

kandimin kanga
kandimin [á] variante: kanfasadimin. Nom. mal de 2 • linguiste; linguist; Sprachwissenschaftler.
Category: Person.
cou, torticolis; aching neck; Halsweh,
Halsschmerz, Halskrampf. Kandimi b'a la. kanfilakalan
Elle a mal au cou. Her neck hurts. Ihr Nacken [ã́-í-á-á-ã́] Morphemes: kan-fila-kàlan.
tut weh. Category: Disease. Nom. éducation bilingue; bilingual education;
synonyme: kankolodimin. zweisprachige Bildung. Category: Learn.
kandɔn [á-ɔ̌] Morphemes: kan-don. Verbe. kanfilamɛnla variante: kanfilamɛla. n.comp.
1 • s'engager, se fourrer; to engage, to get bilingue; bilingual; zweisprachig.
involved; sich engagieren. Musa taara a yɛrɛ kanfilen Nom. trachée, œsophage, pharynx; windpipe,
kandon kunbalan na. Moussa est allé se
oesophagus, pharynx; Luftröhre, Speiseröhre,
fourrer dans les ennuis. Moussa got himself Schlund, Rachen, Rachenhöhle.
into trouble. Moussa geriet in Category: Body, Parts of an animal.
Schwierigkeiten. synonyme: kanfyele.
2 • s'endetter; get into debt; verschulden. N tɛ
kanforoko [á] Nom. goitre; goitre; Kropf.
n kandon juru la mɔgɔ si ye. Je ne
Category: Disease. synonyme: foolo , fɔɔlɔn.
m'endetterai pour personne. I won't go into 2
debt for anyone. Ich werde für niemanden kanforokoma [á] Morphemes: kan-foroko-ma.
Schulden machen.
Nom. goitreux, qui est affligé d'un goitre;
kanɛmɛya [à-ɛ̀-ɛ̀] Nom. lien de cousinage; link of goitrous, who is afflicted with a goiter; der an
origin, cousin relationship; einem Kropf leidet. Muso kanforokoma
Verwandtschaftsverhältnis, cɛsɔrɔ man di. Il n'est pas facile à une femme
Cousin-Beziehung. Kanɛmɛya ka gɛlɛn dɛ ! goitreuse de trouver un mari. It is not easy for
Les relations de cousinage, c'est très a woman who is afflicted with a goitre to find a
important ! Cousin relationships are very husband. Es ist nicht leicht für eine Frau die an
important! Cousin-Beziehungen sind sehr Kropf leidet, einen Mann zu finden.
wichtig! Category: Kinship. kanfɔla Nom. locuteur; speaker; Sprecher.
kanfaari [á] Nom. 1 • haut du mur; top of the wall; Category: Person.
oben an der Wand. so kanfaari le haut de la kanfyele [á] variante: kanfereke, kanfile, kanfyelu.
maison. the top of the house. die Spitze der
Nom. œsophage, trachée; oesophagus, trachea;
Hauswand.
Speiseröhre, Luftröhre. Dumuni bɛ jigin
2 • bord (d'un grenier, d'une ruche); edge (of an
kanfyele de fɛ. C'est par l’œsophage que
grain storage, of a hive); Rand (eines
passe la nourriture. Food passes through the
Kornspeichers, eines Bienenstocks).
esophagus. Nahrung gelangt durch die
kanfasajuru Morphemes: kan-fasa-juru. Nom. corde Speiseröhre. synonyme: gɔɔnɔ, kanfilen,
vocale; vocal chords; Stimmbänder. jiminsira.
Category: Body.
kanga [ã̀-á] Nom. 1 • mousse, écume, bave; foam,
kanfila [á-í-á] variante: kanfilafɔ, kanfilafɔla. 1
lather, slobber; Schaum, Geifer. Kanga bɔra
Verbe. 1 • perfide, fourbe; perfidious, nasty,
a da la. Il avait de l’écume à la bouche. He
cunning, fraudulent; perfide, hinterhältig,
schlau, Schlitzohr. Ale ye kanfila ye. Lui,
foamed at the mouth. Er schäumte aus dem
c'est quelqu’un qui n'a pas de parole. He is
Mund. Woloba de ye safunɛ ye, o tɛ kanga
someone who has no words. Er ist jemand, ka ban. La mère de famille est comme du
der keine Worte hat. savon, elle n'en finit pas de donner de la
2 • versatile, parjure; versatile, perjury; mousse. (proverbe). The mother is like soap,
vielseitig, Meineid. she does not stop giving foam. (proverb). Die
Mutter ist wie Seife, sie gibt unaufhörlich
kanfilafɔ
1
[ã́-í-á-ɔ́] n.comp. se dédire, fourbe, perfide;
Schaum. (Sprichwort).
to retract one's statement, to back out of, 2 • laver (savonner), mousser; wash wit soap,
deceitful, perfidious; widerrufen, rub soap on, to foam; einschäumen, schäumen.
zurücknehmen, betrügerisch, hinterlistig,
A y'i sigi ɲɛgɛn kɔnɔ k'i kanga... Elle s'assit
trügerisch.
dans la douchière et se savonna... She sat in the
kanfilafɔ Nom. bilinguisme; bilingualism; shower and soaped herself... Sie saß unter der
2
Zweisprachigkeit. Dusche und seifte sich ein...
kanfilafɔla [ã́-í-á-ɔ́-á] n.comp. 1 • quelqu'un qui se
dédie; person who retracts; Person, die
widerruft.
29/01/2026 363

kanga kanjabana
kanga [à] variante: gaankan, gangan, kankan. kani [á] variante: kaɲi. Verbe. réclamer (impôt,
2
1 • Verbe. étaler, déployer; spread out, deploy; dette, dot), collecter (impôt); claim (tax, debt,
ausbreiten, entfalten, einsetzen. ka finin ta ka dowry), collect (tax); eintreiben (Steuer,
a kanga n ɲɛma déployer un tissu pour me Schulden, Mitgift), einziehen (Steuern). A na
faire paravent. deploy a fabric to make myself lɛnpo kani i la o ! Il viendra te réclamer
a screen. Ich verwende einen Stoff, um mir l'impôt ! He will come to ask you for tax! Er
selbst einen Windschutz zu machen. wird kommen, um Sie nach Steuern zu fragen!
2 • Verbe. s'interposer, se positionner; to Ne ka jurumantigi bɛ na n kani. Mon
intervene, to position oneself; eingreifen, sich créancier vient me réclamer sin argent. My
positionieren. ... dugu min kangalen bɛ u ni creditor comes to ask me for my money. Mein
kɔrɔnafula cɛ. ... le village qui s'est interposé Gläubiger kommt und bittet mich um mein
entre les Peuls de l'est et eux. ... the village that
Geld. Category: Finance.
stood between the Fulani of the east and them. kaniba Nom. piment doux; plant sp; Pflanzenart.
... das Dorf, das zwischen den Fulani und ihnen Category: Grass, herb, vine. capsicum
steht. annuum.
3 • Verbe. faire obstacle; obstruct, impede;
kanimɛ [à-ì] variante: kanɛmɛ. Nom. cousin,
behindern.
cousine, cousin croisé (enfant de la sœur du
4 • Nom. interposition, obstacle; interposition,
père, du frère de la mère); cousin, cross cousin
obstacle; Zwischenschaltung, Zwischenlage,
(child of father's sister, mother's brother);
Hindernis. Kanga de bɛ áw ni yen cɛ wa ? Y
Base, Cousin, Cousine, Kreuzcousine (Kind
a-t-il un obstacle entre vous et là-bas ? Is there
der Schwester des Vaters, des Bruders der
an obstacle between you and there? Gibt es ein
Mutter). Category: Kinship.
Hindernis zwischen euch und dort?
kanimɛcɛ variante: kanɛmɛcɛ. Nom. cousin croisé (fils
kangaji [à-à] Nom. 1 • eau savonneuse; soapy water;
de la sœur du père, fils du frère de la mère);
Seifenwasser.
cousin (son of the sister of the father, son of
2 • bave, écume; drool, foam; Sabber, Schaum. mother's brother); Cousin (Sohn der
A bɛ kangaji bɔ. Ça fait de l'écume. It makes Schwester des Vaters, Sohn vom Bruder der
foam. Es bildet sich Schaum. dɔlɔ kangaji la Mutter). Category: Kinship.
mousse de la bière. the beer foam. Schaum aus kanimɛmuso variante: kanɛmɛmuso. Nom. cousine
dem Bier.
croisée (fille du frère de la mère, fille de la
kanganin [à-à] Nom. thé; tea; Tee. ka kanganin min sœur du père); cousin (daughter of mother's
prendre le thé. have tea. Tee trinken. brother, daughter of father's sister),
Cross-Cousin; Cousine (Tochter von Mutters
kange [à] variante: kangekurun. Nom. pirogue de
Bruder, Tochter von Vaters Schwester).
grande taille; large canoe; großes Kanu. Category: Kinship.
kange bɛ doniba ta ji kan. Les grandes
kanjabana [ã́-á-á-á] Morphemes: kan-ja-bana.
pirogues transportent des grosses charges.
Large canoes carry large loads. Große Kanus
variante: kanfasajabana. Nom. 1 • méningite;
transportieren große Lasten. Category: Travel. meningitis; Hirnhautentzündung. A bɛ mɔgɔ
kangoronin synonyme: fuflebara. Nom. arbre tanga kanjabanakisɛ de ma. Cela protège
contre le virus de la méningite. This protects
(espèce); tree sp; Baumart. Category: Tree.
against meningitis virus. Dies schützt vor dem
strychnos spinosa.
Meningitis-Virus. Category: Disease.
kanhakɛ [á] Nom. ton; tone; Ton. Fɔlɔ kanhakɛ bɛ synonyme: kankolodimin.
dugu ma, filanan ta bɛ sanfɛ. Le ton du 2 • torticolis; stiff neck; Torticollis,
premier est bas, celui du second est haut. (à, á). Schiefhaltung des Kopfes. Kanjabana b'a la.
The tone of the first is low, that of the second is Elle a la maladie du cou raide. (explication :
high. (à, á). Der Ton des ersten ist tief, der
«elle ne sait pas dire non»). She has stiff neck
des zweiten hoch. (à, á). Category: Grammar. disease. (explanation: “she can’t say no”). Sie
kanhakɛ kɛɲɛnan expr. réglage de volume; volume hat die Halskrankheit. (Erklärung: «sie kann
control; Lautstärkeregler.
nicht nein sagen»).
kanhɔrɔnya [á] Verbe. libérer; release, free, liberate;
befreien, freigeben, freisetzen. ... ka kɛlɛ kɛ
k'u kanhɔrɔnya ... faire la guerre afin de les
libérer. ... to wage war in order to free them. ...
Krieg führen, um sie zu befreien.
29/01/2026 364

kanjan kankari
kanjan [á] Nom. rempart, mur d'enceinte (fortification kankaran [à] variante: kagaran, kangaran. Nom.
1
autour d'un village); rampart, surrounding 1 • valeureux; valiant; tapfer. Ale de tun ye
wall (fortification around a village); Wall, waliju ye, ale de tun ye kankaran ye. Lui
Umfassungsmauer (Befestigung um ein Dorf).
c'était un homme de dieu, c'était un homme de
A ye daga sigi Segu kanjan bilen kɔrɔ. Il
grande valeur. He was a man of God, he was a
campe devant les remparts rouges de Ségou. man of great value. Er war ein Mann Gottes, er
He is camped before the red walls of Segou. Er war ein Mann von großem Wert. Donso
lagert vor der roten Mauer von Segou.
kankaran tun don. C'était un très grand
kanjɛ 1 comparer: jagokɛkan.[ã́-ɛ́] Jula: kangwɛ. n chasseur. He was a very great hunter. Er war
adj. variété pan-dialectale (d'une langue); ein sehr großer Jäger.
pan-dialectal variety (of one language); 2 • mûr, dans la force de l'âge (pour un être
pandialektale Variante (einer Sprache). humain ou un animal); mature, in the force of
kanjɛ [ã-́ ɛ́] Jula: kangwɛ. Nom. langue standard, age (for a human being or an animal); Reife,
2
im Alter (für einen Menschen oder ein Tier).
langue commune, langue véhiculaire; standard
Fali kankaran un âne bien robuste. a very
language, common language, trade language;
sturdy donkey. ein sehr robuster Esel.
Standardsprache, Umgangssprache,
Handelssprache. Kaadɔw ka kanjɛ ye fulakan Npogotigi kakaran man ɲi cɛkɔrɔnin ma.
ye. Le peul est la langue commune des
Une jeune fille dans la force de l'âge n'est pas
bonne pour un vieillard. . A young girl in her
Dogons. Fulani is the common language of the
prime is no good for an old man. . Ein junges
Dogons. Fulani ist die gemeinsame Sprache
Mädchen in der Blüte des Lebens ist für einen
der Dogon. Category: Language.
alten Mann nicht gut.
kanjuru [á] Morphemes: kan-juru. Nom. rênes; reins; 3 • femme ayant dépassé l'âge du mariage, sans
Zügel. A ye so kanjuru minɛ... Il prit les enfant et coquette (populaire); woman over the
rênes du cheval... He took the reins of the age of marriage, childless and flirtatious
horse... Er übernahm die Zügel des Pferdes... (popular); Frau, die das Heiratsalter
überschritten hat, ohne Kinder.
kankaba [á] Nom. maïs à gros grains, gros maïs;
4 • femme énergique, forte femme; energetic
large grain corn, large corn; großkörniger
woman, strong woman; energische Frau,
Mais, großer Mais. Kankaba to de ka di. starke Frau.
C'est le «tô» de gros maïs qui est bon. It’s the
kankaran [à] Verbe. se poster immobile (en
“porridge” of large corn that is good. Es ist 2
das „Hirsebrei“ von großem Mais, der gut ist. attendant), se planter; stand still (waiting);
synonyme: maaɲɔ. sich unbeweglich hinstellen (warten),
verklemmen. A nana i kankaran án dala, k'a
kankala [á] Morphemes: kan-kala. Nom. cou; neck,
tɛ wuli. Il est venu se planter là sans bouger à
collar; Hals, Nacken. A kankala tun ka côté de nous, sans vouloir s'en aller. He came
misɛn. Elle avait le cou mince. She had a thin to stand there without moving next to us,
neck. Sie hatte einen dünnen Hals. without wanting to leave. Er kam, um sich
Category: Body. neben uns zu stellen, ohne sich zu bewegen,
ohne wegzugehen.
kankamu [á] Verbe. affliger, attrister; afflict, sadden;
betrüben, traurig machen. A dusukun
kankari [à-á-í] variante: kangari. Nom.
kankamunen don. Il est triste. He is sad. Er
avertissement, menace, mise en garde;
warning, menace, cautionary statement;
ist traurig.
Warnung, Drohung, Verwarnung. A ye
kankankan Nom. 1 • serpent (espèce de); snake
kankari min da án ye... La mise en garde
(species); Schlange (Art). Category: Snake. qu'il nous a faite... The warning he gave us...
mehelya crossi.
Die Warnung, die er uns gab... Ne ma kankari
2 • remède contre l'impuissance masculine;
da i ye fɔlɔ ? Ne t'ai-je pas déjà averti ? Have I
cure for male impotence; Heilmittel gegen
not warned you? Habe ich dich nicht schon
männliche Impotenz.
gewarnt? synonyme: kankarimada.
29/01/2026 365

kankarida kankolosigi
kankarida Nom. avertissement; warning; Warnung, kanko [á] Nom. bord, rebord, berge; edge, ledge,
Warnmeldung, Warnhinweis. Kankarida ka bank; Kante, Sims, Bank. U y'a jɛgɛ bɛɛ saalo
fisa wuli ka bɔ n dɔgɔ disi la ye. Mieux vaut ka na a da kanko kan. Ils ont tiré jusque sur
donner un avertissement que de dire : «Cesse la berge tous ces poissons. They pulled all
d'étrangler mon petit frère». (proverbe). Better these fish onto the bank. Sie haben all diese
to give a warning than to say, "Stop strangling Fische ans Ufer gezogen. A y'i sigi mobili
my little brother." (proverb). Es ist besser, eine kanko kan. Elle s'est assise sur le bord de la
Warnung zu geben, als zu sagen: «Hör auf,
voiture. She sat on the side of the car. Sie saß
meinen kleinen Bruder zu würgen».
auf dem Rand des Wagens.
(Sprichwort). synonyme: kankarimada.
kankodɔnna [á] Jula: kankolɔnla.
kankarimada [à-à-ì-à] Verbe. 1 • mettre en garde,
Morphemes: kan-ko-dɔn-na. Nom. linguiste:
prévenir; warn; warnen. N bɛ n kankarimada
celui qui a des connaissances au niveau des
i ye fɔlɔ́ Je tiens tout d'abord à te mettre en langues; linguist: someone who has knowledge
garde. First of all, I want to warn you. about languages; Linguist,
Zunächst möchte ich Sie warnen. Sprachwissenschaftler. O sariya ninnu sigira
2 • avertissement, mise en garde; warning, ka a da kankodɔnnaw ka dɔnniya de kan.
caution; Warnung, Vorsicht. polisiw ɲɛmɔgɔ Ces règles ont été établies à partir des
ka kankarimadakan mɛnna. L'avertissement connaissances des linguistes. These rules were
du responsable de la police a été entendu. The established on the basis of the knowledge of
police official's warning was heeded. Die linguists. Diese Regeln wurden auf der
Warnung des Polizeibeamten wurde beachtet. Grundlage des Wissens der Linguisten
synonyme: sulali, lasɔmili, jaaseere, aufgestellt. Category: Person.
kankarida, kankari. kankodɔnniya [á] Jula: kankolɔnniya. Nom.
kankelen [ã́-é-ẽ́] Morphemes: kan-kelen.
linguistique; linguistics; Linguistik,
Sprachwissenschaft. ... ka kankodɔnniya
synonyme: bɛnkan. Nom. unanimité, fidèle à sa
yɔrɔ girinbaw sɛbɛn bamanankan na... ...
parole; unanimity, faithful to one's word;
Einmütigkeit, steht zu seinem Wort.
écrire en bambara les parties les plus
importantes de la linguistique... ... to write in
kankelentigi Morphemes: kan-kelen-tigi. Nom. Bambara the most important parts of
personne de parole, crédible, qui respecte ses linguistics... ... die wichtigsten Teile der
engagements; person who keeps his word, who Linguistik in Bambara zu schreiben...
respects his commitments; Person, die Wort Category: Grammar.
hält, der seine Verpflichtungen respektiert. A kankolo [á-ó-ó] Nom. clavicule, os du cou;
tun bɛ fɔ o tigilamɔgɔw de ma ko
collarbone, clavicle, bone of the neck;
kankelentigiw, wa u bɛ to o min kan, i bɛ Schlüsselbein, Halsknochen. Category: Body.
taa a sɔrɔ o ye tiɲɛ de ye. On appelait ce synonyme: kɔlɔndalajiri, kɔlɔnkannajiri.
genre de personnes des gens de parole, car ce
kankolodimin [á] variante: kannamɛgɛlɛ,
qu'ils disaient, c'était la vérité. These kinds of
people were called people of their word, kannamuguli. Nom. torticolis, rachialgie
because what they said was the truth. Solche cervicale; torticollis, cervical back pain,
Menschen wurden Menschen ihres Wortes cervical spine; Torticollis, Schmerzen im
genannt, weil das, was sie sagten, die Wahrheit Halswirbelsäulenbereich,
war. Halswirbelschmerzen. synonyme: kanjabana,
kankelentigiya comparer: hɔɔrɔnya, janfabaliya. kandimin.
Nom. fidélité, respect de la parole donnée; kankolosigi Morphemes: kan-kolo-sigi. Nom.
fidelity, loyalty, keeping the word given; grammaire, structure linguistique; grammar,
Treue, Aufrichtigkeit, Worthalten. Ale ko a bɛ linguistic structure; Grammatik, sprachliche
o kankelentigiyasira taama. Il dit qu'il Struktur. An bɛ dɔɔnin fɔ áw ye
respectera la parole donnée. He says he will bamanankan sɛbɛnin ni kankolosigi
keep his word. Er sagt, er werde sein Wort
sariyaw kan... Nous parlerons également des
halten.
règles d'orthographe et de grammaire du
kankiran [à] variante: kankira, kankisɛ, nkankisɛ. bambara... We will also talk about the rules of
Nom. 1 • zinc, caisse en zinc; zinc, zinc box. spelling and grammar of Bambara... Wir
werden auch über die Regeln der
2 • caisse, cantine (en bois, en métal); cash
Rechtschreibung und Grammatik des Bambara
register, canteen (wooden, metal), crate;
Kiste, Kantine (Holz, Metall).
sprechen... Category: Grammar.
synonyme: sariyasun.
29/01/2026 366

kankolɔn kanmada
kankolɔn n.comp. linguistique; linguistics; kankulu comparer: siyakankulu.[á] n.comp. famille de
Sprachwissenschaft. langues; language family; Sprachfamilie.
kankɔ Nom. garrot; withers; Widerrist. Category: Language.
Category: Parts of an animal. kankun [á-ú] Morphemes: kan-kun. Nom. 1 • rive,
kankɔnɔ [á] Nom. cou, devant du cou; neck, in front of
bord, berge; shore, border, edge, rim, border;
Ufer, Kante, Rand. A bɛ na ka na jigin ba
the neck; Hals, Vorderseite des Halses. A
kankun fɛ ka ji ta... Elle descend sur la berge
kankɔnɔ ka jan. Elle a un long cou. She has
du fleuve prendre de l'eau... She goes down to
a long neck. Sie hat einen langen Hals.
the river bank to get some water... Sie geht
kankɔnɔna [á] Nom. gorge, intérieur de la gorge; zum Flußufer, um etwas Wasser zu holen ...
throat; Kehle, Hals, Rachen. Mɔgɔ 2 • murette, petit digue, margelle, rebord du
toit en terrasse; low wall, small dike, coping,
kankɔnɔna b'a dimin fo a bɛ dɛsɛ ka
edge of the roof terrace; niedrige Mauer,
dumuni kɛ. La gorge est douloureuse au point
kleiner Deich, Mauerkrone, Rand der
qu'on ne peut plus manger. The throat is so
Dachterrasse. ka kankun da dresser un petit
sore that you can no longer eat. Der Hals tut so
mur sur la terrasse. build a small wall on the
weh, dass man nicht mehr essen kann.
terrace. eine kleine Mauer auf der Terrasse
Category: Body. synonyme: ngɔɔnɔ.
bauen.
kankɔrɔbɔ [á-ɔ́-ɔ́-ɔ́] Verbe. provoquer, défier; kanlafiɲɛ tagamasiɲɛw Nom. signes de
provoke, defy, challenge; provozieren,
ponctuation; punctuation marks; Satzzeichen.
hervorrufen, herausfordern. Dɔgɔkɛ y'a Category: Grammar, Sign, Symbol.
kankɔrɔbɔ... Le frère cadet l'a défié... The
kanli [ã̀-í] synonyme: kanni. Nom. fauche; mowing;
younger brother challenged him... Der jüngere
Mahd, Mähen. Category: Agriculture.
Bruder hat ihn herausgefordert...
synonyme: kolaɲini, mɔgɔlaɲini. kanma postp. 1 • à cause de, pour, au bénéfice de;
kankɔrɔla Nom. gorge, dessous du cou; throat, below because of, for; wegen, infolge, aufgrund. A
the neck; Kehle, Gurgel,, unterhalb des Halses.
nana wari kanma. Il est venu pour l’argent.
Category: Parts of an animal. He came for the money. Er ist wegen dem Geld
synonyme: ngɔɔnɔ. gekommen. synonyme: kama.
2 • contre, vers, à l'endroit de; against,
kankɔrɔsigi [á] Nom. conseiller, assistant, adjoint,
towards; gegen, dagegen. wuli X kanma
lieutenant; adviser, assistant, deputy,
attaquer, se lever contre X. attack, rise up
lieutenant; Berater, Assistent, Stellvertreter,
against X. sich gegen X auflehnen.
Leutnant. dugutigi n'a kankɔrɔsigiw le chef
synonyme: kosɔn.
du village et ses conseillers. the village chief
and his advisers. der Dorfvorsteher und seine kanmada [á] Verbe. 1 • parler humblement, parler
Berater. Faama man jugu, a kankɔrɔsigi de poliment; speak humbly, speak politely;
ka jugu. Ce n'est pas le roi qui est méchant, ce bescheiden sprechen, höflich sprechen. N bɛ n
sont ses lieutenants. (proverbe). It's not the kanmada mɔgɔw ye bonya kosɔn. Je parle
king who is bad, it's his lieutenants. (proverb). humblement aux gens par respect. I speak
Es ist nicht der König, der schlecht ist, sondern humbly to people out of respect. Ich spreche
seine Stellvertreter. (Sprichwort). demütig und aus Respekt mit den Menschen.
Category: Government. synonyme: kɛrɛfɛsigi, 2 • baisser la voix, se taire; lower your voice,
laadibaga. be silent; die Stimme senken, still sein. Mɔgɔ
kankɔrɔtahakɛ hauteur mélodique; melodic height, k'i kanmada ndegu ye, ndegu ka diya tɛ, a
tone pitch; Melodie Höhe, Tonhöhe.
kun ye a kana i nɔrɔkɔ. Si l'on se tait en
Category: Grammar. prenant de la sauce dégué, ce n'est pas pour son
bon goût, mais pour qu'elle ne salisse pas.
kankɔrɔtalan Morphemes: kan-kɔrɔta-lan. Nom.
(proverbe). If we are silent when taking degue
haut-parleur, micro; loud speaker, sauce, it is not for its good taste, but so that it
microphone; Lautsprecher, Mikrofon. A mago does not make us dirty. (proverb). Wenn wir
tɛ kankɔrɔtalan na. Il n'a pas besoin de bei der Einnahme von Degue-Sauce
haut-parleur. It doesn’t need a speaker. Er schweigen, dann nicht wegen des guten
braucht keinen Lautsprecher. Geschmacks, sondern damit sie nicht
Category: Machine. synonyme: kumanan, schmutzig macht. (Sprichwort).
kumajɛnsɛnnan.
29/01/2026 367

kanmajigin kannakɔnɔ
kanmajigin [á] Verbe. s'adresser à quelqu’un avec kannabila [á] Verbe. promettre; promise, pledge;
humilité (par respect); address someone with versprechen. Fa y'a denmuso kannabila o cɛ
humility (out of respect); jemanden mit Demut ye. Le père a promis sa fille à cet homme. The
ansprechen (aus Respekt). k'i kanmajigin
father promised his daughter to this man. Der
karisa ye s'adresser à quelqu’un humblement. Vater versprach diesem Mann seine Tochter.
address someone humbly. Sich demütig an synonyme: layiduɲɔgɔnya.
jemanden wenden.
kannabɔ [á] Morphemes: kan-na-bɔ. Verbe.
1
kanmɛn [á] Verbe. obéir, suivre les conseils, écouter
1 • refaire le crépi d'une maison;
les conseils; obey, follow the instructions, re-plastering a house; ein Haus neu verputzen.
listen to advice; befolgen, gehorchen, auf
An ye so kannabɔ. On a refait le crépi d'une
Ratschläge hören. ka cɛkɔrɔbaw kanmɛn
maison. We redid the plaster of a house. Wir
écouter les conseils des vieux. listen to the haben den Putz eines Hauses erneuert.
advice of old people. auf den Rat alter
2 • préserver, protéger; preserve, protect;
Menschen hören.
bewahren, schützen.
kanmɛnbali [á] Nom. désobéissant; disobedient; kannabɔ [á] Verbe. 1 • appeler, héler, s'adresser à;
2
ungehorsam. den kanmɛnbali enfant
call, hail, address to; rufen, wenden sich an.
désobéissant. disobedient child. ungehorsames Taa i kannabɔ mɔgɔw ma... Va appeler les
Kind. synonyme: bancimana, kafa
1
, falimɔgɔ,
gens... Go call people... Gehe und ruf die
cigoman. Leute...
kanmi [ã-̀ í] variante: kami. Nom. pintade; guinea 2 • critiquer, contredire; criticize, contradict;
kritisieren, widersprechen. ... e min ka laada
fowl; Perlhuhn. Category: Bird.
ye ka ne kannabɔ, e tɛ fɛn fɔ wa ? ... toi qui
kanminɛ [á] Morphemes: kan-minɛ. Nom.
as l;'habitude de me contredire, tu ne dis rien ?
1 • enrouement; hoarseness; Heiserkeit. ... you who are used to contradicting me, don't
2 • croire (en la parole de quelqu'un); to believe you say anything? ... du, der du es gewohnt
(in someone's word); (an das Wort von bist, mir zu widersprechen, sagst du nichts?
jemandem) glauben. U y'a sɛbɛ kanminɛ. Ils
kannajala [á] Nom. cravate, foulard noué autour du
ont vraiment cru à ce qu'il disait. They really
cou; tie, scarf tied around the neck;
believed what he said. Sie glaubten wirklich,
Krawatte, Schal um den Hals gebunden.
was er sagte.
kannajuru [á] Morphemes: kan-na-juru. Nom.
kanminɛli [á] Morphemes: kan-minɛ-li. Nom.
obéissance; obedience; Gehorsam.
dette; debt; Schulden. A ko i ye su min
kannajuru sara... Il dit: «Le défunt dont tu as
kanna [á] Nom. haut, dessus, toit; top, roof; oben,
1 payé la dette...». He said: “The deceased
Dach. So kanna sɔgɔra. Le toit de la maison whose debt you paid…” Er sagte: „Der
est percé. The roof of the house is pierced. Das Verstorbene, dessen Schulden Sie bezahlt
Dach des Hauses ist durchbohrt. haben…“. Category: Finance.
kanna 2 postp. sur (sur un corps, pour un vêtement sur kannakolon [á] Nom. 1 • nu, dénudé; naked, stripped;
une personne); on (on a body, for clothing on a nackt, entkleidet.
person); an, auf (an einem Körper, für
2 • dévêtu, torse nu; undressed, shirtless;
Kleidung an einer Person). ... o ye dulɔki in unbekleidet, ohne Hemd. A kannakolon
bɔ a kanna ni ka dulɔki kolonba don a taara. Il est parti torse nu. He left shirtless. Er
kanna. ... elle lui retira ce boubou et lui mit un ging ohne Hemd.
vieux boubou. ... she took off this garment and 3 • pauvre, impuissant; poor person, helpless;
put an old garment on him. ... sie nahm Armer, Hilfloser. Kannakolon tɛ
dieses Kleid ab und steckte ihm in ein altes
falisusamana ye wa ? Le pauvre n'est il pas
Kleid. Finin fɛgɛnman ka ɲi a kanna. Il aime
celui qui traîne les cadavres des ânes ?
les vêtements légers. He likes light clothes. Er
(proverbe). Isn't the poor person the one who
mag leichte Kleidung.
drags the corpses of donkeys? (proverb). Ist es
kannabaganin [á] [á] Nom. angine; angina; Angina, nicht der arme Mensch, der die Leichen der
Halsweh. Kannabaganin farigan ka jugu Esel schleppt? (Sprichwort).
kosɛbɛ. La fièvre de l'angine est très kannakɔnɔ [á] Nom. collier de perles; string of pearls;
mauvaise. Angina fever is very bad. Perlenkette. Category: Adornment.
Angina-Fieber ist sehr schlimm.
Category: Disease.
29/01/2026 368

kannakurunin kanɲɛfilaman
kannakurunin [á] Nom. ganglions du cou, adénite kannɔrɔ [á] Morphemes: kan-nɔrɔ. Nom. diphtérie;
cervicale; neck lymph nodes, cervical diphtheria; Diphtherie. Kannɔrɔ bɛ daminɛ
lymphadenitis; Halslymphknoten, zervikale kankɔnɔdimin na, ani farigan. La diphtérie
Lymphadenitis. Category: Disease.
commence par des maux de gorge et de la
kannaminɛ [á-á-ì-ɛ́] 1 • Verbe. réserver; book, fièvre. Diphtheria begins with sore throat and
1
reserve; buchen, reservieren. N ye n terikɛ fever. Diphtherie beginnt mit Halsschmerzen
kannaminɛ a ka saga feere n ma. J'ai réservé
und Fieber. Category: Disease.
synonyme: falakabana.
auprès de mon ami un de ses moutons, afin
qu'il me le vende. I have reserved one of his kanntan [á] Nom. qui ne tient pas parole, infidèle; who
sheep from my friend, so that he may sell it to does not keep his word, unfaithful; Der sein
me. Ich habe bei meinem Freund ein Schaf Wort nicht hält, untreu.
gebucht, damit er es mir verkauft.
kanntanya [á] Verbe. 1 • manquer à sa parole; fail in
2 • Nom. réserve; reservation, reserve; Vorrat.
keeping his word, break his word; sein Wort
Mɔgɔ tɛ se ka jɔ ɲɔjago kan ni i ma
brechen.
kannaminɛ kɛ. On ne peut pas faire le
2 • perdre sa voix, devenir aphone; losing his
commerce du mil sans faire des réserves.
voice, becoming aphone; Stimme verlieren,
Millet cannot be traded without reserves.
aphone werden.
Ohne Vorräte kann man nicht mit Hirse
handeln.
3 • infidélité; infidelity, unfaithfulness;
Untreue. Kanntanya mana don furuɲɔgɔnw
kannaminɛ [á-á-ì-ɛ́] Verbe. 1 • répondre (mal) à
2 ni ɲɔgɔn cɛ, o ye furu tiɲɛtɔ ye dɛ. Si
quelqu'un, répliquer; respond (wrong) to
l’infidélité commence entre les époux, c'est à
someone, retaliate; auf jemanden antworten,
coup sûr la destruction du mariage. If infidelity
zurückschlagen, widersprechen. I b'i kɔrɔ
begins between the spouses, it is certainly the
kannaminɛ, fa don wa ? Tu réponds à ton destruction of marriage. Wenn die Untreue
aîné, c'est de la folie ! You answer your elder, zwischen den Ehegatten beginnt, ist es sicher
it’s madness! Du widersprichst deinem die Zerstörung der Ehe.
Ältesten, das ist verrückt!
kanɲɛ variante: kanɲa. Nom. son, voix; sound, voice;
1
2 • acquiescer, promettre de; agree, acquiesce,
Laut, Klang, Geräusch, Stimme. nɛgɛ kanɲɛ
promise to, commit; zustimmen, versprechen,
verpflichten. N ye Seku ka baara kannaminɛ,
heure. hour. Stunde. Nɛgɛ kanɲɛ tan ni kelen
n tɛ se ka baara kɛ dɔwɛrɛ fɛ bilen. Je me
sera. Il est onze heures. It’s eleven o’clock. Es
suis engagé à faire le travail de Sékou, je ne ist elf Uhr. Nɛgɛ kanɲɛ wɔɔrɔ tɛmɛna ni
peux pas travailler avec quelqu'un d'autre. I sanga tan ye. Il est six heures dix. It’s ten past
have committed to do Sékou’s work, I cannot six. Es ist sechs Uhr und zehn Minuten.
work with anyone else. Ich habe mich
kanɲɛ [á] Jula: kanɲa. Nom. 1 • syllabe; syllable;
verpflichtet, Sekos Arbeit zu tun, ich kann 2
nicht mit jemand anderem arbeiten. Silbe. Kanɲɛ tɛ se ka laban ni dafata ye
synonyme: layiduɲɔgɔnya. habada bamanankan na. En bambara, une
syllabe ne peut jamais se terminer par une
3 • reprendre (le refrain); to repeat (the
chorus); wieder aufnehmen (Refrain).
consonne. In Bambara, a syllable can never
end with a consonant. Im Bambara kann eine
kannaminɛna [á] Morphemes: kanna-minɛ-na. Silbe niemals mit einem Konsonanten enden.
Nom. 1 • personne qui reprend le refrain; Category: Grammar.
person who takes over the chorus; Person, die 2 • fois (de dire : parole; de boire; gorgée);
den Refrain wiederholt. times (to say: word; to drink; sip); mal (sagen:
2 • interprète; interpreter, performer; Wort; trinken; schlucken). A danna dɛgɛ
Dolmetscher, Interpret.
kanɲɛ kelen ma. Il n'a pris qu'une seule fois
kannasɛni [á] comparer: sɛni. Nom. collier; du ,dèguè». He took the 'deguè' only once. Er
necklace, chain; Halsschmuck, Halsband, hat nur einmal Dèguè genommen.
Halskette. Category: Adornment. kanɲɛdɔnla Jula: kanɲɛlɔnla.
kannatigɛ Nom. viande halal; halal meat, kosher Morphemes: kanɲɛ-dɔn-la. n.comp. linguiste;
butchered meat; Halal Fleisch, Fleisch von linguist; Sprachwissenschaftler, Linguist.
geschächteten Tieren. Category: Worker, occupation.
kanni [ã-̀ í] synonyme: kanli. Nom. fauche; mowing; kanɲɛfilaman Morphemes: kanɲɛ-fila-man. n.comp.
Mahd. Category: Agriculture. dissyllabe; disyllable; zweisilbig.
Category: Grammar.
29/01/2026 369

kanɲɛkalan kantigiya
kanɲɛkalan Morphemes: kanɲɛ-kalan. Nom. kantiga [á] variante: kantigɛ, nkantigɛ. Nom.
phonétique; phonetics; Lautlehre, Phonetik. arachide; peanut, groundnut; Erdnuß. Tiga
Category: Grammar. farama, a bɛ fɔ o ma ko kantiga. C'est
kanpaɲi Emprunt de : français. Nom. campagne; l'arachide avec la coque qu'on appelle kantiga.
campaign; Kampagne, Feldzug, Aktion. This is the peanut with the shell called kantiga.
Das ist die Erdnuß mit der Schale, die wir
Kansɛri toropiki Emprunt de : français. Nom.
kantiga nennen. Category: Types of food.
Tropique du cancer; Tropic of Cancer; arachis hypogea. synonyme: mantiga, tigɛ .
1
Wendekreis des Krebses.
kantigɛ [á-ì-ɛ́] Morphemes: kan-tigɛ. vt. égorger,
kansi [á-í] Nom. crinière; mane; Mähne.
couper la tête; cut throat of, kosher
Category: Parts of an animal. butchering, slaughter; schächten, schlachten.
synonyme: jakisii.
... k'u ka misiw kantigɛ k'a sogo dun... ... et
kansinamuso [á] Nom. 1 • épouse du frère de égorger leurs vaches et les manger... ...and
slaughter their cows and eat them... ...und ihre
l'époux; spouse of the husband’s brother;
Ehefrau des Bruders des Ehegatten. n
Kühe schlachten und essen...
kansinamuso la femme du frère de mon mari. kantigɛda [á] Nom. 1 • détermination; determination;
the wife of my husband’s brother. Die Frau des Entschlossenheit. Minisiriɲɛmɔgɔ y'a
Bruders meines Mannes. kantigɛda jira... Le ministre a montré sa
2 • belle-sœur; sister-in-law; Schwägerin. détermination... The minister has shown his
Category: Kinship. determination... Der Minister hat seine
kansiri [á-ì-í] Verbe. 1 • mettre en bottes, gerber; to Entschlossenheit gezeigt...
bundle, to stack; bündeln, stapeln. Mɔgɔ bɛ to
2 • argument ultime; final argument; letztes
Argument. Nin ye m kantigɛda bɛɛ de fɔlen
nsira kan ka kansiri bɔ nɛrɛ la. Tout en étant
ye i ye. C'est tout ce que je peux dire. That’s
sur un baobab, on peut faire des bottes de
gousses de néré. (proverbe). While on a
all I can say. Das ist alles, was ich sagen kann.
baobab tree, you can make bundles of néré kantigɛkan [á] Nom. décision ultime, dernier mot,
pods. (proverb). Während Sie auf einem
parole irrévocable; ultimate decision, the last
Affenbrotbaum sitzen, können Sie Bündel aus
word, irrevocable word; endgültige
Néré-Schoten herstellen. (Sprichwort).
Entscheidung, unwiderrufliche Aussage.
2 • botte d'épis, gerbe; bunch of ears, sheaf;
Bündel Ähren, Garbe.
kantigɛla [á] Nom. 1 • sacrificateur; priest; Priester.
synonyme: sarakalasebaga, murukalatigi.
kansisi [á] Nom. enrouement, extinction de voix;
2 • partie de l'animal donnée a celui qui l'a
hoarseness, loss of voice; Heiserkeit,
égorgé; part of the animal given to the person
Stimmverlust. Nɛnɛ fɛ, kansisi bɛ mɔgɔ
who slaughtered it; Teil des Tieres, der der
caman minɛ. A cause du froid, beaucoup de Person gegeben wurde, die es geschlachtet hat.
gens sont enroués. Because of the cold, many
kantigi [á] Nom. quelqu’un de fidèle, fidèle à ses
people are hoarse. Wegen der Kälte sind viele
Menschen heiser. Category: Disease. promesses, personne de parole, loyale;
faithful person, loyal person, someone faithful,
kansoli [á-ó-í] variante: nkansole. Nom. sorte de rat
faithful to his promises, person of his word,
d'eau; water rat; Wasserratte. loyal; treu Person, zuverlässige Person,
Category: Mammal. aulacodus swinderianus. jemand, der treu ist, seinen Versprechen treu
kansun [á] variante: kantiti. Nom. base du cou; base bleibt, jemand, der sein Wort hält, treu. Ala ye
of neck; Halsansatz. A kansun ka bon dɛ ! Il
kantigi ye. Dieu est fidèle. God is faithful.
est extrêmement costaud ! He is extremely Gott ist treu. teri kantigi ami loyal. loyal
strong! Er ist extrem stark! Category: Body. friend. treuer Freund.
kansurun [á] Nom. ras-de-cou; crew-neck sweater, kantigiya [á] Morphemes: kantigi-ya. Nom.
choker; Pullover, Halsreif. Category: Clothing. 1 • fidélité à une parole / à un engagement,
loyauté; faithfulness, loyalty; Treue, Loyalität.
kantalan [á] Morphemes: kan-ta-lan. Nom.
Ala, an bi barika la i ye i ka kantigiya kosɔn.
magnétophone; tape recorder; Tonbandgerät,
Dieu, nous te remercions pour ta fidélité. God,
Kassettenrekorde. synonyme: maɲeto,
we praise you for your faithfulness. Gott, wir
arajomaɲeto. preisen dich für deine Treue.
2 • être fidèle à sa parole, être loyal; to be true
to one's word, to be loyal; seinem Wort treu
sein, loyal sein.
29/01/2026 370

kanto kapo
kanto [ã-́ ó] Morphemes: kan-to. v.ref. s’adresser à, 2 • fidèle (d'une religion); believer (of a
religion); Gläubig (einer Religion). O diinɛ
dire, déclarer, s’écrier, s'exclamer; speak to,
tell, declare; ansprechen, zu jemandem sagen, kanunbagaw fana... Les fidèles de cette
erklären. A y’i kanto a muso ma ko: " ... " Il a religion aussi... The believers of this religion
dit à sa femme, « ... ». He said to his wife, " ... too... Auch die Gläubigen dieser Religion...
". Er sagte zu seiner Frau: « ... ». Category: Religion.
kanun [à] Nom. canon; cannon; Kanone. kanunbaganci [à-ù-à-à] Nom. amateur, qui aime,
1
synonyme: tawutawu, gɛlɛ , gwɛlɛ . défenseur, passionné, «fan»; amateur, loving,
1 3
defender, passionate, «fan»; Liebhaber,
kanun 2 [à-ù] Jula: kanu. 1 • vt. aimer, souhaiter, Verteidiger, Leidenschaftlicher, «Fan». faso
désirer; love, wish, want; lieben, wünschen, kanunbaganci patriote. patriot. Patriot.
verlangen nach. An ka ɲɔgɔn kanu. ntolatan kanunbaganciw les passionnés du
Aimons-nous les uns les autres. Let’s love one football. the football fans. Fans des Fussballs.
another. Laßt uns einander lieben. ... u y'a
kanunkɛ [à-ù] Jula: kanucɛ. Nom. bien-aimé,
kanun o jaabiw ka jɛnsɛn jamana kɔnɔ... ...
amoureux, amant; beloved, lover; Geliebter,
ils ont souhaité que les résultats soient
communiqués dans l'ensemble du pays... ...
Liebhaber, Liebling. n furukɛ ni n kanunkɛ
they wanted the results to be communicated mon mari et amant. my husband and lover.
across the country... ... sie wünschten, daß die mein Mann und Liebhaber.
Ergebnisse im ganzen Land bekannt gemacht antonyme: kanunmuso.
werden... kanunmuso [à-ù] comparer: kanucɛ.
2 • vt. mériter; deserve, earn, merit; verdienen.
Jula: kanumuso. Nom. amante, amoureuse,
I kanunna ni taali ye. Tu mérites de partir (et:
bien-aimée; sweetheart, beloved; Liebling,
«tu es condamné à partir»). You deserve to
Geliebte. antonyme: kanunkɛ.
leave (and: «you are condemned to go»). Du
verdienst es, zu gehen (und: «du bist zum kanunya [à-ù-á] Jula: kanuya.
Gehen verurteilt»). Morphemes: kanun-ya. variante: kanu.
3 • Nom. amour, affection; love, affection; 1 • Nom. amour, passion, entente; love, passion,
Liebe, Zuneigung. Kanun bɛ npogotigi deli lust, understanding; Liebe, Lust, Leidenschaft,
cɛko la. C'est par le plaisir de cœur que la Einverständnis, Einigkeit. ... kelenya ani
jeune fille vient au plaisir du corps. (proverbe). kanunya... ... l'unité et l'entente... ... unity and
It is through the pleasure of the heart that the
understanding... ... Einheit und Einigkeit...
girl comes to the pleasure of the body.
2 • Verbe. aimer, désirer; to love, desire; lieben,
(proverb). Durch die Lust des Herzens kommt
wünschen. Aw ka ɲɔgɔn kanunya, ka sa Ala
das Mädchen zum Vergnügen des Körpers.
(Sprichwort). ka kanunya la. Aimez-vous les uns les autres,
et et mourez dans l'amour de Dieu. Love one
4 • Nom. toute relation amoureuse hors
another, and die in the love of God. Liebt
mariage; any relationship outside marriage;
jede Liebesbeziehung außerhalb der Ehe.
einander und sterbt in der Liebe Gottes.
5 • Nom. souhait, désir; wish, desire; Wunsch, kapɛrɛni Emprunt de : français. synonyme: saalen.
Verlangen. Nom. caporal; corporal, sergeant; Korporal,
kanunbaga [à-ù] Jula: kanubaga. Sergeant. Category: Worker, occupation.
variante: kanubagaci. Nom. 1 • admirateur, kapitalisi Emprunt de : français. Nom. capitaliste;
supporter, ami /amie, amant / amante; fan, capitalist; Kapitalist. Category: Government.
supporter, one who loves, admirer, supporter,
kapitalisimu Emprunt de : français. Nom.
friend/girlfriend, lover; Fan, Anhänger,
capitalisme; capitalism; Kapitalismus.
Unterstützer, Liebhaber, Verehrer. balɔntan
Category: Government.
kanubaga supporter (de football). football
fan. Fußballfan. Sogo bɛɛ n'a kanunbaga
kapitɛni [à-ì-ɛ́-í] Emprunt de : français. Nom.
don. A chaque viande son amateur.
capitaine (poisson); Nile perch, captain (fish);
Kapitänfisch. Category: Fish. Lates niloticus.
(proverbe). Every meat has its own lover.
synonyme: bamutu, salen.
(proverb). Jedes Fleisch hat seinen eigenen
Liebhaber. (Sprichwort). kapo Emprunt de : français. Nom. capot; hood, cover,
bonnet; Motorhaube.
29/01/2026 371

kapote karadante
kapote [á] Emprunt de : français. Verbe. démolir, karabantanya [á] Nom. absence de contrainte;
bousiller quelqu’un (populaire); demolish, absence of constraint; Abwesenheit von
destroy someone (popular); zerstören, Zwang. «N tɛ» tɛ mɔgɔ bannen ye,
jemanden zerstören (beliebt). A' y'a teliya, n'o karabantanya don. Un refus catégorique ne
tɛ, án b'áw kapote. Dépêchez-vous, sinon, on veut pas vraiment dire qu'on refuse, c'est
vous démolit. Hurry up, otherwise we'll simplement qu'on n'y est pas contraint.
destroy you. Beeil dich, sonst zerstören wir (proverbe). A categorical refusal does not
dich. really mean that you refuse, it simply means
kara [à] Nom. 1 • ballon; ball; Kugel, Ball.
that you are not forced to do so. (proverb).
1
Eine kategorische Ablehnung bedeutet nicht
2 • jeu de cartes; card game; Kartenspiel. ka wirklich, dass Sie ablehnen, sondern lediglich,
kara bɔ jouer aux cartes. play cards. Karten dass Sie nicht dazu gezwungen werden.
spielen. synonyme: mariyasiw. (Sprichwort).
kara [á] Verbe. s'efforcer de; strive to; danach
karabara [á] Nom. calebasse à couvercle pour les
2
vêtements, l'argent; lidded gourd for clothes,
streben. A y'a kara ka baara ban. Il s'est
money; Kalebasse mit Deckel für Kleidung,
efforcé de finir le travail. He tried hard to
Geld. Category: Container.
finish the job. Er hat sich bemüht, die Arbeit zu
beenden. karabini [à-à] Emprunt de : français : «carbure».
kara [á] Nom. guigne, malchance, malheur; bad Nom. carbure de calcium (produit utilisé par les
3 chasseurs pour s'éclairer, et également
luck, misfortune; Übel, Pech, Unglück.
employé pour hâter le mûrissement des fruits);
Kɔlɔnkɔnɔbama, i binna a kan, kara, a
calcium carbide (product used by hunters for
binna i kan kara. Si tu tombes sur le crocodile lighting, and also used to hasten the ripening
du puits, d'est de la malchance, s'il te tombe of fruits); Calciumcarbid (Produkt, das von
dessus, c'est encore de la malchance. Jägern verwendet wird und auch zur
(proverbe). If you run into the crocodile in the Beschleunigung der Reifung von Früchten
well, it’s bad luck; if it comes to you, it’s bad verwendet wird). Jiriden karabinima man di.
luck again. (proverb). Wenn du auf das Les fruits mûris au carbure ne sont pas bons.
Krokodil im Brunnen triffst, ist es Pech, wenn Carbide ripened fruits are not tasty.
es dir auf den Kopf fällt, ist es wieder Pech. Karbidgereifte Früchte sind nicht
(Sprichwort). Ala kɛlɛbaga, kara b'a la. geschmackvoll.
Malheur à qui combat Dieu. (proverbe). Woe
karabuga [à-á-ù-á] variante: kabuga kɛrɛbuga,
to him who fights God. (proverb). Wehe dem,
der gegen Gott kämpft. (Sprichwort).
taabuga. Nom. espèce de poisson,
synonyme: neri . L'hémichromis rayé; banded jewel-fish and
2
five-spot cichlid; Buntbarsch. Category: Fish.
karaba [á-á-á] 1 • vt. forcer, contraindre, obliger; hemichromis fasciatus, hemichromis
force, oblige; zwingen, nötigen, verpflichten. bimaculatus.
Tuma sebali tɛ karaba. On ne peut forcer karada [á-á-á] Emprunt de : français.
1
l'avenir. (proverbe). You can’t force the future.
variante: karadaɲin. Nom. carde, pour démêler
(proverb). Die Zukunft kann man nicht
erzwingen. (Sprichwort). synonyme: latugu.
des fibres de coton; card, for carding cotton
fibres before spinning; kämmen, Vorbereitung
2 • vt. surpasser; surpass, exceed; übertreffen. der Baumwolle zum Spinnen. ka kɔɔri siɲɛ ni
Kɛlɛkɛyɔrɔ la, i ye ŋanaw karaba ! Sur le
karada ye démêler le coton avec une carde.
champ de bataille, tu as surpassé les plus
untangle the cotton with a card. Entwirren
braves ! On the battlefield, you outdid the
Sie die Baumwolle mit einem Kamm.
bravest! Auf dem Schlachtfeld hast du die
Category: Tool.
Tapfersten übertrumpft!
karada [à-à] Nom. sternum, bréchet; sternum,
3 • Nom. contrainte; constraint, compulsion; 2
Zwang, Nötigung. Tɔgɔ ye sanfɛn ye, tɔgɔ tɛ breastbone; Brustbein.
karaba. Le renom s’achète, on ne l'obtient pas karadante [á-á-ã́-é] comparer: tagamasiɲɛsɛbɛ,
par contrainte. (proverbe). Fame is bought, not danfarasɛbɛ. Emprunt de : français.
obtained by constraint. (proverb). Man kann
variante: karidante, karatidante. Nom. carte
sich den Ruhm kaufen, man bekommt ihn
d’identité, pièce d'identité; identity card;
nicht durch Zwang. (Sprichwort).
Personalausweis, Ausweis.
Category: Government.
synonyme: dantigɛlisɛbɛ.
29/01/2026 372

karadasi karan
karadasi Nom. cahier; exercise book; Heft, Schulheft. 2 • Verbe. avoir du respect, être déférent; have
respect, be deferential; Respekt haben,
Category: Learn. synonyme: kaye.
respektvoll sein.
karafe [à-à] synonyme: arabe. 1 • bride, mors, raie; karamɔgɔ comparer: mɛtiri,
1
bridle, bit, scratch, line; Streifen, Zaum,
pasitɛri.[à-à-ɔ́-ɔ́] 1 • n.comp. maître d'école,
Zügel, Gebiss am Pferdezaum. Faantan ka
enseignant, instituteur, professeur; teacher,
karafe y'a dɔlɔki ye. La bride du pauvre, c'est
professor; Lehrer, Professor. karamɔgɔ
son habit. (proverbe). The poor man's bridle is
musomanw les enseignantes. the female
his coat. (proverb). Das Zaumzeug des armen
Mannes ist sein Kleid. (Sprichwort).
teachers. die Lehrerinnen. Olu ko án
karamɔgɔ, dɔnni bɛ e la... Ils dirent :
2 • Verbe. attacher; attach, tie, fasten;
befestigen. A y'i sen fila karafe si jalan na,
«Maître, tu possèdes la connaissance....». They
said: “Master, you have knowledge....” Sie
ka jurukisɛ kɛ ka a siri... Il se lia les deux
sagten: „Meister, Sie haben das Wissen ...“.
pieds à un karité mort, et serra la corde... He
Category: Learn, Worker, occupation.
tied both feet to a dead shea tree, and tightened
synonyme: koɲɔgɔyabaga.
the rope... Er band beide Füße an einen toten
Shea-Baum und zog das Seil fest ... 2 • Nom. pasteur; pastor; Pfarrer, Pastor.
3 • Nom. facilitateur; facilitator; Moderator.
karafejuru [à-à-è] Nom. 1 • bride, rênes; bridle,
reins; Zaumzeug, Zügel. U ye karafejuru tigɛ
karamɔgɔ
2
n.comp. maître d'école coranique; leader of
sokɛw ye. Ils détachèrent les brides aux
Koran school; Leiter einer Koranschule.
chevaux. They untied the horses' reins. Sie karamɔgɔkɛ [à-à-ɔ̀-ɔ̀] Jula: karamɔgɔcɛ. Nom.
banden die Zügel der Pferde los. marabout, maître, enseignant, professeur,
2 • câble (deux-roues); cable (two-wheeler); instituteur; Koran teacher, teacher;
Kabel (Zweirad). Korangelehrter, Lehrer. Category: Worker,
karafu Nom. pichet; jug, pitcher; Krug.
occupation.
1
Category: Container. karamɔgɔmuso [à-à-ɔ̀-ɔ̀] Nom. enseignante,
karafu [á] variante: kalifuya. Verbe. devenir sénile;
institutrice, maîtresse d'école; female teacher;
2 Lehrerin. Category: Worker, occupation.
become senile; senil werden. Kɔrɔ bɛ mɔgɔ
karamɔgɔya [à-à-ɔ̀-ɔ̀] Nom. enseignement, statut
karafu. La vieillesse rend sénile. Old age
(fonction) de maître; teaching, status
makes you senile. Das Alter macht senil.
(function) of teacher; Lehrtätigkeit, Status
karakasa [á] synonyme: sajɛgɛ. Nom. polyptère; kind (Funktion) des Lehrers. Dugu tan ni wɔɔrɔ
of fish; Fischart. Category: Fish. polypterus de ka mɔgɔw nana karamɔgɔya dege. Des
sp.. synonyme: sajɛgɛ, logomi, sajɛgɛjɛ. gens de seize villages sont venus apprendre
karakasawu [á] Adverbe. 1 • précipitamment; hastily,, comment enseigner. People from 16 villages
came to learn how to teach. Menschen aus 16
hurriedly; hastig. Bama ko a bɛ karakasawu
Dörfern kamen, um zu lernen, wie man lehrt.
ka boli... Le crocodile voulut se sauver Category: Learn.
précipitamment... The crocodile wanted to run
karan [á] Verbe. 1 • veiller sur, se soucier de; watch
away quickly... Das Krokodil wollte schnell
weglaufen... over, take care of; aufpassen. A b'a karan
2 • empoignade violente; violent fight; heftiger bolota kan a kana tiɲɛ. Il surveille ses
Kampf. Baaritalaw ye karakasawu kɛ. Les affaires afin qu'elles ne soient pas abîmées. He
lutteurs se sont violemment empoignés. The watches his things so that they are not
wrestlers violently grabbed each other. Die damaged. Er paßt auf seine Sachen auf, damit
Ringer packten sich heftig. sie nicht beschädigt werden.
karakoro Nom. beignet de banane; banana dough-nut;
2 • économiser, ne pas dilapider; save, do not
squander; sparen, nicht verschwenden. A b'i
Bananen Küchlein. Category: Food.
karan a ka wari kan. Il est économe pour son
karama [à-à-á] 1 • Nom. considération, respect, argent. He is economical for his money. Er ist
déférence; consideration, respect; Achtung, sparsam mit seinem Geld.
Respekt, Anstand. U ye mɔgɔw karama. Ils 3 • soucis, préoccupation; worries, concern;
ont montré beaucoup de déférence envers les Sorge.
gens. They showed a lot of deference to people.
Sie zeigten großen Respekt gegenüber den
Menschen.
29/01/2026 373

karana karayogo
karana [á] Verbe. réserver, mettre de côté, fiancer; karatɔ [á] Nom. risque-tout, casse-cou, imprudent;
reserve, set aside, engage; reservieren, risk-taker, daredevil, reckless; risikofreudig,
beiseite legen, engagieren. A ye wari dɔɔni waghalsig, rücksichtslos. Dɔlɔminna ye
karana ka a bila dugutaa ɲɛ. Il a mis de mobilibolila karatɔ ye... L'alcoolique est un
l'argent de côté pour son voyage. He put conducteur imprudent... The alcoholic is a
money aside for his trip. Er legte Geld für reckless driver... Der Alkoholiker ist ein
seine Reise beiseite. ka npogotigi karana se rücksichtsloser Autofahrer...
fiancer avec une jeune fille. get engaged to a synonyme: karankarantɔ, yɛrɛfagasu.
girl. sich mit einem Mädchen verloben.
karatu [à-à] Verbe. 1 • détourner; divert; umleiten,
karangafesii [à-à-à-è] variante: karangafe. Nom. veruntreuen, unterschlagen. ka wari karatu
favoris; side whiskers; Koteletten. ka détourner de l'argent. embezzle money. Geld
karangafesii di se raser les favoris. shave the unterschlagen. Ale de ye Seku muso karatu.
side whiskers. sich die Koteletten rasieren. C'est lui qui a détourné la femme de Sékou. It
karangɛ [á] variante: karanga. Nom. enceinte d'une
was he who hijacked Sékou's wife. Er war es,
der Sékous Frau entführte.
ville; city wall; Stadtmauer. A donna Segu
2 • triche, magouille, fraude; cheating, fraud;
karangɛda fɛ. Il entra à Ségou par la porte
Betrug. Aw kana karatu kɛ nin ko in na ! Ne
d'enceinte. He entered Ségou through the
faites pas de magouille dans cette affaire !
gate of the city wall. Er betrat Ségou durch das
Don't play tricks in this matter! Spielen Sie in
Tor der Stadtmauer.
dieser Angelegenheit keine Streiche!
karankarantɔ [á] Nom. téméraire, imprudent (par Category: Finance.
insouciance), casse-cou; reckless (carelessly), karatukaratu [à-à-ù] Nom. affaire louche,
daredevil; rücksichtslos (nachlässig),
malhonnêteté, escroquerie, magouille; shady
Draufgänger. synonyme: karatɔ. business, dishonesty, scam, scheming;
karantan [á] Nom. sans risque; without risk; ohne zwielichtige Geschäfte, Unehrlichkeit, Betrug,
Intrigen. Mɔgɔ caman ye Musa ye
Risiko. Jagɛlɛya kojugu karantan tɛ. Trop
karatukaratu ni nankarabaya la... De
d'assurance n'est pas sans risque. Too much
confidence is not without risk. Zu viel
nombreuses personnes ont vu Moussa mêlé à
Selbstvertrauen ist nicht ohne Risiko.
des affaires louches et des escroqueries...
Many people have seen Moussa involved in
karata comparer: karatakarata.[à-à-á] Nom. natte shady deals and scams... Viele Menschen
grossière, hautes herbes tressées ensemble, ex. haben gesehen, wie Moussa in zwielichtige
pour faire des vérandas; big grass mat, dried Geschäfte und Betrügereien verwickelt war ...
long grasses matted together, used in making
karavati [à-à-à-í] Emprunt de : français. Nom.
shelters; lange Gras-matte, dicke Strohmatte.
synonyme: kaara .
cravate; tie; Krawatte. Category: Clothing.
1
karawu [á] Adverbe. 1 • violemment; violently,
karatakarata
fiercely; heftig. Bala donna so kɔnɔ karawu !
comparer: karata.[à-à-à-á-á-á] n.comp.
Bala entra violemment dans la maison ! Bala
paillote; grass hut; Strohhütte.
entered the house violently! Bala drang
Category: Building.
gewaltsam ins Haus ein!
karatata [á] variante: kɛrɛtɛtɛ. Adverbe. très fort 2 • violence, empoignade; violence, clawing;
(serrer, comprimer...); very strong (tighten, Gewalt.
compress...); sehr stark (festziehen,
karayogo variante: karajago. Nom. marchandise;
komprimieren...) U y'u cɛsiri karatata ! Ils ont
merchandise, commodity; Waren. Fɛn o fɛn,
pris tout leur courage. (littéralement: «se sont
ceints»). They took all their courage.
ni i b'o feere, karayogo don. Toute chose qui
(literally: “girded themselves”). Sie nahmen sen vend est une marchandise. Anything that
all ihren Mut zusammen. (wörtlich: „sich sells is a commodity. Alles, was sich
umgürtet“). verkauft, ist eine Ware. synonyme: feerekɛfɛn,
sannifɛn, jagofɛn.
29/01/2026 374

kare karikari
kare [á-é] Emprunt de : français: carré. Nom. rue, kari [à] variante: kaari. Nom. 1 • Untel; so-and-so;
1 3
pâté de maisons (groupe d'habitations délimité Soundso, So-und-so. A ko ba kari... Il dit:
par des rues); street, block (group of dwellings «Femme Unetelle...». He said: “Woman
delimited by streets); Häuserreihe, So-and-so…” Er sagte: „Frau So und So…“.
Wohnquartier, Straße, Wohnblock Gebiet, synonyme: karsa, karimaasina.
Block (durch Straßen begrenzte Wohngruppe).
kare filanan la deuxième pâté de maisons. the
2 • toi-là (terme vocatif employé à la place du
nom ou du prénom d'une personne); you over
second block. der zweite Häuserblock.
there (a vocative term used in place of a
kare [á] Nom. carré; square; Vierkante, Quadrat. ... person’s first or last name); du dort
2
ni i b'a fɛ i ka foro ka kɛ kare ye... ...si tu (Rufbegriff anstelle des Namens oder
veux que ton champ soit carré... ...if you want
Vornamens einer Person). ... a ko n ma:
your field to be square... ...wenn Sie möchten, «Kari, na yan !» ...elle me dit : «Eh! toi, viens
daß Ihr Feld quadratisch ist... ici !». ...she said to me, "Hey you, come here!"
Category: Mathematics. ... sie sagte mir: «He! du, komm her!».
synonyme: naanikɛɲɛjɔlen. kari [á] Verbe. 1 • faire soudainement quelque
4
kari [á-í] vt. 1 • casser, briser, ébrécher; break, chose, saisir (maladie, froid...); suddenly do
1
something, seize (illness, cold...); plötzlich
shatter, chip; brechen, abbrechen, zersplittern,
splittern. N’i binna ka bɔ yiri sanfɛ, i bolo bi etwas tun, ergreifen (Krankheit, Erkältung...)
Bana karila a kan. La maladie lui est tombée
se ka kari. Si tu tombais d’un arbre, tu
dessus. The illness fell on him. Die Krankheit
pourrais te casser le bras. If you fall from a
tree, you can break your arm. Wenn du von
traf ihn. Nɛnɛ karila Musa la. Le froid saisit
einem Baum fällst, kannst du dir den Arm Moussa. The cold grips Moussa. Die Kälte
brechen. erfaßt Moussa.
2 • cueillir (en cassant); pick; zusammenlesen, 2 • se jeter, se mêler; to throw oneself, to
ablesen. Ne tun bɛ taa nkɔyɔ bilennen ni
mingle; sich werfen, sich unter die Leute
nkɔyɔ geren ni nkɔyɔ mɔnen kari... J'allais
mischen, vermischen. ... a y'i kari dingɛkɔnɔ
parawu ! ... il se jeta précipitamment dans un
cueillir des tomates rouges, des tomates vertes,
des tomates mûres... I was going to pick red trou ! ...he threw himself hastily into a hole!
tomatoes, green tomatoes, ripe tomatoes... Ich ...er warf sich hastig in ein Loch! A ɲɛ fin n'a
wollte rote Tomaten, grüne Tomaten, reife jɛ karila ɲɔgɔn na. Il a le noir et le blanc de
Tomaten pflücken ... Category: Agriculture. l’œil mélangés (: «il est ivre»). He has the
3 • ébranler, entamer; to shake, to begin; black and white of his eye mixed (“he is
schütteln, beginnen. ...Musa galabu karila drunk”). Er hat das Schwarz und Weiß seiner
dɔɔnin. ... la confiance de Moussa fut un peu
Augen vermischt („er ist betrunken“).
ébranlée. ... Moussa's confidence was shaken kariba variante: kaari. Nom. autobus; bus, coach,
a little. ... Moussas Selbstvertrauen war ein omnibus; Bus, Autobus. Category: Travel.
wenig erschüttert. synonyme: bisi .
1
kari 2 [á] Emprunt de : arabe. Nom. dimanche; karidennin Nom. mini-car; small bus; Kleinbus.
Sunday; Sonntag. kari nata dimanche
Category: Travel.
prochain. next Sunday. nächsten Sonntag. Kari
karijakuma [à-ì] Morphemes: kari-jakuma. Nom.
o kari, i bɛ bugɔ bɔlɔn kelen min na, kabi
arbuste (espèce); kind of shrub; Pflanzenart.
sibiri wula, i b'o jateminɛ. Si l'on te frappe
Category: Bush, shrub. psorospermum
tous les dimanches dans une certaine rue, tu corymbiferum /guineense.
commences à la surveiller dès le samedi soir.
(proverbe). If you get hit every Sunday on a
karikari
1
comparer: sotagasɔngɔ. Nom. prix définitif;
certain street, you start watching it on final price; definitiver Preis. I karikari ye joli
Saturday evening. (proverb). Wenn man jeden ye ? Quel est votre dernier prix ? What is your
Sonntag in einer bestimmten Straße
final price?
angefahren wird, beginnt man am
Samstagabend mit dem Aufpassen.
(Sprichwort). synonyme: karilon, dimansi,
haati.
29/01/2026 375

karikari kasa
karikari [á] vt. concasser, casser en petits morceaux; karo [à] Verbe. 1 • voler; steal, rob; stehlen, klauen.
2 2
shatter, break into little pieces; zerschmettern, ka fɛn karo acheter quelque chose et partir
zertrümmern. ... furakisɛ misɛnninw ye, sans payer. buy something and leave without
minnu bɛ karikari ka kɛ jimafɛnw na... ... paying. etwas kaufen und dann ohne
des petits comprimés qu'on réduit en morceaux Bezahlung gehen.
et qu'on met dans des liquides... ... small 2 • tricherie, fourberie; cheating, deceit;
tablets that are broken into pieces and put into Betrug, Hinterlist.
liquids... ... kleine Tabletten, die in Stücke
karo [à] Nom. surveillance; monitoring,
3
gebrochen und in Flüssigkeiten gegeben
werden ...
surveillance, supervision; Überwachung,
Aufsicht. I na don karo la bi. On t'aura à l’œil
karilimuru [á-í-ú-ú] Morphemes: kari-li-muru.
aujourd'hui. We’ll keep an eye on you today.
Nom. canif, petit couteau pliant; penknife, Wir werden dich heute beobachten. A bɛ karo
pocketknife, foldable knife; Taschenmesser,
la. Il est sous surveillance. He's under
Sackmesser. Category: Tool.
surveillance. Er wird überwacht.
synonyme: karimurunin.
karon [à] variante: karo, nkaron, kayon. Verbe.
karilon Morphemes: kari-lon. Nom. dimanche; Sunday;
être impropre à la consommation (parce que
Sonntag. synonyme: kari , dimansi.
2 trop dur : herbes, viande...), être coriace; be
karimaasina [à-ì] Nom. Untel; So-and-so; So und unfit for consumption (because too hard:
herbs, meat...), be tough; ungeeignet für den
so. U ko karimaasina, gɛrɛ án na yan ! Ils
Verzehr sein (weil zu hart: Kräuter, Fleisch...),
disent : «Untel, approche-toi de nous»! They
zäh sein. Gan karonna. Le gombo n'est plus
say: “So-and-so, come closer to us”! Sie
consommable. The okra is no longer edible.
sagen: „So und so, komm näher zu uns“!
Der Okra ist nicht mehr eßbar.
synonyme: kari, karsa.
3
karɔti [à-ì-ɔ ́] Emprunt de : français. Nom. carotte;
karimurunin Nom. canif; penknife; Taschenmesser.
carrot; Karotte, Möhre. Category: Food.
Category: Tool. synonyme: karilimuru.
karsa [à-á] synonyme: balimacɛ. variante: karisa.
karinɛ Emprunt de : français. Nom. carnet; notebook;
Nom. monsieur, untel, unetelle; Sir, Mr, mister,
Heft, Notizbuch. Category: Learn. so-and-so; Herr. synonyme: karimaasina,
kariɲa variante: nkariɲa, nkɛrɛɲɛ, nkiriɲɛ. Nom. kari 3 , karisa.
instrument de musique (baguette de métal kasa [á-á] Nom. odeur; smell; Geschmack, Duft.
1
frottée sur socle dentelé); musical instrument
kasa diman bonne odeur. nice smell.
(rubbed metal stick on serrated base);
Musikinstrument (geriebener Metallstab auf angenehmer Duft. A kasa ka di. Ça sent bon.
gezackter Basis). Category: Musical It smells good. Das riecht gut. Kasa ti bɔra
instrument. wa ? Ɔnhɔn, ka sa dɔ bi bɔra. Tu ne sens pas
karisa [à-ì] Nom. Untel, Unetelle (non vocatif); une odeur ? Oui, il y a une certaine odeur. Isn’t
there a smell? Yes, there is a certain smell.
So-and-so (non-vocative); So und so (ohne
Vokativ). Anw kana ánw ka kɔrɔfɔ fɔ karisa
Riechst du den Duft nicht? Ja, da ist ein
gewisser Duft. A kasa tigɛra. Ça a perdu son
ye. Ne parlons pas à Untel de notre affaire.
odeur. It lost its smell. Es hat seinen Geruch
Let's not talk to So-and-so about our affair.
verloren. synonyme: suma .
Reden wir nicht mit dem und dem über unsere 5
Angelegenheit. synonyme: karsa. kasa [à-á] Emprunt de : peul. Nom. habit contre le
2
karisala [à-ì-à] Nom. tel lieu; such place; solch ein froid, couverture en laine; coat, cloak, jacket,
woollen blanket; Mantel, Jacke, Wolldecke.
Ort. ... án bɛ karisala komini fɛ... ... nous
Sagasii bɛ kɛ kasa ye. La laine de mouton, on
voulons être avec telle commune... ...we want
en fait des couvertures. We make blankets from
to be with such and such a municipality... ...wir
sheep’s wool. Wir stellen Decken aus
wollen mit dieser und jener Gemeinde
Schafwolle her. Category: Clothing.
zusammen sein...
kasa [à] Nom. tilapia; tilapia; Buntbarsch.
karitɔn [à-ì-ɔ ́] Emprunt de : français. Nom. carton; 3
Category: Fish. tilapia monodi.
cardboard box; Kartonschachtel.
Category: Container.
karo [à-ó] Emprunt de : français. Nom. carreau;
1
diamonds; Ecke.
29/01/2026 376

kasa kasan
kasa [à] variante: kasan. Nom. grenier circulaire kasabɔ [á] Verbe. 1 • sentir fort (souvent pour une
4
d'extérieur tressé en branches de bambou odeur désagréable), puer; smell strong (often
fendu; outdoor circular grain storage with for an unpleasant odor), stink; stark riechen
bamboo branches; Runder Kornspeicher aus (oft mit einem unangenehmen Geruch),
gewebten Bambuszweigen. A b'e dumuni kɛ stinken. A sɛbɛkɔrɔ kasabɔra. Ça sent très
iko kasa. Il mange comme un grenier. (: fort. It smells very strong. Es riecht sehr stark.
«comme un ogre»). He eats like a granary. (: 2 • devenir intolérable, dépasser les limites;
“like an ogre”). Er ißt wie ein Kornspeicher. (: become intolerable, exceed limits; unerträglich
„wie ein Unhold“). synonyme: mɔɔnɔ. werden, Grenzen überschreiten. Aw bɛ áw
2
kasaara [à] Nom. catastrophe, malheur, accident; yɛrɛ kasabɔ yɔrɔ bɛɛ. Vous vous rendez
1
insupportables partout. You make yourselves
disaster, misfortune, accident; Katastrophe,
unbearable everywhere. Ihr macht euch
Unglück, Unfall. Alafarankan kɔ, a tun tɛ bɔ
überall unerträglich. Dennin in bɛna a yɛrɛ
kasaara in na. Sans l'aide de Dieu, il ne
kasabɔ sa han ! Cette fille va dépasser les
survivait pas à cet accident. Without the help of
limites hein ! This girl is going to exceed the
God, he would not survive this accident. Ohne
limits huh! Dieses Mädchen wird die Grenzen
die Hilfe Gottes würde er diesen Unfall nicht
überschreiten, nicht wahr?
überleben. synonyme: kasara.
kasadiyalan [á] Nom. parfum; perfume, fragrance,
kasaara [à] Verbe. mettre en cause, accuser; to
2 scent; Duftstoff, Parfüm. Jamadonya fɛ,
question, to accuse, to blame; beschuldigen.
Kasaara ye Seku sɔrɔ. Sékou a été mis en
musow bɛ kasadiyalan kɛ u kan. Les jours
de fête, les femmes se parfument. On holidays,
cause. Sékou was implicated. Sekou wurde
women wear perfume. An Feiertagen
angeklagt.
parfümieren sich die Frauen.
kasaaratɔ [à-à-à] Nom. victime (d'une catastrophe, synonyme: latikɔlɔn, kasatigɛlan, dibigɔrɛ,
d'un accident), blessé, accidenté; victim (of a alanbara, sumadiyalan.
disaster, accident), injured, accident victim;
Opfer (einer Katastrophe, eines Unfalls), kasagoman Nom. nuisance olfactive; unpleasant
Verletzter, Unfallopfer. ... dɔkɔtɔrɔw b'a ɲini smells, odour nuisance; Geruchsbelästigung.
o kasaaratɔw fɛ... ... les médecins demandent kasagoya [á] Morphemes: kasa-go-ya. Nom.
à ces victimes... ...doctors ask these victims... puanteur; stench; Gestank.
...Ärzte fragen diese Opfer...
kasakasa [á] Adverbe. 1 • très rapide (démarche du
kasaba [à-à] Verbe. se précipiter, se hâter; rush, hurry
margouillat ou du varan); very fast
up; sich beeilen. A kasabara ka wuli. Il s'est (margouillat or monitor lizard gait); sehr
levé à la hâte. He got up in a hurry. Er stand in schnell (Margouillat- oder Warangang). Basa
Eile auf. bɛ boli kasakasa ! Le margouillat court à
kasabakɔrɔ [à-à-à] Nom. femme (et parfois homme) toute allure ! The lizard is running at full
entre deux âges, âge avancé; middle-aged speed! Die Echse läuft auf Hochtouren!
woman (and sometimes man), advanced age; 2 • course, fuite; run, escape, the race, the
Frau mittleren Alters (und manchmal auch flight; Rennen, Flucht.
Mann), fortgeschrittenen Alter. E yɛrɛ kasamɛn [á-á-ɛ ́] Nom. odorat; sense of smell;
kasabakɔrɔtɔ ? Toi, à ton âge avancé ? You, at Geruchssinn.
your advanced age? Sie, in Ihrem
kasan Nom. espèce de plante; kind of plant; Pflanze
fortgeschrittenen Alter? synonyme: sakɔrɔ. 1
(Art). Category: Grass, herb, vine. ipomoea
kasabi [à-à-í] Emprunt de : arabe. Nom. 1 • total, muricata.
montant, quantité; total, quantity, amount, kasan [á] adj. 1 • violent, emporté; violent, carried
2
sum; Total, Endsumme, Gesamtsumme,
Betrag. O wari kasabi kɛra... Le montant de
away; gewalttätig, mitgenommen. A fa tun ka
la somme est de... The amount of the sum is...
kasan denmisɛnw nɔfɛ. Son père était
Die Höhe der Summe beträgt... emporté avec les enfants. His father was
violent with children. Sein Vater war
2 • compter, additionner; count, add; zählen,
hinzufügen.
gegenüber Kindern gewalttätig.
2 • féroce, méchant; fierce, mean; grausam,
kasabiya [à-à-í-á] synonyme: sɔnni, jatili. Nom.
böse. Nin wulu in ka kasan. Ce chien est
validité; validity; Geltung, Gültigkeit.
méchant. This dog is mean.
29/01/2026 377

kasanke kasila
3 • turbulent; turbulent; turbulent, unruhig. I 2 • crier (animal); make a noise (animal);
ka cɛnin ka kasan kojugu ! Ton petit est trop Tiergeräusche machen. Wulu bilakun ye kasi
turbulent ! Your little one is too turbulent! ye... Le rôle du chien est d'aboyer... The role
Deine Kleine ist zu unruhig! of the dog is to bark... Die Aufgabe des
kasanke [á] 1 • Verbe. ensevelir (mettre dans linceul);
Hundes besteht darin, zu bellen...
3 • sonner; ring, sound, beep; tönen, erklingen,
bury (put in shroud); begraben (in ein
piepen.
Leichentuch legen). ka su kasanke ensevelir
4 • chanter (oiseaux); crow; krähen, singen
un mort. bury a dead. Begraben eines Toten.
(Vogel). Dondo kasira. Le coq a chanté. The
2 • Nom. linceul; shroud; Leichentuch,
cock crowed. Der Hahn hat gekräht.
Grabtuch. Su dalen bɛ,, a kasenkelen bɛ. Le
5 • souffrir (sans verser de larmes); suffer
corps est couché, enveloppé dans un linceul.
(without shedding tears); leiden (ohne Tränen
The body is lying, wrapped in a shroud. Der
zu vergießen). Cɛ bɛ kasi, ɲɛji tɛ bɔ. Le brave
Körper liegt, in ein Leichentuch gewickelt.
Fɛɛrɔbɔ dan ye kasanke ye. Le dernier habit,
souffre sans larmes. (proverbe). The brave
suffers without tears. (proverb). Der Mutige
c'est le linceul. (proverbe). The last garment is
leidet ohne Tränen. (Sprichwort).
the shroud. (proverb). Das letzte Gewand ist
das Leichentuch. (Sprichwort). kasi [à] Verbe. lever (bière); ferment (beer); gären
2
kasanya [á] Verbe. 1 • s'emporter, être violent; get (Bier). Dɔlɔ dɔ biri bɛ kɛ ka dɔ geren kasi.
La levure d'une bière sert pour faire lever une
carried away, be violent; ausrasten,
gewalttätig sein. Kana i kasanya, i nɔ don.
autre bière. (proverbe). The yeast from one
beer is used to leaven another beer. (proverb).
Ne te mets pas en colère, c'est de ta faute.
Die Hefe eines Bieres wird zum Aufgehen
Don’t get angry, it’s your fault. Sei nicht
eines anderen Bieres verwendet. (Sprichwort).
wütend, es ist deine Schuld.
ɲɔdɔlɔ kasibali de la bière de mil non
2 • emportement, violence; violence; Gewalt.
fermentée. unfermented millet beer.
kasara [à-á-á] Nom. accident, malheur, catastrophe; unvergorenes Hirsebier.
accident, misfortune, disaster, catastrophe, kasibagatɔ [à-ì-à-à] Nom. pleurant, personne qui
tragedy; Unfall, Unglück, Unheil. Mɔgɔ
pleure, pleurnicheur; weeping person, whiner;
caman bi kasara sɔrɔ sira kan. Beaucoup de
weinende Person. A kasibagatɔ nana. Elle est
monde a des accidents sur la route. A lot of
revenue en pleurant. She came back crying.
people have accidents on the road. Viele Leute
Sie kam weinend zurück.
haben einen Unfall auf der Strasse.
synonyme: kasaara .
kasikan [à-ì-á] Morphemes: kasi-kan. Nom. pleurs,
1
cri (d'un animal), chant (d'un oiseau); crying,
kasatigɛlan [á] Nom. déodorant, parfum; deodorant,
cries; Geschrei, Weinen. O y'a sɔrɔ ne
perfume; Deodorant, Parfüm. firigo
terimuso ɲuman in ye fan bɛɛ kɛ kasikan
kasatigɛlan un déodorant pour le ye. Or ma bonne amie s'est mise à crier et
réfrigérateur. a deodorant for the refrigerator.
pleurer à tue-tête. But my friend started
ein Deodorant für den Kühlschrank.
screaming and crying at the top of her lungs.
synonyme: kasadiyalan, sumadiyalan, Aber meine Freundin begann aus vollem Halse
latikɔlɔn. zu schreien und zu weinen.
kasɛti Emprunt de : français. Nom. cassette; cassette; kasikɛti Emprunt de : français. Nom. casquette; cap;
Musikkassette. Mütze, Schirmmütze. Category: Clothing.
kasi comparer: lakasi. vi. 1 • pleurer; cry; schreien: kasiki Emprunt de : français. Nom. casque; helmet;
1
Tiergeräusche machen. Mun na i bi kasi ? Helm, Kopfschutz.
Pourquoi tu pleures ? Why are you crying? kasikuru [à-ì] Nom. sanglot étouffé; muffled sob;
Warum weinst du? A bi kasi barisa a ɲa t’a
gedämpftes Schluchzen. Ni denmisɛn ba y'a
baa la. Il pleure parce qu’il ne peut pas voir sa
bugɔ, kasikuru bɛ na a dusukun na. Un
mère. He is crying because he can’t see/find
enfant que sa mère a frappé sanglote. A child
his mother. Er weint weil er seine Mutter nicht
who was hit by his mother sobs. Ein Kind, das
sehen kann. Den ye kasi daminɛ. L’enfant a
von seiner Mutter geschlagen wurde,
commencé à pleurer. The child started to cry. schluchzt.
Das Kind begann zu weine. Kasi ko lo. C’est
kasila [à-ì] Nom. pleurnicheur; crying person;
triste à pleurer. It makes you weep. Es bring
einem zum Weinen.
weinende Person. den kasila un enfant
pleurnicheur. a crying child. ein weinendes
Kind.
29/01/2026 378

kasilan katawu
kasilan [à-ì] Nom. ferment; ferment; Ferment. Ɲɔdɔlɔ kasɔrɔ [à-ɔ̀-ɔ̀] variante: kasɔrɔma. conj. alors que,
kasilan suguya ka ca. Il y a beaucoup de depuis; while, since, whereas; solange als,
sortes de ferments pour la bière de mil. There während, obwohl, wohingegen. I ye muso in
are many kinds of ferments for millet beer. Es ye wagati min na ka a ɲini furu la kasɔrɔma
gibt viele Arten von Fermenten für Hirsebier. bana b'a la. Tu as vu cette femme et tu as
Kasipiyɛni kɔgɔji Nom. Mer Caspienne; The voulu l'épouser alors qu'elle était déjà malade.
Caspian sea; Das Kaspische Meer. You saw this woman and wanted to marry her
when she was already sick. Du hast diese Frau
kaso [à-ó] Emprunt de : français : cachot. Nom.
1 gesehen und wolltest sie heiraten, obwohl sie
cachot, prison; prison, jail, dungeon, cell; schon krank war.
Kerker, Verlies, Gefängnis. Faama y'u bila
kasɔrɔli [á-ɔ́-ɔ́-í] Emprunt de : français. Nom.
kaso la tugun. Le roi les mit en prison. The
casseroles; cooking pot, pot; Kochtopf.
king put them in prison. Der König steckte sie
Category: Container.
ins Gefängnis. Category: Building.
synonyme: kasobon, dibi 1 . kata 1 [à-à] 1 • Nom. potasse (fait avec des cendres
lessivées); potash (made with leached ashes);
kaso
2
[á] Adverbe. très fort, costaud; very strong,
Pottasche (hergestellt aus ausgelaugter Asche).
sturdy; sehr stark, robust. A kɔgɔlen bɛ kaso ! Tosira tɛ tobi kata kɔ. On ne prépare pas le
Il est très costaud ! He is very strong! Er ist reste de «to» sans potasse. The remaining
sehr stark! "porridge" is not prepared without potash.
kaso [á] Nom. crochet; hook; Haken. A ka sogow Der restliche «Hirsebrei» wird nicht ohne
3
Pottasche zubereitet. synonyme: sigɛn,
dulonnen bɛ kaso la. Sa viande est 1
suspendue au crochet. Its meat is hanging on
sɛgɛkata.
the hook. Sein Fleisch ist am Haken 2 • Verbe. être gris, être sale; to be grey, be
aufgehängt. dirty; grau sein, schmutzig sein. Denmisɛnw
kasobon [à-ò] Morphemes: kaso-bon. Nom. prison, katalenba don, áw y'u ko joona ! Les enfants
maison d'arrêt; prison, jail; Gefängnis.
sont très sales, allez les laver rapidement ! The
Category: Building. synonyme: kaso .
children are very dirty, go wash them quickly!
1
Die Kinder sind sehr schmutzig, wasch sie
kasoden [à-ò-ẽ́] Morphemes: kaso-den. schnell!
variante: kasoladen. Nom. prisonnier; kata [á] Nom. bagarre, dispute, querelle,
2
prisoner; Gefangener. Category: Person. affrontement (discussion, sport...); fight,
synonyme: kasolamɔgɔ. quarrel, confrontation (discussion, sport...);
kasodon [à-ò-ṍ] synonyme: kasoladon. Nom.
Streit, Zank, Konfrontation (Diskussion,
Sport...) U ye kataw kɛ ɲɔgɔn na. Ils se sont
emprisonnement; imprisonment; Haft,
Gefangenschaft, Freiheitsentzug.
battus. They fought. Sie haben gekämpft.
kasoladon [à-ò-à-ṍ] Morphemes: kaso-la-don.
katanin [à-à] Nom. potasse utilisée pour la fabrication
du savon; Potassium used for soap making;
Nom. détention, emprisonnement; detention,
Kalium (aus Asche) zur Herstellung von Seife.
imprisonment, custody; Festnahme, Arrest,
Haft. synonyme: kasolasigi.
Kata bɛ kɛ dumuni na, katanin bɛ kɛ ka
safunɛ dila. On emploie la potasse kata pour
kasoladonsɛbɛ Morphemes: kaso-la-don-sɛbɛ.
la nourriture, et la potasse katanin dans la
Nom. mandat d'arrêt; arrest warrant; fabrication du savon. Kata potash is used for
Haftbefehl. food and katanin potash is used for soap. Das
kasolamɔgɔ Morphemes: kaso-la-mɔgɔ. Nom. Kata-Kalium wird für die Nahrung verwendet,
und das Katanin-Kalium wird zur Herstellung
prisonnier; prisoner; Gefangener.
von Seife verwendet. synonyme: sɛgɛkata.
Category: Person. synonyme: kasoden.
katawu [á] interj. violemment, vlan; violently, whoa;
kasolasigi [à-ò-à-í-í] Morphemes: kaso-la-sigi.
heftig. A ko katawu ! Ne ka ji ! A ko yan
synonyme: kasoladon. Nom. détention,
minɛ ! Il dit : «Tiens, vlan, voici mon coup,
emprisonnement; detention, imprisonment,
custody; Haft, Arrest, Festnahme.
prends donc ça !». He says, "Here you go,
synonyme: kasoladon.
whoa, here’s my shot, take that!" Er sagt:
«Hier, Mann, hier ist mein Schlag, nimm
das!».
29/01/2026 379

katɛmɛ katoliki
katɛmɛ expr. plus que, exprime la supériorité, 2 • être tenace, persévérant, intransigeant,
obstiné, tenir bon; be tenacious, persevering,
supérieur; more than, be superior to; mehr als,
uncompromising, stubborn, stand firm;
besser sein als. Sinji ka ɲi ka tɛmɛ biberɔn
hartnäckig sein, Ausdauer haben,
kan. Le lait maternel est mieux que le biberon. Kompromißlos sein, Durchhaltevermögen
Brest-feeding is better than the bottle milk. haben. Mɔgɔ kɛra cogo o cogo, i tɛ se ka
Muttermilch ist besser als die Milchflasche.
katigɛlɛya k'e i sinankun na. Qui que tu sois,
kati 1 [á] Adverbe. 1 • impitoyable, inclément, dur, tu ne peux pas être intransigeant avec ton
intransigeant; ruthless, inclement, harsh, parent à plaisanterie. Whoever you are, you
uncompromising; rücksichtslos, can't be intransigent with your joking parent.
unbarmherzig, hart, kompromißlos. Yenkaw Wer auch immer Sie sind, Sie können
kati ka gɛlɛn. Les gens là-bas sont
gegenüber Ihrem scherzhaften Verwandten
nicht unnachgiebig sein.
impitoyables. The people there are ruthless.
Die Leute dort sind unbarmherzig. katilaka Nom. outarde à ventre noir; black-bellied
synonyme: katigɛlɛn. bustard; Trappe, Schwarzbauchtrappe.
2 • volonté, énergie; will, energy; Wille, Category: Bird. eupodotis melanogaster.
Energie. synonyme: kakialaka.
3 • très amer, énergiquement (refus); bitter, katilɛ [á] Nom. hachette, herminette, piochons, petite
forceful (refusal); bitter, energisch
pioche (pour creuser les puits); hatchet, adze,
(Ablehnung). A ka kunan kati ! C'est très
pickaxes, small pickaxe (for digging wells);
amer ! It’s very bitter! Es ist sehr bitter! A y'i Beil, Dechsel, Spitzhacke, kleine Spitzhacke
ban kati ! Il a énergiquement refusé ! He (zum Brunnengraben), Axt. A ka katilɛ da
refused energetically! Er hat sich entschieden goyara. La lame de sa petite hache n'est plus
geweigert! tranchante. The blade of his little ax is no
kati [á] Adverbe. très fort (rire); very loud (laughs); longer sharp. Die Klinge seiner kleinen Axt ist
2
nicht mehr scharf. Category: Tool.
sehr laut (lacht). A yɛlɛla katikatikati ! Elle rit
à gorge déployée ! She laughs out loud! Sie katimicira [á] variante: katimicura. Nom. nom
lacht laut! plaisant pour le chien en général; pleasant
katigɛlɛn [á] Morphemes: kati-gɛlɛn. Nom.
name for the dog in general; allgemein ein
angenehmer Name für den Hund.
énergique, tenace, dur, intransigeant,
synonyme: wulu.
1
insensible aux supplications, obstiné dans ses
refus; energetic, tenacious, harsh, katimu [á] Nom. tableau (figure géométrique), tableau
intransigent, insensitive to supplications, géométrique; table (geometric figure),
obstinate in his refusals; energisch, geometric table; Tabelle (geometrische Figur),
hartnäckig, hart, unnachgiebig, unempfindlich geometrische Tabelle. jinɛmoriw katimu le
gegenüber Bitten, hartnäckig in seinen
tableau des magiciens. the magicians' figures.
Ablehnungen. Denmisɛn katigɛlɛn kun ka
die Figuren der Zauberer. Katimu sɛbɛnnen
kɛnɛ. L'enfant tenace est dégourdi. The
dɔ filɛ nin ye. Voici un tableau. Here is a
stubborn child is clever. Das hartnäckige Kind
table. Hier ist eine Tabelle.
ist klug. synonyme: kati.
1
katiya [á] Nom. obstination, ténacité, inflexibilité,
katigɛlɛya [á] Morphemes: kati-gɛlɛ-ya. Nom.
intransigeance; obstinacy, persistence,
1 • ténacité, persévérance, dureté, determination, inflexibility, intransigence;
intransigeance, obstination dans le refus; Hartnäckigkeit, Beharrlichkeit,
tenacity, perseverance, hardness, Entschlossenheit, Unnachgiebigkeit. Dan tɛ a
intransigence, obstinacy in refusal;
ka katiya la. Son obstination est sans limite.
Hartnäckigkeit, Ausdauer, Härte,
Unnachgiebigkeit, Verbissenheit.
His stubbornness is limitless. His obstinacy is
without limit. Seine Sturheit ist grenzenlos.
Seine Hartnäckigkeit ist grenzenlos.
katoliki [á] Emprunt de : français. Nom. catholique;
catholic; Katholik.
29/01/2026 380

katugu kayo
katugu [à] conj. parce que, car, en effet; because, for, kayaba [à-à] Nom. éléphantiasis; elephantiasis;
actually; da, denn, weil, aufgrund, infolge, Elefantiasis. Category: Disease.
weil. An ka bagan caman sara katugu bin synonyme: kaya , senba, samasenbana.
2
tun tɛ yen. Beaucoup de nos bêtes sont mortes kayakilifunun
parce qu'il n'y avait plus d'herbe. Many of our
[à-à-ì-ì] Morphemes: kaya-kili-funun.
animals died because there was no grass.
Nom. enflure des parties sexuelles masculines :
Viele unserer Tiere sind gestorben, weil es
kein Gras mehr gab. synonyme: barisa.
orchite, hydrocèle; swelling of male sexual
parts : orchitis, hydrocele; Schwellung der
-kaw n. les gens de..; the people of..; die Leute von... männlichen Geschlechtsteile : Orchitis,
Nunakaw do? Comment vont les gens de Hydrozele. Category: Disease.
Nouna? How are the people of Nouna? Wie
synonyme: kaya
2
.
geht es den Leuten von Nouna? kayaso [á] Nom. fourmilière; anthill; Ameisenhaufen,
kawalan Nom. dernier quartier de la lune; last quarter Ameisenhügel.
of the moon; abnehmender Halbmond. kayatɔ [à-à] variante: kɛyɛtɔ. Nom. personne atteinte
Category: Sky.
d'hydrocèle, d'orchite, d'éléphantiasis,
kawaro [á-á-ó] Nom. premier croissant; first crescent hernieux; person with hydrocele, orchite,
moon; erste / zunehmende /Mondsichel. elephantiasis; Personen mit Hydrozele,
Category: Sky. Orchitis, Elefantiasis, Leistenbruch. Ni i ye
kawu [á] Adverbe. bruit sec de quelque chose, qui se kayatɔ bɔlen ye dɔn na, a diminnen don. Si
tu vois un hernieux en train de danser, c'est
casse net, bruit de coup; sharp sound of
qu'on l'y a poussé. (proverbe). If you see a
something breaking sharply, sound of blow;
person with a hernia dancing, it's because
scharfes Geräusch von etwas, das scharf
someone pushed it there. (proverb). Wenn
zerbricht, Geräusch eines Schlags. A ye
Sie einen Leistenbruch tanzen sehen, liegt das
bananku kari kawu ! Il a cassé le tubercule de
daran, dass ihn jemand dorthin geschoben hat.
manioc, crac ! He broke the cassava tuber, (Sprichwort).
crack! Er hat die Maniokknolle zerbrochen,
knack!
kaye Emprunt de : français. Nom. cahier; exercise
book; Heft, Schulheft. Category: Learn.
kawule [á] variante: kawulɛ. Nom. automne
synonyme: karadasi.
(octobre-novembre), petite saison chaude
après les pluies; fall, autumn kayikayi variante: kayikayiyiri. Nom. espèce de plante;
(October-November), short hot season after kind of plant; Pflanze (Art). Category: Grass,
the rains; Herbst (Oktober-November), herb, vine. datura innoxis.
kurze heiße Jahreszeit nach den Regenfällen.
kayira [á] Emprunt de : arabe. Nom. paix, félicité;
Category: Weather. synonyme: fonɛnɛmakɔnɔ.
peace, bliss, felicity, happiness; Frieden,
kaya 1 [á-á] Nom. grosse fourmi noire, à la piqûre Glückseligkeit. An tilenna kayira la, Ala ma
douloureuse; large black ant, with a painful án sira kayira la. Nous avons passé la journée
sting; große schwarze Ameise, mit einem en paix, Dieu nous fasse passer la nuit en paix.
schmerzhaften Stich. Category: Insect. We have spent the day in peace, may God
synonyme: tigiɲɛ. grant us to spend the night in peace. Wir haben
kaya [à-á] Nom. 1 • testicule; testicle, testis; Hoden.
den Tag in Frieden verbracht, möge Gott uns
2 die Nacht in Frieden verbringen lassen.
Mɔgɔ sirilen ɲɛ tɛ a kaya la. Un homme
kayo [á] variante: kayin. Verbe. tresser; braid,
attaché me voit pas ses testicules. (proverbe).
A man tied up does not see his testicles. plait, weave; flechten. ... a bɛ se jurukayo
(proverb). Ein gefesselter Mann kann seine la... ... il sait tresser des cordes... ... he knows
Hoden nicht sehen. (Sprichwort). how to weave ropes... ... er kann Seile
Category: Body. synonyme: kiliden, filabara, flechten...
fɔrɔkili, worokɔrɔla, yɛrɛ , bɛlɛkili.
3
2 • hydrocèle, hernie des bourses; hydrocele,
herniated bursa, herniated testicles;
Hydrozele, Hernien der Schleimbeutel.
Category: Disease. synonyme: kayakilifunun.
3 • éléphantiasis; elephantiasis; Elephantiasis.
synonyme: kayaba, samasenbana, senba.
29/01/2026 381

keesekaasa kelekele
keesekaasa [è-è] Verbe. être ou laisser à demi mort, kele [è] variante: cele. adj. jaloux; jealous;
1
être ou laisser inanimé; to be or leave half eifersüchtig. A ka kele i la. Il est jaloux de toi.
dead, to be or leave inanimate; halbtot sein He is jealous of you. Er ist eifersüchtig auf
oder verlassen, unbelebt sein oder verlassen. U dich. Nin muso in ye kele ye. Cette femme
y'a gosi fo ka a keesekaasa. Ils l'ont frappé est jalouse. This woman is jealous. Diese Frau
au point de le traumatiser. They beat him to the ist eifersüchtig.
point of traumatizing him. Sie schlugen ihn
kele [é] Adverbe. très serré; very tight; sehr eng. U
so sehr, daß er traumatisiert wurde. U y'a
2
ye doni siri kele ! Ils ont attaché la charge très
keesekaasalen cɛ ka taa a bila sirada la. Ils
serré. They tied the load very tight. Sie haben
l'ont ramassé inanimé et sont allés le mettre au
die Ladung sehr fest befestigt.
bord de la route. They picked him up
unconscious and put him on the side of the kelebe [è-è] Nom. 1 • plaie longue à guérir (le plus
road. Sie hoben ihn bewußtlos auf und legten souvent plaie sur la jambe en dessous du
ihn am Straßenrand ab. genou); wound long to heal (most often wound
kegun [è] Verbe. malin, rusé; clever, cunning; schlau, on the leg below the knee); Wunde, die lange
heilt (meistens Wunde am Bein unterhalb des
klug, gerissen. Nsonsan, a ka kegun ni sogo
Knies). Kelebe b'a sen la... Il a un ulcère à la
bɛɛ ye. Le lièvre, c'est le plus malin de tous les
jambe... He has an ulcer in his leg... Er hat ein
animaux. The hare is the wisest of all animals. Geschwür am Bein... Category: Disease.
Der Hase ist das schlauste aller Tiere.
2 • gangrène; gangrene; Wundbrand.
synonyme: cegu .
1
kelebetɔ [è-è-è] Nom. personne dont le corps porte
kegunman [è-ù] Nom. malin, rusé; clever, cunning;
une ou plusieurs plaies; person whose body
schlau, gerissen, klug. Jɛgɛ kegunman b'i jɔ bears one or more wounds; Personen, deren
jɔ sen fɛ kɛlɛnwu ! Le poisson malin s'arrête Körper eine oder mehrere Wunden trägt.
net au bord du filet ! The clever fish stops at Kelebetɔ bɛ yɛlɛ ba bosolen na. L'homme
the edge of the net! Der schlaue Fisch bleibt couvert d'ulcères se moque de voir la chèvre
am Rand des Netzes! synonyme: ceguman. écorchée. (proverbe). The man covered in
ulcers laughs at seeing the skinned goat.
kegunya [è-ù] Verbe. 1 • être ou devenir malin,
(proverb). Der mit Geschwüren bedeckte
«rouler» quelqu'un; be or become clever, Mann lacht, als er die gehäutete Ziege sieht.
«trick» someone; schlau sein oder werden, (Sprichwort). Category: Sick.
«jemanden übers Ohr hauen», klug sein. ...
kelekele [è-è] Verbe. 1 • s'amincir; to thin out;
dugutigi kegunyara a ye. ... le chef de village
1
ausdünnen. Juru bɛ tigɛtigɛ a kelekeleyɔrɔ.
fut plus malin que lui. ... the village chief was
smarter than he. ... der Dorfvorsteher war
La corde se rompt là où elle est la plus mince.
klüger als er.
(proverbe). The rope breaks where it is
thinnest. (proverb). Das Seil reißt dort, wo es
2 • ruse, malice, roublardise, stratagème;
am dünnsten ist. (Sprichwort).
cunning, malice, deceit, trick; List, Trick.
Kegunya kojugu laban ye nalon ye. La ruse
2 • s'effilocher; fray, unravel; ausfransen.
Namaya juru bɛ kelekele, nka a tɛ tigɛ. Les
poussée à l'extrême devient de la bêtise.
(proverbe). The cunning pushed to the extreme
liens familiaux s'effilochent, mais ne se
becomes stupidity. (proverb). Auf die Spitze
rompent jamais. (proverbe). Family ties fray,
but never break. (proverb). Familienbande
getrieben wird List zur Dummheit.
(Sprichwort).
schwächeln, zerbrechen aber nie.
(Sprichwort).
keke [é] variante: kege. Nom. 1 • saillie, pointe,
3 • rétrécir à la taille, couper tout autour; shrink
dard, rostre; projection, point, stinger, to waist, cut all around; schmal schneiden,
rostrum; Vorsprung, Spitze, Stachel, Maul. rundum abschneiden. Mɔgɔ tɛ jiri kelekelelen
kunkolo keke saillie sur la tête. protrusion on binfan dɔn. On ne sait pas de quel côté va
the head. Vorsprung am Kopf.
tomber l'arbre entaillé sur son pourtour.
2 • os pointu, , arrête de poisson; sharp bone, (proverbe). It is not known which side the tree
fish bone; scharfer Knochen, Fischgräte. I will fall on its circumference. (proverb). Man
kana i keke sɔgɔ n na. Ne me pique pas avec weiß nicht, auf welcher Seite der
tes os pointus ! Don't prick me with your sharp
eingeschnittene Baum fällt. (Sprichwort).
bones! Stich mich nicht mit deinen scharfen 4 • très maigre, grêle; very thin, spindly; sehr
Knochen! dünn, spindeldürr.
29/01/2026 382

kelekele kelenpe
kelekele [è-é-è-é] variante: nsaninkelekele. Nom. kelen [é-ẽ́] adj. même, pareil, identique, semblable;
2 3
fourmi de grande taille (friande du sucre); same, identical, similar; gleich, dasselbe,
large ant (loving sugar); große Ameise derselbe, dieselbe, selbe, identisch. U bɛɛ ye
(zuckerliebend). Ni cɛsiri tun ye fɛnsɔrɔ ye, kelen ye. Ils sont tous les mêmes. They are all
kelekele tun bɛ diɲɛ mara. S'il suffisait de the same. Sie sind alle gleich. Kelen tɛ. Ce
l'ardeur au travail pour devenir riche, la fourmi n’est pas la même chose. It’s not the same. Es
commanderait le monde. (proverbe). If hard ist nicht dasselbe. o wula kelen... le même
work was enough to become rich, the ant
soir... the same evening... Am selben Abend...
would rule the world. (proverb). Wenn harte
o san kelen na... la même année... in the same
Arbeit ausreichen würde, um reich zu werden,
year... im selben Jahr... An nana mobili kelen
würde die Ameise die Welt beherrschen.
(Sprichwort). Category: Insect. na. Nous sommes venus dans le même
keleku [è-è] Verbe. 1 • tituber, vaciller, chanceler,
véhicule. We came in the same vehicle. Wir
kamen mit demselben Wage.
branler; stagger, waver, falter, wobble;
taumeln, schwanken, wackeln. I bɛ jifiɲɛ kelen 4 [é-é] conj. ou, ou bien (exclusif); or, or else;
cooko ka ɲɛ a kana keleku. Tu installes la oder. U ka a fɔ n sɔnna kelen n ma sɔn.
jarre à eau bien solidement pour qu’elle ne Qu'ils disent «j'accepte» ou bien «je refuse».
vacille pas. You install the water jar firmly so They should say «I accept» or «I don't
that it does not wobble. Du stellst den accept.». Sie sollen sagen «ich nehme an» oder
Wasserkrug fest auf, damit er nicht wackelt. «ich nehme nicht an.».
2 • ébranler; shake; erschüttern. ... o kana kelen kelen num. un à un; one by one; eins ums
1
mɔgɔ si hakili keleku. ... que cela n'ébranle andere, jedes einzelne.
l'esprit de personne. ...let this not shake kelen kelen Adverbe. l’un après l’autre; one by one;
anyone's spirit. ...laß dies niemanden
2
erschüttern.
eins nach dem andern, nacheinander. an kelen
kelen bɛɛ chacun de nous. each one of us.
3 • danser; dance; tanzen. I t'i keleku wa ? Tu
jeder von uns.
ne danses pas ? Don't you dance? Tanzt du
nicht? kelennan [é] Déterminant. unième (onzième, vingt et
kelen [é-ě] excl. déjà, encore; already; schon, unième...); and 1th (eleventh, twenty-first...);
1
bereits. A: Ne bi taga soo sisan. B: Kelen ?!
und erster (elfter, einundzwanzigster...) kalan
tan ni kelennan onzième leçon . eleventh
A: Ɔnhɔn, wagati sera. A: Je vais à la maison
lesson . elfte Lektion . Category: Mathematics.
maintenant. B: Déjà ?! A: Oui, c’est l’heure. A:
I’m going home now. B: Already?! A: Yes, it’s kelennasigi [è-è-à-í-í] Nom. isolement; isolation;
time. A: Ich gehe jetzt heim. B: Schon jetzt?! Isolation. ... k'án ka jamana saheliyanfan bɔ
A: Ja, es ist Zeit. Kelen ka fisa bilen ye.
kelennasigi la. ... faire sortir le nord de notre
Mieux vaut «encore» que «plus du tout».
pays de l'isolement. ... to bring the north of our
(proverbe). Better “still” than “not at all”.
country out of isolation. ... den Norden unseres
(proverb). Lieber „noch“ als „überhaupt
Landes aus der Isolation herausführen.
nicht“. (Sprichwort).
synonyme: mabɔli.
kelen [é-ẽ́] num. 1 • un, une, 1, unité (numération);
2 kelennin [è-è] synonyme: dɔrɔn. Nom. 1 • élément
one, unit (count); ein, eins, Einheit (Anzahl). I
unique; unique element; einzigartiges
bɛ se ka kelen ta. Tu peux en prendre un. You
Bestandteil. Category: Mathematics.
can take one. Du kannst eins nehmen.
2 • as (jouer aux cartes); as (playing cards); as
2 • seul, à l'écart, unique; alone, only, unique; (zu den Karten). A ye kelennin kɛ ka marasi
alleine, einzig. A kelen na. Seul, à l’écart.
tɔ faga. Il a joué l'as et pris les autres cartes.
Alone, by oneself. Alleine. kelennatagama
He played the ace and took the other cards.
marche solitaire. solitary walk. einsamer Weg.
kelenpe adj. unique, seulement (limitatif); unique,
only; einzig. a dencɛ kelenpe son fils unique.
his/her only son. sein /ihr einziges Kind.
29/01/2026 383

kelensigi kene
kelensigi [è-è] Nom. sédentaire, celui qui n'a jamais keleya [è-ì-á] Jula: keliya. Morphemes: kele-ya.
voyagé, qui n'a jamais vécu que dans un seul variante: keliya, celeya. Nom. 1 • jalousie;
endroit; sedentary, one who has never jealousy, envy; Eifersucht. Musonin jalan ni
traveled, who has never lived in only one
keleya tɛ fara. La femme maigre ne peut se
place; Seßhaft, der nie gereist ist, der nur an
départir de la jalousie. The thin woman cannot
einem Ort gelebt hat. Jaa, kelensigi ɲɛ bɛ
get rid of jealousy. Die dünne Frau wird die
bɔrɛ la. En vérité, celui qui n'a jamais voyagé
Eifersucht nicht los.
a les yeux dans un sac. (proverbe). Truly, he
2 • rivalité, concurrence; rivalry, competition;
who has never traveled has his eyes in a bag.
Rivalität, Konkurrenz. Keleya so bɛ jɔ, nka
(proverb). Wahrlich, wer noch nie gereist hat
die Augen in einem Sack. (Sprichwort).
ɲɛngoya so tɛ jɔ. On peut construire la
maison de la rivalité, pas celle de la jalousie.
kelenw ka so Jula: kelenw ka soo. Nom. colonne
(proverbe). We can build the house of rivalry,
des unités; unit column; Einheiten Kolonne. not the house of jealousy. (proverb). Wir
Category: Mathematics. können das Haus der Rivalität bauen, nicht das
kelenya [é-é-á] Morphemes: kelen-ya. 1 • Nom. Haus der Eifersucht. (Sprichwort).
3 • jalouser, envier; envy; neidisch sein,
unité, solitude, isolement; unity; Einheit,
Einigkeit, Übereinstimmung. An ka taama
beneiden. A ma keleya habada ! Jamais il n'a
été envieux ! He was never envious! Er war nie
ɲɔgɔn fɛ, kelenyala, hɔrɔnya la ani dannaya
neidisch! synonyme: ɲɛnakɔniya.
la. Marchons ensemble, dans l'unité, la liberté
et la confiance. Let us walk together, in unity,
4 • rivaliser; compete, rival; wetteifern.
freedom and trust. Laßt uns gemeinsam gehen, keleyabagatɔ [è-è-à-à-à] variante: keleyatɔ.
in Einheit, Freiheit und Vertrauen.
Nom. envieux, jaloux; envious, jealous person;
2 • Nom. singulier; singular; Einzahl, Singular. neidisch, eifersüchtige Person. Nin ye cɛ
kelenya ni caya le singulier et le pluriel. keleyabagatɔ dɔ ye. Il était une fois un
singular and plural. Singular und Plural.
homme jaloux. Once upon a time there was a
3 • Verbe. isoler, laisser seul; isolate, let alone; jealous man. Es war einmal ein eifersüchtiger
isolieren, alleine lassen. O de ye a kɔrɔkɛ in Mann.
kelenya. C'est ce qui a fait que son frère aîné keleyajugu Nom. jalousie; jealousy; Eifersucht.
est resté seul. This is what caused his older
brother to be left alone. Dies führte dazu, daß keleyaɲɔgɔnna [è-è-à-ɔ̀-ɔ̀] Nom. concurrence,
sein älterer Bruder allein gelassen wurde. rivalité, mis en concurrence; competition,
4 • Nom. ressemblance; resemblance; rivalry, put in competition; Konkurrenz,
Ähnlichkeit. Tiganinkuru bɛɛ ye kelen ye, Rivalität, Wettbewerb. Keleyaɲɔgɔnna de y'a
nka minnu bɔra fara kelen na, u ka kelenya to moto dadiyara. C'est la concurrence qui a
ka ɲi tɔw ta ma. Tous les pois de terre sont fait baisser le prix des motos. It is competition
that has driven down the price of motorcycles.
pareils, mais ceux qui sont sortis de la même
Es ist der Wettbewerb, der die Preise für
coque, leur ressemblance est encore plus
grande. (proverbe) . All ground peas are the
Motorräder gesenkt hat.
same, but those that came out of the same keleyatɔ [è-è-à] Nom. jaloux, envieux; jealous,
shell, their resemblance is even greater.
envious; eifersüchtig, neidisch. ... fura bɛ
(proverb). Alle Erbsen sind gleich, aber
muso suguya bɛɛ la fo musonin keleyatɔ. ...
diejenigen, die aus derselben Schale stammen,
il y a des remèdes pour toutes sortes de
haben eine noch größere Ähnlichkeit.
(Sprichwort).
femmes, sauf la petite jalouse.
kelenyasira Nom. singulier (grammatical); singular keliya bambara: keleya. Verbe. être jaloux, jalouser,
envier; be jealous, envy; eifersüchtig seine,
(grammatical); Singular (grammatisch),
Einzahl (grammatisch). ... kalendenw b'u neidisch sein. synonyme: koniya, ɲɛnakɔniya.
bila kelenyasira kan. ... les élèves les mettent kende [è] variante: nkene, nkele. Nom. sorgho, gros
au pluriel. ...the students put them in the mil; sorghum; Sorghum. Category: Food,
plural. ...die Schüler setzen sie in den Plural. Grass, herb, vine. Sorghum margaritiferum.
Category: Grammar.
kene variante: kende. Nom. espèce de sorgho; kind
of sorghum; Sorghum Art. Category: Grass,
herb, vine. Sorghum margaritiferum.
29/01/2026 384

kengeliya ketekete
kengeliya [è-è-ì] 1 • Verbe. être rusé, être malin; to be kerebere synonyme: tubabugɔyɔ, jagaro. Nom.
cunning, to be clever; schlau sein, klug sein. aubergine; aubergine, eggplant; Aubergine.
Ne nana i yɔrɔ i ka ne kengeliya. Je suis venu Category: Food.
te trouver pour que tu me rendes malin. I came kerecɛn Emprunt de : français. Nom. chrétien;
to find you so that you can make me smart. Ich
Christian; Christ. synonyme: Keretiɲɛn.
bin gekommen, um dich zu finden, damit du
mich schlau machen kannst. kerekete [é] variante: kelekele. Nom. escargot;
2 • Nom. ruse, malice; trickery, malice; Betrug, snail; Schnecke. Category: Small animals.
Bosheit. nsonsan ka kengeliya la ruse du synonyme: kɔtɛ , jilakelekele.
1
lièvre. the hare's trick. Der Trick des Hasen.
kerekisɛ [é] Morphemes: kere-kisɛ. Nom. clitoris;
keninge [é-ì-é] comparer: binbiri. Nom. variété de
clitoris; Klitoris. synonyme: musoku, biyɛkisɛ,
sorgho, sorgho bicolore; variety of sorghum;
byɛkisɛ, kesekele, kere.
Sorghum Art. Musokɔrɔnin yaalala, n'a taatɔ
ma keninge folon, a segintɔ b'a bunten. La
kerere [é] Adverbe. très sec; very dry; sehr trocken.
vieille femme est allée se promener, si elle n'a Buru jalen don kerere ! Le pain est
pas enlevé le son du sorgho en partant, elle complètement sec ! The bread is completely
moudra en revenant. (proverbe). The old dry! Das Brot ist völlig trocken!
woman went for a walk, if she did not remove synonyme: ngɔyin.
the sound of sorghum when leaving, she will
Keretiɲɛn Emprunt de : français. Nom. chrétien;
grind on return. (proverb). Die alte Frau ging
spazieren. Wenn sie beim Gehen nicht die Christian; Christ. synonyme: kerecɛn, kɛrɛcɛn.
Kleie vom Sorghum entfernte, mahlte sie,
kerun [è] Verbe. 1 • lancer, jeter (un objet); throw,
wenn sie zurückkam. (Sprichwort).
Category: Food, Grass, herb, vine. Sorghum
throw (an object); werfen, (einen Gegenstand)
gambicum, andropogon sorghum.
werfen. Kabakuru belebele kerunna ka na
bin án cɛla. Une grosse pierre fut lancée et
Keniya Nom. Kenya; Kenya; Kenia.
vint tomber au milieu de nous. A large stone
Category: Country.
was thrown and fell among us. Ein großer
kenken [è] Nom. 1 • abajoue, joue, intérieur des joues; Stein wurde geworfen und fiel unter uns.
cheek pouch, cheek, inside of the cheeks; 2 • lapider; stone, lapidate; steinigen.
Backentasche, Wange, Innenseite der Wangen.
kesekele [é-é-è-é] Nom. 1 • gésier (de la poule);
Nin kɛra fila bɛnnen ye kenken na. Ce fut
gizzard (of the hen); Muskelmagen (der
comme deux sourires sur la même joue.
Henne). Category: Parts of an animal.
(proverbe). It was like two smiles on the same
synonyme: ncɔki.
cheek. (proverb). Es war wie zwei Lächeln auf
derselben Wange. (Sprichwort). 2 • clitoris; clitoris; Klitoris.
synonyme: byɛkisɛ, biyɛkisɛ, kere, kerekisɛ,
2 • partie postérieure de la mâchoire; posterior
part of the jaw; hinterer Teil des Kiefers. musoku.
kenkenfuru [è-è] Morphemes: kenken-furu. Nom. 3 • mont-de-Vénus; mount-of-Venus;
Handballen.
joue, pommette; cheek, cheekbone; Wange,
Wangenknochen. Kuru b'a kenkenfuru la. Il ketala Nom. plante (espèce); plant sp; Pflanzenart.
a un kyste à la joue. He has a cyst on his cheek. Category: Grass, herb, vine. cymbopogon
Er hat eine Zyste auf seiner Wange. giganteus. synonyme: tekala.
Category: Body, Parts of an animal.
ketekete [è-è] 1 • Verbe. tressaillir, tressauter, frémir,
kenkenkɔkiya [è-è] variante: kenkenkɔgɔya,
avoir des soubresauts; to flinch, to shudder, to
kenkenkɔkiyɔ. Nom. oreillons, parotidite, quiver, to have jolts; zusammenzucken,
adénites; mumps; Mumps. Category: Disease. schaudern, zittern, zucken. Ni syɛ kantigɛra, a
kere [é-é] Nom. clitoris, sexe féminin, vulve; bɛ piripiri ka ketekete. Quand on égorge une
poule, elle se débat, elle tressaille. When a
clitoris, vulva, female sexual organ; Klitoris,
Kitzler, weibliches Geschlechtsorgan.
chicken is slaughtered, it struggles, it twitches.
Category: Body. synonyme: kerekisɛ,
Wenn man eine Henne schlachtet, sie kämpft
sich, sie zuckt zusammen.
jakumasogo, byɛkisɛ, musoku, kesekele,
2 • Verbe. faire éclater sa joie; burst forth with
biyɛkisɛ, byɛ, biyɛwo, biyɛdagolo;
joy; vor Freude ausbrechen.
spécifique: latu.
3 • Adverbe. rire aux éclats; laugh out loud; laut
lachen. A yɛlɛla ketekete ! Il rit aux éclats !
He laughs out loud! Er lacht laut!
29/01/2026 385

keteketenin kɛbali
keteketenin [è-è-è-è] variante: ketekete, 4 • mettre dans; put inside; legen, setzen,
stellen, gießen, leeren. N bɛ ji kɛ daga ra. Je
kɔtɔkɔtɔnin. Nom. coqueluche; whooping
mets de l’eau dans le canari. I put the water
cough; Keuchhusten. Category: Disease.
into the jar. Ich gieße das Wasser in den Krug.
synonyme: kalosabasɔgɔsɔgɔ, kɛtɛkɛtɛ ,
1 N bɛ fura kɛ ɲɛ na. Je mets le médicament
kulekulenin.
dans mon œil. I put the medicine into my eye.
keyekeye [é] Adverbe. 1 • très mûr, mature, formé; Ich tue das Medikament in meine Augen. I bɛ
very mature, mature, well formed; sehr reif, se ka sukaro kɛ a la. Tu peux ajouter du
reif, ausgebildet. Bara kɔgɔra keyekeye ! La sucre. You can put sugar in it. Du kannst
calebasse est bien mûre ! The gourd is very Zucker rein tun.
ripe! Der Kürbis ist sehr reif! Sungurunnin 5 • devenir, transformer; become, transform,
kɔgɔra keyekeye ! La jeune fille est bien turn into; werden, verwandeln. N b’a fɛ ka kɛ
formée ! The girl is well formed! Das Mädchen minisiriɲɛmɔgɔ ye. Je veux devenir premier
ist gut ausgebildet / gebaut! ministre. I want to become prime minister. Ich
synonyme: lɔbɔlɔbɔ. will Premierminister werden.
2 • très blanc; very white; sehr weiß. Baba kun 6 • employer, se servir de, utiliser; use, employ;
gebrauchen, anwenden, verwenden. Balan, an
jɛlen, o ye tiɲɛ ye, nka a kɛlen keyekeye,
fugula de tɛ a kun na. Dire que papa a les
b'o kɛ ka nɛgɛ ta ka bɔ tasuma na. Les
tenailles, c'est ce que nous utilisons pour retirer
cheveux blancs, d'accord, mais dire qu'il les a
le fer du feu. We use pincers to get the iron out
tous blancs, là c'est signe qu'il n'a pas de
bonnet sur la tête. (proverbe). To say that Dad
of the fire. Wir verwenden eine Zange um das
Eisen aus dem Feuer zu nehmen.
has white hair is fine, but to say that he has all
of it is white, that's a sign that he doesn't have 7 • aimer, vouloir, désirer, fréquenter; love,
a hat on his head. (proverb). Zu sagen, daß like, want, desire, go out with; lieben, mögen,
Papa weiße Haare hat, ist in Ordnung, aber zu wollen, ausgehen mit. Min mana kɛ u fɛ ... Ce
sagen, daß er alle weißen Haare hat, ist ein qu'ils désirent ... What they desire is ... Was sie
Zeichen dafür, daß er keinen Hut auf dem wollen ist ...
Kopf hat. (Sprichwort). 8 • avoir des relations sexuelles (avec une
3 • très dur; very hard; sehr hart. A kunkolo ka femme), coucher avec (une femme); have
gɛlɛn keyekeye ! Il a la tête très dure ! He has sexual relations (with a woman), sleep with (a
a very hard head! Er hat einen sehr harten
woman); Geschlechtsverkehr haben (mit einer
Kopf!
Frau), schlafen mit einer Frau. A ye muso nin
kɛ. Il a couche avec cette femme. He slept with
kɛ [ɛ]́ vt. 1 • faire, réaliser, accomplir, se dérouler,
1
that woman. Er hat mit dieser Frau geschlafen.
effectuer; do, accomplish, unfold, proceed;
tun, machen, vollbringen. I bi mun kɛ ? / I bɛ kɛ 2 [ɛ̀] excl. 1 • particule d'assertion «je te dis»
mun na ? Qu’est-ce que tu fais ? What are (valeur d'assertion, situé à la fin de la phrase),
dans les énoncés injonctifs, valeur
your doing? Was machst du? Na dumuni kɛ !
d'impatience, donc; particle of assertion, at the
Viens manger ! Come and eat! Komm essen!
end of the sentence; Partikel der Gewissheit. A
2 • se passer, arriver (pour une chose); happen;
tagara kɛ. Il est parti, je te le dis. He went
passieren, sich ereignen. Mun kɛra ? Qu’est-ce
away, I assure you. Er ist gegangen, ganz
qui s’est passé ? What happened? Was ist
sicher. Na ni fani ye kɛ ! Amène donc l'habit !
passiert?
Bring the garment, will you! Bring doch das
3 • passer (du temps); spend (time); Zeit
Kleid!
verbringen. I ye kalo joli kɛ Bobo la ?
2 • n'est-ce pas? (valeur de constatation
Combien de mois as-tu passé à Bobo ? How
dubitative); or not, isn't it?; oder? nicht wahr?
many months have you spent in Bobo?
A nana kɛ? Ɔnhɔn, a nana. Il est venu,
Wieviele Monate hast du in Bobo verbracht?
An bi wagati joli kɛ sira kan ? On va passer
n’est-ce pas? Oui, il est venu. He has come,
hasn't he? yes, he came. Er ist gekommen,
combien de temps sur la route ? How long will
oder? Ja, er ist gekommen.
our journey take? (How long will we spend on
the road?) Wieviel Zeit werden wir auf der kɛ a dɔ ye expr. appartenir; to belong to; gehören.
Strasse verbringen?
kɛ sabubu ye synonyme: na ni ... ye. Verbe.
engendrer; generate, engender; verursachen,
hervorbringen.
kɛbali [ɛ́] Nom. infaisable, non fait; infeasible, not
done; undurchführbar, nicht gemacht.
29/01/2026 386

kɛci kɛkatiɲɛ
kɛci [ɛ]́ Nom. 1 • mission, fonction; mission, kɛɛnkɛn [ɛ́] variante: kɛnkɛn. Nom. 1 • rythme
function; Mission, Funktion, Aufgabe. E kɛci particulier du tambour «bangolo» (une main
ye mun ye ? Quel est ta fonction? What is your nue, et l'autre frappe avec une baguette);
particular rhythm of the “bangolo” drum (one
function? Was ist deine Aufgabe?
bare hand, and the other hits with a stick);
2 • travail; work; Arbeit. Hali ni i ma se k'i ka
besonderer Rhythmus der
kɛci bɛɛ kɛ, i k'i gɛlɛya ka dɔɔni kɛ. Même si „Bangolo“-Trommel (eine bloße Hand und die
tu n'arrives pas à faire toute ta tâche, andere schlägt mit einem Stock).
efforce-toi d'en faire un peu. (proverbe). Even 2 • petit tambour d'accompagnement; small
if you can’t do all of your work, try to do a little accompaniment drum; kleine Begleittrommel.
bit. (proverb). Selbst wenn du deine ganze Dununba kɔnɔntɔ ni kɛɛnkɛn bɛ fɔ a ye. On
Arbeit nicht erledigen kannst, versuche doch
lui joue les neuf grands tambours et le kɛɛnkɛn.
etwas zu tun. (Sprichwort).
The nine great drums and the kɛɛnkɛ n are
kɛcogo [ɛ́] Morphemes: kɛ-cogo. variante: kɛko. played. Es werden die neun großen Trommeln
Nom. 1 • manière de vivre, manière de faire, und das Kɛɛnkɛ n gespielt.
façon, méthode; way of life, way of doing, 3 • sorte de triangle (instrument de musique);
manner, appearance, method; Lebensweise, sort of triangle (musical instrument); Art
Lebensphilosophie, Art und weise, Methode. Dreieck (Musikinstrument). Category: Musical
Baara kɛcogo ɲuman... La bonne façon de instrument.
faire le travail... The right way to do the job... kɛɛrennada Nom. espèce de plante; kind of plant;
Die richtige Art, um zu arbeiten... N ka kalan
Pflanze (Art). Category: Grass, herb, vine.
kɛcogo y’i diya wa ? Tu aimes la façon dont borreria scaber.
j’enseigne ? Do you like the way I teach? kɛɛrɛnnada Nom. espèce de plante; kind of plant;
Magst du die Art und Weise wie ich
unterrichte? synonyme: fɛɛrɛ.
Pflanze (Art). Category: Grass, herb, vine.
2 hibiscus panduriformis.
2 • apparence; appearance, look; Aussehen,
Erscheinungsbild, Erscheinung. A ka dennin
kɛɛrɛnworo Nom. espèce de plante; kind of plant;
kɛcogo ka ɲi. Sa copine est bien faite. His
Pflanze (Art). Category: Grass, herb, vine.
commelina diffusa.
girlfriend is well made. Seine Freundin ist gut
gebaut. kɛɛya [ɛ̀] Nom. poisson (espèce de); kind of fish; Fisch
kɛcogoɲuman Morphemes: kɛ-cogo-ɲuman. Art. Category: Fish. distichodus brevipennis.
n.comp. savoir-faire; know-how; Know-how, kɛfɛn [ɛ́] variante: kɛlan. Nom. condiment, épice,
Sachverständnis, Fachkenntnis. assaisonnement, aromate; condiment,
kɛɛlɛ [ɛ]́ Nom. poisson (espèce de); fish (species); seasoning, spices, flavouring, aromatics;
Gewürz, Zutat, Aromat. Na bɛɛ ju ye jo ye,
Fisch (Art). Category: Fish. chrysichtys sp..
kɛfɛn de b'u bɔ ɲɔgɔn na. Toutes les sauces
kɛɛlɛbilen [ɛ́] Morphemes: kɛɛlɛ-bilen. Nom. poisson
sont à base d'eau, ce sont les condiments qui
(espèce de); fish (species), Planet Catfish; les distinguent. (proverbe). All sauces are
Fisch (Art). Category: Fish. chrysichthys water-based, it's the condiments that set them
auratus longifilis. apart. (proverb). Alle Saucen basieren auf
kɛɛlɛjɛ [ɛ]́ Morphemes: kɛɛlɛ-jɛ. Nom. poisson Wasser, es sind die Gewürze, die sie
(espèce de); fish (species); Fisch (Art).
unterscheiden. (Sprichwort). Category: Food.
Category: Fish. chrysichthys nigrodigilatus.
synonyme: nadiyalan, nadiyafɛn, kɛlan.
kɛɛnkɛ [ɛ]̀ variante: kɛɛnkɛn. Nom. petite pince (pour kɛkabila Verbe. anticiper; anticipate; voraussehen,
retirer les épines); small tweezers (to remove erwarten, vorhersehen.
thorns); kleine Pinzette (um Dornen zu kɛkafilɛ n.comp. essai; try, trial; Versuch, Test.
entfernen). Kɛɛnkɛ bɛ kɛ ka ŋɔni bɔ. On retire
les épines avec une pince. We remove the
kɛkatiɲɛ [ɛ́] Morphemes: kɛ-ka-tiɲɛ. Nom. dégât;
thorns with tweezers. Wir entfernen die damage, spoiling; Schaden. ... o tɛ ale
Dornen mit einer Pinzette. Category: Tool. kɛkatiɲɛ ye, o y'a yɛrɛ de ka kɛkatiɲɛ ye. ...
le dégât ne vient pas de lui, c'est elle qui l'a
causé. ...the damage does not come from him,
it is she who caused it. ...der Schaden kommt
nicht von ihm, sie ist es, die ihn verursacht hat.
29/01/2026 387

kɛkɛ kɛlɛ ɲanabɔli
kɛkɛ [ɛ-́ ɛ́] variante: kwɛkwɛ. Nom. peigne à kɛlen [ɛ́] part. 1 • acte, action, agissement, haut fait,
grosses dents (en bois); comb; Kamm. Kɛkɛ bɛ exploit; deed, action, feat, exploit; Tat, Aktion,
kundigilaw bolo. Les tresseurs se servent du Kunststück, Leistung, Heldentat. An m'u ye,
peigne à grosses dents. The braiders use the án y'u kɛlen de mɛn. Nous ne les avons pas
comb with large teeth. Die Flechter verwenden vus, mais nous avons entendu parler de leurs
den Kamm mit großen Zähnen. Category: Tool. exploits. We haven't seen them, but we've
kɛkɛrɛkɛ [ɛ́-ɛ́-ɛ̀-ɛ́] Adverbe. très maigre; very skinny;
heard about their exploits. Wir haben sie nicht
gesehen, aber wir haben von ihren Heldentaten
sehr dünn, mager. A jara ka a kɛ kɛkɛrɛkɛ !
gehört.
Elle a maigri au point de devenir squelettique.
2 • lorsque, un fois que; when, once; als. Wulu
She lost weight to the point of becoming
skeletal. Sie verlor so viel Gewicht, daß sie
kɛlen ka denmisɛnninw ye, a y'i fɔlɔn ka taa
zum Skelett wurde. sira wɛrɛ fɛ. Lorsque le chien a vu les enfants,
il a bifurqué et est parti par une autre chemin.
kɛko [ɛ]́ comparer: cogo, kɛcogo. Nom. 1 • façon
When the dog saw the children, he turned and
de faire, façon; way of doing things, manner; went another way. Als der Hund die Kinder
Art, Dinge zu tun, Art und Weise. A ka baara sah, drehte er sich um und ging einen anderen
kɛko ka ɲi. Sa façon de travailler est bonne. Weg. Ni i ye kooro kɛlen ye ka muso sɔrɔ, a
His way of working is good. Seine kooroɲɔgɔn don. Si tu vois que le varan de
Arbeitsweise ist gut.
terre a trouvé femme, c'est un varan comme
2 • fois, tenue; times; mal. Tɔnsigi in kɛko fɔlɔ lui. (proverbe). If you see that the earth
de ye nin ye. C'est la première fois que cette monitor lizard has found a wife, it's a monitor
réunion se tient. This is the first time that this lizard like him. (proverb). Wenn Sie sehen,
meeting has been held. Dies ist das erste Mal, daß der Erdwaran eine Frau gefunden hat,
daß dieses Treffen stattfindet. Bo kɛko kelen
handelt es sich um einen Waran wie ihn.
(Sprichwort).
tɛ kɔda fara. Déféquer une seule fois ne
déchire pas l'anus. (proverbe). Defecating just kɛlɛ [ɛ̀-ɛ̀] comparer: bɛnbaliya. synonyme: lagɛri.
once does not tear the anus. (proverb). Ein 1 • Nom. querelle, lutte, bataille, guerre,
einmaliger Stuhlgang reißt den Anus nicht ein. bagarre, litige, dispute, combat; quarrel, fight,
(Sprichwort). battle, struggle, war, dispute; Streit, Zank,
3 • raison; reason; Grund. Ayi, mankan kɛko Auseinandersetzung, Krieg, Zwist, Debatte. U
tɛ o ! Non, il n'y a pas de raison de faire des bɛ kɛlɛ la. Ils se disputent. Ils sont dans une
histoires pour ça ! No, there's no reason to bagarre. They are quarrelling, fighting. Sie
make a fuss about that! Nein, es gibt keinen streiten sich. Diya ma ko min ɲɛ, kɛlɛ t'o ɲɛ.
Grund, darüber viel Aufhebens zu machen! Ce que la négociation n'a pu arranger, la
kɛkun [ɛ]́ Nom. raison d'être, raison; reason for being,
dispute ne l'arrange pas. (proverbe). What
negotiation could not fix, fighting does not fix.
reason; Grund des Seins, Grund. O kɛkun ye
(proverb). Was Verhandlungen nicht lösen
misiw kana yɛrɛkɛ. La raison pour faire cela, konnten, wird durch Streit nicht gelöst.
c'est que les vaches ne divaguent pas. The (Sprichwort). synonyme: cɛtulon.
reason for doing this is that the cows do not
2 • Nom. armée; army; Armee. Kɛlɛ min b'i
wander. Der Grund dafür ist, daß die Kühe
nicht wandern.
bolo... L'armée que tu as... The army you
have... Die Armee, die du hast...
kɛlan [ɛ]́ Nom. épice, condiment, assaisonnement,
3 • vt. combattre, être contre, se bagarrer, se
aromate; spice, condiment, seasoning, battre, se quereller, se disputer, se fâcher; fight,
aromatic; Gewürz, aromatisch. ... ka kɛlan be against; kämpfen, dagegen sein. faantanya
bɛɛ k'o la k'o diya haali ! ... et y mettre tous kɛlɛ lutter contre la pauvreté. to fight poverty.
les assaisonnements de façon à le rendre très
Gegen die Armut an-kämpfen. Ni cɛw ma
savoureux ! ...and add all the seasonings to
kɛlɛ, sebaga tɛ dɔn. Tant que les hommes
make it very tasty! ...und fügen Sie alle
Gewürze hinzu, damit es sehr lecker wird!
n'ont pas combattu, on ne connaît pas le
synonyme: nadiyafɛn, kɛfɛn.
vainqueur. (proverbe). Until the men have
fought, we do not know the winner. (proverb).
Bis die Männer gekämpft haben, kennen wir
den Sieger nicht. (Sprichwort).
kɛlɛ ɲanabɔli synonyme: bɛnbaliya ɲanabɔli. Nom.
règlement de conflit; conflict resolution;
Konfliktlösung, Konfliktbewältigung.
29/01/2026 388

kɛlɛ tigɛ kɛlɛkɛlɛ
kɛlɛ tigɛ [ɛ̀ ì] expr. provoquer une querelle; to provoke kɛlɛjeli [ɛ̀-ɛ̀] Nom. bagarreur, qui pousse à la bagarre,
a quarrel; einen Streit provozieren. agressif; brawler, who pushes for a fight,
kɛlɛbɛbilen synonyme: kɔlɔbɛ, gɔlɔbɛ. Nom.
aggressive; Schläger, der zum Kampf drängt,
aggressiv. Kɛlɛjeli f'ɛ jɛ ye kunkoɲini ye. Se
Kinkéliba (vrai); kind of shrub; Strauch (Art).
lier avec un bagarreur, c'est chercher des
Category: Bush, shrub. combretum
ennuis. (proverbe). Getting involved with a
micanthum. synonyme: ngɔlɔbɛ.
brawler is like getting into trouble. (proverb).
kɛlɛbolo [ɛ̀-ɛ̀-ó-ó] Morphemes: kɛlɛ-bolo. Sich mit einem Schläger zu verbinden,
synonyme: kɛlɛjama,, kɛlɛkulu. Nom. armée,
bedeutet Ärger zu machen. (Sprichwort).
régiment, colonne militaire; army, regiment; kɛlɛjeliya [ɛ̀-ɛ̀-è-ì] Nom. agressivité; aggressiveness;
Armee, Regiment. Mali kɛlɛbolo. l'armée Aggressivität.
malienne. the Malian army. die malische kɛlɛkɛcɛ [ɛ̀-ɛ̀-ɛ̀] Morphemes: kɛlɛ-kɛ-cɛ.
Armee.
variante: kɛlɛcɛfarin. Nom. combattant,
kɛlɛcɛ [ɛ-̀ ɛ̀-ɛ́] synonyme: kɛlɛden, kɛlɛkɛcɛ. Nom.
militaire, soldat, guerrier; combatant, soldier,
guerrier; warrior; Krieger. Kamalen cɛsiri warrior; Kämpfer, Soldat. Category: Person.
koɲuman bɛɛ tɛ kɛlɛcɛ ye. Tous les jeunes synonyme: sarawisi.
gens bien sanglés ne sont pas des guerriers.
kɛlɛkɛcɛfarin Morphemes: kɛlɛkɛcɛ-farin.
(proverbe). Not all well-belted young men are
warriors. (proverb). Nicht alle strammen
variante: kɛlɛcɛfarin. Nom. guerrier; warrior;
jungen Männer sind Krieger. (Sprichwort). Krieger. synonyme: kɛlɛcɛfari.
Category: Person. kɛlɛkɛla [ɛ̀-ɛ̀-ɛ̀] synonyme: kɛlɛla. Nom. combattant,
kɛlɛcɛfari [ɛ̀-ɛ̀] Morphemes: kɛlɛ-cɛ-fari. adversaire, ennemie, belligérant; fighter,
variante: kɛlɛcɛfarin. Nom. guerrier; warrior; adversary, enemy; Kämpfer, Gegner, Feind,
Krieger. Category: Person. Widersacher. A y'i banamini kɛlɛkɛla fila cɛ.
synonyme: kɛlɛkɛcɛfarin. Il s'est interposé entre les deux querelleurs. He
intervened between the two quarrelsome
kɛlɛda [ɛ-̀ ɛ̀] Morphemes: kɛlɛ-da.
people. / He stood between the two
synonyme: kɛlɛyɔrɔ. variante: kɛlɛdaga. Nom. quarrellers. Er intervenierte zwischen den
champ de bataille; battle field; Schlachtfeld. beiden streitsüchtigen Menschen. / Er stand
synonyme: muguda . zwischen den beiden Streitern.
1
synonyme: kɛlɛla.
kɛlɛdabila bɛnkan [ɛ̀-ɛ̀-á-í-á ɛ ̀-ã́] Nom. armistice;
armistice; Waffenstillstand. kɛlɛkɛlan [ɛ̀-ɛ̀-ɛ̀] variante: kɛlɛminɛ. Nom. arme;
kɛlɛdaga Morphemes: kɛlɛ-daga. Nom. 1 • campement
arm, weapon; Waffe. Nin tɛ cɛ ka kɛlɛkɛlɛlan
bɔ. Ce n'est pas une arme d’homme. It's not a
de base de l'armée; army base camp;
Basislager der Armee. synonyme: muguda .
man's weapon. Es ist keine Männerwaffe.
1
Category: Tool. synonyme: kɛlɛminɛn.
2 • champ de bataille, lieu des combats;
battlefield, place of fighting; Schlachtfeld, Ort kɛlɛkɛlɛ comparer: foronto.[ɛ́-ɛ́-ɛ́-ɛ́] Nom. 1 • piment
1
des Kampfes. Diɲɛlatigɛ ye kɛlɛdaga ye, min fort; chilli pepper; Pfeffer. Kabini kɛlɛkɛlɛ
tɛ ɲɛ fo cɛsiri. La vie est un champ de bataille, geren, a ka kunan. Alors qu'il est encore vert,
on ne la mène pas a bien sans courage. déjà le piment est piquant. (proverbe). While it
(proverbe). Life is a battlefield, you cannot is still green, the pepper is already hot.
succeed without courage. (proverb). Das (proverb). Solange es noch grün ist, ist die
Leben ist ein Schlachtfeld, ohne Mut kann man Paprika bereits scharf. (Sprichwort).
keinen Erfolg haben. (Sprichwort). Category: Food. capsicum annuum.
kɛlɛden [ɛ̀-ɛ̀] synonyme: kɛlɛcɛ, kɛlɛkɛcɛ. Nom. synonyme: dagannan.
guerrier, combattant, soldat; warrior, soldier; 2 • très violent, très fort (pour un goût); very
Krieger, Kämpfer, Soldat. Category: Person. strong or hot (for a taste), spicy; sehr scharf,
synonyme: sarawisi. sehr stark (für einen Geschmack). kɛlɛkɛlɛji
sauce très pimentée. very spicy sauce. sehr
scharfe Soße.
3 • serré, collé; tight, stuck, attached; eng,
festgefahren. A y'i nɔrɔ dennin na kɛlɛkɛlɛ !
Il s'attache très fort à la jeune fille ! He is very
attached to the young girl! Er hängt sehr an
dem jungen Mädchen!
29/01/2026 389

kɛlɛkɛlɛ kɛlɛtigiya
4 • fort, vigoureusement; strong, vigorously; kɛlɛn variante: gwɛlɛnnin. Nom. rat palmiste,
stark, energisch. Jamanan ɲɛmɔgɔw yɛrɛ
écureuil fouisseur; ground squirrel;
cɛsirilen bɛ a ko la kɛlɛkɛlɛ ! Les dirigeants Sonnenhörnchen. Category: Mammal. euxerus
du pays se sont d'ailleurs attachés très erythropus. synonyme: nkɛlɛn.
vigoureusement à cette question. The country's
kɛlɛnkɛlɛn [ɛ̀-ɛ̀] variante: nkɛlɛnkɛlɛn. Nom. hernie,
leaders have also focused very vigorously on
this issue. Auch die Regierung des Landes hat ganglion, adénopathie; hernia, lymph node,
sich sehr intensiv mit diesem Thema befaßt. lymphadenopathy; Hernie, Lymphknoten,
Lymphadenopathie. Joli juguman bɛ
kɛlɛkɛlɛ Adverbe. complètement rassasié; completely
2
kɛlɛnkɛlɛn lase mɔgɔ ma. Des mauvaises
satisfied; völlig gesättigt. N fara kɛlɛkɛlɛ. Je
plaies provoquent des ganglions. Bad wounds
suis bien rassasié. I am completely satisfied.
cause lymph nodes. Schlechte Wunden
Ich bin völlig satt. synonyme: kɛngɛrɛ.
verursachen Lymphknoten.
kɛlɛkɛlɛmugu synonyme: forontomugu. Nom. Category: Disease.
piment en poudre; pepper powder; kɛlɛnwu [ɛ́] variante: kɛlɛwu. Adverbe. net (dans le
Pfefferpulver. contexte de l'arrêt d'un mouvement),
kɛlɛkɛminɛnw Nom. armes; arms, weapons; Waffen. brusquement; sharp (in the context of stopping
a movement), suddenly, abruptly; scharf,
kɛlɛkɛɲɔgɔn [ɛ̀-ɛ̀-ɛ̀] variante: kɛlɛɲɔgɔn. Nom. plötzlich (im Zusammenhang mit dem
adversaire, antagoniste, ennemi; adversary, Stoppen einer Bewegung), abrupt. A y'i jɔ
antagonist, enemy; Gegner, Antagonist, Feind. kɛlɛnwu ! Il s'arrêta net ! He stopped
kɛlɛkɛpankurun suddenly! Er blieb plötzlich stehen! Ta
[ɛ]̀ Morphemes: kɛlɛ-kɛ-pan-kurun. Nom. kɛlɛnwu teliya o teliya, i bɛ nkarange kɔ. Si
avion de combat; fighter jet, combat aircraft; rapidement qu'on prenne, le piège est plus
Kampfflugzeug. rapide encore. (proverbe). However quickly
one catches, the trap is even quicker.
kɛlɛla [ɛ-̀ ɛ̀] Morphemes: kɛlɛ-la. Nom. combattant,
(proverb). So schnell man auch fängt, die Falle
adversaire; fighter, adversary; Kämpfer,
ist noch schneller. (Sprichwort).
Gegner. A ye kɛlɛlaw lafara... Il a séparé ceux
kɛlɛɲɛboli [ɛ̀-ɛ̀-ɛ̀] Morphemes: kɛlɛ-ɲɛ-boli. Nom.
qui se battaient... He separated those who
fought... Er trennte diejenigen, die fuite, désertion, évacuation; flight, desertion,
gegeneinander kämpften ... Category: Person.
evacuation; Flucht, Desertion, Evakuierung.
synonyme: kɛlɛkɛla. kɛlɛɲɛbolila Jula: kɛlɛɲabolila.
kɛlɛmabolila Morphemes: kɛlɛ-ma-boli-la. Nom. synonyme: kunkalifaden. Nom. réfugié, fuyard;
déserteur, fuyard, évacué; deserter, runaway, refugee, fugitive, runaway; Flüchtling,
evacuee; Deserteur, Ausreißer, Flüchtling, Asylant. Kɛlɛɲɛbolila tɛ kɛlɛ tɔgɔ diman fɔ.
Evakuierte. Kɛlɛmabolila tɛ foyi dɔn kɛlɛ la. Le fuyard ne parle pas en bien de la guerre.
Le fuyard ne connaît rien de la guerre. The The fugitive does not speak well of the war.
fugitive knows nothing about war. Der Der Flüchtling spricht nicht gut über den
Deserteur weiß nichts vom Krieg. Krieg.
Category: Person. kɛlɛtigɛla [ɛ̀-ɛ̀-ɩ̀-ɛ̀] Morphemes: kɛlɛ-tigɛ-la. Nom.
kɛlɛmasa [ɛ̀-ɛ̀] Morphemes: kɛlɛ-masa. Nom. chef provocateur, fauteur de guerre; provocateur,
de guerre, chef d'armée; warlord, chief of warmonger; Provokateur, Kriegstreiber. ...
army; Kriegsherr, Befehlshaber der Armee. kɛlɛtigɛlaw tɛ kisi. ... les fauteurs de guerre ne
Category: Worker, occupation. seront pas épargnés. ... war mongers will not
synonyme: kɛlɛtigi. be spared. ... Die Kriegstreiber werden nicht
verschont.
kɛlɛmasaya [ɛ̀-ɛ̀-à-à] Morphemes: kɛlɛ-masa-ya.
kɛlɛtigi Morphemes: kɛlɛ-tigi. Nom. chef de guerre,
Nom. puissance militaire, gloire (de celui qui
est maître de guerre); military power, glory (of maître de guerre, celui qui commande l'armée;
him who is master of war); militärische Macht, warlord, chief of war, master of war, one who
Ruhm (desjenigen, der den Krieg beherrscht). commands the army; Kriegsherr,
Kriegsmeister, derjenige, der die Armee
kɛlɛminɛn [ɛ̀-ɛ̀] Morphemes: kɛlɛ-minɛn.
befehligt. synonyme: kɛlɛmasa.
variante: kɛlɛkɛminɛn. Nom. arme; weapon;
Waffe. synonyme: cɛminɛn, kɛlɛkɛlan,
kɛlɛtigiya [ɛ̀-ɛ̀-ì-ì] Nom. commandement militaire;
maramanfɛn. military command; Militärkommando,
militärischen Führung.
29/01/2026 390

kɛlɛyɔrɔ kɛmɛsarada
kɛlɛyɔrɔ [ɛ̀-ɛ̀-ɔ́-ɔ́] Morphemes: kɛlɛ-yɔrɔ. kɛmɛjate Jula: kɛmɛjata. synonyme: kɛmɛsarada.
synonyme: kɛlɛda, kɛlɛdaga. Nom. champ de Nom. pourcentage, %; percentage, %; Prozent,
bataille; battlefield; Schlachtfeld. Kamalen %. kɛmɛjate a bɛɛ kan pourcentage pour
gojogojo dama tun bɛ taa kɛlɛyɔrɔ. Seuls les l'ensemble. percentage for all. Prozentsatz für
jeunes hommes robustes allaient à la guerre.
die Gesamtheit. Category: Mathematics.
synonyme: kɛmɛsarada, kɛmɛ o kɛmɛ hakɛ,
Only young men who were strong did go to
war. Nur junge, robuste Männer gingen in den kɛmɛsigi.
Krieg. synonyme: muguda 1 . kɛmɛkɔnɔn [ɛ̀-ɛ̀] Nom. 1 • perle (plate, noire, portée
kɛli [ɛ-́ í] comparer: kɛ, -li. Nom. 1 • action de au cou, protège contre le mauvais œil); pearl
faire, fait de; making, doing; das Machen von (flat, black, worn at the neck, protects against
..., das Tun von ... ... ka diɲɛmɔgɔw waaju ko evil eye); Perle (flach, schwarz, am Hals
getragen, schützt vor dem bösen Blick).
kolonman kɛli la. ... afin d'exhorter les
synonyme: kɔnɔnkisɛ.
hommes à ne pas commettre de mauvais
actions. ... to urge men not to commit evil 2 • perle de protection attachée à la taille des
deeds. ... um die Menschen zu ermahnen, nourrissons; protective bead attached to
keine schlechten Taten zu begehen. infants' waists; Schutzperle an der Taille von
Kleinkindern befestigt.
2 • coït, acte sexuel (populaire); coitus, sexual
act (popular); Koitus, sexueller Akt kɛmɛkulu Nom. centaine; hundred; Tausend.
(Volksmund). Sungurunba kɛli man ɲi. Ce Category: Mathematics.
n'est pas bon de coucher avec des prostituées.
kɛmɛlitiri synonyme: ɛkitolitiri. Nom. hectolitre;
It’s not good to sleep with prostitutes. Es ist
nicht gut, mit Prostituierten zu schlafen.
hectolitre; Hektoliter. Category: Mathematics.
kɛmɛ [ɛ-̀ ɛ̀] Nom. 1 • cent (100); hundred (100); kɛmɛmɛtɛrɛ synonyme: ɛkitomɛtɛrɛ. Nom.
hundert. misi kɛmɛ seegin huit cents vaches.
hectomètre; hectometre; Hektometer.
Category: Mathematics.
eight hundred cows. achthundert Kühe.
Category: Mathematics. kɛmɛmɛtɛrɛkɛnɛ Nom. hectare; hectare; Hektare.
2 • cinq cents francs CFA; five hundred francs 100 m x 100 m = 10'000 m²
CFA; fünfhundert Franken CFA. Da min Category: Mathematics. synonyme: taari.
delila kɛmɛ la, kɛmɛtila t'a ladiya. La bouche
kɛmɛna [ɛ̀-ɛ̀] Déterminant. pour cinq cents francs; for
habituée à 500 francs, 250 francs ne la
satisfont pas. (proverbe). The mouth
five hundred francs; für fünfhundert Franken.
A bɛ jolila fɛ ? A bɛ kɛmɛna fɛ. Il veut pour
accustomed to 500 francs, 250 francs do not
satisfy her. (proverb). Der Mund, der 500 combien ? Il veut pour cinq cents francs. How
Franken gewohnt ist, 250 Franken befriedigt much does he want? He wants five hundred
sie nicht. (Sprichwort). francs worth. Wie viel will er? Er will einen
Wert von fünfhundert Franken.
kɛmɛ ka so Jula: kɛmɛ ka soo. Nom. colonne des
kɛmɛnan [ɛ̀-ɛ̀] Nom. centième; hundredth;
centaines; column of the hundreds; Hunderter
Kolonne. Category: Mathematics. hundertstel. Category: Mathematics.
kɛmɛ ni kelen num. cent et un, 101; hundred and kɛmɛsarada [ɛ̀-ɛ̀-à-à] variante: kɛmɛsigi. Nom.
one, 101; hundert und eins, 101. 1 • pourcentage; percentage; Prozentsatz.
Category: Mathematics. Kɛmɛsarada la... % En termes de
kɛmɛ ni tan ni kelen Nom. cent et onze, 111;
pourcentage... In percentage terms... In
Prozenten ausgedrückt.... Olu la, kɛmɛsarada
hundred and eleven, 111; hundert und eins,
111. Category: Mathematics.
la, 60 ye musow ye. 60 % d'entre eux sont des
femmes. 60% of them are women. 60 %
kɛmɛ o kɛmɛ hakɛ expr. pourcentage; percentage;
davon sind Frauen. Category: Mathematics.
Prozent. Category: Mathematics, Sign, synonyme: kɛmɛsigi, kɛmɛjate, kɛmɛ o kɛmɛ
Symbol. synonyme: kɛmɛsarada, kɛmɛjate,
hakɛ.
murumuru , kɛmɛsigi.
1 2 • calculer le pourcentage; calculate
kɛmɛgaramu synonyme: ɛkitogaramu. Nom. percentage; Prozent berechnen. ... ni i ye san
hectogramme; hectogram; Hektogramm. situlu kɛmɛsarada ... ... si tu calcules le
Category: Mathematics. pourcentage annuel pour le beurre de karité...
...if you calculate the annual percentage for
Shea butter... ...wenn man den jährlichen
Prozentsatz für Sheabutter berechnet...
29/01/2026 391

kɛmɛsi kɛnɛ
kɛmɛsi [ɛ-̀ ɛ̀-í] Nom. siècle; century; Jahrhundert. 3 • avoir de la graisse (pour un animal); to have
fat (for an animal); Fett haben (für ein Tier).
Kɛmɛsi duurunan sa... Au cinquième siècle...
Saga in, a kɛnnen don. Ce mouton-ci est
In the fifth century... Im fünften Jahrhundert...
gras. This sheep is fat. Dieses Schaf ist fett.
kɛmɛsigi [ɛ̀-ɛ̀] Morphemes: kɛmɛ-sigi. Nom.
kɛndɔye Nom. appartenance (maths); membership
pourcentage; percentage; Prozentsatz. ... ni i
(maths); Zugehörigkeit (Mathematik).
y'o musow kɛmɛsigi kɛ... ... si on calcule le
Category: Mathematics. synonyme: kɛndɔyeli.
pourcentage de ces femmes... ...if we
calculate the percentage of these women... kɛndɔyeli Nom. appartenance; membership;
...wenn wir den Prozentsatz dieser Frauen Zugehörigkeit. Category: Mathematics, Sign,
berechnen... synonyme: kɛmɛsarada, kɛmɛ o Symbol. synonyme: kɛndɔye.
kɛmɛ hakɛ, kɛmɛjate. kɛnɛ [ɛ́-ɛ́] Nom. lumière du jour; light, daylight;
1
kɛmɛsu [ɛ̀-ɛ̀] Emprunt de : arabe. Nom. ciseaux, Licht, Tageslicht. Ala ko: "Kɛnɛ ka bɔ." Kɛnɛ
sécateur; scissors, shears; Schere. bɔra. Dieu dit: « Que la lumière soit. » La
Category: Tool. synonyme: sizo. lumière fut. God said, "Let light appear."
Light appeared. Gott hat gesagt: «Es werde
kɛmɛtila [ɛ̀-ɛ̀] Morphemes: kɛmɛ-tila. Nom.
Licht.» Und das Licht erschien. Note: Bible:
cinquante; fifty; fünfzig. synonyme: biduuru.
Jenɛse 1.3 Kɛnɛ tɛ tigɛ ni tile ma bɔ. La
kɛminan [ĩ̀-ã́] Nom. récipient, ustensile, outils, lumière du jour n'apparaît pas sans le soleil.
bagages; container; Behälter.
(proverbe). Daylight does not appear without
Category: Container. synonyme: kɛminɛn,
the sun. (proverb). Ohne die Sonne gibt es kein
Tageslicht. (Sprichwort).
minɛn.
kɛnɛ [ɛ́-ɛ́] adj.pred. être en bonne santé, sain, en
kɛminɛn Jula: kɛminan. Morphemes: kɛ-minɛn. Nom. 2
pleine forme; be in good health, healthy, in
récipient; container, vessel; Gefäß, Behälter.
good shape; in guter Gesundheit sein, gesund.
... kɛminɛn kɔrɔ dɔ kɔnɔ. ... dans un vieux I ka kɛnɛ ? Tu te portes bien ? Tu es en bonne
récipient. ...in an old container. ... in einem santé ? Are you well? Bist du in guter
alten Behälter. Category: Container. Gesundheit? Geht es dir gut? I somɔgɔw ka
synonyme: kɛminan.
kɛnɛ ? Ta famille est en bonne santé ? Is your
kɛmɔgɔye [ɛ́] Morphemes: kɛ-mɔgɔ-ye. family well? Ist deine Familie in guter
variante: [kɛmaaye]. Nom. utile aux autres, Gesundheit? A man kɛnɛ. Il/elle est malade.
généreux, attentif aux autres, faire pour He/she is unwell. Er/sie ist krank.
quelqu'un; helpful to others, generous, kɛnɛ [ɛ́-ɛ́] adj.pred. 1 • être frais; to be fresh; frisch
3
attentive to others, doing for someone;
sein. Nɔnɔ kɛnɛ. lait frais. fresh milk. Frische
hilfsbereit gegenüber anderen, großzügig,
Milch.
aufmerksam gegenüber anderen, für jemanden
tun. Nin den ni, a b'ánw ɲɛna ka a fɔ 2 • être cru, non cuit, vert; to be uncooked,
kɛmɔgɔyeden don. Cet enfant-ci, nous
green; roh sein, ungekocht, grün. Sogo kɛnɛ.
pensions que ce serait un enfant utile. We
La viande crue. Uncooked meat. Rohes
thought this child would be a useful child. Wir
Fleisch.
dachten, dieses Kind wäre ein nützliches Kind. 3 • nouveau; new; neu. Jubagatɔ kɛnɛ ka kan
kɛn [ɛ]́ Nom. 1 • graisse animale, gras (de la ka mun kɛ ? Que doit faire la nouvelle
accouchée ? What should the woman who
viande); fat, animal fat, fat (from meat); Fett,
newly gave birth do? Was muß die neue
Öl, Tierfett, Fett (am Fleisch). Sagamɔnɛ kɛn
Geburtshelferin tun?
ka ca. Le mouton de case a beaucoup de
graisse. Farm sheep have a lot of fat.
kɛnɛ
4
[ɛ́-ɛ́] synonyme: yɔrɔ. Nom. espace, surface,
Nutzschafe haben viel Fett. synonyme: tulu, aire, superficie, place, espace dégagé, clairière,
domaine; surface, space, area, domain;
kɛnmafɛn.
Oberfläche, Raum, Fläche, Zone, Bereich. U
2 • profit; profit, gain, benefit; Nutzen,
ye kɛnɛ bila a ɲɛ. Ils lui firent place. They
Gewinn, Profit. Musalahakuma tɔlɔlen bɛ,
made way for him. Sie machten ihm Platz.
nka kɛn t'a la. Les paroles flatteuses sont
kɛnɛ kan publiquement, en public. publicly, in
onctueuses, mais elles n'ont pas de gras.
public. öffentlich, in der Öffentlichkeit.
(proverbe). Flattering words are creamy, but
Category: Mathematics. synonyme: kɔlɛ ,
they have no fat. (proverb). Schmeichelhafte 1
Worte sind cremig, haben aber kein Fett.
jɛkɛnɛ.
(Sprichwort).
29/01/2026 392

kɛnɛ don kɛnɛkɛnɛ
kɛnɛ don [ɛ́-ɛ́ õ̀] vi. aérer; ventilate, to air, space out; kɛnɛfarada [ɛ́] Morphemes: kɛnɛ-fara-da.
durchlüften. variante: kɛnɛfara, kɛnɛgwɛda, kɛnɛtigɛnda.
kɛnɛ kɔŕ ɔtanin Nom. plateau; plateau; Plateau, Nom. aube, aurore, petit jour; dawn, daybreak;
Hochebene.
Morgendämmerung, Tagesanbruch. ...
kɛnɛfarada masurunya la ... ... à l'approche
kɛnɛ sumanikɛnanw variante: kɛnɛ sumani
1 de l'aube ... ...as dawn approaches...
kɛnanw. Nom. mesures agraires, mesures de ...wenn die Morgendämmerung naht...
surface; surface measures; Category: Sky, Weather.
Landwirtschafts-Masse, Oberflächenmasse. synonyme: milikimalaka, fajiri, kɛnɛjɛnda,
Category: Mathematics.
kɛnɛmilikimalaka, alifajiri.
kɛnɛ sumanikɛnanw variante: kɛnɛ sumananw.
2 kɛnɛjɛ [ɛ́] Morphemes: kɛnɛ-jɛ. Nom. en public; in
Nom. mesures de surface; area measurements;
public, publicly; in der Öffentlichkeit,
Oberflächenmass, Flächenmass.
Category: Mathematics.
öffentlich. O kɛra kɛnɛjɛ kan. Ça s'est passé
publiquement. It happened publicly. Es
kɛnɛba Nom. plaine; plain; Ebene. Category: Land.
geschah öffentlich.
kɛnɛbagatɔ [ɛ́] Nom. personne en bonne santé, kɛnɛjɛnda [ɛ́] Nom. aube, aurore, point du jour; dawn,
personne saine; person in good health, healthy break of day; Morgendämmerung,
person; gesunde Person, gesunder Mensch. ... Tagesanbruch. Category: Sky, Weather.
ka taa kɛnɛbagatɔ dɔ joli lanɔgɔ n'a daburu synonyme: alifajiri, kɛnɛtigɛnda,
ye. ... et va infecter une personne saine avec sa kɛnɛmilikimalaka, kɛnɛfarada,
trompe. ... and will infect a healthy person with milikimalaka, fajiri.
his trunk. ... und wird eine gesunde Person mit
kɛnɛkanda [ɛ́] Morphemes: kɛnɛ-kan-da. Nom.
seinem Eileiter infizieren.
public, non caché, manifeste, visible pour tous;
kɛnɛbonya [ɛ́] Nom. superficie, surface; surface,
public, not hidden, manifest, visible to all;
area; Oberfläche, Fläche. Malijamana öffentlich, nicht verborgen, manifest, für alle
kɛnɛbonya ye ... La superficie du Mali est sichtbar. Kɔrɔbɔ bɛ tiga ma, nka syɔ ta ye
de... The area of Mali is... Die Fläche von Mali kɛnɛkanda ye. Il faut creuser pour savoir ce
beträgt... que va donner l'arachide, mais pour les
kɛnɛbɔ [ɛ]́ vi. briller; shine; scheinen, leuchten. haricots, c'est visible à l’œil nu. (proverbe).
1
You have to dig to know what the peanut will
kɛnɛbɔ Nom. désertification; desertification; produce, but for beans, it is visible to the naked
2
Desertifikation, Verödung, Versteppung, eye. (proverb). Man muß graben, um zu
Wüstenausbreitung. Category: Land. wissen, was die Erdnuß hervorbringt, aber bei
synonyme: jaa basigili. Bohnen ist es mit bloßem Auge sichtbar.
(Sprichwort).
kɛnɛbɔda [ɛ́] Morphemes: kɛnɛ-bɔ-da.
kɛnɛkanpanni synonyme: senbilayɔrɔfɔlɔ. Nom. saut
synonyme: kɛnɛfara. variante: kɛnɛbɔ,
en longueur; long jump; Weitsprung.
kɛnɛbonda. Nom. aube; dawn; Dämmerung,
kɛnɛkansariya synonyme: lamini sariya. Nom. loi
Tagesanbruch. ... kabi kɛnɛbɔda fɛ, fo ka taa
physique; physical law; physikalisches Gesetz.
tilesen kuncɛ. ... depuis l'aube, jusqu'au
Category: Mathematics.
moment du plein midi. ... from dawn until
noon. ... von Sonnenaufgang bis zur kɛnɛkaraba [ɛ́] Morphemes: kɛnɛ-karaba. Verbe.
Mittagszeit. Category: Sky. synonyme: fajiri, faire par la force, contraindre, forcer, violenter;
kɛnɛmilikimalaka. do by force, compel, force to do; zwingen,
nötigen, erzwingen. ... ka a kɛnɛkaraba a ka
kɛnɛda [ɛ]́ Morphemes: kɛnɛ-da. Nom. lumière du
faso kura ta... ... le forcer à prendre une autre
jour, jour (solaire); daylight, day (solar);
partie... ...force him to take another part...
Tageslicht, Tag (Sonne). Tu bɛ bonya ka taa
...zwinge ihn, eine andere Rolle zu
a fɛ, a tɛ kɛnɛda ye. La forêt devient de plus übernehmen...
en plus touffue, il ne voit pas la lumière du
kɛnɛkɛnɛ Verbe. circoncire; circumcise; beschneiden.
jour. The forest is becoming increasingly 1
dense, he does not see the light of day. Der
Wald wird immer dichter, er sieht kein
Tageslicht.
kɛnɛdon Nom. aération; ventilation; Belüftung,
Ventilation. synonyme: fɔɲɔdon.
29/01/2026 393

kɛnɛkɛnɛ kɛnɛtigɛnda
kɛnɛkɛnɛ [ɛ́] Nom. tout frais, tout nouveau, tout jeune; kɛnɛmana [ɛ́-ɛ́-á-á] Jula: kɛnɛmala. Nom.
2
very fresh, very new, very young; ganz frisch, extérieur, endroit public, dehors; exterior,
ganz neu, sehr jung. ... kaburu kɛnɛkɛnɛ kan. outward, outside, on the open air, public
... sur la tombe tout fraîche. ...on the fresh place; Äussere, ausserhalb, äusserlich, aussen,
grave. ...auf dem frischen Grab. A kɛnɛkɛnɛ öffentlicher Platz, Öffentlichkeit. Boli jugu
karila. Il est mort dans la fleur de l'âge. He laban ye kɛnɛmana ye. Le mauvais fétiche
died in the prime of his life. Er starb in der finit par être connu au grand jour. (proverbe).
Blüte seines Lebens. The bad fetish is finally known. (proverb). Der
böse Fetisch wird schließlich bekannt.
kɛnɛkɛnɛ
3
Morphemes: kɛnɛ-kɛnɛ. Nom. très bien
(Sprichwort).
portant; very well, in good health; sehr gesund.
kɛnɛmanya [ɛ́] Morphemes: kɛnɛ-man-ya. Nom.
... u bɛ bana kunntanw lase mɔgɔ
kɛnɛkɛnɛw ma. ... ils donnent de sales
santé; health; Gesundheit. Ala ka simaya ni
maladies aux gens très bien portants. ...they
kɛnɛmanya k'án ye ! Que Dieu nous accorde
give nasty diseases to very healthy people. longue vie et santé. May God grant us long life
...sie verursachen bei sehr gesunden Menschen and health. Gott schenke uns langes Leben
schlimme Krankheiten. und Gesundheit.
kɛnɛkisɛjɛ [ɛ́] Morphemes: kɛnɛ-kisɛ-jɛ. kɛnɛmataa [ɛ́] Jula: kɛnɛmataga. Nom. excréments,
variante: kɛnɛwalesale, kɛnɛwalawala. Nom. selles; excrements, stools; Kot, Exkrement,
Stuhl. ... n'a ye kɛnɛmataa kɛ, a
publiquement, au su et au vu de tous;
publicly, in full view of everyone; öffentlich, nɛrɛmugulama don... ... quand il fait, ses
vor den Augen aller. An ka ɲɔgɔn sɔrɔ selles sont de couleur jaune... ...when he
kɛnɛkisɛjɛ kan, sebaga bɛ dɔn.
does, his stools are yellow in colour...
...wenn er das tut, ist sein Stuhl gelb gefärbt...
Affrontons-nous publiquement, on connaîtra le
vainqueur. Let's face each other publicly, we kɛnɛmilikimalaka [ɛ́] Nom. aube, point du jour.
will know the winner. Lasst uns öffentlich synonyme: dugujɛ, alifajiri, fajiri, kɛnɛfarada,
gegeneinander antreten, wir werden den
kɛnɛtigɛnda, kɛnɛjɛnda, kɛnɛbɔda.
Gewinner kennen. synonyme: dajira, foroba.
kɛnɛɲɛ Morphemes: kɛnɛ-ɲɛ. Nom. lumière; light;
kɛnɛma [ɛ́-ɛ́-à] Jula: kɛnɛmala.
Licht. Kɛnɛɲɛ ye dibi fara. La lumière a fait
Morphemes: kɛnɛ-ma. Adverbe. dehors, à
disparaître l'obscurité. The light made the
l’extérieur, endroit public; outside, outdoors,
darkness disappear. Das Licht ließ die
public place; draußen, im Freien, öffentlicher
Dunkelheit verschwinden. Kɛnɛɲɛ bɔra. Le
Ort. A bila kɛnɛma. Mettez-le dehors. Put it
jour commence à se lever. The day begins to
outside. Lege es draußen hin. si kɛnɛma
dawn. Der Tag beginnt zu dämmern.
dormir dehors. sleep outdoors. draussen
schlafen. Im Freien schlafen.
kɛnɛsii [ɛ̀-ɛ̀] Nom. poils pubiens; pubic hair;
Schamhaar. ... a kɛnɛsiiw bɛ falen... ... les
kɛnɛma dugalen See main entry: . expr. rétroviseur
poils pubiens poussent... ...pubic hair
externe; outside rear view mirror;
grows... ...Schamhaare wachsen...
Aussenspiegel.
synonyme: barakɔrɔsii.
kɛnɛman [ɛ́-ɛ́-ã́] Morphemes: kɛnɛ-man. adj. frais
kɛnɛsuma sawura Nom. figure géométrique;
(contraire de sec), de bonne qualité, en bonne
geometrical shape; geometrische Figur.
santé, bien portant, sain; fresh, in good health,
Category: Mathematics.
of good quality, healthy; frisch, in guter
Verfassung, bei guter Gesundheit, gute kɛnɛsumakalan
Qualität, qualitativ gut, gesund. N bɛ n [ɛ́] Morphemes: kɛnɛ-suma-kalan. Nom.
kɛnɛman fɛ. C'est bien portant que j'aime être. géométrie; geometry; Geometrie.
It’s quality that I like to be. Ich mag es, gesund Category: Mathematics.
zu sein. woro kɛnɛman de la cola de bonne
kɛnɛtigɛnda [ɛ́] Morphemes: kɛnɛ-tigɛn-da. Nom.
qualité. cola nut of good quality. Cola Nuß
aube, point du jour; dawn, break of day,
guter Qualität.
daybreak; Morgendämmerung, Tagesanbruch.
An wulila kɛnɛtigɛnda de fɛ. C'est au point
du jour que nous nous sommes levés. It was at
daybreak that we got up. Bei Tagesanbruch
standen wir auf. Category: Sky, Weather.
synonyme: kɛnɛjɛnda, fajirida, dugujɛda,
kɛnɛmilikimalaka, fajiri, alifajiri.
29/01/2026 394

kɛnɛtintin kɛnyɛrɛye
kɛnɛtintin [ɛ̀-ɛ̀] variante: kɛnɛtintiri. Nom. région kɛnkɛn [ɛ ̀-ɛ ́] synonyme: cɛncɛn. Nom. sable; sand;
1
pubienne, pubis, pénil; pubic region, pubis, Sand. Category: Land.
penile; Schamgegend, Schambein,
kɛnkɛn [ɛ́] synonyme: tɛntɛn. Verbe. vanner, tamiser;
Schambereich. Category: Body. 2
winnow, sift, sieve; sieben, sichten. ka ɲɔ
kɛnɛya [ɛ-́ ɛ́-á] Morphemes: kɛnɛ-ya. 1 • Nom. santé,
kɛnkɛn vanner du mil. winnowing millet.
bonne santé; health, good health; Gesundheit,
Hirse sichten. synonyme: fiyɛ .
Heilung. A kɔbɛkɔbɛcogo b'a ka kɛnɛya jira.
1
La vivacité de son allure montre qu'il est en kɛnkɔnɔ [ɛ́] Nom. poison (mis volontairement dans la
bonne santé. The liveliness of his appearance nourriture ou la boisson); poison (put
shows that he is in good health. Die intentionally in food or drink); Gift
Lebendigkeit seines Aussehens zeigt, daß es (absichtlich in Essen oder Trinken gegeben).
ihm gut geht. ... u ko u bɛ n faga ka na kɛnkɔnɔ kɛ n kɔnɔ.
2 • vt. guérir, devenir ou être bien portant; heal; ... ils ont voulu me tuer en m'empoisonnant
heilen. A kɛnɛyara. Il est guéri. He is cured. avec de la nourriture. ...they wanted to kill me
Er ist geheilt. by poisoning me with food. ...sie wollten mich
töten, indem sie mich mit Essen vergifteten.
kɛnɛya sɛgɛsɛgɛli expr. dépistage de santé; health
synonyme: donnkɔnɔ.
screening; Früherkennung von Krankheiten.
Category: Treat disease. kɛnma [ɛ́] Nom. gras, graisseux, adipeux; fatty, greasy,
kɛnɛyabali [ɛ́] Nom. incurable; incurable; unheilbar. adipose; fett, fettig, fettleibig. jɛgɛ kɛnma
poisson gras. oily fish, . fetter Fisch.
Banabagatɔ kɛnɛyabali bɛ kɛ diɲɛ bɛɛ ka
surɔfana ye. La maladie incurable devient le kɛnmafɛn Nom. graisse animale, gras; animal fat;
repas du soir de tous. (proverbe). The tierisches Fett. Ni mɔgɔ tɛnɛ kɛra kɛnmafɛn
incurable disease becomes everyone's evening ye, i kana a to sɔn k'a majeni, ni i mɛɛnna
meal. (proverb). Die unheilbare Krankheit
k'a majeni, i b'i bolo lanɔn. Si la graisse est
wird zum Abendessen aller. (Sprichwort).
ton interdit alimentaire, évite d'en faire fondre
Category: Disease.
fréquemment, sinon, tu vas te lécher les doigts.
kɛnɛyafuranin [ɛ́] Nom. drogue (populaire); drug (proverbe). If fat is your dietary ban, avoid
(popular); Droge (Volksmund). melting it frequently, otherwise you will lick
Kɛnɛyafuranin bila, a b'i tiɲɛ. Abandonne la your fingers. (proverb). Wenn Fett Ihr
drogue, ça te détruit. Give up drugs, it destroys
Diätverbot ist, vermeiden Sie es, es häufig zu
you. Gib Drogen auf, sie zerstören dich.
schmelzen, sonst lecken Sie sich die Finger.
(Sprichwort). synonyme: tɔlɔ, kɛn.
kɛnɛyaji Morphemes: kɛnɛya-ji. Nom. sel de
kɛnyɛrɛla [ɛ́] Morphemes: kɛ-n-yɛrɛ-la. Nom.
réhydratation; re-hydration salts;
Rehydratations-Salz. Category: Treat disease. mauvais tour contre soi, tort causé à soi-même,
masochisme; evil trick against oneself, harm
kɛnɛyali [ɛ́-ɛ́-á-í] Morphemes: kɛnɛya-li.
caused to oneself, masochism; böser Trick
synonyme: kɛnɛyasɔrɔ. Nom. guérison; healing; gegen sich selbst, sich selbst zugefügter
Heilung. Schaden, Masochismus. Nin kɛra kɛnyɛrɛla
kɛnɛyaninkura wagati Nom. convalescence; dan ye. C'est le comble du tort qu'on se cause
convalescence, recovery; Rekonvaleszenz, à soi-même. This is the height of harm we do to
Genesungszeit. Category: Treat disease. ourselves. Das ist der größte Schaden, den wir
uns selbst zufügen. Kɛnyɛrɛla dan ye
kɛnɛyaso [ɛ́] Morphemes: kɛnɛ-ya-so. Nom.
kɔlɔnkɔnɔboci ye. Le comble du masochisme
dispensaire, centre de santé; dispensary, health
est de péter au fond d'un puits. (proverbe). The
center; Poliklinik, Krankenstation.
height of masochism is farting at the bottom of
Category: Building.
a well. (proverb). Der Höhepunkt des
kɛnɛyasɔrɔ [ɛ́-ɛ́-á-ɔ́-ɔ́] synonyme: kɛnɛyali. Nom. Masochismus ist das Furzen auf dem Grund
guérison; healing; Heilung. eines Brunnens. (Sprichwort).
kɛngɛrɛ [ɛ́] Adverbe. complètement rassasié; kɛnyɛrɛye Morphemes: kɛ-n-yɛrɛ-ye. Nom.
completely satiated; satt. N fara kɛngɛrɛ ! Je 1 • entrepreneur privé, secteur privé;
suis très bien rassasié ! I am very well fed! Ich
entrepreneur, private sector; Unternehmer in
bin sehr satt! synonyme: kɛlɛkɛlɛ. der Privatwirtschaft. N ye kɛnyɛrɛye ye. Je
2
travaille pour moi-même. I work for myself.
kɛnkaliba [ɛ̀-á-ì-á] variante: kankalaba. Nom. Ich arbeite für mich.
Kinkéliba de Kita; kind of shrub; Strauch 2 • égoïste; egoistic person, selfish person;
(Art). Category: Bush, shrub. vepris Egoist.
heterophylla.
29/01/2026 395

kɛnyɛrɛye baarada kɛɲɔgɔn
kɛnyɛrɛye baarada Nom. secteur privée; private kɛɲɛ [ɛ̀] Nom. cire; wax; Wachs. Ni tulu binna ta la,
3
sector, private economy, private enterprise; kɛɲɛ tɛ se k'a bɔ. Quand l'huile tombe dans le
Privatwirtschaft, Privatsektor. N ye kɛnyɛrɛye feu, la cire ne peut l'en retirer. (proverbe).
baarakɛla ye. Je travaille pour moi-même. I When the oil falls into the fire, the wax cannot
work for myself. Ich arbeite für mich selber remove it. (proverb). Wenn das Öl ins Feuer
/auf eigene Rechnung. fällt, kann das Wachs es nicht entfernen.
(Sprichwort).
kɛnyɛrɛyebaarada synonyme: kɛnyɛrɛyejɛkulu.
kɛɲɛka [ɛ̀-ɛ̀] Jula: kɛɲɛkan. synonyme: kɔgɔdugu.
Nom. Organisation non gouvernementale;
non-government organization; Nom. Nord; North; Norden. Suruku y'i sin
Hilfsorganisation. kɛɲɛka fɛ. L'hyène se dirigea vers le nord. The
kɛnyɛrɛyenjɛkulu Morphemes: kɛnyɛrɛye-jɛnkulu. hyena headed north. Die Hyäne zog nach
Norden.
synonyme: kɛnyɛrɛyebaarada. Nom. ONG,
Organisation Non-Gouvernementale; NGO, kɛɲɛkalama [ɛ̀-ɛ̀] Morphemes: kɛɲɛ-kalama. Nom.
Non-Governmental Organisation; bougie, cierge; candle; Kerze.
Nicht-Regierungs-Organisation,
kɛɲɛkɛ [ɛ́] 1 • Nom. insoumis, révolté, rebelle,
Hilfsorganisation.
récalcitrant, indomptable, incorrigible;
kɛɲɛ 1 [ɛ]́ variante: kɛɲa. 1 • vt. empêcher, éviter, rebellious, indomitable, unruly; Unwillig,
résister à, vaincre; prevent, avoid, resist, rebellisch, widerspenstig, unbeugsam,
defeat; verhindern, verhüten, widerstehen, unverbesserlich. ... u bɛna a fɔ sa ko i kɛra
widersetzen, Widerstand leisten. Foyi tɛ Ala kɛɲɛkɛ ye... ... ils diront alors que tu es devenu
kɛɲa. Rien n’est impossible à Dieu. Nothing is un révolté... ... they will say then that you have
impossible with God. Für Gott ist nichts become a rebel... ... dann sagen sie, daß du ein
unmöglich. Note: Bible: Luka 1.37 Rebell geworden bist...
2 • vi. échouer, ne pas arriver à, être incapable 2 • Verbe. échouer; fail; scheitern, versagen,
de; fail to, be incapable of, not be able to; nicht scheitern. Donsow bɛɛ kɛɲɛkɛra. Tous les
können, durchfallen, fehlen, verfehlen, chasseurs échouèrent. All the hunters failed.
scheitern, nicht vermögen. Malobaara ye n Alle Jäger scheiterten.
kɛɲɛ. Je n'ai pas pu entièrement finir le travail kɛɲɛkɛya [ɛ́] [ɛ́] Nom. insoumission, délinquance;
dans mon champ de riz. I was not able to
insubordination, delinquency; Ungehorsam,
completely finish the work in my rice field. Ich
Kriminalität. Olu ma sɔn a ka kɛɲɛkɛya ma.
konnte die Arbeit auf meinem Reisfeld nicht
vollständig beenden. Banabagatɔ kɛɲɛna
Ils n'ont pas accepté son insoumission. They
did not accept his insubordination. Sie haben
tagama na. Le malade n’est pas arrivé à
seine Unfolgsamkeit nicht akzeptiert.
marcher. The sick person is unable to walk.
Der Kranke kann nicht gehen.
kɛɲɛniya variante: kɛɲɛninya. n.comp. égalité;
equality; Gleichheit, Gleichberechtigung.
3 • Nom. échec, défaite; failure, defeat;
Versagen, Fehlschlag, Niederlage. synonyme: kɛɲɛya.
kɛɲɛ [ɛ]́ Verbe. égaliser, coïncider, être égal, mette à kɛɲɛya Nom. égalité; equality; Gleichheit.
2
niveau, correspondre; to level out, equalize, be Category: Mathematics. synonyme: kɛɲɛniya.
equal, coincide; ausgleichen, aus-ebnen,
kɛɲɔgɔn [ɛ́] variante: kɛɲɔgɔnkɛ. Nom. compagnon,
gleich sein, entsprechen. Mɔgɔ kana i ni mɔgɔ
camarade; companion, comrade; Gefährte,
kɛɲɛ ni a man kan. Ne nous rendons pas
Genosse, Kamerad. Ni i ye i kɛɲɔgɔn sabara
abusivement égaux à d'autres. (proverbe). Let
fili ba kɔ, n'a ma bɛn ni i kɛɲɔgɔn dɔ sen ye,
us not make ourselves improperly equal to
others. (proverb). Machen wir uns nicht a na bɛn ni dɔ ta ye. Si tu jettes la sandale de
ungerechtfertigt gleich mit anderen. ton camarade de l'autre côté de la rivière, si
(Sprichwort). O kɛɲɛna ni ja ye. Cela elle ne va pas pour l'un de tes camarades, elle
coïncida avec la sécheresse. This coincided ira pour un autre. (proverbe). If you throw your
with the drought. Dies fiel mit der Dürre comrade’s sandal across the river, if it doesn’t
zusammen. go for one of your comrade, it will go for
another (proverb). Wenn du die Sandale
deines Kameraden über den Fluss wirfst, wenn
sie für einen deiner Kameraden nicht gut ist,
wird sie für einen anderen sein. (Sprichwort).
29/01/2026 396

kɛɲɔgɔnmuso kɛrɛfɛsigi
kɛɲɔgɔnmuso [ɛ́] Morphemes: kɛ-ɲɔgɔn-muso. kɛrɛbɔ [ɛ̀-ɛ̀] Morphemes: kɛrɛ-bɔ. Nom.
Nom. compagne, camarade féminine; female détournement, écart, imprévu; diversion,
companion, female comrade; Gefährtin, deviation, unforeseen, misappropriation;
weibliche Genossin. Ablenkung, Abweichung, unvorhergesehen,
kɛɲɔgɔnya [ɛ́] Nom. compagnonnage, camaraderie; Veruntreuung. An ka jɛ la, kɛrɛbɔ yera a la.
Dans notre association, il y a eu des
companionship; Kameradschaft. Kɛɲɔgɔnya,
détournements. In our association, there
f'áw ka jɛya ɲɔgɔn ye. Dans la camaraderie, il
have been misappropriations. In unserem
faut être franc l'un vers l'autre. In Verein kam es zu Veruntreuungen.
companionship, we must be frank with each
other. In der Kameradschaft müssen wir offen
kɛrɛcɛn Emprunt de : français. variante: kerecɛn. Nom.
miteinander umgehen. chrétien; Christian; Christ. Nowɛli ye donba
kɛrɛ [ɛ]̀ Nom. côté, flanc; side, flank; Seite, Flanke. ye kerecɛnw fɛ. Noël est un jour de fête chez
les chrétiens. Christmas is a special day for
A kɛrɛ b'a dimin. Il a mal au côté. His side
Christians. Weihnachten ist ein besonderer
hurts. Seine Seite tut weh. ka sɛbɛrɛ bari so
Tag für die Christen. synonyme: Keretiɲɛn.
kɛrɛ la coller les éperons sur les flancs du
kɛrɛda [ɛ̀-ɛ̀] Morphemes: kɛrɛ-da. Nom. côté; side;
cheval. stick the spurs on the sides of the
horse. Die Sporen an den Pferdeflanken Seite. ... i bɛna a ton so in kɛrɛda fɛ. ... tu
drücken. Category: Body. synonyme: kɛrɛda, l'entasseras dans un côté de la maison. ...you
gɛrɛn , bere . will pile it up in one side of the house. ...Sie
1 5
werden es auf einer Seite des Hauses stapeln.
kɛrɛbɛtɛ [ɛ́] Adverbe. 1 • exact, sûr, sans aucun doute; synonyme: bere , kɛrɛ.
5
exact, sure, without doubt; genau, sicher, ohne
kɛrɛfɛ [ɛ̀-ɛ́-ɛ̀] Jula: gɛrɛfɛ. postp. 1 • près de, à côté
Zweifel. O bɛ kɛrɛbɛtɛ ! C'est absolument
exact ! That is absolutely correct! Das ist
de, sur le côté; next to, close by, besides;
absolut richtig!
neben, in der Nähe von. N ka so bi misiri
kɛrɛfɛ. Ma maison est à côté de la mosquée.
2 • à plus forte raison, surtout; even more so,
especially; umso mehr, insbesondere, vor My house is next to the mosque. Mein Haus ist
allem. ... cikɛminɛnw sɔngɔw gɛlɛyara, nɔgɔ neben der Moschee.
sɔngɔ kɛrɛbɛtɛ ! ... le prix des outils agricoles 2 • par derrière, en cachette; from behind,
a augmenté, et surtout celui des engrais ! ... the
secretly; von hinten, heimlich. Musow b'u
price of agricultural tools has increased, and dɛn ka don olu kan kɛrɛfɛ. Les femmes se
especially that of fertilizers! ... die Preise für cachent pour aller les trouver par derrière. The
landwirtschaftliche Geräte sind gestiegen, vor women hide to go and find them from behind.
allem die Preise für Dünger! Die Frauen verstecken sich, um sie von hinten
3 • net; strictly; deutlich, strikt. Dugamasa zu erreichen. synonyme: gɛrɛfɛ.
kɔrɔ ko n kɛrɛbɛtɛ ! Le maître vautour refusa kɛrɛfɛla [ɛ̀-ɛ̀-ɛ̀] Jula: gɛrɛfɛla.
net ! The vulture refused strictly! Der Geier
Morphemes: kɛrɛ-fɛ-la. Nom. abords,
weigerte sich strikt!
alentours, proximité, pourtour, côté;
kɛrɛbo [ɛ-̀ ɛ̀] variante: kɛrɛbɔ, kɛrɛbɔkaba. Nom. surroundings, proximity, circumference, side,
1 • pierre à fusil, pierre à briquet; gun stone, near; Umgebung, Nähe, Umkreis, Seite. ... ni
lighter stone. ji caman bɛ sɔrɔ tasuma yɛrɛ kɛrɛfɛla la. ...
2 • amorce; primer; Zündkapsel. Mugu ni si de l'eau en grande quantité peut être trouvée
kɛrɛbo kɛlɛla... La poudre et l'amorce se à proximité du foyer de l'incendie. ... if water
querellèrent... Powder and primer were
in large quantity can be found near the fire. ...
fighting... Pulver und Zündkapsel stritten
wenn Wasser in großer Menge in der Nähe des
sich...
Feuers gefunden werden kann.
synonyme: gɛrɛfɛla.
kɛrɛbosigi [ɛ̀-ɛ̀-ò] Morphemes: kɛrɛbo-sigi. Verbe.
kɛrɛfɛsigi [ɛ̀-ɛ̀-ɛ̀] Morphemes: kɛrɛ-fɛ-sigi. Nom.
prêter l'oreille, écouter attentivement; lend an
ear, listen attentively; ein offenes Ohr 1 • conseiller; advisor, counsellor; Berater.
schenken, aufmerksam zuhören. A' u'a tulo Kɛrɛfɛsigiw ko : «Dugutigi... » Les
kɛrɛbosigi ! Écoute attentivement ! Listen conseillers dirent : «Chef de village...». The
carefully! Hören Sie gut zu!
counsellors said, "Chief of village... ". Die
Berater sagten: «Dorfvorsteher... ».
synonyme: ladi , ladilikɛla, ladibaga,
2
kankɔrɔsigi, kɔnseye.
2 • voisin; neighbour; Nachbar.
29/01/2026 397

kɛrɛkelen kɛrɛnkɛrɛnya
kɛrɛkelen [ɛ̀-ɛ̀] Morphemes: kɛrɛ-kelen. Nom. crabe kɛrɛnin [ɛ̀-ɛ̀] variante: nkɛrɛ, nkɛrɛnin. Nom. prise
de rivière; river crab; Flußkrabbe. Kɛrɛkelen de lutte qui consiste à prendre l'adversaire par
ka cinni ka jugu. La morsure du crabe est le côté, prise de hanche (basculement de
l'adversaire autour de la hanche); wrestling,
douloureuse. The crab bite is painful. Der Biß
which consists in taking the opponent by the
der Krabbe ist schmerzhaft. Category: Small
side, hip grip (opponent swinging around the
animals. synonyme: babagɛrɛnkelen,
hip); Kampfeinsatz, bei dem der Gegner von
ɲingiriɲangara, gangan .
1 der Seite genommen wird, Hüftgriff
kɛrɛkelenjɛngɛ (Umkippen des Gegners um die Hüfte) . N ye
[ɛ-̀ ɛ̀-è-è] Morphemes: kɛrɛ-kelen-jɛngɛ. kɛrɛnin kɛ a la. Je lui ai fait une prise de
Nom. bancal (pour une voiture, pour une hanche. I gave him a hip-lift. Ich habe ihm
personne), boiteux; wobbly (for a car, for a einen Hüftgriff gemacht.
person), lame; wackelig (für ein Auto, für eine kɛrɛnkɛrɛn [ɛ́] Verbe. 1 • mettre à part, être à part,
1
Person), lahm. Cɛ in ye kɛrɛkelenjɛngɛ ye.
réserver; put aside, reserve, keep; beiseite
Ce type est boiteux. This guy is lame. Dieser legen, reservieren. N ye nin kɛrɛnkɛrɛn ni i
Typ ist lahm.
ye. Je t'ai réservé ceci. I’ve reserved this for
kɛrɛkɛ Emprunt de : arabe. Nom. selle; saddle; Sattel. you. Ich habe dies für Sie reserviert.
synonyme: kirikɛ. 2 • économiser; save, economize; sparen. U
kɛrɛkɛtɛ [ɛ́] Adverbe. très serré; very tight; sehr eng. sera ka warinin min kɛrɛnkɛrɛn... Le peu
An y'a kɛ kɛrɛkɛtɛ ! On l'a attaché très serré.
d'argent qu'ils ont économisé... The little
money they saved... Das wenige Geld, das sie
We tied him up really tight. Wir haben ihn
gespart haben...
richtig fest gefesselt.
3 • particulier, à part, spécial; particular, set
kɛrɛmɛ [ɛ-̀ ɛ̀] variante: kɛrɛmu. Verbe. 1 • retirer à la aside, special; besonders, beiseite,
main les impuretés (du riz, mil...) dans la abgesondert, speziell. yɔrɔ kɛrɛnkɛrɛnnen un
calebasse; remove impurities (rice, millet, etc.) endroit à part. a place apart. ein Ort für sich.
from the calabash by hand; entfernen Sie kɔrɔsigi kɛrɛnkɛrɛnnen conseiller spécial.
Verunreinigungen (Reis, Hirse usw.) von
special advisor. Sonderberater.
Hand aus der Kalebasse. ka malo kɛrɛmɛ
nettoyer le riz. clean the rice. Reis einigen.
kɛrɛnkɛrɛn
2
[ɛ̀-ɛ̀] Nom. côté, bas-côté, abords,
proximité; side, sidewalk, surroundings,
2 • nettoyer le mil, vanner avant de piler;
proximity; Seite, Seitenweg, Vorraum, Nähe.
clean the millet, winnow before pounding;
reinigen der Hirse bevor sie zerstampft wird. ba kɛrɛnkɛrɛn na sur le côté du fleuve. on the
ka ɲɔ kɛrɛmɛ segere la séparer les grains du river side. an der Flußseite. sira kɛrɛnkɛrɛn
mil avant un van. separate the grains from the bas-côté de la route. side of the road, roadside.
millet before winnowing. Trennen Sie die Seitenstraße, Straßenseite.
Körner von der Hirse vor dem Sichten. kɛrɛnkɛrɛnnenya la expr. en particulier; in
kɛrɛmu 1 Emprunt de : français. Nom. crème (pour la particular; insbesondere.
peau); cream (for skin); Creme, Hautcreme, kɛrɛnkɛrɛnnin Nom. particulier; particular;
Salbe.
besonders, Einzelheit, speziell.
kɛrɛmu [ɛ̀-ɛ̀] variante: kɛrɛmɛ. Verbe. 1 • ébaucher
2 kɛrɛnkɛrɛnya [ɛ́] variante: kɛrɛnkɛrɛnnenya.
un pas de danse, prendre un élan avant
Verbe. 1 • être ou rendre particulier; be or make
d'effectuer un lancer; sketch out a dance step,
special; besondere Merkmale aufweisen. ... a
gain momentum before performing a throw;
Skizzieren Sie einen Tanzschritt, gewinnen Sie ye don dɔ kɛrɛnkɛrɛnya diɲɛ bɛɛ kɔnɔ... ...
Schwung, bevor Sie einen Wurf ausführen. elle a choisi un jour particulier pour le monde
2 • se tourner d'un côté et de l'autre en dansant; entier... ... she chose a particular day for the
turn from side to side while dancing; sich beim whole world... ... sie wählte einen besonderen
Tanzen auf eine Seite und auf die andere zu Tag für die ganze Welt...
drehen. A' ye ɲangaranfɔli fɔ n ye, n ka n 2 • particularisme, spécificité; particularism,
kɛrɛmu. Jouez-moi l'air des braves que je
specificity, particularity; Partikularismus,
Eigenart, Spezifität, Besonderheit.
m'élance pour danser. Play me the air of the
brave as I dance. Spielt mir die Musik der
Mutigen, wie ich mich zum Tanzen aufmache.
29/01/2026 398

kɛrɛntɛ kɛtɛkɛtɛ
kɛrɛntɛ [ɛ̀-ɛ̀] Verbe. 1 • s'entrechoquer, grincer; kɛsu ka lon o lon jatiminɛsɛbɛ synonyme: kɛsu
clanging, squealing; zusammenstoßen, ka tile kɔnɔ jatiminɛsɛbɛ. expr. journal de
knirschen. Mobili fila y'u kɛrɛntɛ ɲɔgɔn na. caisse; cash-book; Kassenbuch.
Les deux voitures se sont effleurées. The two
kɛsuwari [ɛ́] Nom. l'argent en caisse; money in the cash
cars brushed against each other. Die beiden
Autos streiften einander.
box; Geld in der Kasse. Category: Finance.
2 • gratter, effleurer, frôler; scratch, brush, kɛta [ɛ́-á] Morphemes: kɛ-ta. Nom. 1 • devoir, à
touch, rub; kratzen, streichen, reiben. Ɲinɛw faire; task: something to be done; Benehmen,
ye bananku kɛrɛntɛ. Les souris ont gratté le Tat, Verhalten, Handlung, Handeln. I y’i ka
manioc. The mice have scratched the cassava. kɛta kɛ. Tu as fait ce que tu devais faire. You
Die Mäuse haben die Maniok zerkratzt. did what you had to do. ... a ka kɛtaw kan. ...
kɛrɛsaba [ɛ̀-ɛ́-à-á] Nom. triangle; triangle; Dreieck. à propos de ses agissements. ... about his
... o ye kɛrɛsaba ye. ... c'est un triangle.
actions. ... über seine Handlungen. I jɔyɔrɔ tɛ
...it's a triangle. ...es ist ein Dreieck. dɔn, i ka kɛta tɛ dɔn. On ne connaît ni ta
synonyme: gɛrɛnsaba, selekesaba, gɛrɛn. place, ni ta conduite. We know neither your
3
place nor your conduct. Wir kennen weder
kɛrɛtɛkɛrɛtɛ [ɛ́] Verbe. 1 • se précipiter (pour une deinen Platz noch dein Verhalten.
action répréhensible); rush (for wrongdoing); 2 • devoir; duty; Pflicht, Aufgabe. Ni Mali cɛw
Eile (wegen Fehlverhaltens). Mɔgɔ jugu
ni musow bɛɛ y'i ka kɛta dɔn... Si tous les
mana kolonninfilila min komɛn, a b'i
hommes et les femmes du Mali connaissent
kɛrɛtɛkɛrɛtɛ. Quand un méchant entend parer leur devoir... If all the men and women of Mali
d'un devin, il se précipite. When a wicked man know their duty... Wenn alle Männer und
hears of a fortune-teller, he rushes. Wenn ein Frauen in Mali ihre Pflicht kennen...
Böser von einem Wahrsager reden will, eilt er.
kɛtasugandinan Nom. touche de commande;
2 • manigancer; scheme, engineer, plot;
command key, control button; Befehlstaste,
intrigieren. I bɛ kɛrɛtɛkɛrɛtɛ ka taa min ? Où
Steuertaste.
est-ce que tu te précipites comme cela ? Where
are you rushing off to? Wohin rennst du so
kɛtɛkɛtɛ
1
[ɛ́-ɛ́-ɛ́-ɛ́] synonyme: kalosabasɔgɔsɔgɔ.
eilig? Nom. coqueluche, tousser de manière longue et
répétée; whooping cough, coughing for a
kɛrɛtɔ [ɛ-̀ ɛ̀] variante: kɛrɛma. Nom. qui fait des
long time and repeatedly; Keuchhusten, langes
écarts (pour un cheval), légèrement dérangé und wiederholtes Husten. Den bɛ kɛtɛkɛtɛ
mentalement; who makes deviations (for a
kojugu ! L'enfant tousse de manière continue.
horse), slightly mentally disturbed; das
The child coughs continuously. Das Kind
Abschweifungen macht (für ein Pferd), leicht
geistig gestört. So kɛrɛtɔ ɲɛ bɛ sira, a tɛ taa a
hustet ständig. Category: Disease.
synonyme: kalosabasɔgɔsɔgɔ, keteketenin,
fɛ. Le cheval qui fait des écarts voit bien la
kulekulenin.
route mais il ne la prend pas. (proverbe). The
horse that makes deviations sees well the road kɛtɛkɛtɛ [ɛ́] Adverbe. absolument, vraiment,
2
but it does not take it. (proverb). Das Pferd,
effectivement; absolutely, truly, indeed,
das Abschweifungen macht, sieht den Weg
really; absolut, wirklich, tatsächlich. A kɛra
gut, aber er nimmt ihn nicht. (Sprichwort).
n ɲɛna kɛtɛkɛtɛ ! Je l'ai vraiment vu de mes
kɛsɛkɛsɛ [ɛ̀-ɛ̀] Adverbe. 1 • très sec; very dry; sehr propres yeux ! I really saw it with my own
trocken. woro kunba kɛsɛkɛsɛ une grosse eyes! Ich habe es wirklich mit eigenen Augen
noix de cola très sèche. a large, very dry cola gesehen!
nut. eine sehr trockene große Cola-Nuß.
2 • rapidement; quickly; schnell.
kɛsikaradasi Nom. cahier de caisse; cash book;
Kassenbuch. Category: Finance.
kɛsu [ɛ]́ Emprunt de : français. variante: kɛsi. Nom.
caisse, valise, malle; trunk, cash box; Kiste,
Kasse. forobakɛsu les caisses de l'État. the
State funds. die Kassen des Staates. kɛsuwari
l'argent en caisse. cash in the till. das Geld in
der Kasse. tɔn ka kɛsu la caisse de
l'association. the Association’s fund. die Kasse
des Vereins. Category: Container.
29/01/2026 399

kɛtɔ kibiriki
kɛtɔ [ɛ]́ part. en train de; in the process of, doing, 2 • article (de presse); article (published);
Zeitungsartikel.
while; im Prozeß von, machend, während. ... a
3 • présage; omen, presage; Omen, Zeichen.
kɛtɔ ka ɲɔ susu. ... alors qu'elle était en train
ka don kibaru bɔ prédire l'avenir. predict the
de piler le mil. ... while she was pounding the
future. die Zukunft vorhersagen.
millet. ... während sie die Hirse zerstampfte.
4 • Kibaru est aussi le nom du principal journal
Ni i ye falatɔ kɛtɔ ye ka sagajigi kɛ saraka
en bambara; Kibaru is also the name of the
ye, a makariko tuma tɛmɛna. Quand tu vois
main Bambara newspaper; Kibaru ist auch der
un orphelin faire l'offrande d'un bélier, il n'est Name der wichtigsten Bambara-Zeitung.
plus temps d'avoir pitié de lui. (proverbe).
kibarudiso Morphemes: kibaru-di-so. Nom. maison
When you see an orphan offering a ram, there
is no time to pity him. (proverb). Wenn du de la presse, service d'information; Press
einen Waisen siehst, der einen Widder opfert, house, information service; Pressehaus,
dann ist es nicht mehr an der Zeit, ihn zu Informationsdienst.
bemitleiden. (Sprichwort). kibarujɛnsɛnso [ì-à-ù-ɛ̀-ɛ̀] variante: kibaruso.
kɛwale [ɛ-́ á-é] Nom. 1 • acte, action, comportement; Nom. Ministère de l'information; Ministry of
act, action, deed, behavior; Aktion, Tat, Information; Informationsministerium.
Handlung, Benehmen. Jogo bɛ dɔn kɛwale de Category: Government.
fɛ. C'est aux actes qu'on reconnaît le caractère. kibarulasela
It is in the acts that character is recognized. [ì-à-ù-à-è] Morphemes: kibaru-lase-la.
Der Charakter wird durch die Tat erkannt.
Nom. journaliste; journalist; Journalist. ... ka
synonyme: kɛwali.
kibarulaselaw ka baara nɔgɔya u bolo. ...
2 • effet; effect; Wirkung, Auswirkung. Kuran
faciliter le travail aux journalistes. ... facilitate
tɛ ye ɲɛ na, nka a bɛ dɔn a kɛwale fɛ. the work of journalists. ... den Journalisten die
L’électricité ne se voit pas, mais on sait qu'elle Arbeit erleichtern. Category: Worker,
existe par ses effets. Electricity is not seen, but occupation. synonyme: faseribaga,
we know it exists by its effects. Elektrizität ist kunnafonilasela, lakalitaɲinina,
nicht sichtbar, aber man weiß, dass sie
kunnafonijɛnsɛnna, kunnafonidila.
existiert.
kɛwali variante: kɛwale. Nom. attitude, comportement,
kibaruya [ì-à-ù] Nom. 1 • nouvelle; news;
Nachrichten, Neuigkeiten. Dugu kibaruya bɛ
œuvre, acte; attitude, behavior, act; Haltung,
Benehmen, Werk. synonyme: kɛwale. di ? Quelles sont les nouvelles du pays ?
What’s the news from the country? Was gibt es
kɛwaliɲuman Morphemes: kɛwali-ɲuman. n.comp.
Neues aus dem Land?
bon comportement, savoir-être; good
2 • présage; omen, presage; Vorzeichen,
behavior, know-how of being, good behavior;
Vorbote, Omen. A kɔni y'a mɛn ko donon ka
gutes Benehmen, gewusst wie, gute
Benehmen.
sufɛkasi bɛ npogotigi kɔnɔma kibaruya fɔ.
Il a entendu dire que si le coq chantait la nuit,
ki [í] Nom. prophète (populaire), forme tronquée
c'était le présage d'une jeune fille enceinte. He
de «kira»; prophet (popular), truncated form heard that if the rooster crowed at night, it was
of «kira»; Prophet (Volksmund), Abkürzung an omen of a pregnant girl. Er hörte, daß das
von ''kira''. A bɛ n ni ki cɛ... Au nom du Krähen des Hahns in der Nacht ein Omen für
Prophète... In the name of the Prophet... Im ein schwangeres Mädchen sei.
Namen des Propheten... synonyme: kira. kibaruyakuraw Nom. actualités; news, current
kibaro Nom. moqueur (oiseau); Senegal wood hoopoe; events, headlines; Neuigkeiten, Nachrichten,
1
Vogelart. Category: Bird. phoeniculus
Tagesschau, Schlagzeilen.
purpureus. kibaruyaw Nom. les nouvelles, les informations; the
kibaro [ì-à] variante: kibaru. Nom. coucou jacobin; news, informations; die Neuigkeiten,
2
Jacobin cuckoo; Kuckuck. Category: Bird.
Informationen.
clamator jacobinus. kibiriki [ì-ì-ì] Emprunt de : arabe. variante: kibiri,
kibaru [ì-à-ú] Nom. 1 • nouvelle; news; Neuigkeiten. tinbiriki. Nom. 1 • souffre; sulphur, sulfur;
kibaru diman bonne nouvelle. good news. Schwefel. synonyme: kiribi 1 .
gute Neuigkeiten. kibaru jugu mauvaise 2 • jaunâtre, cheval à robe blanchâtre;
nouvelle. bad news. schlechte Neuigkeiten. yellowish, horse with whitish coat; gelblich.
Kibaru Diman fɔbaga évangéliste. evangelist. Category: colour.
Evangelist.
29/01/2026 400

kibu kiliden
kibu [í-ú] Emprunt de : français. Nom. cube; cube; kiisikaasa [ì-ì] variante: kisikasa. Adverbe.
Kubus, Würfel. Category: Mathematics. 1 • marcher péniblement, se traîner (malade,
kiiba [í] Nom. espèce de poisson-chat; kind of fish,
blessé); striding, dragging (sick, injured);
mühselig gehen, sich schleppen (krank,
planet catfish; Fischart, Wels. Category: Fish.
verletzt). A sunɔgɔtɔ kiisikaasara ka a sen
bagrus docmac niger.
don án ka teminɛw la. Il est entré comme un
kiimɛ [í] Verbe. estimer (une valeur), évaluer;
somnambule et a bousculé notre matériel pour
estimate; schätzen, einschätzen, abschätzen, faire le thé. He walked in like a sleepwalker
bewerten. ... ka baara kɛlen kiimɛ walasa a and pushed our tea making equipment. Er kam
ɲuman n'a juguman ka dɔn. ... évaluer le wie ein Schlafwandler herein und schob unsere
travail accompli afin de savoir ce qui est bon et Teematerial.
ce qui est mauvais. ... evaluate the work done 2 • lentement et de façon ondoyante (démarche
in order to know what is good and what is bad. d'un reptile); slowly and rippling (reptile gait);
... die geleistete Arbeit bewerten, um zu langsam und flatternd (Gang eines Reptils).
erkennen, was gut und was schlecht ist. kilasi Emprunt de : français. Nom. classe; class;
kiimɛli [í] variante: kiimɛni. Nom. estimation, Klasse. Category: Learn.
évaluation, examen; estimation, evaluation, kile [í] Emprunt de : français. Nom. clé, clef; key;
examination; Schätzung, Einschätzung,
Schlüssel. Category: Tool. synonyme: konnigɛ,
Auswertung, Prüfung, Untersuchung,
Überprüfung. kiimɛbaga évaluateur.
dayɛlɛlan, konɲin.
evaluator. Bewerter, Gutachter. kilecɛman Nom. clé sans fente; key without groove;
Category: Mathematics.
Schlüssel ohne Kerbe.
kiin [í] bambara: kin. variante: kinda. Nom. kilemusoman Nom. clé à fente; key with groove;
quartier; district; Bezirk, Kreis.
Schlüssel mit Kerbe.
Category: Land.
kili [í-í] Nom. 1 • œuf; egg; Ei. I ye wɔlɔ min faga,
kiiri synonyme: kiti. variante: kiri. Nom. réprimande; 1
ne y'a kili cɛ. C'est moi qui ai ramassé les
reprimand; Tadel, Verweis.
œufs du francolin que tu as tué. (proverbe). I
kiiritigɛla synonyme: kititigɛla. variante: kiritigɛla. picked up the eggs from the francolin you
Nom. juge; judge; Richter. Category: Worker, killed. (proverb). Ich habe die Eier des Fasans
occupation. gesammelt, den du getötet hast. (Sprichwort).
kiisa [í] Emprunt de : arabe. Nom. 1 • proportion,
synonyme: syɛkili, fan
1
.
2 • boule; ball; Kugel.
mesure, niveau, quantité; proportion, measure,
level, quantity; Proportion, Maß, Niveau, 3 • testicule; testicle; Hoden. Category: Body.
Menge. Simɔn ni cɛncɛn bɛ ɲagami kiisa kili [í] Verbe. appeler, héler; call, hail; anrufen,
2
min na... Les proportions du mélange ciment rufen. Anw de ye Musa kili. C'est nous qui
et sable... The proportions of the cement and
avons appelé Moussa. We called Moussa. Wir
sand mixture... Die Anteile der Mischung aus
haben Moussa angerufen.
Zement und Sand... ... n'a yɛrɛ kɔgɔra ka se
kilibara [í] Morphemes: kili-bara.
kiisa dɔ la, a bɛ se mɛtɛrɛ kelen kiisa la. ...
synonyme: kiliforoko. Nom. testicule, bourses;
s'il grandit jusqu’à un certain niveau, il peut
atteindre environ un mètre. ... if it grows to a testicle, bursae; Hoden, Schleimbeutel,
certain level, it can reach about one meter. ... Hodensack. kilibara synonyme: kiliden.
wenn er bis zu einem bestimmten Niveau
kiliden [í] Morphemes: kili-den. Nom. testicule;
wächst, kann er etwa einen Meter erreichen.
An ye san kiisa ye. Nous sommes de la même
testicle; Hoden. «ni kiliden y'a fɔ ko a ni
année. We are from the same year. Wir sind
bofiɲɛ tɛ kun, fo ni a ye a danmakulusi kala
aus dem gleichen Jahr. a yɛrɛ ye. Si le testicule dit qu'il ne peut
2 • preuve; evidence, proof; Beweis, supporter l'odeur du pet, il n'a qu'à se faire
Nachweis, Beweismittel. coudre une culotte à part. (proverbe). If the
testicle says it can’t stand the smell of a fart, he
just has to sew his panties on. (proverb). Wenn
der Hoden sagt, daß er den Geruch des Furzes
nicht verträgt, muß er sich nur ein separates
Höschen nähen lassen. (Sprichwort).
Category: Body. synonyme: filabara, kaya ,
2
fɔrɔkili, bɛlɛkili, kilibara, worokɔrɔla.
29/01/2026 401

kilifara kinibolofan tintinnan
kilifara [í] Nom. câprier d'Afrique; woolly caper bush; 2 • kilomètre, km; kilometre, km; Kilometer.
Kapernstrauch. Category: Bush, shrub.
Yan ni Bamakɔ ye kilo tan ye. Bamako est à
capparis tomentosa. synonyme: jatabali,
10 km d'ici. Bamako is 10 km from here.
Bamako ist 10 km von hier.
donkarifin.
synonyme: kilomɛtɛrɛ.
kilikanlali synonyme: birili, buguli. Nom. couvaison;
kilogaramu [í] Emprunt de : français. Nom.
breeding, breading season; Brutzeit, Brut.
kilogramme; kilogram; Kilogramm.
Category: Agriculture.
synonyme: kilo.
kiliki Nom. mimosa-clochettes; kind of tree;
kilomɛtɛrɛ [í] Emprunt de : français. Nom. kilomètre;
Baumart. Category: Tree. dichrostachys
cinerea / glomerata. kilometre; Kilometer. Kilomɛtɛrɛ 1 ye mɛtɛrɛ
kilimatizɛri Emprunt de : français. Nom. climatiseur;
1000 ye. 1 km est 1000 m. 1 km is 1000 m. 1
km ist 1000 m. synonyme: kilo.
air-conditioner; Klimaanlage.
kilinkalan [í] Nom. 1 • sonnerie, sonnette (d'une kilomɛtɛrɛkɛnɛ Nom. kilomètre carré; square
1
kilometre; Quadratkilometer.
bicyclette); doorbell, bell (of a bicycle);
Klingel, Glocke (eines Fahrrads). Category: Mathematics.
2 • dring-dring (onomatopée: bruit de la kimi Nom. parasol, parapluie; umbrella, parasol,
sonnette); dring-dring (onomatopoeia: sound sunshade; Regenschirm, Schirm,
of the doorbell); dring-dring (Lautmalerei: Sonnenschirm. synonyme: sanminɛnan.
Geräusch der Türklingel).
kin [ì] Jula: kiin. Nom. quartier; district, area;
kilinkalan [í] Adverbe. très grand de taille,
2
Bezirk, Kreis, Quartier, Stadtteil. Bamakɔ kin
dégingandé; very tall, lanky; sehr groß,
schlaksig. A taatɔ filɛ kilinkalan ! Regarde-le
tɔw les autres quartiers de Bamako. the other
districts of Bamako. die anderen Stadtteile von
qui s'en va tout dégingandé ! Look at him
Bamako. Category: City. synonyme: kinda.
walking away all gangly! Look at him go all
limp! Schau dir an, wie er ganz schlaksig kinda [ì] synonyme: kin. variante: kunda. Nom.
davongeht! Sieh ihn dir an, wie er sich
quartier; district, area; Bezirk, Kreis, Quartier.
verrenkt!
Bosola ye Bamakɔ kinda dɔ ye. Bazola est un
kilinyɔrɔkɔ variante: kilinyɔrɔn. Nom. 1 • œufs non quartier de Bamako. Bazola is a district of
encore formés qu'on trouve dans le ventre de la Bamako. Bazola ist ein Stadtteil von Bamako.
poule; eggs not yet formed that are found in the synonyme: kunda , kin.
1
belly of the hen; noch nicht gebildete Eier, die
im Hühnerbauch zu finden sind.
kinedo [ì-è] variante: [kindo]. Nom. arbre à fleurs
roses; tree pink flowers; Baum mit rosa Blüten.
2 • testicules (populaire); testicles (popular);
Hoden (im Volksmund).
Category: Tree. andira inermis.
kilisi See main entry: kirisi.[í] Nom. formule magique Kingirigan n.comp. Non d'un village dans la Région
des Hauts-Bassins; name of a village; Name
propitiatoire; magic spell; magische Formel,
Zauberformel, Magische Formel der Gnade.
eines Dorfes. Category: City.
ka kilisi tu ka bɔnɛ fani. prononcer des kini synonyme: malokini. Nom. riz (cuit); rice
formules magiques pour conjurer le malheur. (cooked); Reis (gekocht). Category: Food.
to use magic spells to ward off misfortune. synonyme: malokinin.
Zaubersprüche sprechen, um das Unglück
abzuwenden. Category: Religion. kinibolo fɔgɔfɔgɔ Nom. poumon droit; right lung;
synonyme: kirisi. rechte Lunge. Category: Body.
kilisikan [í] Nom. parole magique, invocation, kinibolo jolikafosira Nom. veine pulmonaire
incantation; magic word, invocation, droite; right pulmonary vein; rechte
incantation; Zauberwort, Zauberspruch, Lungenvene. Category: Body.
Beschwörung. Category: Religion. kinibolofan [í] Nom. à droite, côté droit; at the right,
kilo [í-ó] Emprunt de : français. Nom. right-hand side; rechts, rechte Seite.
1 • kilogramme, kilo, kg; kilogram, kilo, kg; antonyme: numanbolofan.
Kilogramm. A bɛ dumuni kilo 1 dun tile o kinibolofan tintinnan Nom. accent aigu; acute
1
tile. Il absorbe 1 kg de nourriture par jour. It
accent; steigender Akzent. á
absorbs 1 kg of food per day. Es nimmt täglich
1 kg Futter auf. synonyme: kilogaramu. kinibolofan tintinnan 2 Nom. accent aigu, ton haut;
acute accent, high tone; steigender Akzent,
Hochton. á, é, í, ó ú Category: Grammar.
29/01/2026 402

kinibolokɔkili kiri
kinibolokɔkili Nom. rein droit; right kidney; rechte kininkinin [ì-ì] Nom. 1 • plainte, lamentation;
Niere. Category: Body. complaint, lamentation; Beschwerde, Klage.
kinibolosen [í] Nom. pied droit; right foot; rechter kininkininkuma lamentation sur son propre
sort. lament over one's own fate. über das
Fuss. Category: Body.
eigene Schicksal klagen.
kinibolotaga Nom. virage à droite; turn right ahead,
2 • pitié; pity, mercy; Mitleid.
bend to right; Rechtskurve, rechts abbiegen. 3 • dénué de sens, confus; meaningless,
Category: Sign, Symbol. confused; bedeutungslos, verwirrt.
kinibolotigi Nom. ailier droit; right-winger; rechte kininkininkan paroles dénuées de sens.
Flügelstürmer, Rechtsaussen. meaningless words. bedeutungslose Worte.
kinin [í] Nom. riz (préparé), et type de préparation kininsira [í] Morphemes: kinin-si-ra. Nom. reste du
1
pour les céréales (cuites en grains ou en plat de riz (ou mil...) de la veille au soir;
brisures); rice (prepared), and type of leftover rice dish (or millet...) from the night
preparation for cereals (cooked in grains or before; übrig gebliebenes Reisgericht (oder
broken); Reis (zubereitet) und Hirse...) vom Vorabend.
Zubereitungsart für Getreide (ganz oder kininyanfan [í] Morphemes: kinin-yanfan. Nom.
gebrochen gekocht). Kinin mɔna. Le riz est
droite, côté droit; right, right side; rechts,
cuit. The rice is cooked. Der Reis ist gekocht.
rechte Seite. synonyme: kinin.
2
kabakinin plat de maïs en grains. corn kernel
dish.
kinkankin [í-à-í] Nom. cri de joie; cry of joy; Schrei
der Freude, Freudenschrei. Ɲɛ min tun tɛ
kinin [í] Jula: kini. Nom. droite, la droite; right;
2
dolo ye, n'o ye kalo ye, a ko kinkankin.
Rechte, rechts, rechte Seite. i kinin fɛ à droite.
L’œil qui ne voyait pas une étoile pousse des
on your right. zu deiner Rechten. a kininsen
cris de joie en voyant la lune. (proverbe). The
sa jambe droite. his right leg. sein rechtes eye that did not see a star cries out with joy
Bein. synonyme: kininyanfan. when it sees the moon. (proverb). Das Auge,
kinin tintinnan Jula: kini tintinnan. Nom. accent das keinen Stern gesehen hat, schreit vor
Freude, wenn es den Mond sieht. (Sprichwort).
aigu; acute accent; steigender Akzent. é, ó, ú,
á, í Category: Grammar.
kintigi [ì] Morphemes: kin-tigi. variante: kinkuntigi.
Nom. chef du quartier; chief of the town
kininbolo 1 [í-í-ó-ó] Jula: kinibolo. section; Quartier Chef.
Morphemes: kinin-bolo. Nom. main droite; kira [í-á] synonyme: alakira, nabi. Nom. prophète;
right hand; rechte Hand. Fara kininbolo fɛ.
prophet; Prophet. Category: Person.
Tourne à droite. turn right. rechts abbiegen. synonyme: ki.
Category: Body.
kiramantonw n.comp. les disciples du prophète
kininbolo [í] Jula: kinibolo.
2
Mohamed; the disciples of the Prophet
Morphemes: kinin-bolo. Nom. côté droite, main
Mohammed; Jünger / Nachfolger des
droite; right side, right hand; rechte Seite, Propheten Mohammed.
rechte Hand, rechts. I bɛ faran i kininbolo fɛ.
kiraya Morphemes: kira-ya. 1 • Nom. prophétie,
Tu tournes à droite. Turn right. Zweige rechts
ab.
condition de prophète; prophecy, condition
of prophet; Prophetie, Prophezeiung, Zustand
kinini Emprunt de : français. Nom. quinine; quinine; des Propheten. kiraya kɛ prophétiser.
Malaria Medikament (Art). Category: Treat prophesy. prophezeien.
disease.
2 • Verbe. envoyer, commissionner; send,
kininkana [ì-ì] variante: nkininkana. Verbe. appoint; senden, beauftragen. N ye Musa
1 • marcher en se balançant de manière peu kiraya ka taa Bamakɔ. J'ai envoyé Moussa en
gracieuse, tituber; walk ungraciously swaying, commission à Bamako. I sent Moussa on a
stumble; unansehnlich schaukelnd gehen, commission to Bamako. Ich habe Moussa im
herumstolpern. Dɔlɔminna bɛ kininkana. Auftrag nach Bamako geschickt.
L'ivrogne avance en titubant. The drunkard
kirɛtigɛla [í] Nom. juge, juriste; judge, lawyer.
staggers forward. Der Trunkenbold stolpert
vorwärts.
Category: Government, Worker, occupation.
synonyme: kititigɛla, sariyatigɛla.
2 • sans queue ni tête; meaningless, confused;
bedeutungslos, verwirrt. kininkanakuma kiri vt. appeler; call; rufen.
1
paroles incompréhensibles. incomprehensible
words. unverständliche Worte.
29/01/2026 403

kiri kirikasa
kiri [í] variante: kiiri, kiti. Nom. 1 • jugement, kiribilen [í] variante: kiri, nkiri, nkiribilen. Nom.
2
procès, justice; judgment, trial, justice; Urteil, poisson-chat rouge; upside-down catfish;
Prozeß, Gerechtigkeit. Kiri in tigɛra ten. Le Fiederbartwels. Kiribilen kɛlɛkɛlɛji ka fisa
jugement a été rendu ainsi. The judgment was kosɛbɛ ! Ce poisson-chat rouge à la sauce
rendered thus. Das Urteil wurde so gefällt. U pimentée est délicieux ! This red catfish with
ni mɔgɔ tɛ bɔ kiri la... Ils sont toujours en spicy sauce is delicious! Dieser rote Wels mit
procès... They are still on trial... Sie stehen scharfer Soße ist köstlich! Category: Fish.
immer noch vor Gericht... E sɔn kɔrɔ bɛ kiri synodontis violaceus.
goya i la. Tes fautes anciennes te nuisent en kiriden [í] Nom. accusé; accused; beschuldigt. ...
justice. (proverbe). Your old faults harm you in kiriden ka kan ka jalaki... ... on doit donner
justice. (proverb). Deine alten Fehler tort à l'accusé... ... the accused must be proven
schaden dir in der Gerechtigkeit. (Sprichwort). wrong... ... der Angeklagte muß beschuldigt
synonyme: kiti. werden...
2 • consentir, accepter, autoriser; consent, kirifuntun [í] Nom. 1 • querelleur; quarrelsome
accept, authorize; zustimmen, akzeptieren,
person; der Streitsüchtige.
genehmigen. An kirila n'o ye. Nous acceptons
synonyme: balawumɔgɔ, sabulamɔgɔ.
cela. We accept this. Wir akzeptieren dies.
2 • difficultés, problèmes, embarras;
kiri tigɛ expr. juger, rendre (justice); judge; richten, difficulties, problems, embarrassments;
urteilen, verurteilen. Schwierigkeiten, Probleme, Verlegenheit.
kiribi [í-í-í] Nom. souffre; sulphur, brimstone; Basa bɔra ka bin jiri la, a bɛ kirifuntun na.
1
Le margouillat est tombé de l'arbre, il est dans
Schwefel. synonyme: kibiriki.
les difficultés. (proverbe). The lizard has
kiribi [ì-ì] Verbe. 1 • s'enivrer, se soûler; get drunk; fallen from the tree, it is in trouble. (proverb).
2
sich betrinken. A kiribilen don. Il est ivre. He
Die Echse ist vom Baum gefallen, sie steckt in
Schwierigkeiten. (Sprichwort).
is drunk. Er ist betrunken.
2 • s'empiffrer; stuff oneself; stopfen. kirika [ì-ì] Nom. 1 • billet de mille (ou 5000) francs;
kiribifura [ì-ì-ì] Nom. drogue; drug; Droge.
Thousand (or 5000) franc note; Tausend-
(oder 5000-) Franken-Note. kirika kelen cinq
Kiribifura ye cɛ bɔ mɔgɔya la, k'a kɛ bagan
mille francs. five thousand francs. fünftausend
ye. La drogue a retiré à cet homme son
Franken. A san kirika naani. Achète-le à
humanité, et en a fait une bête. The drug has
4000 francs. Buy it for 4000 francs. Kaufen
taken away his humanity, and made him a
Sie es für 4000 Franken.
beast. Die Drogen haben diesem Mann seine
2 • mille francs (en billets ou en pièces); one
Menschlichkeit genommen und ihn zu einem
thousand francs (in notes or coins); eintausend
Biest gemacht.
Franken (in Banknoten oder Münzen).
kiribikaraba [ì-ì-ì] 1 • Nom. bagatelle; bagatelle, Category: Finance.
trifle; Kleinigkeit, Bagatelle. kirikara [ì-ì] variante: kisikasa. Nom. sans qualité,
2 • Nom. chose vaine, sottise; vain thing,
sans valeur, sans importance; without quality,
foolishness, nonsense; Vergebliches,
without value, without importance; ohne
Dummheit, Unsinn. A' tɛ kiribikaraba dabila
Qualität, ohne Wert, ohne Bedeutung. fɛn
de wa ? Vous n’allez pas arrêter vos sottises ?
kirikaraw insectes (et petites bestioles).
You’re not going to stop your nonsense? Sie
Insects (and small critters). Insekten (und
hören nicht auf, Ihren Unsinn zu erzählen?
kleine Tiere). dumuni kirikara, mobili
mɔgɔ kiribikaraba personne sans valeur.
kirikara, mɔgɔ kirikara mauvaise nourriture,
worthless person. wertlose Person.
voiture sans valeur, personne sans importance.
3 • Verbe. gâcher, rendre vain, gâter; spoil,
bad food, car of no value, person of no
make vain; verderben, verachten. A ye ko bɛɛ
importance. schlechtes Essen, wertloses Auto,
kiribikaraba. Il a tout gâché. He’s ruined unwichtige Person.
everything. Er hat alles ruiniert.
kirikasa [í] Nom. lutte difficile, empoignade farouche;
hard struggle, fierce grip, difficult fight;
schwerer Kampf, wilde Ergreifung,
schwieriger Kampf, heftiger Griff. Diɲɛ kɛra
kirikasa watita ye. La vie est une lutte sans
merci. Life is a merciless struggle. Das Leben
ist ein gnadenloser Kampf.
29/01/2026 404

kirikasa watita kirisɛbɛn
kirikasa watita [í-í-á-á à-í-ǎ] expr. âpre lutte; kirimisi [í] Emprunt de : français. Nom. criminel,
bitter struggle; erbitterter Kampf. Diɲɛ kɛra délinquant (populaire); criminal, delinquent
kirikasa watita ye. La vie est une lutte sans (popular); ein Verbrecher, Delinquent,
(Volksmund).
merci. Life is a relentless struggle. Das Leben
ist ein unerbittlicher Kampf. kirin [ì] 1 • vi. s’évanouir, perdre connaissance; faint,
kirikɛ [í] Nom. 1 • selle; saddle; Sattel. A ye kirikɛ lose consciousness; ohnmächtig werden, in
foni... Il détacha la selle... He untied the
Ohnmacht fallen. A kirinna. Il s’est évanoui.
saddle... Er band den Sattel los...
He fainted. Er wurde ohnmächtig.
synonyme: kɛrɛkɛ. 2 • Nom. évanouissement, syncope; blackout,
fainting, syncope; Ohnmacht, Kollaps. Den ka
2 • mouton de robe blanche et tache noire sur le
kirin juguyara ni ba ta ye. La syncope de
dos; sheep with white coat and black spot on
the back; Schaf in weißer Wolle und l'enfant fut plus grave que celle de la mère.
schwarzer Fleck auf dem Rücken. The child's syncope was more serious than that
of the mother. Die Synkope des Kindes war
kiriki
1
Nom. 1 • cric; jack; Wagenheber.
schwerwiegender als die der Mutter.
2 • grande dame ; important lady; große Dame. 3 • Nom. anesthésie; anaesthesia; Narkose,
3 • personne petite de taille mais d'une grande Betäubung, Anästhesie.
force; small person with great strength; kleine 4 • Verbe. engourdir, anesthésier, asphyxier;
Person mit viel kraft. numb, anesthetize, asphyxiate, numb;
4 • fonceur, casse-cou; go-getter, daredevil; betäuben, ersticken. Nɛnɛ y'a sen kirin. Le
Draufgänger. froid lui a engourdi les jambes. The cold has
kiriki [ì-ì] variante: jɛlakiriki. Nom. vers rouges de numbed his legs. Die Kälte hat ihre Beine taub
2
gemacht.
grande taille qu'on utilise coupés en morceaux
sur les hameçons; large red worms that we use kirinɛ [í] Emprunt de : peul. Nom. petite guitare
cut into pieces on the hooks; große rote monocorde; small single-string guitar;
Würmer, die wir verwenden, um zu fischen. kleine einsaitige Gitarre. Category: Musical
kirikiri [í] 1 • Verbe. trembler fort; shake hard; kräftig instrument.
1
schütteln. Farigan bɛ mɔgɔ bila kirikiri la. La kirinkaran [í] Verbe. 1 • laisser inerte; leave inert;
fièvre fait trembler. The fever makes you inaktiv lassen, bewegungslos. Jakuma
tremble. Das Fieber läßt einen zittern. kirinkaranna de. Le chat est resté inerte. The
2 • Verbe. s'agiter, gigoter; fidget; zappeln. cat remained inert. Die Katze blieb
3 • Nom. tremblement; trembling; Zittern. bewegungslos.
kirikiri [í] variante: nkirikiti. Adverbe. très noir; very 2 • traîner; drag; ziehen. Ni i y'i kirinkaran, án
2
black; sehr schwarz. A ka fin kirikiri ! C'est t'i kɔnɔ. Si tu traînes, on ne t'attend pas. If you
très noir ! It's very dark! Es ist sehr dunkel! don't come quickly, we won't wait for you.
danfinwulu kirikiri un chien complètement Wenn Sie nicht bald kommen werden wir nicht
auf Sie warten.
noir. a completely black dog. ein komplett
schwarzer Hund. kirinnan [ì-ì] Nom. produit anesthésique; anesthetic
kirikirimasyɛn variante: kilikilimasyɛn. Nom. product; anästhetische Mittel. ... furakɛlaw bɛ
épilepsie; epilepsy; Epilepsie. se ka kirinnan kɛ a la. ... le personnel
Category: Disease. soignant peut aussi lui administrer des produits
synonyme: warawulenɲama, bolikabin, anesthésiques. ... the nursing staff may also
takabin, bɔkabin, binnibana, administer anesthetic products. ... kann das
Pflegepersonal auch Anästhetika
ncikunbaɲama, warabilenɲama, serikaja,
verabreichen.
talonkabinbana.
kirisɛbɛn [í] Nom. plainte écrite, plainte en justice;
kirikirimasyɛntɔ Nom. épileptique; the epileptic;
written complaint, legal complaint;
der Epileptiker. Kirikirimasyɛntɔ, sarati si t'a schriftliche Beschwerde, gerichtliche Klage.
la a binni na... L’épileptique, il n'y a pas de ...kirisɛbɛn 95 ye ɲɔgɔn sɔrɔ kiritigɛlaw
règle pour ce qui concerne les moments où il bolo... ...95 plaintes ont été déposées auprès
tombe... The epileptic, there is no rule des juges... ...95 complaints were filed with the
regarding the times when he falls... Für den judges... ... 95 Beschwerden wurden bei den
Epileptiker gibt es keine Regel bezüglich der Richtern eingereicht...
Zeitpunkte, zu denen er stürzt ...
Category: Sick.
29/01/2026 405

kirisi kisɛ
kirisi Variant: kilisi. 1 • Nom. incantations, formule kiriwu [í] Adverbe. bruit de détonation; bang, shooting
magique; incantations, magic incantation; noise; Geräusch der Detonation. Donso
Inkarnationen, Beschwörungen. ka kirisi karamɔgɔ ye dafila fan fila bɛɛ konkon:
durusi apprendre une formule secrète par kiriwu ! K ! Le maître chasseur déchargea les
cœur. learn a secret formula by heart. eine deux coups de son fusil: pan ! pan ! The master
Geheimformel auswendig lernen. hunter fired both shots of his rifle: pan! pan!
synonyme: kilisi. Der Meisterjäger feuerte zwei Schüsse aus
2 • Verbe. préparer à l'aide d'incantation; seinem Gewehr ab: Knall! Knall!
prepare with the help of incantations; mit synonyme: doloo, tuyi, doyi.
Beschwörungen vorbereiten. tulu nin kirisi ka kiriyɔn Emprunt de : français. Nom. crayon; pencil;
bila
Bleistift. Category: Tool.
kiritigɛ [í] Morphemes: kiri-tigɛ. Nom. procès, kiriyɔndabɔnan Nom. taille-crayon; pencil
jugement; trial, judgment; Prozeß, Urteil.
sharpener; Spitzer, Bleistiftspitzer.
Kiritigɛw bɛ kɛ faransikan de la... Les procès Category: Tool, Learn.
se déroulent en français. Trials are conducted
kiriyɔnkisɛtanan Nom. porte-mine; pencil,
in French. Die Verfahren werden auf
Französisch geführt. kiritigɛ dibidibiw les
mechanical pencil; Drehbleistift,
Minenschreiber, Druckbleistift.
magouilles dans les jugements. the
Category: Tool, Learn.
machinations in judgements, the shenanigans
in the judgements. die Verschwörungen in den kiriyɔnɲɛman buwati expr. boîte de crayon de
Urteilen. synonyme: kititigɛ. couleur; box of colour pencils; Box mit
Buntstiften, Farbstiftschachtel.
kiritigɛla [í-í-í-ɛ́-á] Morphemes: kiri-tigɛ-la.
synonyme: zuzi. Nom. juge, juriste; judge,
kisɛ
1
[ì-ɛ́] comparer: falenkun. Nom. 1 • grain,
lawyer, jurist, legal expert; Richter, Jurist, graine, semence, pépin, germe, noyau; seed,
Rechtsanwalt. ...kiritigɛlaw b'o ko grain, pip, stone of fruit; Samen, Keim,
sennasumaya. ...les juges laissent traîner
Keimling, Kern. ɲɔkisɛ, malokisɛ grain de
mil, grain de riz. grain of millet, grain of rice.
l'affaire. ...the judges let the case drag on.
Hirsekorn, Reiskorn. Bana caman kisɛ bɛ
...die Richter ließen den Fall in die Länge
ziehen. Category: Person. sɔrɔ ji de la. Les germes de beaucoup de
maladies se trouvent dans l’eau. The germs of
kiritigɛso [í] Morphemes: kiri-tigɛ-so. Nom.
many diseases are found in water. Im Wasser
tribunal, cour de justice; court, court of justice;
finden sich die Keime vieler Krankheiten.
Gericht, Gerichtshof.
Category: Agriculture, Parts of a plant.
kiritikarata [ì-ì-ì] Nom. 1 • chose bizarre, chose synonyme: falenkun.
effrayante; weird thing, scary thing; seltsame 2 • lame; blade; Klinge. murukisɛ lame de
Sache, beängstigende Sache. ... fɛn couteau. knife blade. Messerklinge.
kiritikarata ninnu, i bɛ minnu ye su fɛ. ... 3 • balle, plomb (de chasse); bullet;
des choses bizarres, comme tu en vois en rêve Gewehrkugel. A ka kisɛw tun tɛ sogo jɛ. Ses
la nuit. ... strange things, as you dream at plombs ne manquaient aucune bête. His lead
night. ... seltsame Dinge, wie du sie nachts was not missing any beast. Seine Kugeln
träumst. verfehlten kein einziges Tier.
2 • chose sans importante, babiole;
kisɛ [ì-ɛ̀] adj.pred. 1 • zélé, actif, brave, ardent au
unimportant thing, bauble; unwichtige Sache, 2
Spielerei.
travailleur, courageux; zealous, active,
hard-working; eifrig, aktiv sein, viel arbeiten,
kirititi Adverbe. très sombre et menaçant; very dark mutig. Cɛ kisɛ, cɛ jitɔ un homme courageux,
and threatening; sehr dunkel und bedrohlich. un homme peureux. a brave man, a fearful
Kaba finnen kirititi ! Le ciel est très sombre. man. ein mutiger Mann, ein ängstlicher Mann.
The sky is very dark. Der Himmel ist sehr 2 • vaillant; gallant, valiant; tapfer.
dunkel. Nsonsannin ka kisɛ ni surukuba ye. Le petit
lièvre est plus vaillant que la grande hyène.
The little hare is more valiant than the great
hyena. Der kleine Hase ist tapferer als die
große Hyäne.
29/01/2026 406

kisɛ kisibikasaba
kisɛ [ì] Nom. comme second élément d'un nom kisɛman [ì-ɛ̀-ã]́ adj. zélé, ardent, vaillant (au travail),
3
compose : partie du corps, élément individuel brave, actif, active, travaillant beaucoup;
d'un ensemble, unité minimale; as the second zealous, brave, active, hard-working,
element of a compound noun: part of the body, assiduous, laborious; eifrig, aktiv, viel
individual element of a set, minimal unit; als arbeitend, fleissig, arbeitsam. Sani mɔgɔ min
zweites Element eines zusammengesetzten
ka den kisɛman wolo, i ka den garisɛgɛma
Substantivs: Körperteil, einzelnes Element
wolo. Plutôt que d'engendrer un enfant
einer Menge, minimale Einheit. Jikisɛ mana
courageux au travail, mieux vaut engendrer un
pan ka burun mɔgɔ min kan... Celui sur qui
enfant chanceux (proverbe). Rather than
tombe une goutte d’eau... The one on whom a having a brave child at work, it is better to
drop of water falls... Derjenige, auf den ein have a lucky child (proverb). Anstatt ein Kind
Wassertropfen fällt... sanjikisɛ goutte de zu zeugen, das bei der Arbeit mutig ist, ist es
pluie. raindrop. Regentropfen. ɲinkisɛ dent. besser, ein Kind zu zeugen, das Glück hat
tooth. Zahn. (Sprichwort).
kisɛ [ì] Nom. vérité, réalité, vrai, juste; truth, reality, kisɛw yɛlɛmayɔrɔ expr. réacteur nucléaire; nuclear
4
true, just; Wahrheit, Realität, wahr, gerecht. A reactor; Kernreaktor, Atomreaktor.
dalakuma ye kisɛ ye. Ce qu'il dit est la vérité. kisɛya [ɩ̀-ɛ̀] Morphemes: kisɛ-ya. 1 • Nom. courage,
What he says is the truth. Was er sagt, ist die ardeur au travail, vaillance; energy, courage;
Wahrheit. O ntalen ye kisɛ ye. Ce conte est Energie, Fleiß, viel Arbeitseinsatz. Kisɛya de
vrai. This tale is true. Diese Geschichte ist y'a tɛmɛ fadenw kan. C'est sa vaillance qui
wahr. O jateminɛ bɛ kisɛ kan... Ces lui a fait supplanter ses rivaux. It was his
observations sont justes... These observations bravery that made him outshine his rivals. Es
are correct... Diese Beobachtungen sind war seine Tapferkeit, die ihn dazu brachte,
richtig... synonyme: lasagafi. seine Rivalen zu verdrängen.
kisɛbarika Nom. énergie nucléaire; nuclear energy, 2 • Verbe. être ardent, être travailleur, être
courageux, être vaillant ; be ardent, be
nuclear power; Kernenergie, Atomenergie,
hard-working, be courageous, be valiant ;
Atomkraft.
eifrig sein, fleißig sein, mutig sein, tapfer sein.
kisɛbarika kuran dilanni expr. production A kisɛyara. Il est vaillant ! He is valiant! Er ist
d’électricité par énergie nucléaire ; nuclear tapfer!
electricity production; Stromerzeugung aus kisi [í-í] Emprunt de : arabe. 1 • vt. sauver,
der Kernenergie.
1
préserver, protéger; save, preserve, protect;
kisɛbɔtuma Nom. montaison; rising; Aufstieg. retten, bewahren, schützen. A y’an kisi saya
Category: Agriculture. ma. Il nous a sauvé de la mort. He saved us
kisɛkisɛ [ì-ɛ́-ì-ɛ́] variante: kisɛkisɛnin. Verbe. from death. Er rettete uns vor dem Tod. Ala k'i
1 • être couvert de petits boutons; be covered in kisi bana jugu tɔɔrɔ ma. Que Dieu te protège
small pimples; mit kleinen Pickeln bedeckt des souffrances causées par des maladies. May
sein. A fari kisɛkisɛlen don. Son corps est God protect you from suffering caused by
couvert de petits boutons. His body is covered disease. Gott schütze dich vor den Leiden, die
with small pimples. Sein Körper ist mit kleinen durch Krankheiten verursacht werden.
Pickeln bedeckt. Category: Disease. 2 • Nom. vie; life; Leben.
2 • petits boutons, bourbouille, boutons de kisi [í] Verbe. souhaiter quelque chose à quelqu'un;
2
chaleur; small buds, heat-rush; kleine
wishing someone something; jemandem etwas
Knöpfchen, Hautausschlag wegen der Hitze.
wünschen. I ka kan ka mɔgɔ kisi ni ɲuman
kisɛkunukɔnɔ Nom. oiseau granivore; granivorus
ye. On doit souhaiter du bien aux gens. We
bird; Körnerfresser. Category: Bird. must wish people well. Man muß den
Menschen Gutes wünschen.
kisibaga Morphemes: kisi-baga. Nom. sauveur;
saviour, savior; Retter, Befreier.
Category: Person.
kisibikasaba [ì-ì-ì] 1 • Verbe. mélanger (races,
espèces...); mix (breeds, species...); mischen
(Rassen, Arten...)
29/01/2026 407

kisili kiwe
2 • Nom. travail bâclé (bien fait à certains kitisanla [í-í-á-á] synonyme: kititigɛ dɛmɛbaga,
endroits, mal fait à d'autres), faire tant bien que
lafasabaga, avoka. Nom. avocat; advocate;
mal; sloppy work (well done in some places,
Anwalt.
not well done in others), doing both good and
bad; schlampige Arbeit (an manchen Stellen kititigɛ [í-í-í-ɛ́] synonyme: kiti. Nom. audience,
gut gemacht, an anderen schlecht gemacht),
justice, procès, jugement; audience, justice,
das Beste wie möglich machen. Baara trial, lawsuit, case; Audienz, Publikum,
kisibikasabalen bɛ mɔgɔ tɔgɔ tiɲɛ. Le Gericht, Gerichtsverfahren, Prozess.
travail bâclé déconsidère quelqu'un. Sloppy synonyme: kiritigɛ.
work brings someone into disrepute.
kititigɛ dɛmɛbaga Nom. avocat; advocate; Anwalt.
Schlampige Arbeit bringt jemanden in Verruf.
Category: Worker, occupation.
kisili Morphemes: kisi-li. Nom. salut; salvation;
kititigɛbolo synonyme: kititigɛkunda. Nom.
Rettung, Errettung. kisili sɔrɔ être sauvé. to be
juridiction, tribunal; jurisdiction, courts;
saved. gerettet sein.
Gerichtsbarkeit, Rechtsprechung, Gerichtshof.
kisin [ì] Verbe. être dur, durci; to be hard, hardened;
kititigɛbolow Nom. institutions judiciaires ; judicial
hart sein, verhärtet sein. A tɛgɛkɔ nɔgɔlen
institutions; Gerichtsinstanzen.
don fo k'a kisin. Il a le dos des mains dur de
crasse. The backs of his hands are hard with
kititigɛda ka latigɛli variante: kitigɛda ka latigɛli.
dirt. Seine Handrücken sind hart vor Schmutz. Nom. décision de justice; adjudication,
decision of the law court; Gerichtsentscheid,
kitabu [ì-à-ú] Emprunt de : arabe. Nom. livre
Gerichtsbeschluss.
(spécialement la Bible ou le Coran); book (esp.
kititigɛla Morphemes: kiti-tigɛ-la. Nom. juge; judge;
the Bible or Qur’an); Buch, heiliges Buch, der
Koran, die Bibel. ka kitabu bayɛlɛma traduire Richter. Category: Worker, occupation.
un livre. translate a book. ein Buch
synonyme: kirɛtigɛla.
übersetzen. Category: Learn. kititigɛlakulu synonyme: kitibolo. Nom. la cour,
kiti [í-í] Emprunt de : arabe. synonyme: kititigɛ. tribunal; Court of law, tribunal; Gericht,
1 • Nom. jugement, procès, justice; judgment, Gerichtshof.
trial, justice, trial, lawsuit; Gericht, Prozess, kititigɛlaw Nom. jury; jury; Geschworenen,
Urteil, Recht, Gerichtserfahren.
Schwurgericht, .
synonyme: kiri.
2
kititigɛlaw ka minisiriso Nom. ministère de la
2 • Verbe. consentir, accepter, autoriser; allow,
justice; ministry of Justice; Justizministerium.
accept, authorise; einverstanden sein,
akzeptieren, bewilligen. Category: Government.
kitibali fagali Nom. exécution extrajudiciaire; illegal kititigɛɲuman synonyme: kititigɛda, tilenninya,
execution; gesetzwidrige Hinrichtung. hɔɔrɔnya. Nom. justice; justice; Gerechtigkeit.
kitibolo [í-í-ó-ó] synonyme: kititigɛlakulu.
Bɛn - ɲataga - kititigɛɲuman Unité - progrès
- Justice. Unity - Progress - Justice. Einheit -
variante: kitibolo fɔlɔ. Nom. court, tribunal;
Fortschritt - Gerechtigkeit.
court of law, tribunal; Gericht, Tribunal.
kititigɛsira Nom. procédure, procédure judiciaire;
kitibolo ɲɛmɔgɔ Nom. président du tribunal;
proceedings, procedure; Verfahren,
presiding judge; Gerichtsvorsteher. Vorgehen, Arbeitsweise.
kitifanga synonyme: sariyatigɛkunda. Nom. pouvoir kititigɛso Nom. palais de justice, cour de justice,
judiciaire; judiciary; Justizgewalt. tribunal; law court; Gerichtshof.
kitikiti [í] Adverbe. très sale, très noir; very dirty, very Category: Building.
black; sehr schmutzig, sehr schwarz. A kiwe [é] synonyme: tatugukɔnɔ. variante: kiwɛ.
nɔgɔlen kitikiti ! C'est très sale ! It's very Nom. guêpier à gorge rouge; red-throated
dirty! Es ist sehr schmutzig! A finna kitikiti ! bee-eater; Bienenfresser. Category: Bird.
C'est très noir ! It's very dark! Es ist sehr merops bulocki. synonyme: tatugukɔnɔ.
dunkel! synonyme: kotokoto.
kitilon Morphemes: kiti-lon. Nom. jour de jugement;
judgment day; Gerichtstag.
kitiɲini comparer: sɛbɛtigɛ. Nom. plainte, requête;
complaint, request; Beschwerde, Begehren,
Anliegen. synonyme: sɛbɛtigɛ.
29/01/2026 408

kiyama ko
kiyama [í] variante: kuyama. Nom. 1 • jour du ko [ò] 1 • vt. laver, nettoyer (avec un liquide);
2
jugement dernier; judgment day; Jüngster wash, clean (with liquid); waschen, reinigen
Tag, Tag des jüngsten Gerichts. Ala kana án (mit Flüssigkeit). fani ko faire la lessive. wash
nimisa kiyama don. Dieu ne fasse pas que the clothes. Die Wäsche waschen. mobili ko
nous regrettions au jour du jugement dernier. laver la voiture. wash the car. Das Auto
God do not let us regret the day of judgment. waschen. Bolo fila bɛ ɲɔgɔn ko ka jɛ. Les
Gott möge machen daß wir am Tag des deux mains se lavent mutuellement.
Gerichts nichts zu bereuen haben. (proverbe). Both hands wash each other.
synonyme: alikiyamalon, laharadon, jɔdon, (proverb). Beide Hände waschen sich
jamajɔdon, siratu. gegenseitig. (Sprichwort).
2 • l'au-delà; the afterlife; das Jenseits. Jamu tɛ 2 • Verbe. se laver, baigner; wash oneself, bath;
kuyama. Il n'y a pas de nom de famille dans
sich waschen, baden. A bi kora. Il est en train
l'autre vie. (proverbe). There is no surname in
de se laver. He is washing. Er ist daran sich zu
the other life. (proverb). Es gibt keinen
waschen.
Nachnamen im anderen Leben. (Sprichwort). 3 • Verbe. fabriquer (une boisson); make (a
synonyme: laharaso, nɛɛmaso. drink); herstellen (ein Getränk). Jiriden kolen
bɛ kɛ a ye... On en fait du jus de fruits, avec de
ko [ó] 1 • pred. dire, dire que, parler, (prédicat de
1 l'eau... We make fruit juice with water... Wir
parole introduisant le discours direct et
machen Fruchtsaft mit Wasser...
indirect); say, that, speak, (speech predicate
4 • Verbe. circoncire, exciser; circumcise,
introducing direct and indirect speech); sagen,
excise; beschneiden. ... ni e bolokora, e ka
daß, sprechen, (Wort-Prädikat, das direkte und
indirekte Rede einführt). I ko di ? Que dis-tu ? teli ka a sɔrɔ ka tɛmɛ min ma ko kan. ...
What do you say? Was sagst du? A ko: «Ɛ ! K'i
celle qui a été excisée l'attrape plus facilement
que celle qui ne l'a pas été. ...the one who has
ma teri sɛbɛ sɔrɔ ban dɛ !» Il dit: « Eh ! s'est
been circumcised catches it more easily than
que tu n'as pas encore trouvé un véritable
the one who has not been circumcised. ...der
ami !». He said, "Well, you haven’t found a Beschnittene erwischt es leichter an als der
true friend yet." Er sagt: «Ach, du hast noch Unbeschnittene.
keinen richtigen Freund gefunden!». Jɔn ko
ko [ó] variante: koo. Nom. 1 • affaire, événement,
ten ? Qui dit ainsi ? Who says so? Wer sagt 3
chose, problème, fait de, ce qui concerne;
das? synonyme: barisa.
matter, happening, thing, problem; Sache,
2 • conj. conjonction : que , pour que, afin que, Ereignis, Ding, Betreff. E ko tɛ o ! Cela ne te
parce que, comme; conjunction: that, so that,
concerne pas ! This is not your concern! Das
because; Konjunktion: daß, damit, so daß. A
geht dich nichts an! Ni i ye konin kɛ a la... Si
ko a bɛ Musa kɔnɔ ko i bɛ siran. Il dit que
tu lui fais la moindre chose... If you do
Moussa pense que tu as peur. He says that anything to him... Wenn du ihr etwas antust...
Moussa thinks that you’re scared. / He says A ko ka bon a yɛrɛ ma. C'est une affaire qui le
Moussa thinks you are scared. Er sagt, daß
dépasse. It’s a case beyond him. Das ist eine
Moussa denkt, daß du Angst hättest. / Er sagt,
Sache, die ihn übersteigt.
Moussa denkt, du hast Angst. A kɔrɔ ye ko a
2 • besoin, envie, désir; need, desire;
tɛ sɔn. Cela signifie qu'il n'accepte pas. This
Bedürfnis, Verlangen, Begierde. O ko bɛ n ye.
means that he does not accept. Das bedeutet,
J'en ai besoin. I need this. Ich brauche das.
daß er nicht akzeptiert. synonyme: wa
7
.
wariko problème d'argent. money problem.
3 • conj. ne se fera pas (expression du futur Geldproblem / Frage des Geldes. I ko bɛ ne
immédiat pour une action qui ne se réalisera
ye. J'ai besoin de toi. (et: «je te désire»). I need
pas); will not happen (expression of the
you. (and: «I want you»). Ich brauche dich.
immediate future for an action that will not
(und: «Ich will dich»). denko désir d'enfant
happen); wird nicht stattfinden (Ausdruck der
unmittelbaren Zukunft einer Handlung, die (pour une femme). Desire for children (for a
nicht stattfinden wird). So ko a bɛ bin, woman). Kinderwunsch (für eine Frau).
kologɛlɛnba y'a bɛn ka a jason. Au moment 3 • fois; times; mal. yɛlɛma ko saba trois
changements. three changes. drei
où le cheval allait tomber, l'homme plein de
force se mit en dessous et l'attrapera au vol. Änderungen. ... o ma fɔ ko fila. ... ça n'a pas
Just as the horse was about to fall, the man full été dit deux fois. ... it was not said twice. ... das
of strength got under it and caught it in flight. wurde nicht zweimal gesagt.
Gerade als das Pferd zu fallen drohte, kroch
der Mann voller Kraft darunter und fing es im
Flug auf.
29/01/2026 409

ko kodonɲɔgɔnna
ko [ò] Verbe. tomber (pour la nuit); get dark; kobi [ò] Nom. 1 • Touloucouna, espèce d'arbre;
4 2
Eindunkeln, Nacht werden. Su kora. La nuit African crab-wood, also called Monkey kola;
tomba. It got dark. Es wurde Nacht. I ye su ko Uganda-Läuseholz, Touloucouna-Baum oder
kungo la bi. Aujourd'hui la nuit est tombée
Andiroba-Baum. Category: Tree. carapa
procera.
alors que tu étais encore dans la brousse.
2 • sorte de savon de fabrication locale; type of
Today it was dark while you were still in the
locally made soap; eine Art lokal hergestellter
bush. Heute ist es dunkel geworden, als du
Seife.
noch im Busch warst.
ko o ko toute chose; everything, anything; alles, alle
kobida synonyme: perefɛkitiri. Nom. préfecture;
prefecture, main city of a department;
Dinge. Ko o ko bɛ digi musocɛ la... Toute
Präfektur. Category: Government.
chose qui puisse déplaire à un époux...
Anything that might displease a husband... kodi [ó-ì] interj. n'est ce pas; isn't it, don't you,
Alles, was einem Ehemann mißfallen könnte right; nicht wahr, stimmt's, oder? Ne nɔ t'o ye,
... kodi? Ce n'est pas ma faute, n'est pas ? It’s not
koba [ó-á] synonyme: koo. Nom. événement; event; my fault, is it? Es ist nicht meine Schuld, oder?
Ereignis. Kodiwari [ɔ́-í-á-í] variante: Kɔdiwari. n.pro. Côte
kobaden [ó] Morphemes: ko-ba-den. Nom. très d’Ivoire; Ivory Coast; Elfenbeinküste.
bonne chose; very good thing; sehr gute Sache. Category: Country.
A ye kobaden kɛ án ye. Il a fait des très kodiya Verbe. plaire, susciter, faire apprécier, rendre
bonnes choses pour nous. He did very good agréable, faire aimer; like, arouse, spark off,
things for us. Er hat sehr Gutes für uns getan. give rise to, create; gefallen, erwecken,
kobafin Nom. singe vert; green monkey; grüner Affe. schmackhaft machen, aufrütteln. A ka
Category: Mammal. cercopithecus aethiops koɲumanya de y'a kodiya. C'est sa
sabaeus. synonyme: ngobanin. gentillesse qui a fait que les gens l'aiment. It
was his kindness that made people love him.
kobako [ò-á-ò] Nom. Gonolek de Barbarie; Barbary
Es war seine Freundlichkeit, die die Leute
shrike; Vogelart. Category: Bird. laniarius dazu brachte, ihn zu lieben. ... o tulu kodiyara
baarbarus. synonyme: disibilen. mɔgɔw ye... ... cette huile plut aux gens... ...
kobali [ò-á-í] Morphemes: ko-bali. adj. non-lavé; this oil pleased people... ... dieses Öl gefiel den
unwashed; ungewaschen.
Leuten...
kobaliya Morphemes: ko-bali-ya. Nom. manque de kodiyanye [ó] Morphemes: ko-di-ya-n-ye. Nom. la
passion de quelque chose, le plaisir de quelque
lavage; lack of cleaning; mangelnde
Reinigung, unsauber.
chose; the passion of something, the pleasure
of something; die Leidenschaft von etwas, die
kobasini Nom. baignoire; bath; Badewanne.
Freude an etwas. A muso kodiyanye y'a to a
Category: Building. bɔra u ka du kɔnɔ. Il est parti de sa famille à
kobɛɛdɔn [ó] Jula: kobɛɛlɔn. cause de l'amour qu'il avait pour sa femme. He
Morphemes: ko-bɛɛ-dɔn. Nom. left his family because of the love he had for
his wife. Er verließ seine Familie wegen der
1 • omniscience; omniscience; Allwissenheit.
Liebe, die er zu seiner Frau hatte.
2 • omniscient; omniscient; allwissend.
kodonɲɔgɔnna [ó] Nom. embrouille, imbroglio;
kobɛɛseere [ó] Morphemes: ko-bɛɛ-seere. Nom.
confusion, imbroglio; Verwirrung,
1 • indicateur, espion, mouchard, police
Verwicklung. ... ɲugunɲugun nana don u ni
secrète; informer, spy, snitch, secret police;
Informant, Spion, Spitzel, Geheimpolizei. ɲɔgɔn cɛ, ka kodonɲɔgɔnna daminɛ. ... des
2 • commissaire; commissioner; Kommissar.
mésententes sont apparues entre eux, les
embrouilles ont commencé. ...
kobi 1 [ò] variante: kɔbi. Verbe. baiser (populaire), misunderstandings arose between them, the
faire le coït (avec une femme); kiss troubles began. ... Unstimmigkeiten
(popular), have coitus (with a woman); küssen entstanden, die Probleme begannen.
(Volksmund), Koitus haben (mit einer Frau).
ka muso kobi baiser une femme. fuck a
woman. eine Frau ficken.
29/01/2026 410

kodɔn kogo
kodɔn [ó] Morphemes: ko-dɔn. Verbe. entendre dire, kofɔ [ó] Morphemes: ko-fɔ. Verbe. 1 • parler de,
savoir par ouï-dire, apprendre indirectement; déclarer, annoncer, faire savoir, rapporter, être
hear say, know by hearsay, learn indirectly; question de; speak about, talk about,
sagen hören, vom Hörensagen wissen, indirekt announce, make known, declare, to report,
lernen. Mɔgɔ kodɔnnen bɛ, nka i ko bɛɛ discussed; erklären, anzeigen, ankündigen,
dɔnnen tɛ. On entend parler de quelqu'un, bekanntmachen, sprechen über, erwähnt.
mais on ne sait pas tout de lui. (proverbe). We
Boloci minnu fɛn kofɔra gafe in kɔnɔ... Les
hear about someone, but we don't know vaccinations dont il a été question dans ce
everything about them. (proverb). Wir hören livret... The vaccinations discussed in this
von jemandem, wissen aber nicht alles über booklet... Die in diesem Heft erwähnten
ihn. (Sprichwort). muso dodɔnnenba une Impfungen...
femme très connue. a very famous woman. 2 • dénoncer, accuser; report, charge,
eine sehr berühmte Frau. denounce, accuse; anklagen, beschuldigen.
Mali musow ye mɔgɔw kofɔ ni barika ye...
kodɔnbaga [ó] Jula: kolɔnbaga.
Les femmes du Mali ont dénoncé
Morphemes: ko-dɔn-baga. Nom. connaisseur, vigoureusement ces personnes... Women in
savant, celui qui a la connaissance; expert, Mali have strongly denounced these people...
learned person, scholar; Kenner, Experte, Die Frauen in Mali haben diese Menschen
Gelehrte. Kodɔnbaga bɛ kodɔnbali hakili energisch angeprangert...
waga. Celui qui sait ouvre l'esprit de celui qui 3 • montrer, proposer; show, propose; zeigen,
ne sait pas. (proverbe). He who knows opens vorschlagen. Nsiiri in bɛ
the mind of he who does not know. (proverb). waleɲumandɔnbaliya taamaseere dɔw
Wer weiß, öffnet den Geist dessen, der es nicht
kofɔ. Cette histoire montre des exemples
weiß. (Sprichwort). Category: Person.
d'ingratitude. This story shows examples of
kodɔnbali [ó] Nom. 1 • ignorant, celui qui ne sait pas; ingratitude. Diese Geschichte zeigt Beispiele
ignorant, unaware, the one who does not von Undankbarkeit.
know; unwissend, der, der nicht weiß, kofɔsɛbɛ synonyme: sewe. n.comp. curriculum vitae;
Kodɔnbaga bɛ kodɔnbali hakili waga. Celui
curriculum vitae (your life story), personal
qui sait ouvre l'esprit de celui qui ne sait pas.
record, life career; Lebenslauf.
(proverbe). The one who knows opens the mind
of the one who does not know. (proverb). Der kofu 1 [ò-ú] Nom. filet de toilette; bathroom net;
Wissende öffnet den Geist des Unwissenden. Badenetz.
(Sprichwort).
kofu [ò-ú] variante: kolifu. Nom. espèce de liane,
2
2 • innocent; innocent; Unschuldige.
éponge végétale; kind of liana, vegetable
Denmisɛnnin kodɔnbali dɔ... Un petit enfant
sponge; Pflanzenart, pflanzlicher Schwamm.
innocent... An innocent little child... Ein Category: Bush, shrub. luffa cylindrica.
unschuldiges kleines Kind... synonyme: kolanfu.
3 • inexpérimenté; inexperienced; unerfahren.
kogira Nom. plante (espèce); plant sp; Pflanzenart.
kodɔnbaliya [ó] Jula: kolɔnbaliya. Nom.
Category: Bush, shrub. alchornea cordifolia.
1 • ignorance; ignorance; Unwissenheit,
Unkenntnis, Ignoranz.
kogo [ó-ó] Nom. 1 • mur (non porteur); wall (not
synonyme: fɛndɔnbaliya, ɲɛdɔnbaliya, carrying weight); frei stehende Mauer, Wand.
dɔnbaliya. kogo kan sur le mur. on the wall. auf der
Mauer. Kogoninkuru bɛɛ tɛ bɔgɔdɛsɛ ye.
2 • innocence; innocence; Unschuld.
Tous les petits bouts de murs ne sont pas signe
3 • inexpérience; inexperience;
de manque de «banco». (proverbe). All small
Unerfahrenheit. synonyme: kolɔnbaliya.
pieces of walls are not a sign of lack of
kodɔnna Jula: kolɔnna. Morphemes: ko-dɔn-na. «construction bricks». (proverb). Nicht jedes
kleine Mäuerchen ist ein Zeichen für einen
Nom. connaisseur, expert, celui qui a la
connaissance, personne avisée, savant; expert, «Baustein»-Mangel. (Sprichwort). A ka du
connoisseur, the person who knows, well kogo ka surun. Le mur de sa concession est
advised person, learned person; Kenner, bas. The wall of his compound is low. Die
Gelehrter, der welcher es weiss, Wissender, Mauer seines Gehöfts ist niedrig.
Experte. Cɛkɔrɔbaya tɛ mɔgɔ kɛ dodɔnna 2 • cinéma; cinema; Kino.
ye... La vieillesse ne fait pas d'un homme un
sage... Old age does not make a man wise...
Das Alter macht einen Mann nicht weise...
Category: Learn.
29/01/2026 411

kogobaga kojugu
kogobaga [ó] Nom. bouille de farine de mil (ou de koji [ò] Nom. 1 • eau de lavage du mil; millet
2
maïs, ou de riz, à laquelle on ajoute du washing water; Hirsewaschwasse. Koji
gingembre et du sucre); porridge made of
kumun ka di dimɔgɔ ye, nka a sakala bɛ bɔ
millet flour (or corn, or rice) to which ginger
a la. Les mouches aiment les rinçures de mil
and sugar are added; Brei aus Mehl von Hirse
(oder Mais, oder Reis) mit Ingwer und Zucker.
fermenté, mais elles y trouvent la cause de leur
mort. (proverbe). Flies like fermented millet
Kogobaga b'a to mɔgɔ bɛ dumuni kɛ. Cette
rinses, but they find it the cause of their death.
bouille ouvre l’appétit. This porridge makes
(proverb). Fliegen mögen fermentierte
you hungry. Dieser Brei macht hungrig.
Hirsespülungen, aber sie finden darin die
kogonin Nom. muret; low wall; niedrige Mauer. Ursache für ihren Tod. (Sprichwort).
Category: Building. 2 • breuvage de son de mil pour le bétail;
millet bran drink for livestock;
kogoro [ó-ó-ó] synonyme: kagana. Nom. varan de
Hirsekleiegetränk für Nutztiere. So b'i da
sable, varan de terre; Savannah Monitor; Sand
buruburu koji la. Le cheval remue le museau
Waran. Category: Reptile. synonyme: kooro .
2
dans l'eau de son. The horse wiggles its muzzle
kogosogo [ó] variante: kogoso, korokoso, in the millet bran water. Das Pferd wackelt
kosokoso, kogoyo. Adverbe. 1 • très dur mit der Schnauze im Hirsekleie Wasser.
physiquement; very hard physically; sehr hart. 3 • boisson faite de farine de mil, de piment et
Jiri in bɛ kogosogo ! Ce bois est très très dur ! de miel; Drink made of millet flour, with
This wood is very very hard! Dieses Holz ist
pepper and honey; Getränk aus Hirsemehl mit
sehr, sehr hart!
Pfeffer und Honigmehl.
2 • vigoureusement, avec force; vigorously, kojigin [ó-ì-í] Morphemes: ko-jigin. Verbe.
forcefully; energisch, kraftvoll. Cɛ in bɛ 1 • rappeler, faire se souvenir; to remember;
kogosogo ! Ce type est très vigoureux ! This sich erinnern.
guy is very vigorous! Dieser Typ ist sehr 2 • rendre l'envie de; make you want to; Lust
energisch! auf, verlangen nach. ... a bɛ Segutaa kojigin
3 • brutalement; brutally; brutal. ne kɔnɔ. ... ça me rend l'envie d'aller à Ségou.
kogoyanye [ó] Morphemes: ko-goya-n-ye. Nom. ...it makes me want to go to Ségou. ...es weckt
in mir den Wunsch, nach Ségou zu fahren.
haine, détestation; hatred; Haß. ... ale tun tɛ
kuma a fɛ bilen, a ka kogoyanye fɛ. ... il ne
kojugu
1
[ó-ù-ù] Morphemes: ko-jugu. Adverbe.
1 • intensif : trop, beaucoup, excessivement,
lui parlait plus, à cause de la haine que cette
personne avait pour lui. ...he no longer spoke
très, énormément, totalement; too much,
excessively, very much, very many, totally,
to her, because of the hatred this person had
for him. ...er sprach nicht mehr mit ihr, weil
completely, intensive; zuviel, sehr viel, sehr,
diese Person ihn haßte. völlig, komplett, völlig, intensiv. N sɛgɛnna
kogwɛlɛn synonyme: gwɛlɛman. variante: kogwɛlɛ.
kojugu. Je suis trop fatigué. I’m too tired. Ich
bin sehr zu müde. I bi sigarɛti min kojugu.
n.comp. tâche pénible; difficult task; schwierige
Aufgabe.
Tu fumes trop. You smoke too much. Du
rauchst zuviel. Murunin dadiya kojugu b'a
koji Morphemes: ko-ji. Nom. l’eau avec laquelle on
1 tan fara. Trop aiguiser le petit couteau fait se
se lave; water for washing; Waschwasser. Koji
déchirer le fourreau. (proverbe). Sharpening
bi ɲɛgɛn na. L’eau pour prendre un bain est the small knife too much causes the sheath to
dans la ’salle de bains’. Water for washing is in tear. (proverb). Wenn Sie das kleine Messer
the ’bathroom’. Es hat Waschwasser im zu stark schärfen, reißt die Scheide.
Badezimmer. Boda bɛ bɔ kɔ koji nun ma. (Sprichwort).
L'anus profite de l'eau de toilette du dos. 2 • assurément, pour sûr, parfaitement;
(proverbe). The anus benefits from the water certainly, for sure, perfectly; sicherlich, ganz
from the back. (proverb). Der Anus profitiert sicher, perfekt.
vom Wasser, das vom Rücken herunterfließt 3 • tant que; as long as; solange.
(Sprichwort).
kojugu [ó-ú-ú] Nom. 1 • mauvaise action,
2
méchanceté, crime; bad deed, viciousness,
nastiness, wickedness, malice, badness, crime;
Bosheit, Gemeinheit, Verbrechen.
antonyme: koɲuman.
2 • trouble, désastre, catastrophe; trouble,
disaster, catastrophe; Unheil, Unruhen,
Katastrophe.
29/01/2026 412

kojuguba kokoroko
kojuguba [ó] synonyme: nintɔɔrɔbaga. Nom. koko synonyme: komo. Nom. espèce de plante; kind
1
terroriste; terrorist; Terrorist. of plant; Pflanze (Art). Category: Grass, herb,
kojuguba duniɲamɔgɔw fagali Nom. crime
vine. sansevieria senegambica.
contre l'humanité; crime against humanity; koko 2 [ǒ-ǒ] hémorroïdes; haemorrhoids;
Verbrechen gegen die Menschheit. Hämorrhoiden. Category: Disease.
kojugukansegila [ó] Nom. récidiviste; recidivist, synonyme: kookoo, kɔbɔ 2 , nancabɔ.
habitual offender, repeater, backslider; koko variante: kokoba, nkokoba. Nom. touraco gris;
3
Rückfälliger. plantain-eater; Schwarzschwanz-Lärmvogel.
kojugukɛla [ó] Morphemes: ko-jugu-kɛ-la. Nom. Category: Bird. crinifer piscator.
synonyme: arabuka, koroko.
malfaiteur; criminal, evildoer; Krimineller,
Verbrecher, Übeltäter. Category: Person. kokoba [ò-ò] Nom. termite (variété plus grosse que
1
synonyme: kokolonkɛla.
bagabaga); termite (variety larger than
kojugukɛɲɔgɔn [ó] Nom. complice; accomplice; bagabaga); Termite (Sorte größer als
Bagabaga).
Komplize, Mittäter.
kojugulɔnbali [ó] comparer: sɔntan, jalakitan.
kokoba
2
Nom. grand aloès; White Striped Gian;
Nom. innocent; innocent; unschuldig.
Schwiegermutterzunge. Category: Grass,
herb, vine. sansevieria liberica; sansevieria
kojuguya [ó] Nom. excès; excess; Übermaß, guineensis.
Überschuß. A kulo kojuguya y'a kan sisi. kokojuma [ò-ò] Nom. fistule; fistula; Fistel. A ka ca
D'avoir tant crié l'a enroué. Having shouted so
a la, kokojuma bɛ musomisɛnninw de la.
much made him hoarse. Nachdem er so viel
Le plus souvent, les fistules touchent de très
geschrien hatte, wurde er heiser.
jeunes femmes. Fistulas are most often
kokajɛ [ò-à] Nom. 1 • toilette bien faite; cleaning well experienced by very young women. Am
done, being clean; gut geputzt, sauber sein. häufigsten sind sehr junge Frauen von Fisteln
Bana in bɛ dɔw ka kokajɛ sa. La maladie betroffen.
empêche certains d'entre eux d'être propres. kokola [ó] Nom. teint, couleur; complexion, color;
The disease prevents some of them from being
Teint, Farbe. A kolola ka fin. Elle est de teint
clean. Die Krankheit verhindert, daß einige
noir. She is black in complexion. Sie hat einen
von ihnen sauber sind.
schwarzen Teint. A kolola ka jɛ. Elle est de
2 • propreté; cleanliness; Sauberkeit.
teint clair. She is fair-complexioned. Sie ist
3 • assainissement (de la vie publique);
hellhäutig. Category: colour.
Sanitation (of public life); Sanierung (des
öffentlichen Lebens). kokolonkɛla [ó] Morphemes: ko-kolon-kɛ-la.
kokɛbali [ó] synonyme: dagabali. adj. déconseillé; Nom. malfaiteur; criminal, perpetrator;
Übeltäter, Verbrecher, Bösewicht. Fɔlɔfɔlɔ,
advise against, dis-advise, dissuasion; abraten,
warnen vor.
kokolonkɛlaw tun bɛ bila falan kɔnɔ.
Autrefois on enfermait les malfaiteurs dans des
kokɛbaliya [ó] Morphemes: ko-kɛ-bali-ya. Nom.
grottes souterraines. Once criminals were
omission, abstention; omission, abstention; locked in underground caves. Früher wurden
Unterlassung, Enthaltung. Ni i y'a dɔn k'i t'a die Übeltäter in unterirdischen Höhlen
laban, kokɛbaliya ka fisa a labanbaliya ye. eingesperrt. synonyme: kojugukɛla.
Si tu sais que tu ne parviendras pas à bout de
kokoroko [ò-ó-ǒ-ó] variante: kokolo. Nom.
quelque chose, mieux vaut t’abstenir. If you
1
1 • griot des Peuls; Fulani soothsayer;
know that you will not succeed in something, it
is better to abstain. Wenn du weißt, daß du
Fulani-Griot.
etwas nicht schaffst, dann verzichte lieber. 2 • personne obstinée, indocile, qui ne fait que
des choses mauvaises; stubborn, indocile
kokɛla Nom. personnage, acteur; character, figure,
person who only does bad things; sturer,
personage, actor; Persönlichkeit, unfügsamer Mensch, der nur Schlechtes tut.
Schauspieler. Category: Person, Worker, Nɔgɔlen kɔrɔ iko kokoroko ! Dégoûtant
occupation.
comme un Kokoroko ! Disgusting like a
kokɛninw synonyme: tariku. Nom. histoire; history; Kokoroko! Eklig wie ein Kokoroko!
Geschichte. 3 • colporteur; pedlar, peddler; Hausierer.
kokɛtaw [ó-ɛ́-á-ù] Nom. choses à faire; things to do;
Sachen / Dinge, die zu tun sind.
29/01/2026 413

kokoroko kolafɔ
kokoroko Nom. pagne de coton à traits verts et kokunsyɛ variante: kokosyɛ. Nom. poule dont les
2
rouges; cotton cloth with green and red lines; ailes, la poitrine et la tête sont blanches et le
Stoff aus Baumwolle mit grünen und roten reste du plumage noir; hen whose wings,
Linien. breast and head are white and the rest of the
kokotɔ [ò-ò] Nom. personne souffrant d'hémorroïdes;
plumage black; Henne, deren Flügel, Brust
und Kopf weiß und der Rest des Gefieders
person suffering from hemorrhoids; Person,
schwarz ist. Category: Animal husbandry.
die an Hämorrhoiden leidet. Kokotɔ ka ca
kokura [ó-ú-á] Adverbe. encore une fois, de nouveau,
saheli fɛ. Il y a beaucoup de personnes 1
atteintes d’hémorroïdes dans le nord. There
à son tour; again; wieder, erneut, abermals. ...
are a lot of people with hemorrhoids in the o jiri fana bɛ fɔsɔnfɔsɔn kokura. ... cet arbre
north. Im Norden gibt es viele Menschen mit se fane de nouveau. ...this tree is withering
Hämorrhoiden. Category: Sick. again. ...dieser Baum verdorrt schon wieder.
kokoyo [ò-ò] comparer: nko. Nom. 1 • criquet Jama yɛlɛla kokura... Les gens se remirent à
1
rire... People started laughing again... Die
migrateur; migratory locust;
Leute fingen wieder an zu lachen ...
Wanderheuschrecke.
2 • sauterelle nocturne; nocturnal kokura 2 [ó] Nom. nouveauté; novelty, newness, new
grasshopper; nachtaktive Heuschrecke. thing; Neuheit, das Neueste, Neuerung.
Category: Insect.
kolabɛnbaga Morphemes: ko-labɛn-baga. Nom.
3 • costaud, fort et malin, débauché; tough,
organisateur; organizer; Organisator.
strong and clever, debauched; zäh, stark und
klug, ausschweifend. Cɛ in ye kokoyo ye dɛ ! kolabɛnna Morphemes: ko-labɛn-na. Nom.
Ce type est rudement fort ! This guy is really secrétaire; secretary; Sekretär, Sekretärin.
strong! Dieser Typ ist wirklich stark! synonyme: sɛbɛntigi.
kokoyo 2 [ò-ò] variante: nkokoyo. Verbe. se mettre koladegi Nom. simulation; simulation; Simulation,
sur, se coucher sur (avec le sens de «prendre»); Simulierung.
to lay on, to lie down on (with the meaning of
koladɔn [ó] Jula: kolalɔn. Morphemes: ko-la-dɔn.
“to take”); sich darauf legen, sich hinlegen
(im Sinne von „nehmen“). A y'i kokoyo n ka Verbe. 1 • avoir des nouvelles de qqn, être au
courant, entendre parler de quelqu'un; to have
nafolo kan. Il s'est couché sur mon argent. (:
news from, be aware of, hear about someone;
«il l'a détourné»). He has laid on my money. (:
auf dem Laufenden sein, von jemandem hören.
«he has diverted it»). Er hat sich auf mein Geld
A taara án t'a koladɔn. Il est parti et nous
gelegt. (: «er hat es abgezweigt»).
n'avons pas de nouvelles de lui. He left and we
kokɔrɔbɔ Nom. preuve; proof, piece of evidence; haven't heard from him. Er ist gegangen und
Beweis. wir haben nichts von ihm gehört.
kokulereke variante: kekelereke. interj. cocorico; synonyme: lakomɛn.
crowing; Kikeriki. Dononkɔrɔ kasikan ye
2 • soupçonner; suspect; verdächtigen.
Jakumamori, a bɛ tiɲɛ kɛ ka a sɔrɔ a ma
kokulereke ye. Le cri du coq, c'est cocorico.
koladɔn. L'hypocrite, il est malfaisant sans
The rooster's cry is «coorico». Der Schrei des
Hahns ist kikeriki.
qu'on puisse le soupçonner. The hypocrite is
evil without anyone suspecting it. / The
kokun 1 [ó] Morphemes: ko-kun. Nom. activiste, hypocrite, he is evil without anyone can
dirigeant, chef; activist, leader; Aktivist, suspect. Der Heuchler ist böse, ohne daß es
Anführer. A nana i yɛrɛ kɛ kokun ye. Il vint jemand ahnt. / Der Heuchler, er ist böse, ohne
se poser en chef. He came to pose as leader. Er daß man ihn verdächtigen kann.
trat als Anführer auf. synonyme: lakodɔn.
kokun [ǒ-ǔ] Nom. 1 • aigle pêcheur; fish eagle; kolafɔ [ó] Morphemes: ko-la-fɔ. Verbe. parler de,
2
Fischadler. Jigon tɛ se kokun muso kɔrɔ. Le parler pour; to speak of, to speak for, talk
calao ne peut prendre en charge la femme de about; sprechen von, sprechen für. I ye n ka
l'aigle pêcheur. (proverbe). The horn-bill finin kolafɔ wa? As-tu parlé de mes habits ?
cannot take care of the fish eagle's wife. Did you talk about my clothes? Hast du über
(proverb). Der Nashornvogel kann sich nicht meine Kleidung gesprochen?
um die Frau des Fischadlers kümmern.
(Sprichwort). Category: Bird. cuncuma vocifer
clamans.
2 • pélican; Pelican; Pelikan. Category: Bird.
pelecanus sp.. synonyme: kulanjan.
29/01/2026 414

kolajɛ koliji
kolajɛ [ó] Verbe. 1 • rendre visite (à une personne qui kolanfu [ò-à-ú] variante: kofu, kolifu. Nom.
n'est pas libre de ses mouvements : malade, courge-torchon, éponge végétale; kind of
prisonnier...), prendre des nouvelles; visit (a liana, vegetable sponge; Baumart,,
person who is not free to move: sick, prisoner, Pflanzenschwamm. Category: Grass, herb,
etc.), get news; besuchen (eine Person, die sich vine. luffa cylindrica. synonyme: kofu.
2
nicht frei bewegen kann: Kranker, Gefangener
usw.), Neuigkeiten erhalten. A taara a dɔgɔkɛ
kolanjan synonyme: kɔnɔbɔrɔtigi. Nom. pélican blanc,
banabagatɔ kolajɛ. Il est allé rendre visite à
pélican gris; white pelican, grey pelican;
weisser Pelikan, grauer Pelikan.
son jeune frère malade. He went to visit his
Category: Bird. pelecanus onocrotalus /
sick younger brother. Er besuchte seinen
rufescens. synonyme: konkɔnɔ, kɔsɔgɔkɔnɔ.
kranken jüngeren Bruder.
2 • examiner, espionner; examine, spy; kolaɲini [ó] Verbe. provoquer; provoke, cause;
untersuchen, spionieren. hervorrufen, verursachen. O la sa, min mana
kolajɛbaga Morphemes: ko-la-jɛ-baga. Nom. espion; ne sɔrɔ, o ye ne yɛrɛ ka kolaɲinini ye. Alors,
spy; Spion. si quelque chose m'arrive, ce sera moi-même
qui l'aurai provoqué. So, if something happens
kolakali masalabolo Nom. texte narratif; narrative
to me, it will be me who caused it. Wenn mir
text; Erzählung, Narrativ. also etwas passiert, bin ich es, der es
kolakalila Morphemes: ko-lakali-la. Nom. rapporteur, verursacht hat. synonyme: mɔgɔlaɲini,
délateur; rapporteur, informer; kankɔrɔbɔ, daraɲini, dalaɲini, darabɔ.
Berichterstatter, Informant. Ni i bɛ kɛ fana ye kolaɲinina [ó] Nom. provocateur, querelleur, agressif;
walima ni i bɛ kɛ kolakalila ye... Si tu es un
provocative, quarrelsome, aggressive;
menteur ou si tu es un rapporteur... If you are provokant, streitsüchtig, aggressiv.
a liar or if you are a gossip... Wenn Sie ein
Lügner oder ein Klatscher sind ...
kolasegi synonyme: kolakali. n.comp. compte rendu;
synonyme: naafigi, nafigi, fanayakɛla, jahili. report, review; Bericht, Protokoll.
kolakalisɛbɛ synonyme: darakantasɛbɛ. Nom. procès kolasegisɛbɛ synonyme: cikɔsegisɛbɛ. n.comp.
rapport; report; Bericht.
verbal; minutes of a meeting; Protokoll,
Bericht. kolatigɛjɛkulu Morphemes: ko-latigɛ-jɛkulu. Nom.
kolan Emprunt de : français. Nom. collant; tights, conseil d'administration, groupe de direction;
1
leggings; Strumpfhose. Category: Clothing.
Board of Directors, Management Group;
Verwaltungsrat, Gruppe der Führungskräfte.
kolan Morphemes: ko-lan. Nom. ce qui sert à laver :
2 kolɛsi Emprunt de : français. Nom. collège; secondary
savon, éponge..; what is used to wash: soap,
sponge..; Wasch-Mittel: Seife, Schwamm...
school, junior high school; Sekundarschule,
Gymnasium. Category: Learn, Building.
kolandi Nom. qui aime se mêler de ce qui ne le
koli [ó-í] synonyme: saniyali. variante: joli. Nom.
concerne pas, importun, intrigant, qui se
montre partout; who likes to get involved in 1 • désinfection, toilette; disinfection;
what does not concern him, importunate, Desinfektion. U ye u koli daminɛ. Elles
intriguing, who shows himself everywhere; der commencèrent leur toilette. They began to
sich gerne auf Dinge einläßt, die ihn nichts wash. Sie begannen sich zu waschen.
angehen, aufdringlich, intrigierend, der sich 2 • menstrues, règles; menstruation;
überall zeigt. Kolandi bɛ sa banabagatɔ ɲɛ. Menstruation, Monatsblutungen. Ni muso
L'importun, qui se mêle de tout, risque de banna koli la... Quand une femme n'a plus ses
mourir avant le malade. (proverbe). The règles... When a woman has no more periods...
importunate person, who gets involved in Wenn eine Frau ihre Periode absetzt...
everything, risks dying before the sick person. synonyme: hayida, laada.
(proverb). Der aufdringliche Mensch, der sich
auf alles einläßt, riskiert, früher zu sterben als kolifu [ò-ì-ú] Nom. éponge; sponge; Schwamm.
der Kranke. (Sprichwort). Kolandi don, ko tɛ Category: Tool.
kan a la, a tɛ kan ko la. C'est un intrigant, koliji [ò-ì-í] Nom. eau de la toilette; toilet water;
rien ne l'arrête. He's an intriguer, nothing can
Toilettenwasser. Ɲɛ kolon koliji ka ca. Il faut
stop him. Er ist ein Intrigant, nichts kann ihn
beaucoup d'eau pour laver l’œil malade.
aufhalten.
(proverbe). It takes a lot of water to wash the
sick eye. (proverb). Man braucht viel Wasser,
um das kranke Auge zu waschen.
(Sprichwort).
29/01/2026 415

kolikɛ kolobakari
kolikɛ [ò-ì-ɛ́] Nom. margouillat mâle; male lizard; 5 • couleur, teinture, constitution; colour, dye,
constitution; Farbe, Farbstoff, Konstitution. A
männliche Echse. Kolikɛ kun bilen la tête
rouge du margouillat. the red head of the
kolo ye nɛrɛmuguma ye. C'est de couleur
lizard. der rote Kopf der Echse. jaune. It is yellow. Es ist gelb. Amadiw kolo
synonyme: ndorogere. tun ka gɛlɛn. Les Amadi étaient de forte
constitution. The Amadi were strong. Die
kolikoduga [ò-ì-ò] synonyme: ɲɛbɔduga, mawulɛ.
Amadi waren stark. A kolo ka fɛgɛn. C'est
variante: koliko. Nom. vieux vautour, vieux
fragile. It's fragile. Es ist zerbrechlich.
charognard; old vulture, old scavenger; alter
Category: colour.
Geier, alter Aasfresser. pseudogyps africanus.
6 • essentiel; the essential; die Hauptsache. I
kolila [ò-ì] Morphemes: koli-la. Nom. 1 • personne ka kuma bɛ kolo kan. Tu as parlé vrai. You
qui lave le linge, lavandier, lavandière; person were right. Du hast recht. ka balo a kolo la
who washes clothes, washerman,
vivre indépendamment. live independently.
washerwoman; Person, die Wäsche wäscht,
unabhängig leben.
Wäscher, Wäscherin.
7 • radical (grammaire); radical (grammar);
2 • dribbleur (football, basket...); dribbler
Stamm oder Wurzel (Grammatik).
(football, basketball, etc.); Dribbler (Fußball,
Category: Grammar.
Basketball usw.)
kolo [ó-ó] Nom. antilope (espèce), biche; antelope
kolilan Morphemes: koli-lan. Nom. lotion, médicament 2
sp; Antilope (Art). Category: Mammal.
sous forme liquide dont on s'enduit le corps;
lotion, medicine in liquid form with which the kolo 3 synonyme: koro. 1 • vt. éduquer, dresser,
body is coated; Lotion, Arzneimittel in soumettre, dompter; train, discipline, to break
flüssiger Form, mit dem der Körper bestrichen in, tame, subdue; ausbilden, disziplinieren
wird. zähmen, gefügig machen, unterwerfen.
koliyɔrɔ [ò-ì-ɔ́-ɔ́] Morphemes: koli-yɔrɔ. Nom. synonyme: kolon 5 , lakuru 3 .
douchière, lieu de toilette, salle de bains; 2 • vt. pétrir, assouplir; knead, to make supple,
shower room, toilet area, bathroom; soften; kneten, geschmeidig machen.
Duschraum, Toilettenbereich, Badezimmer. 3 • vi. obéir à, se soumettre; obey, submit;
Muso bɔra koliyɔrɔ la wula fɛ... Au soir, gehorchen, befolgen, sich unterwerfen. kolo X
quand la femme sortit de la douchière... In the ye obéir à X. obey X. X gehorchen.
evening, when the woman came out of the
shower... Abends, als die Frau aus der Dusche
kolo
4
[ó] Nom. maladie provoquée par les sorciers
kam... (utilisant un poison à distance); disease caused
by sorcerers (using a poison at a distance);
kolo See main entry: .[ó-ó] Nom. 1 • os, arête (de
1 Krankheit, die von Zauberern verursacht wird
poisson), dent; bone, fish-bone, tooth; (mit einem Ferngift). Kolo ye mɔgɔbolo ye.
Knochen, Fischgräte, Zahn. Kolo min ye
La maladie kolo est une maladie due à un sort
namakɛ bali, wulukɛ dunfɛn tɛ. L'os qui a jeté par une personne. Kolo disease is a
tenu en échec une hyène ne peut servir de disease caused by a spell cast by a person. Die
nourriture pour le chien. (proverbe). The bone Kolo-Krankheit ist eine Krankheit, die durch
that kept a hyena in check cannot serve as food einen Zauber einer Person verursacht wird.
for the dog. (proverb). Der Knochen, der eine Category: Disease.
Hyäne in Schach hielt, kann dem Hund nicht
kolobakari [ó] Morphemes: kolo-ba-kari. adj.
als Futter dienen. (Sprichwort). Kolo t'a da
louange adressé à un Diarra, audacieux, brave,
tuguni. Il n'a plus de dents. He no longer has
fort (terme de louange, griot); word of praise
any teeth. Er hat keine Zähne mehr. addressed to a Diarra, bold, brave, strong
2 • partie dur de quelque chose; hard part of (word of praise, griot); Lob an Diarra
something; harter Teil von etwas. dugukolo, gerichtet, kühn, mutig, stark (Begriff des
sankolo le sol, le ciel. the ground, the sky. der Lobes, griot). Jara cɛman ni kolobakari,
Boden, der Himmel. musoman ni nsɛmɛsusu. Les hommes
3 • noyau; kernel; Kern. nɛrɛkolo noyau de Diarra brisent les grands os, les femmes Diarra
néré. néré kernel. Kern der Nere Frucht.
sucent la moelle. Diarra men break big bones,
Diarra women suck marrow. Die
4 • texture, essence, essentiel; texture, essence,
Diarra-Männer zerschmettern große Knochen,
essential; Textur, Essenz, Wesentliches.
die Diarra-Frauen saugen das Mark.
29/01/2026 416

kolobilen kologɛlɛn
kolobilen [ó] Nom. couleur rouge, ocre, rougeâtre; koloci [ó] Morphemes: kolo-ci. n.comp.
red, ochre, reddish colour; rot, ocker, rötlich. 1 • drépanocytose, rhumatisme;
Cɛ in la finin caman ye kolobilen ye. La drepanocytosis, rheumatism; Art
plupart des vêtements de cet homme sont Blutkrankheit, Rheuma. Category: Disease.
rouges. Most of this man's clothes are red. Die 2 • hypotension, anémie; hypo-tension,
meisten Kleidungsstücke dieses Mannes sind anaemia; Hypotonie, Anämie. ... jolicaya ni
rot.
jolidɔgɔya, n'o bɛ weele ko tansɔn ni
kolobokalaba [ò-ò-ò] 1 • Verbe. être négligé, koloci... ... l'hypertension et l'hypotension,
désordonné; to be neglected, untidy, sloppy; c'est à dire la tension et l'anémie... ... high
vernachlässigt, unordentlich sein, schlampig. blood pressure and hypotension, that is to say
A b'a yɛrɛ kolobokalaba fininko la. Il est the tension and anemia... ... Bluthochdruck
négligé dans sa tenue. He is sloppy in his und Hypotonie, also Blutdruck und Anämie...
outfit. Er ist schlampig in seinem Outfit. A Category: Disease.
dalakuma ye kolobokalaba ye. Ses paroles koloden [ó] Morphemes: kolo-den. Nom. 1 • petit os,
sont désordonnées. His words are disordered. osselet; small bone; kleiner Knochen. O ye
Seine Worte sind ungeordnet. koloden sigisigilen ye ɲɔgɔnka ka wuli. Ce
2 • Verbe. traîner les pieds (par manque de sont les petits os emboîtés les uns dans les
bonne volonté); dragging your feet (for lack autres. These are the little bones nested inside
of good will); Nachlässigkeit (aus Mangel an each other. Das sind die kleinen, ineinander
gutem Willen). k'i kolobokalaba mɔgɔw kɔfɛ verschachtelten Knochen.
traîner les pieds derrière les gens. dragging 2 • vertèbre; vertebra; Wirbel. Galakakolow
your feet behind people. Deine Füße hinter den
ni kolodenw jɛlen de ye disisansara ye. Les
Leuten herziehen.
côtes forment avec les vertèbres la cage
3 • Adverbe. de manière négligente, par
thoracique. The ribs form the thoracic cage
négligence, bêtement; carelessly, stupidly;
with the vertebrae. Die Rippen bilden
nachlässig, dumm. Ni i ye juru kolobokalaba
zusammen mit den Wirbeln den Brustkorb.
don kɔlɔn kɔnɔ, a bɛ bɔ ni
kolofɛgɛnya [ó] Verbe. user, diminuer d'épaisseur;
kolobokalabajinin ye. Si tu fais descendre
wear out, decrease in thickness; verschleißen,
négligemment le seau dans le puits, il
nehmen an Dicke ab, abnutzen. A
remontera avec le peu d'eau retiré de cette
manière. (proverbe). If you lower the bucket kolofɛgɛnyara. Il a perdu du poids. He lost
carelessly into the well, it will rise again with weight. Er verlor an Gewicht.
the little water removed in this way. (proverb). kologɛlɛn [ó] Jula: kologwɛlɛn.
Wenn Sie den Eimer unvorsichtig in den
variante: kolomagɛlɛn. adj. 1 • dur, résistant,
Brunnen absenken, steigt er mit dem wenigen
vigoureux, solide, mûr, fort; mature, strong,
dabei entnommenen Wasser wieder an.
(Sprichwort).
vigorous, solid, ripe, hard; reif, stark, hart,
solide. lannabaga kologwɛlɛn croyant mûr.
4 • Adverbe. négligeable, sans valeur;
negligible, worthless; vernachlässigbar, strong/mature believer. reifer / starker
wertlos. kolobokalabafɛn chose sans valeur. Glaubender. A kolo ka gɛlɛn sumanw na
worthless thing. wertlose Sache. banaw bolo. Il est résistant aux maladies des
kolobokalababaaraw des petits travaux. céréales. It is resistant to diseases of cereals.
small jobs. kleine Arbeiten.
Es ist resistent gegen Getreidekrankheiten.
kolobɔ [ó-ó-ɔ́] Morphemes: kolo-bɔ.
2 • pénible; painful; schmerzhaft, mühsam. N
bɛ se ka baara kologɛlɛnmanw ke;, o tɛ se
synonyme: dakɔnɔɲinw. Nom. dentition, sortie
ka digi n na. Je peux faire des travaux
des dents, mal aux dent; dentition, growing of
pénibles sans que ça me soit difficile. I can do
teeth, toothache; Gebiß, Zahnen,
Zahnschmerzen. Den binna kolobɔ la.
hard work without being difficult. Ich kann
mühsame Arbeit machen, ohne daß es mir
L'enfant commença à avoir mal aux dents. The
schwer fällt.
child began to have toothache. Das Kind
bekam Zahnschmerzen. Kolobɔ y'a den ɲɔgɛ
dɔɔnin. La sortie des dents a affaibli son
enfant. The loss of teeth weakened her child.
Der Zahnverlust schwächte ihr Kind.
Category: Body.
29/01/2026 417

kologɛlɛnya kolokari
kologɛlɛnya [ó] Jula: kologwɛlɛnya. 2 • Verbe. être ou devenir dur, solide; to be or
become hard, solid; hart, fest sein oder
variante: kolomagɛlɛnya. 1 • Nom. résistance,
werden. Ntɔrɔnw ka kan ka nuguya, k'u
solidité, force physique, robustesse;
kologirinya. Les sabots doivent être lisses, et
resistance, solidity, robustness, physical
strength; Festigkeit, Widerstandsfähigkeit, bien durs. The hooves must be smooth, and
Stabilität, Robustheit. ... a bɛ taa mere fanfɛ
very hard. Die Hufe müssen glatt und hart
sein.
kologɛlɛnya la. ... il se rapprocha de la vache
3 • Nom. solidité, consistance, importance;
de petite taille pour la robustesse. ... he came
solidity, consistency, importance; Solidität,
closer to the small cow for robustness. ... er
Beständigkeit, Bedeutung.
kam der kleinen Kuh wegen ihrer Robustheit
näher. 4 • Nom. gravité; severity, seriousness;
Schweregrad. ... olu bɛ tali kɛ wale jugu
2 • Verbe. être dur, solide, résistant; to be hard,
solid, resistant; hart sein, solide sein, kɛlen kologirinya de kan. ...[les sanctions]
widerstandsfähig sein. ... sumaya banakisɛw dépendent de la gravité des actes commis.
kologɛlɛnyara tubabufuraw bolo... ... les
...[penalties] depend on the seriousness of the
acts committed. ...[Sanktionen] hängen von
agents du paludisme sont devenus résistants
der Schwere der begangenen Handlungen ab.
aux médicaments européens... ... the malaria
agents have become resistant to European 5 • Nom. épaisseur; thickness; Dicke.
drugs... ... Die Malaria-Erreger sind gegen kolojalan Morphemes: kolo-jalan. Nom. squelette;
europäische Medikamente resistent
skeleton; Skelett, Knochengerüst.
geworden...
Category: Body. synonyme: ɲɔnsɔn .
1
3 • Verbe. fortifier, renforcer; fortify,
strengthen; stärken, verstärken. Alabato bɛ kolojɛbugu [ó] Morphemes: kolo-jɛ-bugu. Nom.
dannatigi kologɛlɛnya. L'adoration de Dieu 1 • séjour des morts, l'au-delà; hell, the
afterlife, the world to come, the hereafter; das
fortifie le croyant. The worship of God
Totenreich, das Jenseits, das Leben nach dem
strengthens the believer. Die Anbetung Gottes
stärkt den Gläubigen.
Tod. A taara kolojɛbugu. Il est allé dans
l’au-delà. He went to the afterlife. Er ging ins
kologirin [ó] Nom. 1 • essentiel, principal, important;
Jenseits. synonyme: nɛɛmaso, tiɲɛso,
essential, main, important; wesentlich,
laharaso.
wichtig, hauptsächlich. A baara kologirin ye
2 • cimetière (populaire); cemetery (popular);
sɛnɛ de ye. L'occupation essentielle de ce
Friedhof (Volksmund).
village est l'agriculture. The main occupation
of this village is agriculture. Die wichtigste kolokala [ó] Morphemes: kolo-kala. Nom. os, partie
Beschäftigung dieses Dorfes ist die centrale allongée de l'os; bone, elongated
Landwirtschaft. ... a kologirinmanyɔrɔ ye... central part of the bone; Knochen, länglicher
... la partie essentielle c'est... ... the essential Mittelteil des Knochens. Ni i y'a mɛn ko kolo
part is... ... der wesentliche Teil ist... karila, kolokala ko don. Quand un os se
2 • solide, dur, lourd, pénible; solid, hard, casse, c'est toujours en sa partie centrale.
heavy, difficult; fest, hart, schwer, mühsam. (proverbe). When a bone breaks, it is always in
baara kologirin travail pénible (: «gros its central part. (proverb). Wenn ein Knochen
travail», «travail de force»). hard work bricht, ist es immer in seinem mittleren Teil.
(«heavy labour», «hard labour»). (Sprichwort).
Ermüdungsarbeit («schwere Arbeit», «harte kolokari [ó] Nom. 1 • fracture; fracture; Bruch,
1
Arbeit»).
Knochenbruch. A kɛra n ɲɛna mugu don, n
3 • épais; thick; dick.
t'a dɔn kolokari don. Je pensais que c'était
kologirinya [ó] 1 • Verbe. renforcer, consolider, une entorse, je ne savais pas que c'était une
développer; strengthen, consolidate, develop; fracture. (proverbe). I thought it was a sprain,
stärken, festigen, weiterentwickeln. ... o bɛna I didn’t know it was a fracture. (Proverb). Ich
sɛgɛsɛgɛli jɛkulu tɔw kologirinya. ... cela va dachte, es sei eine Verstauchung, wußte nicht,
daß es ein Bruch war. (Sprichwort).
renforcer l'action des autres commissions de
contrôle. ... this will strengthen the action of
Category: Disease.
other control committees. ... wird dies die 2 • situation compliquée; complicated
Arbeit der anderen Kontrollausschüsse situation; komplizierte Situation.
stärken. kolokari [ó-ó-á-í] Nom. guépard; cheetah; Gepard.
2
Category: Mammal.
29/01/2026 418

kolokelen kolokolo
kolokelen [ó] Morphemes: kolo-kelen. Nom. kolokolo [ò-ò-ó-ó] variante: korokoro. Nom.
3
costaud, très vigoureux; strong, very vigorous; boisson forte à base de mil et de miel, panaché;
kräftig, sehr kräftig. strong drink made from millet and honey,
kolokelennin [ó] Morphemes: kolo-kelen-nin.
mixed; starkes Getränk aus Hirse und Honig,
gemischt.
Nom. pagne de femme blanc et noir; white and
black women’s fabric; Damen-Stoff in kolokolo 4 [ò-ó-ò-ó] Nom. 1 • poule déplumée;
schwarz und weiß. plucked hen; gerupftes Huhn.
kolokɛnɛ [ó] Morphemes: kolo-kɛnɛ. Nom. 2 • oiseau qui n'a pas encore des plumes; bird
that does not yet have feathers; Vogel, der
énergique, dynamique; energetic, dynamic;
noch keine Federn hat.
energisch, dynamisch. baarakɛla kolokɛnɛ un
3 • sans plumage; without plumage; ohne
travailleur dynamique. a dynamic worker. ein
dynamischer Arbeitnehmer.
Gefieder. Kɔnɔden min tɔrɔtuma ma mɛɛn,
a kolokolo don. L'oisillon qui vient de naître
kolokɛnɛya [ó] Morphemes: kolo-kɛnɛ-ya.
est sans plumage. The newly born bird has no
1 • Verbe. dynamiser, donner du tonus; plumage. Das neugeborene Vögelchen hat
energize, give tone; Energie spenden, kein Gefieder.
dynamisieren. Ngaɲaka furabulu bɛ tobi ka
4 • imberbe; hairless; unbehaart.
di denmisɛnw ma, a b'u kolokɛnɛya. On
5 • dépenaillé, en haillons; ragged; zerlumpt.
donne aux enfants des infusions de
Ni i ye kolokolojeli den furu, i na sii da a la.
«nganyaka», ça les fortifie. Children are given
Si tu épouses la fille d'un griot déplumé, tu le
«nganyaka» infusions, which strengthens
couvriras de plumes. (proverbe). If you marry
them. Wir geben den Kindern
the daughter of a featherless griot, you will
«Nganyaka-Tee», das macht sie stärker.
cover him with feathers. (proverb). Wenn du
2 • Nom. dynamisme physique, tonus, énergie, die Tochter eines federlosen Griot heiratest,
vitalité; physical dynamism, tone, energy, wirst du ihn mit Federn bedecken.
vitality; körperliche Dynamik, Tonus, Energie, (Sprichwort).
Vitalität. Ngɔlɔbɛ bɛ mɔgɔ kolokɛnɛya. Le
kolokolo [ó] Nom. tambour de bois (pour chasser les
«quinquéliba» donne du tonus. The juice made 5
of this tree gives people energy. Der Saft, den
singes); wooden drum (to chase away
man aus diesem Baum gewinnt, gibt Energie.
monkeys); Holztrommel (um Affen zu
vertreiben). Tegere mana kolokolofɔla
kolokojugu [ó] Morphemes: kolo-ko-jugu. Nom.
minɛ, a yɛrɛ ka mɔgɔ weelelen don. Si le
1 • mauvais, méchant, vicieux; bad, wicked,
brigand s'empare du joueur de tambour, c'est
vicious; böse, bösartig, boshaft. Mɔgɔ
que ce dernier l'a fait venir. (proverbe). If the
kolokojugu don. C'est quelqu'un de mauvais. bandit seizes the drummer, it is because the
He’s a bad person. Er ist ein böser Mensch. latter has sent for him. (proverb). Wenn der
2 • mal éduqué; badly educated; schlecht Bandit den Trommler packt, dann deshalb,
erzogen. weil dieser nach ihm geschickt hat.
(Sprichwort). Category: Musical instrument.
kolokojuguya [ó] Nom. 1 • méchanceté, malfaisance;
kolokolo [ó] Verbe. secouer; shake; schütteln. Mɔgɔ
malice, wickedness, malevolence; Bosheit, 6
Böswilligkeit. A ka kolokojuguya de y'a to caman wulukolokolo ka ɲi musoko la, nka
mɔgɔw y'a bila. C'est à cause de sa u tɛ se muso kɔrɔ. Il y a bien des hommes
méchanceté que les gens l'ont laissé tomber. It pour la coucherie (littéralement: «se secouer la
was because of his wickedness that people verge»), mais peu sont capables d'entretenir
abandoned him. Wegen seiner Bosheit une femme. (proverbe). There are many men
verließen ihn die Menschen. for sleeping with women (literally: «shake the
penis»), but few are able to support a woman.
2 • mauvaise éducation, mauvais
(proverb). Es gibt viele Männer , die mit einer
comportement; bad education, bad behaviour;
schlechte Bildung, schlechtes Benehmen.
Frau schlafen wollen (wörtlich: «schütteln sich
synonyme: marabaliya.
den Schwanz»), aber wenige sind fähig, eine
Frau zu unterhalten. (Sprichwort).
kolokolo [ò-ó-ò-ó] variante: kulokulo, kɔlokɔlo.
1
Nom. dindon; turkey; Truthahn.
Category: Animal husbandry.
synonyme: kulekule .
2
kolokolo [ó] Nom. arbre (espèce); tree sp; Baumart.
2
Category: Bush, shrub. afrormosia laxiflora.
29/01/2026 419

kolokolo kolokunba
kolokolo [ó] Verbe. 1 • se presser, s’agglutiner, se kolokoto [ó] variante: kɛrɛkɛtɛ. Adverbe. en vain,
7 2
regrouper dans le désordre; to crowd together, vainement, catégoriquement (refuser),
to clump together, to regroup in disorder; complètement (échouer, manquer, priver...); in
zusammenpressen, verklumpen, sich in vain, categorically (refuse), completely (fail,
Unordnung sammeln. O wagati ye syɛdenw miss, deprive...); vergebens, kategorisch
kolokolotuma ye, ka son sulu kɔnɔ. C'est le (verweigern), völlig (versagen, verpassen,
berauben...) U y'a deli kolokoto ! Ils l'ont
moment où les poussins se pressent pour
rentrer dans le poulailler. This is the time when supplié en vain ! They begged him in vain! Sie
chicks rush into the coop. Das ist die Zeit, in flehten ihn vergebens an! A y'i ban kolokoto !
der sich die Küken drängen, um in den Stall zu Il refusa catégoriquement ! He categorically
kommen. refused! Er lehnte kategorisch ab! Olu bɛɛ
2 • concentrer; concentrate; konzentrieren. ka dɛsɛra a la kolokoto ! Tous, ils échouèrent
funteni kolokolo concentrer la chaleur. totalement ! They all failed completely! Sie
concentrate the heat. Wärme konzentrieren. sind alle komplett gescheitert!
3 • rassembler, tasser, entasser; gather, pack, kolokoto [ó] Verbe. 1 • comprimer, froisser;
3
heap, pile up; sammeln, packen, häufen,
compress, crumple; komprimieren,
aufstapeln. ka finin kolokolo ɲɔgɔn kan zerknittern. synonyme: mɔlɔnkɔtɔ.
entasser des étoffes. pile up fabrics. Stoffe
2 • réduire à la misère; reduce to poverty; in die
aufstapeln.
Armut reduzieren, in Armut zu stürzen. A
kolokolo
8
[ó] Verbe. 1 • mettre en boule, donner une
kolokoto don sisan. Il est maintenant réduit à
forme cylindrique, façonner au tour; shape la misère. He is now reduced to poverty. Er ist
into a round, put into a ball, give a cylindrical jetzt in die Armut gestürzt. synonyme: laɲɛni.
shape, shape on a lathe; zu einer Kugel
formen, eine zylindrische Form geben und auf kolokoto 4 Nom. qui ne recule devant rien, malfrat;
einer Drehbank formen. A ye sɛngɛrɛ who does not shy away from anything,
kolokolo. Elle a mis la pâte de mil en boules. malefactor; Der vor nichts zurückschreckt,
She put the millet paste into balls. Sie formte Schurke. Kolokoto bɛ ntaki sidɔgɔ ɲini. Le
die Hirsepaste zu Kugeln. malfrat va chercher le bois de chauffage de la
nuit pour l'escroc. (proverbe). The thug
2 • être en boule, être rond; to be in a ball, to be
round; in einer Kugel sein, rund sein. Balɔn
(gangster, criminal, villain, assassin, bandit)
goes to get the night's firewood for the crook.
kolokololen don. Le ballon est rond. The ball
(proverb). Der Schurke holt für den Gauner
is round. Der Ball ist rund.
das Nachtbrennholz. (Sprichwort).
kolokolo 9 [ó] Verbe. 1 • inciter, encourager; incite, kolokun [ó-ó-ṹ] Nom. 1 • tête de l'os, tête
encourage, urge; anregen, ermutigen,
d'articulation, articulation; bone, joint, hinge;
auffordern. N y'a kolokolo a ka tiɲɛ fɔ. Je l'ai Knochen, Gelenk. Bagan in joginna a
incité à dire la vérité. I urged him to tell the
kolokun na. Cet animal s'est blessé à une
truth. Ich forderte ihn auf, die Wahrheit zu
articulation. This animal has a joint injury.
sagen. I ka ɲuman kolokolo a la.
Category: Body.
Encourage-le à bien faire. Encourage him to
2 • constitution, ossature; constitution,
do well. Ermutigen Sie ihn, es gut zu machen.
structure; Aufbau, Struktur.
2 • s'habituer à, devenir proche; get used to,
become close; sich daran gewöhnen, sich kolokunba [ó] Nom. corpulent, bien charpenté;
näher kommen. A y'i kolokolo n ka wulu la. corpulent, well-built; korpulent, gut gebaut.
Il s'est habitué à mon chien. He got used to my Finin bɛ mɔgɔ kolokunba minɛ. Les
dog. Er hat sich an meinen Hund gewöhnt. U vêtements vont bien aux personnes bien
kolokolola ɲɔgɔn na. Ils sont devenus très
charpentées. These clothes look good on
well-built people. Diese Kleidung steht gut
proche. They became very close. Sie kamen
gebauten Menschen gut.
sich sehr nahe.
kolokolomuso variante: kulokulomuso. Nom.
dinde; turkey hen; Truthenne. Category: Bird.
kolokoto [ó] Verbe. être lourd, épais, mal-fait; be
1
heavy, thick, poorly made; schwer, dick und
schlecht verarbeitet sein. Kabakuru
kolokotow bɛ bɛlɛ la. Il y a des gros cailloux
dans le gravier. There are large stones in the
gravel. Im Kies liegen große Steine.
29/01/2026 420

kolokuru kolon
kolokuru [ó] Morphemes: kolo-kuru. Nom. os, kolomamisɛn [ó] Morphemes: kolo-ma-misɛn.
morceau d'os; bone, piece of bone; Knochen, variante: kolomisɛn. Nom. petit, maigre, chétif,
Knochenstück. kolokuru buma un os avec de malingre, sans force, mince, frêle; small, thin,
la viande. a bone with meat. ein Knochen mit feeble, weak, without strength, frail; klein,
Fleisch. Ni dosokɔrɔ ye i ka a myɛ na, dünn, schwach, gebrechlich, kraftlos,
kolokuru caman bɛ a majɛ. Si le gros chien schwach. Muso in ye mɔgɔ finman ye,
ne veut pas avouer qu'il raffole de viande, il se janmanjan don, a kolomamisɛn. Cette
privera de beaucoup d'os. (proverbe). If the big femme est de teint sombre, grande et frêle.
dog doesn't want to admit that he loves meat, This woman is dark, tall and frail. Die Frau ist
he will deprive himself of a lot of bones. dunkel, groß und schwach.
(proverb). Wenn der große Hund nicht synonyme: mirimɔrɔ.
zugeben will, daß er Fleisch liebt, wird er sich
viele Knochen entziehen. (Sprichwort).
kolomayɔrɔ [ó] Morphemes: kolo-ma-yɔrɔ. Nom.
partie essentielle, consistance, importante, le
kololabaara [ó] Morphemes: kolo-la-baara. Nom.
cœur de quelque chose; essential part,
travail dur, travail de force; hard work, hard consistency, important, the heart of
labour; harte Arbeit, Kraftarbeit. something; wesentlicher Teil, Konsistenz,
kololenya [ó] Morphemes: kolo-len-ya. wichtig, das Herz von etwas, der Kern des
variante: kolonnenya. Nom. docilité, politesse,
Sache. Jamanakuntigi ka kuma kolomayɔrɔ
kɛra ninnu de ye ɲinan. Voilà les éléments
bonne éducation; docility, politeness, good
education; Fügsamkeit, Höflichkeit, gute principaux du discours du chef de l'état cette
Bildung, gute Erziehung. Kalanden ka année. These are the main elements of the
speech by the head of state this year. Das sind
kololenya ka di karamɔgɔ ye. La maître aime
die wichtigsten Elemente der diesjährigen
la docilité de l'élève. The teacher loves the
Rede des Staatschefs.
docility of the student. Der Lehrer liebt die
Sanftmut des Schülers. kolomɛɛrɛ [ó] Morphemes: kolo-mɛɛrɛ.
kololi [ó-ó-í] Nom. dressage; dressage, training; variante: kolomyɛɛrɛ, kolomyɛɛnu,
Dressur . Category: Agriculture.
kolomyɛɛru. Nom. cartilage, os qui n'est pas
dur, os facile à croquer; cartilage, bone that is
koloma [ó] Morphemes: kolo-ma. Nom. 1 • avec de
not hard, bone easy to chew; Knorpel,
l'os, osseux; with bone, bony; mit Knochen, Knochen, der nicht hart ist, Knochen leicht zu
knochig. sogo koloma de la viande avec de kauen. Kolomɛɛrɛ birilen bɛ kolokun kan.
l'os. meat with bone. Fleisch mit Knochen. Du cartilage recouvre l'articulation. Cartilage
2 • non égrené (coton); unginned (cotton); covers the joint. Knorpel bedeckt das Gelenk.
nicht entkernt (Baumwolle). kɔɔri koloma kolon [ó-ṍ] adj.pred. 1 • mauvais, en mauvais état,
1
coton non égrené. unginned cotton. nicht
faible, paresseux; bad, in bad condition, weak,
entkörnte Baumwolle.
lazy; schlecht, schwach, faul, träge. Nin misi
3 • solide, résistant; strong, solid, resistant;
ka kolon misidaba la. Ce bœuf est faible à la
stark, widerstandsfähige. Kuma koloma don.
charrue. This ox is weak with the plow. Dieser
C'est un argument solide. This is a solid
Ochse ist schwach im Umgang mit dem Pflug.
argument. Das ist ein solides Argument.
Mɔgɔ bɛ se k'i den ka sokolonsan bali, nka i
4 • forte, dure (pour une parole); strong, hard
tɛ se ka a ka musokolonfuru bali. On peut
(for a word); stark, hart (für Worte). Kuma
empêcher son enfant d'acheter un mauvais
koloma don. Ce sont des paroles dures.
cheval, mais pas d'épouser une mauvaise
That’s a tough word. Das sind harte Worte. femme. (proverbe). You can prevent your child
5 • essentiel; essential, critical, key; from buying a bad horse, but not from
wesentlich. Hadamaden ka kunnafonifalen marrying a bad woman. (proverb). Sie
koloma bɛ kɛ ni kuma ye. La communication können verhindern, daß Ihr Kind ein
schlechtes Pferd kauft, aber nicht, daß es eine
entre les êtres humains se fait essentiellement
par la parole. Communication between human
schlechte Frau heiratet. (Sprichwort).
beings is essentially by speech. Die
Kommunikation zwischen den Menschen
erfolgt hauptsächlich über das Wort.
kolomadɔgɔ [ó] Morphemes: kolo-ma-dɔgɔ.
variante: kolomamisɛn. Nom. chétif, malingre;
weak, frail; schwach, gebrechlich.
synonyme: mirimɔrɔ.
29/01/2026 421

kolon kolonkalan
2 • bon à rien, usagé, usé, vieux, vieille, qui ne kolonin [ó-ó-ĩ́] variante: golonin. Nom. antilope
1
vaut rien; useless, used, old; unnütz,
ourébi; oribi antelope; Antilope (Art).
verbraucht, alt. Dɛbɛ kolon. Vieille natte. Old
Category: Mammal. synonyme: kolonnin,
mat. Alte Matte. Balansan kolon tɛ bin
nkolonnin.
bamuso kɔrɔ dungɔ don. Le vieil acacia ne
kolonin [ó] Morphemes: kolo-nin. Nom. 1 • bouton;
tombe pas le jour qui convient à la vieille 2
chèvre. (proverbe). The old acacia does not button; Knopf. A ka dɔlɔki fan bɛɛ ye
fall on the day that suits the old goat. kolonin ye. Son vêtement avait des boutons
(proverb). Die alte Akazie fällt nicht an dem
partout. His clothing had buttons everywhere.
Tag, der der alten Ziege passt. (Sprichwort).
Seine Kleidung hatte überall Knöpfe.
3 • violent; violent; gewalttätig. fiɲɛ kolonba 2 • agrafe en métal; metal clip;
un vent violent. a violent wind. ein heftiger Metallklammer.
Wind.
3 • sorte de bijou de femme; kind of women's
kolon comparer: bolokolon, fanikolon.[ó] adj. vide, jewelry; Art von Damenschmuck.
2
nu; empty, naked, bare; leer, nackt, kahl. kolonindonnan
kolon [ò-ṍ] Nom. mortier; mortar; Mörser. [ó] Morphemes: kolo-nin-don-nan.
3
Category: Tool. variante: kolonindonyɔrɔ. Nom. boutonnière;
kolon [ò-ó] Nom. cauris; cowrie; Kauri Muschel. ... buttonhole; Knopfloch.
4
ka a sɔn ba dɛbɛ kolon na. ... et lui offrir koloninjɛ [ó] Jula: koloningwɛ.
quarante mille cauris. ... and offer him forty synonyme: surukuɲɛɲɛ. variante: nkoloninjɛ.
thousand cowrie shells. ... und biete ihm Nom. balan des savanes; White-berry bush;
vierzigtausend Kaurimuscheln an. Schleimiger Strauch oder Süßholz-Flieder.
synonyme: kolonkisɛ. securiega virosa ; securiega microcarpa.
synonyme: surukuɲɛɲɛ, ncɛnɛ.
kolon [ó] Verbe. 1 • dresser, éduquer, dompter,
5
soumettre; train, educate, tame, submit; kolonju [ò-ò] Nom. sucre candi, cône (de sucre candi);
trainieren, erziehen, zähmen, unterwerfen. Ni i candy sugar, cone (of candy sugar);
ma cɛnin in kolon, a bɛna jaasi i bolo yan. Kandiszucker, Kegel (aus Kandiszucker).
Si tu ne dresses pas ce garçon, il deviendra un kolonkala [ó] Morphemes: kolon-kala.
vaurien. If you don't train this boy, he will
variante: kolongala, kolongaladen. Nom.
become a scoundrel. Wenn Sie diesen Jungen
pilon; pestle; Stössel, Mörserkeule. Ɲɔmugu
nicht erziehen, wird er zu einem Schurken.
synonyme: lakuru, kolo .
minnu bɛ nɔrɔ kolon ni kolonkalaw la... La
3 3
poudre de mil qui colle aux mortiers et aux
2 • obéir à, se faire obséquieux, s'aplatir; to
pilons... Millet powder that sticks to mortars
obey, to be obsequious; gehorchen,
and pestles... Hirsepulver, das an Mörsern und
unterwürfig sein.
Stößeln haftet... Category: Tool.
3 • tanner, assouplir, pétrir; tan, soften, knead;
bräunen, erweichen, kneten, lockern. ka wolo kolonkalan 1 [ó] bambara: nkolonkalan.
kolon assouplir la peau. soften the skin. die variante: ngolongala, . Adverbe. très grand et
Haut weich machen. mince, très haut; very tall and thin, very tall;
sehr groß und dünn, sehr groß. A ka jan
4 • cultiver pour la première fois, roder;
cultivate for the first time, break in; Erstmalige kolonkalan ! Il est très grand. He is very big.
Kultivierung, Einrodung. A ye foroda kura Er ist sehr groß.
kolon. Il a cultivé le nouveau champ pour la kolonkalan [ó] Nom. légumineuse annuelle à tige
2
première fois. He cultivated the new field for creuse, variété de citrouille allongée; annual
the first time. Er bebaute das neue Feld zum hollow-stemmed legume, elongated pumpkin
ersten Mal. variety; einjährige hohlstämmige
kolongala See main entry: Hülsenfrucht, längliche Kürbissorte.
.[ò-ò-á-á] Morphemes: kòlon-gàla. Nom.
pilon; pestle; Stössel. Category: Tool.
kolongaladen variante: kolongala. Nom. pilon;
pestle; Stössel. Category: Tool.
29/01/2026 422

kolonkan kolonman
kolonkan [ó] Nom. bâton, portant une corde à chaque kolonkolon [ò-ò] vt. 1 • rouler, faire rouler; roll,
1
bout, que l'on met au cou des chiens pour les explore, browse, roam; rollen, durchsuchen,
dresser; stick, carrying a rope at each end, durchstreifen. Wulu y'i da dugu ma k'i
which is placed around the neck of dogs to kolonkolon. Le chien se coucha et se roula sur
train them; Stock, der an jedem Ende ein Seil
le sol. The dog lay down and rolled around on
trägt, das Hunden zum Trainieren um den Hals
the ground. Der Hund legte sich hin und rollte
gelegt wird. Ni i ye kolonkan ye jakuma kan
auf dem Boden herum. Fan kolonkolonna.
na, a ye dosokɔrɔ sɔn ta de. Si tu vois le
L’œuf se mit à rouler. The egg began to roll.
collier de dressage du chien au cou d'un chat, Das Ei begann zu rollen. Kolonkolonli dan ye
c'est qu'il s'est conduit comme un mâtin.
geren ye. La limite extrême pour rouler, c'est
(proverbe). If you see the dog’s training collar
le bout de la terre ferme. (proverbe). The
on a cat’s neck, it means that he behaved like a
extreme limit for rolling is the end of dry land.
mischievous person. (proverb). Wenn du das
(proverb). Die extreme Grenze für das Rollen
Hundehalsband am Hals einer Katze siehst, hat
ist das Ende des trockenen Landes.
er sich wie ein Schelm verhalten. (Sprichwort).
(Sprichwort).
kolonkari variante: kolokari. Nom. chat sauvage,
2 • roulement (mouvement); rolling
chat-tigre; wildcat; Wildkatze. (movement); Rollen (Bewegung).
Category: Mammal. felis sylvestris lybica.
kolonkolon [ò-ò-ò-ó] variante: kolokolo. Nom.
2
kolonkelen [ò-ò] Morphemes: kolon-kelen. Nom.
fourmi (espèce); ant sp; Ameise (Art).
enfant dont les aînés sont décédés; child whose Category: Insect.
elders have died; Kind, dessen ältere
kolonkolon [ó-ó-ò-ó] variante: nkolonkolon.
Geschwister verstorben sind. 3
vent tourbillonnant au niveau du sol; swirling
kolonkisɛ [ò-ò-í-ɛ́] Morphemes: kolon-kisɛ. Nom.
wind at ground level; wirbelnder Wind in
cauris; cowrie shell; Kaurimuschel. Bodennähe. Kolonkolon de ye ɲamaɲama
synonyme: kolon 4 . kɛ i ka mugu la. C'est le tourbillon qui a mis
kolonkolo [ò-ò] Nom. vent de saison froide; cold des saletés dans ta farine. It's the whirlwind
1
season wind; Wind der kalten Jahreszeit.
that put dirt in your flour. Es ist der
Wirbelsturm, der Schmutz in Ihr Mehl bringt.
Musow kana denmisɛnw kannakolon bila
Category: Sky, Weather.
kolonkolo la. Que les femmes ne laissent pas
kolonkɔnɔ [ó] Nom. outarde de Denham; Denham's
les enfants dévêtus dans le vent de saison
froide. Let women not leave children bustard; Trappe. Category: Bird. neotis
undressed in the wind of the cold season. Die denhami. synonyme: kolonkolo .
2
Frauen sollen ihre Kinder nicht unbekleidet im
kolonkɔrɔkɔnɔnin
kalten Wind lassen.
[ò-ò-ɔ̀-ɔ̀-ɔ̀-ɔ̀] comparer: jɛkɔɔnin. Nom.
kolonkolo [ó] Nom. outarde; Bustard,, Denham's
2 amarante commun; red-billed fire-finch;
bustard; Denham-Trapphuhn,
Feuerfink. Category: Bird. lagonosticta
Savannentrappe, Denhamstrappe, Trappe.
senegala. synonyme: jeferelen, njɛkɔɔnin.
Category: Bird. neotis denhami.
synonyme: kolonkɔnɔ. kolonman [ó] Morphemes: kolon-man. Nom.
kolonkololan [ó] Nom. clochette; bell; Glocke. 1 • mauvais; bad evil; schlecht, böse. ... ka
diɲɛmɔgɔw waaju ko kolonman kɛli la. ...
Kolonkololan, a bɛ kɛ ka ɲɛnajɛ de kɛ. Les
afin d'exhorter les hommes a ne pas commettre
clochettes, on s'en sert pour les réjouissances.
de mauvaises actions. ...in order to exhort men
The bells are used for celebrations. Die
not to commit evil deeds. ...um die Menschen
Glocken werden für Feierlichkeiten
zu ermahnen, keine bösen Taten zu begehen.
verwendet. Category: Musical instrument.
synonyme: wele , daro. 2 • paresseux; lazy; faul, träge.
1
3 • vieux, usagé; old, used; alt, gebraucht,
abgenutzt.
29/01/2026 423

kolonnabɔ kolosabana
kolonnabɔ [ò-ò-à] Morphemes: kolon-nabɔ. Nom. kolonsyɛ [ò-ò] Emprunt de : kolon-syɛ. Nom.
aide entre voisines pour le pilage; help 1 • maïs à long épi à grains rouges et blancs
between neighbors for pounding; Hilfe entremêlés; long ear corn with intermingled
zwischen Nachbarn zum Stampfen im Mörser. red and white kernels; Langährenmais mit
Hali án ka togoda dɔw la kolonnabɔ vermischten roten und weißen Körnern.
dabilala. Même dans certain s de nos hameaux synonyme: maaɲɔ.
l'aide pour le pilage a cessé. Even in some of 2 • poule à plumage noir avec taches blanches;
our hamlets help for pounding has stopped. hen with black plumage with white spots;
Sogar in einigen unserer Dörfer wurde die Henne mit schwarzem Gefieder mit weißen
Hilfe beim Stampfen eingestellt. Flecken.
Category: Agriculture. kolontigi [ò-ò] Morphemes: kolon-tigi. Nom. un
kolonnin Nom. antilope ourébi; kind of antelope; riche; a rich man; ein reicher Mann. Musa
Antilope (Art). Category: Mammal. ourebia kolontigi Moussa le riche. Moussa the rich.
ourebi. synonyme: kolonin
1
, nkolonnin.
Moussa der Reiche.
kolonninfili [ò-ò-ì] Morphemes: kolon-nin-fili. kolonya [ó] Morphemes: kolon-ya. 1 • Verbe. être
Nom. divination par les cauris; divination by faible, affaiblir; to be weak, to weaken;
cowrie shells; Weissagung durch schwach sein, schwächen. Mɔgɔ kolonyara
Kaurimuscheln. Category: Religion.
cogo o cogo, don kelen bɛ fisaya i ma. Si
kolonninfilila Morphemes: kolon-nin-fili-la. Nom. faible qu'on soit, un jour pourtant les choses
devin (qui pratique avec des cauris); iront mieux. (proverbe). However weak we
soothsayer (who practices with cowrie shells); are, one day things will be better. (proverb).
Wahrsager (der mit Kaurimuscheln weissagt). So schwach man auch ist, eines Tages wird es
O tun ye kolonninfilila ye. Cet homme-là doch besser. (Sprichwort).
était un devin. This man was a soothsayer. 2 • Verbe. rendre paresseux; make lazy; faul
Dieser Mann war ein Wahrsager. machen. synonyme: lasalaya.
Category: Religion. 3 • Nom. faiblesse, mollesse, paresse;
kolonso [ó] variante: kolonson. Verbe. 1 • mélanger, weakness, sloth, laziness; Schwäche,
Weichheit, Faulheit. Faantan ni kolonya tɛ
mêler, croiser; mix, mingle, cross; mischen,
vermischen, kreuzen. ... sani áw ka misi in ban. Le pauvre passe toujours pour un
kolonso tɔw cɛla. ... avant de mêler cette paresseux. (proverbe). The poor man is always
vache aux autres. ..before mixing this cow with
seen as a sloth. (proverb). Der Arme gilt
the others. ...bevor man diese Kuh mit den
immer als faul. (Sprichwort).
anderen vermischt. ... k'i senw kolonso... ... kolosa [ó] Morphemes: kolo-sa. variante: kolofaga.
croiser les jambes... ...cross your legs... ...die Nom. 1 • manque d'énergie, mollesse, apathie,
Beine überkreuzen... maaɲɔ si kolonsolenw abattement; lack of energy, weakness, apathy,
variétés de maïs croisés. crossed corn depression; Energiemangel, Schwäche,
varieties. gekreuzte Maissorten. Apathie, Niedergeschlagenheit. Kolosa bɛ
synonyme: kalanso 2 . min na, a tɛ se ka foyi ɲɛnama kɛ. Celui qui
2 • mélange, croisement; a mixture, crossing; est mou ne peut rien faire de bon. He who is
eine Mischung, Kreuzung. ... n'o ye sansi ni weak cannot do anything good. Wer schwach
tulu kolonsolen ye... ... et qui se compose
ist, kann nichts Gutes tun.
d'un mélange d’essence et d'huile... ...and
2 • courbatures; body aches;
which consists of a mixture of gasoline and Körperschmerzen. synonyme: kolosabana.
oil... ...und das aus einem Gemisch aus Benzin kolosabana [ó] Morphemes: kolo-sa-bana. Nom.
und Öl besteht...
courbatures; body aches, muscle soreness,
3 • noix de cola de couleur non unie;
pains; Gliederschmerzen, Muskelkater,
multicoloured cola; mehrfarbige Kolanuß. A
Schmerzen. Category: Disease.
ye woro jɛ tan tɔmɔn, ni kolonso t'a la. Elle synonyme: kolosa, farisa, farikumun.
choisit dix noix de cola qui soient parfaitement
blanches. She chooses ten kola nuts that are
perfectly white. Sie wählt zehn Kolanüsse aus,
die vollkommen weiß sind.
29/01/2026 424

kolosigi komayɛlɛma
kolosigi [ó-ó-ì-í] 1 • Verbe. mettre en place, kolɔnbaliya [ó-ɔ ́-á-í-á] bambara: kodɔnbaliya.
renforcer, structurer; establish, strengthen, Morphemes: ko-lɔn-bali-ya.
structure; etablieren, stärken, strukturieren. O synonyme: kunfinya. Nom. ignorance,
wagati kɔnɔ, balikukalansoba fana y'a innocence, inexpérience; ignorance,
kolosigi... Pendant cette période, les services innocence, inexperience; Unwissenheit,
d’alphabétisation fonctionnelle se sont Unschuld, unerfahren. synonyme: kodɔnbaliya.
renforcés... During this period, functional
kolɔnni Nom. expérience; experience; Erfahrung.
literacy services were strengthened... In dieser
Zeit wurden die funktionalen synonyme: lɔnniya 2 .
Alphabetisierungsdienste gestärkt... komagɛlɛya [ó] Morphemes: ko-ma-gɛlɛya. Verbe.
2 • Nom. structure, grammaire; structure, recommander; recommend, advise;
grammar; Struktur, Grammatik.
empfehlen. U ye komagɛlɛyali minnu kɛ, olu
bamanankan kolosigi grammaire bambara.
dɔw filɛ nin ye... Voici quelques-unes des
Bambara grammar. Bambara-Grammatik.
recommandations qu'ils ont faites... Here are
kolosu [ó] Morphemes: kolo-su. Nom. 1 • os some of the recommendations they made...
spongieux; spongy bone; schwammiger Hier sind einige der Empfehlungen, die sie
Knochen. Fɛn wɛrɛ tɛ, kolosu de don. Ce gemacht haben ... synonyme: koo fɔ,
n'est rien d'autre qu'un os spongieux. It's yamaruya, kumagwɛlɛya.
nothing more than a spongy bone. Es ist
komagɛlɛyasɛbɛn
nichts weiter als ein schwammiger Knochen.
2 • calcaire; limestone; Kalkstein.
[ó] Morphemes: ko-ma-gɛlɛya-sɛbɛn. Nom.
attestation, recommandation; certificate,
kolotugu [ó] Morphemes: kolo-tugu. Nom.
recommendation; Zertifikat, Empfehlung.
1 • réduction d'une fracture ou d'une foulure; Mɔgɔ man kan k'i jigi da komagɛlɛyasɛbɛn
reduction of a fracture or strain; Reduzierung
dɔrɔn kan. On ne doit pas fonder tous ses
einer Fraktur oder Zerrung.
espoirs sur seulement une lettre de
2 • technique consistant à consolider un os
recommandation. You should not base all your
fracturé; technique of consolidating a
hopes on just a letter of recommendation. Sie
fractured bone; Konsolidierung eines
sollten nicht alle Ihre Hoffnungen nur auf ein
gebrochenen Knochens.
Empfehlungsschreiben stützen.
kolotuguda [ó-ó-ú-ú-á] Nom. articulation; komakɔnɔ [ó-á-ɔ́-ɔ́] n.comp. anticipation;
articulation, joints; Gelenk, Artikulation. U anticipation; Zuvorkommen, Ahnung,
kolotugudaw b'u dimin... Ils ont mal aux Vorgreifen.
articulations... Their joints hurt... Ihre Gelenke komaɲininka
tun weh... Category: Body.
[ó-á-ì-ì-á] Morphemes: ko-ma-ɲininka.
kolotugula [ó] Morphemes: kolo-tugu-la. Nom.
Verbe. demander indirectement, interroger
rebouteux; bone-setter; Heilkundiger der quelqu'un à propos de quelqu'un d'autre,
Knochen zusammenfügt, Knochensetzer. demander des informations sur quelqu'un; ask
Mɔgɔw sɔrɔla ka kolotugula ɲini ni ka na indirectly, ask someone about someone else,
Musa bolo kolo tugu. Les gens ont alors ask for information about someone; indirekt
cherché un rebouteux pour remettre en place le fragen, jemanden nach jemand anderem
bras de Moussa. People then looked for a fragen, nach Informationen über jemanden
bone-setter to put Moussa's arm back in place. fragen. N ye baara komaɲininka Nsan na.
Dann suchten die Leute nach einem J'ai demandé à Jean des nouvelles du travail. I
Knochensetzer, um Moussas Arm wieder in asked Jean news about his work. Ich habe
Position zu bringen. Category: Treat disease. Jean nach der Arbeit gefragt.
kolotuguyɔrɔ Nom. articulation; articulation, joint; komasiran [ó] Verbe. craindre pour quelque chose ou
Gelenk, Gelenkverbindung. Category: Body. quelqu'un; to fear for something or someone;
kolowalawala [ó] variante: kolowalanwalan,
um etwas oder jemanden fürchten. A bɛ ka nin
bana in komasiran. Il craint cette maladie.
kolowɔlɔwɔlɔ. Nom. 1 • douleurs dans les os
He fears this illness. Er hat Angst vor dieser
des jambes; pain in leg bones; Schmerzen in
Krankheit.
den Beinknochen. Category: Disease.
2 • rhumatisme; rheumatism; Rheuma. komayɛlɛma 1 comparer: faniɲa.
kolɔgɔbɔ n.comp. ras-le-bol; discontent; genug haben variante: kumayɛlɛma. n.comp. calomnies;
von, Unzufriedenheit.
slanders; Verleumdung. synonyme: galon
1
.
29/01/2026 425

komayɛlɛma konamuso
komayɛlɛma [ó-á-ɛ̀-ɛ̀-á] Verbe. 1 • transformer kominike Emprunt de : français. Nom. communiqué;
2
complètement; completely transform; völlig statement, press release, announcement;
verwandeln. Ka jiribulu kɛ wari ye, a fana ye Aussage, Mitteilung. synonyme: wangolali.
komayɛlɛma ye, jinɛmoriw b'a kɛ. komite Emprunt de : français. synonyme: kulu. Nom.
Transformer des feuilles en billets de banque,
comité; committee; Gremium, Komitee,
cela aussi c'est une transformation complète, et
Ausschuss.
les «charlatans» le font. Transforming leaves
into bank notes is also a complete komitɛrɛ [ó] Emprunt de : français : « pomme de
transformation, and the “charlatans” do it. terre ». variante: komitɛri. Nom. pomme de
Auch die Umwandlung von Blättern in
terre; potato; Kartoffel. komitɛrɛ balabalalen
Geldscheine ist eine vollständige
pommes de terre cuites à l'eau. boiled
Verwandlung, und die „Scharlatane“ tun es.
potatoes. Kartoffeln, gekocht in Wasser.
2 • déformer; deform, distort, warp; Category: Food. synonyme: pɔmitɛri,
verformen, verdrehen. Kana n ka kuma
pɔmutɛɛri, pɔmutɛri, kɔmitɛri.
komayɛlɛma dɛ ! Ne déforme pas ce que j'ai
dit ! Don't twist what I said! Verdrehen Sie komo [ò] variante: konbo. Verbe. rugir, mugir,
nicht, was ich gesagt habe! A ye o kow beugler, braire; roar, bellow, bray; brüllen.
komayɛlɛma. Il a déformé les faits. He Waraba komona siɲɛ saba. Le lion rugit trois
distorted the facts. Er hat die Fakten verdreht. fois. The lion roared three times.
komɛn [ó-ɛ́] Morphemes: ko-mɛn. Verbe. entendre Komɔri Nom. Comores; Comoros; Komoren.
parler de; to hear about; hören von. .... bana Category: Country.
kura min komɛnna sisan... ... la nouvelle kon 1 [ò] Nom. cible, cible taillée dans le bois; target,
maladie dont on a entendu parler à présent... target carved in wood; Zielscheibe,
...the new disease we've heard about these Zielscheibe aus Holz geschnitzt.
days... ...die neue Krankheit, von der wir
kon [ó] Jula: koon. Nom. porte, battant de la
gerade gehört haben... synonyme: lakodɔn,
2
porte; door, door flap; Tür, Türflügel. Sulu
lakomɛn.
kon fan bɛɛ ye jiri ye. La porte du poulailler
komi Etym: comme.[ó] Emprunt de : français» « est entièrement en bois. The door of the
comme ». variante: ikomi. conj. comme; since, chicken coop is entirely made of wood. Die
because; weil, wegen. Komi i y'a fɔ cogo min
Tür des Hühnerstalles ist komplett aus Holz.
na... Comme tu l'as dit... Like you said... Wie
ka kon kɛ ka a dasɔgɔ fermer la porte à clef.
lock the door. Tür verschließen.
du schon sagtest... A bɛ baara kɛ komi fali. Il
synonyme: koon.
travaille comme un âne. He works like a
donkey. Er arbeitet wie ein Esel. kon minɛyɔrɔ Nom. poignet de porte; door handle,
synonyme: iko. door knob, door latch; Tür-falle, Tür-klinke.
komika [ó] Emprunt de : français: « pomme-cajou Category: Building.
». Nom. 1 • pomme cajou; cashew apple; kona [ò-á] variante: kɔna, konan. Nom.
Cashew-Apfel. Category: Food. 1 • stérilité; sterility, infertility;
synonyme: sɔmɔn, jibaranin, tubabu finsan. Unfruchtbarkeit, Sterilität.
2 • anacardier; cashew tree; Cashew Baum.
2 • personne stérile; barren person;
unfruchtbare Person. muso kona wala
komini [ó-í-í] Emprunt de : français. Nom.
musokɔrɔba cɛ le mari d'une femme stérile ou
commune; district; Distrikt, Bezirk.
d'une vieille femme. the husband of a barren
Category: Government.
wife or an old woman. der Ehemann einer
komini ka kɔnseye variante: kafo ka kɔnseye. unfruchtbaren oder alten Frau.
expr. conseiller municipal; municipal 3 • femme sans enfants; woman without
councillor, city councillor, local councillor; children, childless woman; Frau ohne Kinder.
Stadtrat, Gemeinderat, Ratsherr. konamuso [ò] comparer: bangebali. Nom. femme
Category: Government, Worker, occupation.
stérile; sterile woman; sterile Frau.
komini ka wusuru expr. taxe communale;
municipal tax, local tax; Gemeindesteuer,
Kommunalsteuer. Category: Finance,
Government.
29/01/2026 426

konaya kongoɲɔgɔmɛ
konaya [ò-à] variante: kɔnaya. Nom. 1 • état d’une 2 • maladie due aux esprits de la brousse;
disease caused by bush spirits; Krankheit von
femme sans enfant; state of a woman without
Buschgeistern veranlasst.
children; Status einer Frau ohne Kinder,
Kinderlose Frau. Furujoona ti konaya sa. Se kongo 2 synonyme: wula, burusi. Nom. brousse, région
marier tôt n’empêche pas de rester sans enfant. inhabitée; bushland, inhabited area; Busch,
Marrying early doesn’t stop you being without unbewohnte Gegend, Wildnis.
children. Früh heiraten verhilft dir nicht synonyme: wula .
2
unbedingt aus der Kinderlosigkeit.
kongojeni Morphemes: kongo-jeni.
2 • être ou rendre stérile; to be or make sterile,
barren; steril sein oder machen. A konayara.
synonyme: wagajeni. Nom. feu de brousse; bush
Elle est devenue stérile. She became barren.
fire; Buschfeuer. synonyme: ŋunan
2
.
Sie ist unfruchtbar geworden. kongokami Nom. pintade sauvage; wild Guinea fowl;
3 • stérilité; sterility, infertility; Sterilität, wildes Perlhuhn. Category: Bird. numida
Unfruchtbarkeit. ... u ye fura sɔrɔ, min y'u ka meleagris. synonyme: kungokami.
furumusow bɛɛ bali konaya ma. ... ils
kongokolon Nom. désert; desert; Wüste.
trouvèrent un remède qui guérit leurs épouses
de la stérilité. ... they found a remedy that Category: Land.
cured their wives of infertility. ... sie fanden ein kongokɔnɔfɛnw [ó] synonyme: kongosogow.
Heilmittel, das ihre Frauen von der
Nom. faune; fauna, wildlife; Fauna, Tierwelt.
Unfruchtbarkeit heilte.
kongokɔnɔjakuma synonyme: jakumawara. Nom.
konbalabala [ó] variante: konfalafala. Nom.
chat sauvage d'Afrique; African wild cat;
1 • serrure; lock; Türschloß. synonyme: konɲin,
wilde Katze.
konnɛgɛ, sɔgɔnan, balabala .
1 2 kongokɔnɔmɔgɔ comparer: binkɔnɔmɔgɔ. n.comp.
2 • clef de serrure traditionnelle; traditional
villageoise; village person; Dorfbewohner.
lock key; Schlüssel für traditionelle Schlösser.
U sɔrɔla ka mɔgɔw bila ka taa ni kongokɔnɔsonsan [ú] Nom. lièvre; hare, rabbit;
konbalabala ye... Ils envoyèrent alors des Hase. Category: Mammal. synonyme: nsonsan.
gens avec la clef... They sent people with the kongokɔnɔwulu [ó] Nom. lycaon, loup peint;
key... Sie schickten dann Leute mit dem
hunting dog; afrikanischer Wildhund.
Schlüssel...
Category: Mammal. synonyme: nɔɔsiwulu,
kondo
1
[ò] Nom. 1 • abeille (espèce de petite taille); bee
naasiwulu.
(small species); Biene (kleine Art).
kongolɛ [ó-ó-ɛ́] synonyme: lɛfali. variante: kungolɛ,
2 • petite mouche à miel; little honey fly; kleine
Honigfliege. Diden bɛ yɔrɔ min, kondo tɛ fɔ kongokɔnɔlɛ. Nom. cochon sauvage,
yen. Là où se trouve l'abeille, on ne parle pas phacochère, sanglier; boar, warthog;
de petite mouche à miel. (proverbe). Where the
Wildschwein. Category: Mammal.
synonyme: kungokɔnɔjɛ, jɛ , jɛfali.
bee is, we do not speak of a little honey fly. 3
(proverb). Wo die Biene ist, spricht man nicht kongoli [ṍ-ó-í] synonyme: kurunin.
von einer kleinen Honigfliege. (Sprichwort).
variante: konkoli. Nom. colline; hill; Hügel.
Category: Insect.
Category: Land.
kondo [ò] variante: konto. Nom. 1 • grande corbeille
2 kongomisi synonyme: sigi. Nom. buffle; buffalo;
servant à garder les objets des femmes; large
Büffel. Category: Mammal.
basket used to keep women’s objects; großer
Korb, in dem die Gegenstände der Frauen kongoɲinan Nom. espèce de rat; kind of rat; Art
aufbewahrt werden. Category: Container. Ratte. Category: Mammal.
2 • récipient pour ranger les étoffes; container
kongoɲɔgɔmɛ synonyme: tiren, tilen,
for storing fabrics; Behälter zur
Aufbewahrung der Stoffe. turaminanjan, wanjalaka. Nom. girafe;
3 • panier en feuilles de rônier; basket made of giraffe; Giraffe. Category: Mammal.
palm leaves; Korb aus Laubblättern. synonyme: ntilen, njɛ.
kongo bambara: kungo. synonyme: wula, burusi.
1
Nom. 1 • brousse, espace non cultivé hors du
village, campagne; countryside, bush; auf dem
Land, ländliche Gegend. kongo la en brousse.
up country. auf dem Land. Category: Land,
Region. synonyme: burusi, kungo.
29/01/2026 427

kongoron konkankon
kongoron [ò] variante: konkoron, kunkoron. kongoyaala siradisɛbɛ expr. permis de chasse;
1
Nom. 1 • tenue des chasseurs, treillis; Hunter's hunting licence, hunting permit; Jagdschein,
clothing; Kleidung der Jäger. Donso dɔw ka Jagdlizenz. Category: Hunt and fish.
kongoron tɛ ko. Certains chasseurs ne lavent Koniba n.pro. prénom de l'enfant né après les jumeaux;
jamais leur tenu de chasse. Some hunters never name given to a child born after twins; Name,
wash their hunting gear. Einige Jäger waschen den man einem Kind gibt, dass nach
ihre Jagdkleidung nie. Category: Clothing. Zwillingen geboren wurde.
2 • bonnet des chasseurs et des guerriers; cap of
koniya [ó] Verbe. 1 • être jaloux, jalouser, envier; be
hunters and warriors; Jäger- und
Kriegermütze.
jealous, envy; eifersüchtig sein, neidisch sein,
beneiden. Yali i ka dakantigi den koniya, k'i
3 • bonnet à points; hat with corners; Hut mit
Ecken. ka a k'i teri ye. Au lieu de jalouser l'enfant
d'un homme de grande destinée, fais-en ton
kongoron [ǒ-ò-ó] variante: konkoron. Nom. reins,
2 ami. (proverbe). Instead of being jealous of the
région lombaire; kidneys, lumbar region;
child of a man of great destiny, make him your
Nieren, Lendenbereich. Musokɔrɔba friend. (proverb). Anstatt eifersüchtig auf das
lafiyalen kongoron bɛ fɛrɛ. Une vieille Kind eines Mannes mit großer Zukunft zu sein,
femme [relevée par sa belle-fille] se repose et machen Sie es zu Ihrem Freund. (Sprichwort).
son basin s’élargit. (proverbe). An old woman synonyme: keliya, ɲɛnakɔniya, kɔniya 1 .
[picked up by her daughter-in-law] rests and 2 • haïr (par jalousie); to hate (out of
her basin widens. (proverb). Eine alte Frau jealousy); hassen (aus Eifersucht). Ni i
[von ihrer Schwiegertochter aufgenommen]
fadenkɛw y'i konya, dabakala kɛ i teri ye.
ruht sich aus und ihr Becken wird breiter.
(Sprichwort). Cɛmisɛnnin y'i bolo da
Quand tes demi-frères te haïssent, prends ta
houe pour ami. (proverbe). When your
npogotigi kongoron kan. Le petit jeune
half-brothers hate you, take your hoe for a
homme mit la main sur les reins de la fille. The friend. (proverb). Wenn deine Halbbrüder dich
little man put his hand on the girl’s lumbar hassen, nimm deine Hacke zum Freund.
region. Der kleine junge Mann legte seine (Sprichwort).
Hand auf die Lenden des Mädchens.
3 • jalousie; jealousy; Eifersucht. fadenkonya
Category: Body.
jalousie de rivalité. rivalry jealousy.
kongosira variante: kongosiranin. Nom. espèce de Eifersucht der Rivalität.
gommier, Platane du Sénégal; kind of tree,
koniyabagatɔ [ó] Morphemes: koniya-baga-tɔ.
African Shea Butter Tree; Baumart.
Category: Tree. sterculia setigera.
Nom. jaloux, envieux; jealous person, envious
person; eine eifersüchtige Person, neidische
kongosisɛnin bambara: kungosyɛnin. Nom. poule Person. Koniyabagatɔ tɔnɔ ye nimisa dɔrɔn
de rocher; stone partridge; Felsenwachtel. de ye. Le seul bénéfice de l'envieux est le
Category: Bird. philomachus petrosus.
regret. The only benefit of the envious is regret.
synonyme: kungosyɛnin.
Der einzige Vorteil des Neides ist das
kongosodugu synonyme: dugu, cikɛdugu. Nom. Bedauern. synonyme: kɔniyabagatɔ.
village; village; Dorf, Weiler. konjo [ó] variante: koyo, konjon. Nom. 1 • hyène
kongosogow synonyme: kongokɔnɔfɛnw. Nom. (surnom de l'); hyena (nickname); Hyäne
faune, ressource faunique; fauna; Fauna, (Spitzname). synonyme: lagabure, jaturu,
Tierwelt. walowalo , dajugu, jujuju.
2
kongosomɔgɔ synonyme: cikɛla, dafɛdugumɔgɔ. 2 • homme d'une très grande force vitale; man
Nom. villageois; villager; Dorfbewohner.
of great vital force; Mann von großer
Lebenskraft.
kongowulu synonyme: ŋala. variante: kungowulu,
3 • fort et bête (comme la hyène); strong and
kongowulunin. Nom. chacal; jackal; Schakal. stupid (like the hyena); stark und dumm (wie
Category: Mammal. canis canis aureus; canis die Hyäne).
canis adustus.
konkankon [ṍ-ã-̀ ó] Jula: konkanko.
kongowulunin [ó] synonyme: kongokɔnɔwulu, variante: konkankonkɔnɔ. Nom. 1 • barbu de
nɔgɔsiwulu. variante: kongowulu. Nom. Vieillot; Vieillot's Barbet;
lycaon, loup peint; hunting dog; Afrikanischer Blutbrust-Bartvogel. Category: Bird. lybius
Wildhund. synonyme: nɔɔsiwulu, naasiwulu. vieilloti.
2 • Gonolek de Barbarie; yellow-crowned
gonolek; Goldscheitelwürger. Category: Bird.
laniarius barbarus.
29/01/2026 428

konkankonninkelen koɲɛ
konkankonninkelen [ó] Nom. barbu à front jaune; konkɔnɔ [ó-ɔ̀-ɔ́] Nom. pélican gris; Pink-backed
kind of bird; Vogelart. Category: Bird. Pelican; Rötelpelikan. Category: Bird.
pogoniulus chrysoconus. pelecanus rufescens. synonyme: kolanjan,
konkanu Nom. jabiru du Sénégal; saddle-bill stork; kɔsɔgɔkɔnɔ, kulanjan, forokoba,
Storch (Art). Category: Bird. ephippiorhynchus kɔnɔbɔrɔtigi.
senegalensis. synonyme: npɔlɔnsama, konkɔrɔ [ò] variante: kɔnkɔrɔ. Nom. gros singe
kamalenɲuman, pɔlɔnsama.
rouge mâle; big red male monkey; großer roter
konkelen [ò] Nom. vieux singe rouge solitaire; männlicher Affe. Category: Mammal.
erythrocebus patas.
lonely old red monkey; einsamer alter roter
Affe. erythrocebus patas. konnɛgɛ [ó] variante: kɔnnɛgɛ, koɲin, konnigɛ.
konko [ò] Nom. calebasse sphérique (avec couvercle, Nom. serrure, clef, clé; lock, key; Türschloss,
Schlüssel. ... án ye so dasɔgɔ ka konnɛgɛ de
utilisée par les apiculteurs); spherical gourd
(with lid, used by beekeepers); Kugelkürbis bɔ kon la. ... nous avons fermé la porte à clef
(mit Deckel, wird von Imkern verwendet). et retiré la clef de la porte. ... we locked the
door and removed the key from the door. ... wir
konkolo [ó-ò-ó] Nom. planchette (sur laquelle les
haben die Tür verschlossen und den Schlüssel
cordonniers découpent le cuir); board (on
aus der Tür genommen.
which shoemakers cut leather); Brett (auf dem
synonyme: konbalabala.
Schuhmacher Leder schneiden). Tulikɛla fila
tɛ ɲɛ konkolo kelen kan. Deux cordonniers konnɛgɛdulonnan Nom. bourse à monnaie; purse;
ne peuvent pas se servir en même temps de la Brieftasche, Geldbeutel. Category: Finance.
même planchette. (proverbe). Two shoemakers konnigɛ
cannot use the same board at the same time.
comparer: dayɛlɛlan.[ó-ɛ́-ɛ́] Morphemes: ko
(proverb). Zwei Schuhmacher können nicht
n-nɛgɛ. synonyme: konnɛgɛden.
gleichzeitig das gleiche Brett benutzen.
(Sprichwort). variante: konnɛgɛ. Nom. clef, clé; key;
konkon [ó] Nom. partie saillante (arcade sourcilière, Schlüssel. synonyme: konɲin, kile, dayɛlɛlan.
1
mâchoire); protruding part (brow arch, jaw); konɲin [ó] Nom. clef, clé; key; Schlüssel. ... k'u
hervorstehender Teil (Stirnknochen, Kiefer). konɲin bila k kun. ... et en garder les clefs sur
ɲɛkonkon arcade sourcilière. eyebrow arch.
toi. ... and keep the keys on you. ... und behalte
Augenbrauenbogen. synonyme: ɲɛgosi, die Schlüssel bei dir. synonyme: konnigɛ,
ɲɛkonkon. konbalabala, gɛlɛyalan, kile.
konkon 2 [ó] Verbe. décharger (une arme), tirer; unload konson [ó] Nom. butin; loot, booty, spoils; Beute. ... u
(a weapon), shoot; (eine Waffe) entladen, ye konson labɔ ka a tila. ... ils oint fait sortir
schießen. Donso karamɔgɔ ye dafila fan fila
le butin et l'ont partagé. ...they brought out
bɛɛ konkon : kiriwu ! kiriwu ! Le maître the spoils and divided them. ...sie brachten
chasseur déchargea les deux coups de son fusil die Beute hervor und teilten sie auf.
: pan ! pan ! The master hunter discharged two kɛlɛkonson butin de guerre. spoils of war.
shots from his rifle: bang! bang ! Der Kriegsbeute.
Meisterjäger feuerte zwei Schüsse aus seinem
Gewehr ab: Knall! Knall!
konsɔgɔ [ó] Verbe. s'asseoir en tailleur; sit
cross-legged; im Schneidersitz sitzen. A y'a
konkon [ó] Verbe. épousseter, ôter la poussière en
3
sen konsɔgɔ. Il s'est assis en tailleur. He sat
frappant à coups répétés; dust, remove dust by
cross-legged. Er saß im Schneidersitz.
knocking repeatedly; Staub entfernen, Staub
durch wiederholtes Klopfen entfernen. A ye koɲaɲini synonyme: kokɔrɔbɔli. Nom. curiosité;
kirikɛ konkon. Il épousseta la selle. He dusted curiosity; Neugier.
the saddle. Er staubte den Sattel ab. koɲɛ [ó] Nom. 1 • affaire; affair, case, matter; Fall,
konkonnin synonyme: koonin. Affäre. Bakari Jan ni Bilisi ka koɲɛ...
variante: kɔnɔkɔnɔnin. Nom. espèce de silure, L'affaire entre Bakari, Dian et Bilissi... The
poisson-chat; kind of mud-fish; Fischart. affair between Bakari, Dian and Bilissi... Die
Category: Fish. clarias anguillaris / Affäre zwischen Bakari, Dian und Bilissi...
senegalensis. synonyme: kɔnɔkɔnɔnin. 2 • fois; times; mal.
29/01/2026 429

koɲɛbɔla koo yɛrɛyɛrɛ
3 • problème, différend; problem, dispute; koɲumandɔn [ó] Morphemes: ko-ɲuman-dɔn.
Problem, Streit. Bi, basigi koɲɛw ka gɛlɛn
1 • Verbe. être reconnaissant envers quelqu'un;
kosɛbɛ. Aujourd'hui les problèmes de sécurité to be grateful to someone; jemandem dankbar
sont très graves. Today security problems are sein. N bɛ segin ka laban k'i koɲumandɔn...
very serious. Heutzutage sind Je t'en suis à nouveau reconnaissante... I am
Sicherheitsprobleme sehr ernst. U ka koɲɛ bɛ grateful to you again... Ich bin dir noch einmal
mun kan? A quoi tient leur différend ? What is dankbar...
their disagreement about? Worin besteht ihre 2 • Verbe. encourager; encourage, promote,
Meinungsverschiedenheit? foster; ermutigen. An ka foli bɛ mɔgɔ caman
koɲɛbɔla [ó] Morphemes: koɲɛ-bɔ-la. ye, minnu y'an ka kɛlɛ i n koɲumandɔn...
variante: koɲɛnabɔla. Nom. organisateur, Nous remercions les nombreuses personnes
qui nous ont encouragés dans notre combat...
responsable; organizer, responsible;
We thank the many people who encouraged us
Organisator, Leiter. Jɔyɔrɔ bɛ koɲɛbɔlaw
in our fight... Wir danken den vielen
fana na. Les organisateurs ont aussi un rôle à
Menschen, die uns in unserem Kampf ermutigt
jouer. Organizers also have a role to play. haben...
Auch die Organisatoren spielen eine Rolle.
3 • Verbe. reconnaître la valeur; recognize the
koɲɛfɔli synonyme: koɲɛyirali, kumalaseta. Nom. value; den Wert erkennen. U y'i ka baara
déclaration; declaration; Aussage, Erklärung. koɲumandɔn. Ils ont reconnu la valeur de ton
koɲɛɲini n.comp. enquête, investigation; travail. They recognized the value of your
work. Sie haben den Wert Ihrer Arbeit erkannt.
investigation; Untersuchung, Nachforschung.
4 • Nom. reconnaissance, gratitude;
koɲɛɲinibaro comparer: kunnafoniɲinibaro. Nom. recognition, gratitude; Anerkennung,
interview; interview; Interview, Besprechung, Dankbarkeit.
Unterredung.
koɲumanlɔn 1 • Verbe. être reconnaissant envers,
koɲɛɲinila n.comp. enquêteur; investigating officer; encourager, reconnaître la valeur ; to be
Ermittler, Forscher, Untersuchungsbeamter. grateful towards, encourage, recognize the
Category: Person. value of; dankbar sein, ermutigen, den Wert
koɲɛsigi comparer: fɔkabila. n.comp. prévision;
anerkennen.
2 • Nom. gratitude, reconnaissance;
forecasting, prediction; Vorhersage,
gratefulness, gratitude, appreciation,
Prognose.
recognition, acknowledgement; Dankbarkeit,
koɲɔgɔyabaga variante: konɔgɔyabaga. Nom. Anerkennung.
facilitateur; facilitator; Vermittler, Moderator, koo [ó] variante: ko. Nom. chose, action, affaire,
Schulungsleiter. synonyme: karamɔgɔ .
1 événement; thing, matter, affair, action, event;
koɲuman [ó-ù-à] Morphemes: ko-ɲuman. Ding, Aktion, Sache, Angelegenheit, Ereignis.
1 • Adverbe. bien, parfaitement, correctement; I ko tɛ. Cela ne te concerne pas. It’s not your
well, perfectly, correctly; gut, perfekt, korrekt. affair. Das ist nicht deine Angelegenheit. An
A bɛ balan fɔ koɲuman. Il joue bien du kumana o ko la. Nous en avons parlé. We
balafon. He plays the balafon well. Er spielt spoke about that. Wir haben von dieser
gut Balafon. ... hali a kumakan tɛ mɛn Angelegenheit gesprochen.
koɲuman ! ... on n'entend même pas koo bɔrɔtɔ [ó ɔ̀-ɔ̀-ɔ́] synonyme: koo jɛnsɛ. vi.
correctement ce qu'il dit ! ... we don’t even
divulguer; divulge, disclose; enthüllen,
hear what he’s saying! ... man hört nicht
verbreiten, ausplaudern.
einmal richtig, was er sagt!
koo dagabali [ó à-à-á-í] comparer: fili. Nom. délit;
2 • Nom. bonne action; good action; gute Tat. I
ye koɲuman kɛ. Tu as bien fait. You did well.
misdeed, offence; Vergehen, Delikt.
Du hast es gut gemacht. antonyme: kojugu. koo fɔ vi. recommander; recommend; empfehlen.
2
synonyme: komagɛlɛya.
koɲumanba Nom. très bonnes choses; very good
things; sehr gute Dinge /Sachen. koo jɛnsɛ synonyme: koo bɔrɔtɔ. vi. divulguer;
divulge, disclose; enthüllen, ausbreiten,
verbreiten.
koo ye [ó é] synonyme: sɔmi koo ra. Verbe. déceler;
detect; entdecken, herausfinden.
koo yɛrɛyɛrɛ Nom. concret; concrete, tangible,
practical; konkret. Category: Mathematics.
29/01/2026 430

kookoo kooro
kookoo [òó-òó] variante: koko. Nom. hémorroïdes; koorikɔnɔci [ò-ì-ɔ̀-ɔ̀] Morphemes: koori-kɔnɔ-ci.
haemorrhoids, hemorrhoids; Hämorrhoiden. variante: koolikɔnɔci. Nom. diamètre,
Category: Disease. synonyme: koko 2 , kɔbɔ 2 . circonférence, équateur; diameter, equator;
kooli [ò-í] variante: koli. Nom. règles; menstrual Durchmesser, Äquator. Wagadugu... a dugu
period; Monatsblutung. synonyme: kalobɔ.
koorikɔnɔci ye kilomɛtɛrɛ 30 ye. La ville de
Ouagadougou a 30 km de diamètre. The city of
koolo [ò] Nom. poids du métier à tisser; weight of the Ouagadougou is 30 km in diameter. Die Stadt
loom; Gewicht des Webstuhls. Nɛgɛkuru de Ouagadougou hat einen Durchmesser von 30
ye ale ka koolo ye. C'est un morceau de métal km. Dugukolo koorikɔnɔci ye kilomɛtɛrɛ
qui lui sert de poids pour le métier à tisser. It is 40'000 ye. La circonférence de la terre est de
a piece of metal which serves as a weight for 40 000 kilomètres. The circumference of the
the loom. earth is 40,000 kilometres. Der Erdumfang
beträgt 40.000 Kilometer.
koolokaala [ò-ò] Verbe. flâner, prendre son temps,
Category: Mathematics.
traîner; stroll, take your time, hang out;
bummeln, Zeit nehmen, herumhängen. A y'i
koorilamini [ò] Morphemes: koori-lamini.
koolokaala ka na. Il est arrivé en prenant son variante: koori lamini. Nom. circonférence;
temps, sans se presser. He arrived taking his
circumference; Umkreis.
time, without rushing. Er kam in aller Ruhe an, Category: Mathematics.
ohne sich zu beeilen. koorinin variante: kooronin. Nom. cercle, circulaire;
koon [ṍõ̀] bambara: kon. Nom. porte (battant); door circle, circular; Kreis, kreisförmig.
(hinged section); Tür. synonyme: kon . Category: Mathematics. synonyme: sɛrɛkili,
2
baro , koori.
koori [ò-í] variante: kooli. 1 • Nom. cercle, rond; 3
circle; Kreis, Ring. so selekema, so koorilen
kooritilancɛ Nom. arc de cercle; circle arc, circle
une pièce rectangulaire, une pièce ronde. a
segment; Kreissegment, Kreisbogen,
rectangular room, a round room. ein
Kreissektor.
rechteckiger Raum, ein runder Raum. kooro [ò-ó] variante: koro. Verbe. traîner, racler;
1
Category: Mathematics. synonyme: baro ,
3 drag, scrape, scrape off; schleifen, schleppen,
sɛrɛkili, koorinin. schaben, abschaben, abkratzen. A ye wulusu
2 • vt. encercler, entourer, arrondir, être rond; kooro a kɔ. Il a traîné le cadavre du chien
encircle, to be round; einkreisen, umgeben, derrière lui. He dragged the dog's body behind
runden, rund sein. An nana án koori Musa him. Er zog den Körper des Hundes hinter sich
na... Nous sommes venus faire cercle autour her. Ɲɔsuurulaw bɛ ɲɔbu kooro. Les
de Moussa... We came to form a circle around vanneuses raclent par terre le son de mil. After
Moussa... Wir bildeten einen Kreis um winnowing the millet, the ladies scrape the
Moussa... U nana baro koori. Ils vinrent faire millet bran from the ground. Nach dem
une causerie. They came to have a talk. Sie Sichten der Hirse kratzen die Frauen die
kamen, um sich zu unterhalten. Áw bɛ koori Hirsekleie vom Boden zusammen.
kɛ kabalidaɲɛw. Entourez les mots kooro 2 [ó-ó] synonyme: kogoro. variante: nkooro.
exclamatifs. Circle the exclamatory words. Nom. 1 • varan du sable, varan de terre;
Kreisen Sie die ausrufenden Wörter ein. Savannah monitor; Sand Waran,
synonyme: lakoori. Steppenwaran. Ni i ye kooro kɛlen ye ka
koori tilancɛ expr. demi-lune; half moon; Halbmond. muso sɔrɔ, a kooroɲɔgɔn don. Si tu vois que
le varan de terre a trouvé femme, c'est un varan
Category: Sky.
comme lui. (proverbe). If you see that the
kooricinan variante: koorikɛnan. Nom. compas; monitor lizard has found a wife, it's a monitor
compasses, circle; Zirkel. lizard like him. (proverb). Wenn Sie sehen,
Category: Mathematics, Tool. daß der Steppenwaran eine Frau gefunden hat,
synonyme: koorikɛlan. handelt es sich um einen Waran wie ihn.
(Sprichwort). Category: Mammal. varanus
koorikɛlan [ò-ì-ɛ̀] Morphemes: koori-kɛ-lan. Nom.
exanthematicus. synonyme: kogoro.
compas; compass; Zirkel. tiiricilanw ni
2 • flatteur, rapporteur (populaire); flatterer,
koorikɛlanw des règles et des compas. rulers rapporteur (popular); Schmeichler,
and compasses. Lineale und Zirkel. Berichterstatter (Volksmund).
Category: Tool. synonyme: kooricinan.
29/01/2026 431

kooro koro
kooro [ó] Verbe. hurler, rugir, mugir; howl, roar, kora [ó-á] variante: kɔra. Nom. cora: harpe à 21
3
bellow, scream; heulen, brüllen, schreien. Ni cordes, jouée par des griots en Afrique de
saya kɛra, muso dɔw bɛ kooro. Quand l’Ouest; kora: traditional 21-string harp
played by griots in West Africa; kora: harfe mit
quelqu'un meurt, certaines femmes se mettent
21 saiten die von den lobpreissängern in
à hurler. When someone dies, some women
start screaming. Wenn jemand stirbt, fangen
Westafrika verwendet wird. korafɔla joueur
manche Frauen an zu schreien. de « kora ». kora player. Kora-Spieler.
synonyme: kaaro , kule, kulo, woronto, Category: Musical instrument.
2 1
pɛrɛn . korafɔla Nom. joueur de kora; harp / lute player;
1
koorokaara [ò-ò] variante: korokara. Nom. tortue
Harfenspieler.
de terre; tortoise, turtle; Schildkröte. Ni i ye korakora [ó] variante: kurakura. Verbe. glousser;
koorokaara ye jiri sanfɛ, i b'a sɔrɔ hɛɛrɛ tɛ giggle, chuckle, cluck; kichern, gackern. A
dugu ma. Quand la tortue est en haut de denw sara, o bɛɛ la a bɛ korakora. Ses
l'arbre, c'est qu'il ne fait vraiment pas bon être poussins sont morts, et pourtant elle glousse.
par terre. (proverbe). When the turtle is at the Her chicks are dead, and yet she clucks.
top of the tree, it's really not good to be on the kori [ó-í] Verbe. 1 • associer, être casanier;
ground. (proverb). Wenn die Schildkröte oben
associate, stay-at-home; assoziieren,
auf dem Baum ist, ist es wirklich nicht gut, am
vereinigen, zusammenbringen, Zuhause
Boden zu sein. (Sprichwort).
hocken. Karisa korilen bɛ so kɔnɔ. Untel
Category: Reptile. synonyme: sirakɔgɔma.
reste toujours chez lui. He always stays at
kooromori [ó] Morphemes: kooro-mori. Nom. home. Er bleibt immer zu Hause.
marabout, charlatan (travaillant surtout pour 2 • couver; brood; brüten. Syɛ mana kori, a bɛ
les femmes); soothsayer, charlatan (working
juguya. Quand la poule couve, elle devient
especially for women); Wahrsager, Scharlatan
méchante. When the hen hatches, she becomes
(besonders für Frauen tätig). Kooromori, a
wicked. Wenn die Henne brütet, wird sie böse.
bolo b'a kɛ, a ku b'a tiɲɛ. Le charlatan,
koro [ò-ó] variante: korofin. Nom. 1 • arbre
[comme le varan], sa queue efface ce que sa 1
patte a fait. The charlatan, [like the monitor
(espèce) et fruit, prune noire, prunier noire;
lizard], his tail erases what his paw has done.
tree sp, Black plum; Baumart, schwarze
Der Scharlatan [wie die Warane] löscht mit Pflaume, schwarzer Pflaumenbaum. Ka n da
seinem Schwanz aus, was seine Pfote getan fin n ma koro dun. Me noircir la bouche alors
hat. Category: Religion. que je n'ai pas mangé de prune noire !
synonyme: batutamori, jinɛmori, jinamori. (proverbe). Turning my mouth black even
though I haven't eaten a black plum!
koorosɔnin [ó] Morphemes: kooro-sɔnin. Nom.
(proverb). Mein Mund wird schwarz, obwohl
plante épineuse; thorny plant; stachelige ich keine schwarze Pflaume gegessen habe!
Pflanze. Category: Grass, herb, vine. (Sprichwort). Category: Tree, Food. vitex
blepharis linariifolia. doniana.
koorosyɔsina [ó] Morphemes: kooro-syɔ-sina. 2 • noir; black; schwarz.
Nom. herbe annuelle (espèce de); annual grass koro [ó-ó] synonyme: kolo. vt. éduquer; bring up,
2
(kind of); einjähriges Gras (Art).
educate; erziehen, aufziehen. Category: Learn.
Category: Grass, herb, vine. crotalaria
synonyme: lakuru.
glauca.
3
koorowo [ó] Morphemes: kooro-wo. Nom. koro 3 [ó] Nom. 1 • calebasse pour boire la bière de
mil, pour faire les semis; calabash to drink
chaussures fermées, en matière plastique;
millet beer, to sow seeds; Kalebasse, um
closed shoes, made of plastic; geschlossene
Hirsebier zu trinken, um Samen zu säen.
Schuhe aus Kunststoff. Fulakɛ ka koorowo ye
dannikoro / dannikɛkoro calebasse pour
a ka jifilen ye. C'est sa chaussure qui sert au
semer. calabash for sowing. Kalebasse zur
Peul de pot pour boire. It is his shoe that the
Aussaat. Category: Container.
Fulani use as a drinking pot. Es ist sein Schuh,
den die Fulani als Trinkgefäß benutzen.
2 • servir une calebasse (de bière...); serve a
calabash (of beer...); eine Kalebasse (Bier...)
Category: Clothing.
servieren. N ma koro fɔlɔ. On ne m'a pas
encore servi. I haven't been served yet. Ich
wurde noch nicht bedient.
3 • verre à thé; tea glass; Teeglas.
29/01/2026 432

koroba koroŋɛɲɛ
koroba Nom. plante (espèce); plant sp; Pflanzenart. 3 • circonscrire, réduire; circumscribe, reduce;
1
Category: Grass, herb, vine. vitex cienkowski.
umschreiben, reduzieren. ... bana in bɛ se ka
koron... ... cette maladie ne peut être
koroba [ò-ò-á] variante: koro, korofin. Nom.
2 circonscrite... ... this disease cannot be
1 • espèce d’arbre, prunier noir; kind of tree, circumscribed... ... diese Krankheit kann nicht
black plum tree; Baumart, schwarze
eingegrenzt werden...
Pflaumenbaum. Category: Tree. vitex doniana.
4 • être exigu, être trop petit, être gêné par le
2 • prune noire; black plum; schwarze Pflaume. manque de place, se trouver à l'étroit; to be
korobara [ó] Morphemes: koro-bara. Nom. cramped, to be too small, to be hampered by
lack of space; eng sein, zu klein sein, durch
calebasse pour semer; calabash for sowing;
Kalebasse zum Säen. Category: Agricultural
Platzmangel behindert sein, beengt sein. A ka
tool, Container. so koronnen don. Sa maison est trop petite.
korocoli [ó] Verbe. 1 • tresser une corde pour la rendre
His house is too small. Sein Haus ist zu klein.
... a wagati koronnen don dɔɔnin. ... sa
plus forte; braiding a rope to make it stronger;
Seil flechten, um es stärker zu machen.
durée est un peu insuffisante. ... its duration is
a little insufficient. ... die Dauer ist etwas zu
2 • corder; string; bespannen. A ye juruden
kurz.
korocoli. Il corda la ficelle. He tied the string.
koronbanin variante: gorobanin. Nom. tourterelle du
Er band die Schnur fest.
Cap; Long-tailed Dove, Namaqua dove; Taube
3 • corde (de fort diamètre), câble; rope (large
(Art), Kaptäubchen, Maskentäubchen.
diameter), cable; Seil (mit großem
Category: Bird. oena capensis.
Durchmesser), Kabel. A ye korocoli don a ka
synonyme: ngorobanin, jɔntugannin.
misi la. Il attacha sa vache avec une grosse
ficelle. He tied his cow with a thick string. Er koroninfin [ò-ò-ì-í] variante: koronin. Nom. koro
band seine Kuh mit einer dicken Schnur fest. des berges, koro denté; kind of tree, Madiensis
nɛgɛkorocoli câble métallique. metal cable. chaste tree; Baumart. Category: Tree. vitex
Metallkabel. chrysocarpa; vitex madiensis, vitex
simplicifolia.
korofuga [ò-ò] Nom. Gommier, Platane du Sénégal;
koroninsumago Nom. koro denté; kind of tree;
African Shea Butter Tree; Stinkbaum.
Category: Tree. sterculia setigera. Baumart. Category: Tree. vitex madiensis
/barbata.
korokala [ò-ó-à-á] Nom. plante (espèce de),
koronniyɔrɔ [ó] Morphemes: koron-ni-yɔrɔ. Nom.
légumineuse; plant (species of); Pflanze (Art),
Hülsenfrucht. Category: Grass, herb, vine. parc clos pour le bétail, enclos; closed
desmodium hirtum. enclosure for livestock, enclosure;
geschlossenes Gehege für Nutztiere, Gehege.
korokara [ò-ó-à-á] synonyme: sirakɔgɔman.
ka baganw sɔgɔ koronniyɔrɔ kɔnɔ vacciner
variante: koorokaara. Nom. tortue; turtle, les bêtes dans l'enclos. vaccinate the animals
tortoise; Schildkröte. Category: Reptile. in the enclosure. Impfen Sie die Tiere im
koroko synonyme: arabuka. variante: koko. Nom. Gehege. Category: Animal husbandry.
touraco gris; Grey Plantain-Eater; Grauer koronto [ò-ò] Verbe. rassembler en tas, ratisser,
Lärmvogel. Category: Bird. crinifer piscator. mettre en tas; gather in a heap, rake, pile up;
synonyme: arabuka, koko 3 . auf einen Haufen sammeln, harken, aufhäufen.
korokoto [ò-ò-ò] Nom. poisson-chat; catfish;
ka nɔgɔ koronto mettre en tas du fumier. pile
up manure. Mist aufhäufen.
Augenfleckwels. Category: Fish.
auchenoglanis occidentalis, auchenoglanis koroŋɛɲɛ [ò-ò-ɛ́-ɛ́] variante: kuruŋɛɲɛ. Nom.
cutatus. synonyme: mugukɔɔnkɔn. démangeaison, eczéma; itching, eczema;
Juckreiz, Ekzeme. Koroŋɛɲɛ fɛ a ye kulusi
koron [ó] Verbe. 1 • coincer, cerner, traquer; to
bila. Il a tellement d’eczéma qu'il ne met plus
corner, to surround, to track down; in die Enge
treiben, umzingeln, aufspüren. A sɔrɔla ka olu
de pantalon. He has so much eczema that he no
longer wears pants. Er hat so viele Ekzeme,
koron ni ka olu minɛ yen. Il finit par les
daß er keine Hosen mehr trägt.
coincer et les attraper là-bas. He ends up
synonyme: muɲumuɲu.
catching them and grabbing them there. Er
trieb sie in die Enge und fängt sie dort ein.
2 • assiéger; besiege; belagern.
29/01/2026 433

korosakorosa kota
korosakorosa [ò-ò-à] Nom. maladie de peau kosɛbɛ [ó-ɛ́-ɛ́] variante: kɔsɛbɛ, kosɔbɛ. Adverbe.
caractérisée par l'apparition de nombreux 1 • très bien, beaucoup, parfaitement, tout à
petits boutons urticants, urticaire; skin disease fait, complètement; very good, a lot, perfectly,
characterized by the appearance of numerous completely, well, very good; sehr gut, viel,
small stinging pimples, nettle-rash, hives; zahlreich, perfekt, vollkommen, gut, bestens.
Hauterkrankung, die durch das Auftreten ... o bɛ bɛn ale ma kosɛbɛ ! ... cela lui
zahlreicher kleiner stechender Pickel convient très bien ! ...it suits him very well!
gekennzeichnet ist, Nesselsucht. A bɛ kisɛkisɛ ...es steht ihm sehr gut! Kosɛbɛ dɛ !
i n'a fɔ korosakorosa. Ça fait des petits Absolument ! Absolutely ! Absolut !
boutons comme de l'urticaire. It makes little synonyme: kosɔbɛ, ta .
4
pimples like hives. Es entstehen kleine Pickel
2 • intensif, très grave; intensive, very
wie Nesselsucht. Category: Disease.
serious; intensiv, sehr ernst. O ka bana ka
korosɔli Emprunt de : français. Nom. corossol; gɛlɛn kosɛbɛ ! La maladie de celui-là est très
sour-sop, Graviola; Graviola. Category: Food. grave ! This one's illness is very serious! Die
koroto synonyme: bonzonin. Nom. arbre (espèce); tree Krankheit dieser Person ist sehr ernst!
sp; Baumart. Category: Tree. acacia kosɛbɛ-kosɛbɛ Adverbe. très bien; very well; sehr
macrostachya. gut.
kosa 1 [ò] Verbe. être compétent en, être habitué à; to kosɛgɛsɛgɛla n.comp. curieux (abus); nosy, curious;
be competent in, to be accustomed to; neugierig.
kompetent sein, daran gewöhnt sein. N kosara
koso [ò] Nom. couverture en coton; cotton blanket;
fulakanfɔ la. Je sis bien parler le peul. I can
Baumwolldecke. koso kura une couverture en
speak Fulani well. Ich kann gut Fulani
sprechen.
coton neuve. a new cotton blanket. eine neue
Baumwolldecke.
kosa [ò] Emprunt de : français. variante: kusa.
2 kosɔbɛ [ó-ɔ́-ɛ́] variante: kosobɛ. Adverbe. beaucoup,
Nom. 1 • costume; suit, costume; Anzug.
très, très bien; much, many, very, very well;
Category: Clothing.
viel, sehr, sehr gut. A ka di kosɔbɛ. C'est très
2 • vêtement d’extérieur importé : manteau,
bon. It is very good. Es ist sehr gut. N ka a
anorak..; imported outerwear: coat, anorak..;
Importierte Bekleidung: Mantel, Anorak... mɛn kosɔbɛ. J'ai très bien compris. I
3 • mauvais vêtement, loques, haillons understood it very well. Ich verstand es sehr
(populaire); bad clothes, rags (popular); gut. synonyme: kosɛbɛ.
schlechtes Gewand, Lumpen. Jaa e ma kosa kosɔn [ó-ɔ̀] variante: kɔson, kɔsɔn. postp. à cause
bi dɛ ! Vraiment tu es mal habillé aujourd'hui !
de, pour, grâce à, au nom de; because of, for, in
You’re really not dressed today! Du bist heute
the name of; für, wegen, im Namen. A ma taa
wirklich schlecht angezogen!
sanji kosɔn. Il n’est pas allé à cause de la
4 • être « bien sape » (avec des vêtements non
pluie. He didn’t go because of the rain. Er ging
traditionnels, populaire), bien habillé; be “well
nicht wegen dem Regen. O de kosɔn... C’est
dressed” (with non-traditional, popular
clothing); gut gekleidet sein (mit pourquoi: en conséquence... Therefore: so...
nicht-traditionellen Kleidung, beliebt). A Darum: deshalb: nin kanun kosɔn au nom de
kosalen don bi. Il es bien habillé aujourd'hui.
cette amitié. in the name of this friendship. im
Namen dieser Freundschaft. synonyme: kanma.
He’s well dressed today. Er ist heute gut
gekleidet. kota [ò] 1 • Verbe. désobéir gravement à Dieu,
kose [ó] Morphemes: ko-se. Verbe. amener à, faire commettre un sacrilège; seriously disobey
parvenir; bring to, make to; dazu bringen, God, commit sacrilege; Gott ernsthaft
veranlassen. Ka muso in nidungɔ kose a ma ungehorsam sein, ein Sakrileg begehen. ... ka
purke a ɲɛ kana bɔ cɛ wɛrɛ fɛ. Faire en sorte Ala kota kɛ ka ɲinɛ ko saya bɛ yen. ... faire
ce que Dieu interdit et oublier que la mort
que cette femme l'aime afin qu'elle n'aille pas
rechercher un autre homme. Make this woman
existe. ... do what God forbids and forget that
death exists. ... tun, was Gott verbietet und
love him so she doesn't go looking for another
man. Bringe diese Frau dazu, ihn zu lieben,
vergessen, dass es den Tod gibt.
damit sie sich nicht auf die Suche nach einem 2 • Nom. désobéissance à Dieu, impiété;
anderen Mann macht. disobedience to God, impiety; Ungehorsam
gegenüber Gott, Gottlosigkeit.
29/01/2026 434

kotalako koya
3 • Nom. acte sexuel... en particulier adultère, 2 • Nom. responsabilité, pouvoir, patronage;
inceste, acte sexuel immorale; sexual act... responsibility, power, patronage;
especially adultery, incest, immoral sexual Verantwortung, Macht, Fürsorge. ...ne tɛ
act; sexuelle Handlung... insbesondere kotigiya ɲini... ... je ne cherche pas le
Ehebruch, Inzest, unmoralische sexuelle
pouvoir... ... I’m not looking for power... ... ich
Handlung.
suche nicht nach Macht...
4 • Nom. vice; vice; Laster.
kotiɲɛla [ó-í-ɛ́-á] synonyme: jalakitigi. Nom.
kotalako [ò-à-à] Morphemes: kota-la-ko. Nom.
coupable; culprit; Angeklagte, Schuldige,
vice, grave défaut; vice, serious defect; Laster, Verbrecher.
Fehler, schwerwiegender Mangel. Kɔlɔmin ye
koto Nom. fruit (noir) de vitex doniana; black fruit;
kotalako ye. L'ivrognerie est un vice.
1
schwarze Frucht. Category: Food. vitex
Drunkenness is a vice. Trunkenheit ist ein
doniana.
Laster.
koto [ò] comparer: jukoto, kɔkoto, nunkoto.
koteba variante: kɔtɛba. Nom. théâtre; theater; 2
Nom. dos, échine, partie basse du dos; back,
Theater.
spine, lower back; Rücken,
kotebanin Nom. sketch; sketch; Entwurf, Skizze, Lendenwirbelsäule, unterer Rückenbereich.
Anspiel. kotodimintɔ personne qui a mal au dos.
kotɛba variante: koteba. Nom. théâtre, pièce de
person who has back pain. Person, die
Rückenschmerzen hat. Category: Body.
théâtre, sketch; play, sketch, drama, theater;
Theater, Theaterstück, Schauspiel, koto 3 [ó] Nom. pommade d'origine européenne,
Bühnenstück, Sketch. synonyme: tiyatiri. grasse et d'odeur forte (camphre), utilisée pour
des luxations, les douleurs; ointment of
kotɛnten [ó-ɛ́-è] variante: kotɛten, koteenten,
European origin, greasy and with a strong
kotenɛnten. Adverbe. peut-être, par hasard, qui odor (camphor), used for dislocations, pain;
sait ?; perhaps, by chance, who knows?; Salbe europäischen Ursprungs, fettig und mit
vielleicht, zufällig, wer weiß? Kotɛnten á ma starkem Geruch (Kampfer), zur Behandlung
Musa tɛmɛtɔ ye wa ? Vous n'auriez pas vu von Luxationen und Schmerzen.
Moussa par hasard ? You haven’t seen Moussa kotokoto [ó] Adverbe. très sale; very dirty; sehr
by any chance? Ihr habt Moussa nicht zufällig schmutzig. A nɔgɔlen kotokoto ! C'est très
gesehen? Ka taa Faransi ? Kotɛnten na, a bɛ
très sale ! It's very, very dirty! Es ist sehr, sehr
se ka kɛ. Partir en France ? Qui sait, ça dreckig! synonyme: kitikiti, biribɔrɔ.
2
pourrait se faire. Going to France? Who
kotoɲɔgɔntala
knows, it could be done. Nach Frankreich
gehen? Wer weiß, vielleicht wäre das [ó] Morphemes: ko-to-ɲɔgɔn-ta-la. Nom.
machbar. respect d'un consensus, respect mutuel,
kotigi [ó-í-í] Morphemes: ko-tigi. Nom. soumission à la décision prise par une partie;
respect for a consensus, mutual respect,
responsable, chef; leader, director, manager;
submission to the decision taken by one party;
Verantwortlicher, Leiter. ... a kotigi de ye ale
Respekt vor einem Konsens, gegenseitiger
ye. ... la responsable c'est elle. ... the one Respekt, Unterwerfung unter die von einer
responsible is her. ... sie ist die Partei getroffene Entscheidung.
Verantwortliche. Kotoɲɔgɔntala de bɛ Kaarabugu si caya. Le
kotigiya [ó] Morphemes: ko-tigi-ya. 1 • Verbe. être respect du consensus, voilà ce qui donne
longue vie au village de Karabougou.
responsable, avoir la situation en mains; be in
(proverbe). Respect for consensus is what
charge of, have control of the situation;
gives a long life to the village of Karabougou.
verantwortlich sein für, Verantwortung tragen,
(proverb). Der Respekt vor dem Konsens
die Situation in der Hand haben. Kɛlɛ mana
verleiht dem Dorf Karabougou ein langes
mɔgɔ maatigiya, fo kɛlɛ k'i kotigiya. Si la
Leben. (Sprichwort).
guerre fait de quelqu'un le maître des hommes,
koya Nom. karité (petit); kind of tree; Baumart.
il faut qu'elle fasse aussi de lui le responsable
des choses. (proverbe). If war makes one the Category: Tree. manilkara multinervis.
master of men, it must also make him
responsible for things. (proverb). Wenn der
Krieg jemanden zum Herrscher macht, muß er
auch den Menschen für die Dinge
verantwortlich machen. (Sprichwort).
29/01/2026 435

koyi kɔ
koyi [ó-í] excl. 1 • certes, c’est sûr, assurément, koyokoyo [ó] variante: korokoro. Verbe. toucher
2
vraiment, certes, absolument, tout à fait, pas du moralement, faire mal non physiquement
tout; at end of a sentence: certainly, (populaire); touch morally, hurt not physically
absolutely, surely, of course; am Schluß eines (popular); moralisch berühren, nicht
Satzes: sicherlich, ganz und gar. Ne lara a la körperlich verletzen (Volksmund). A y'i
koyi ! Je le crois tout à fait ! I certainly believe koyokoyo de. Ça t'a fait mal .(populaire). It
that! Sicherlich glaube ich das! A ma kuma hurt you.(popular). Es hat dir
koyi ! Il n'a pas parlé hein ! He didn't speak, of wehgetan.(Volksmund).
course he did! Hat er nicht gesprochen, klar koyɔrɔ [ò-ɔ́-ɔ́] Nom. douche, salle de bain; shower,
hat er! douche, bathroom; Dusche, Badezimmer.
2 • à la fin d’une phrase négative: pas du tout; Category: Building.
at end of negative phrase: not at all; am
kozɛsi Emprunt de : français. n.comp. comité de
Schluß eines negativen Satzes: sicher nicht,
ganz und gar nicht. Ne ma la a la koyi ! Je ne
gestion; management committee;
Leitungskomitee.
le crois pas du tout ! I don’t believe that at all!
Das glaube ich ganz sicher nicht! Saya ni kɔ 1 [ɔ́] postp. 1 • après, derrière; after, behind;
sunɔgɔ tɛ kelen ye koyi ! La mort et le nach, hinter. Baara kɔ, i bi taa min ? Après le
sommeil, ce n'est pas du tout la même chose ! travail, tu vas où ? After work, where are you
Death and sleep are not at all the same thing! going? Wo gehst du hin nach der Arbeit? o kɔ,
Tod und Schlaf sind überhaupt nicht dasselbe! ... après ça: et puis. after that: then. nachher.
koyo [ò] Morphemes: français « couillon ». tile saba bi kɔ dans trois jours. in three days
1
variante: koɲo. Nom. imbécile, stupide; time. in drei Tagen.
imbecile, stupid; dumm. synonyme: susunjula. 2 • sauf, en dehors de, à part, hormis, excepté;
except, apart from; außer. A tɛ foyi mɛn
koyo [ó] variante: kayo. Nom. tissu de coton blanc
2 julakan kɔ. Il ne comprend rien sauf le dioula.
(avec une transversale), bande de pagne blanc
Il ne comprend que le dioula. He understands
large de 10 cm; white cotton fabric, strip of
nothing but Dioula. He understands only
white cloth 10 cm wide; weißer
Dioula. Er versteht nur Dioula. Tagama ti
Baumwollstoff, Streifen aus weißem Stoff 10
cm breit.
taga wari kɔ. On ne peut pas voyager sans
argent. You can’t travel without money. Du
koyokoyo
1
[ò-ò] variante: korokoro. 1 • Adverbe.
kannst nicht ohne Geld reisen.
blanc, sale (de cendre, de poussière); white,
3 • autrement, sinon, sans; otherwise, without
dirty (with ashes, dust); weiß, schmutzig (mit
the; andernfalls, sonst. A ka naliw ye o
Asche, Staub). A jukunan jɛlen bɛ
nacogow de ye. Kɔ a tɛ na yan tuma bɛɛ.
koyokoyo ! Il a les fesses blanches de
C'est pour ces raisons-là qu'elle vient, sinon,
poussière ! His buttocks are white with dust!
elle ne vient pas ici tout le temps. That’s why
Sein Hintern ist weiß vor Staub! A nɔgɔlen
she comes, otherwise she doesn’t come here all
koyokoyo ! Il est très sale ! He is very dirty! the time. Sie kommt aus diesen Gründen, sonst
Er ist sehr schmutzig! kommt sie nicht ständig hierher.
2 • Adverbe. crasseux, poussiéreux; filthy, 4 • en l'absence de; in the absence of; in
dusty; dreckig, staubig. Abwesenheit von. A b'i tɔgɔ tiɲɛ i kɔ. Il dit du
3 • Verbe. se salir, couvrir de crasse; to get mal de toi en ton absence. He says bad things
dirty, to be covered with filth; schmutzig about you when you’re not here. Er redet
werden, mit Dreck bedeckt sein. ... a fari bɛɛ schlecht von dir, wenn du nicht da bist.
bɛ koyokoyo ! ... tout son corps se couvre de kɔ [ɔ́] Jula: kɔɔ. Nom. 1 • dos; back; Rücken. A
2
crasse. ...his whole body is covered in filth.
kɔ b'a dimin. Il a mal au dos. His back hurts.
...sein ganzer Körper ist mit Dreck bedeckt.
Sein Rücken tut weh. Category: Body, Parts of
4 • Verbe. devenir gris (de saleté ou de ne pas an animal. synonyme: kɔɔ .
1
être enduit de pommade); turn gray (from
2 • arrière, derrière, extérieur; rear, behind,
dirt or not being coated with ointment); grau
werden (durch Schmutz oder fehlende Salbe).
exterior; hinten, außen.
3 • descendance, parents, famille; descendants,
kinship, family; Nachkommen, Verwandte,
Familie. A y'a kɔ kalifa n ma. Il m'a confié les
siens. He entrusted his family members to me.
Er hat mir seine Familienangehörigen
anvertraut.
29/01/2026 436

kɔ kɔbin
4 • côté, envers; side, towards; Seite, gegen. kɔbatigi [ɔ́] Morphemes: kɔ-ba-tigi. Nom.
Kalo kelen ni kɔ bɛ se ka tɛmɛ. Il peut se
1 • patriarche; patriarch; Patriarch. Mɔgɔ min
passer un peu plus d'un mois. It could take a
ka kɔlɛ ka ca, a bɛ fɔ o ma ko kɔbatigi ; a
little more than a month. Es könnte etwas
mehr als einen Monat dauern. denw bɛ yen, a mɔdenw bɛ yen, a
5 • quelques (dans un nombre approximatif); tulomasamaw bɛ yen, a fufafuw bɛ yen.
some (in approximate numbers); einige (in Quelqu’un dont la descendance est nombreuse,
einer ungefähren Zahl). A bɛ mugan ni kɔ bɔ. on l'appelle patriarche : il a ses enfants, ses
Ça fait vingt et quelques. That's twenty
petits-enfants, ses arrière-petits-enfants, ses
something. That’s some twenty. Das sind etwa
arrière-arrière-petits-enfants. Someone whose
zwanzig. Das sind schon über 20.
descendants are numerous is called a
patriarch: he has his children, his
kɔ 3 [ɔ]̀ Jula: kɔɔ. Nom. marigot, cours d'eau non grandchildren, his great-grandchildren, his
permanent, rivière, ruisseau; backwater, great-great-grandchildren. Jemand, dessen
non-permanent watercourse, river, stream, Nachkommen zahlreich sind, wird Patriarch
brook; nicht dauerhafter Wasserlauf, Fluß, genannt: Er hat seine Kinder, seine Enkel,
Bach. Ji bɛ don kɔ la dɔɔnidɔɔni. L'eau seine Urenkel, seine Ururenkel.
monte dans le marigot tout doucement. 2 • membre d'une famille importante; member
(proverbe). The water slowly rises in the river. of an important family; Mitglied einer
(proverb). Im Fluß steigt das Wasser langsam wichtigen Familie. Fɛn tɛ kɛ nin na, kɔbatigi
an. (Sprichwort). Kɔ dɔ tigɛlen, dɔwɛrɛ b'i don. On ne peut rien faire à celui-là, il a des
ɲɛ. Un marigot traversé, un autre encore se parents haut placés. We can't do anything
présente. (proverbe). A river crossed, yet about this one, he has parents in high places.
another presents itself. (proverb). Ein Bach Wir können nichts gegen ihn tun, er hat Eltern
wird überquert, und schon taucht ein weiterer in hohen Positionen.
auf. (Sprichwort). synonyme: kɔɔ 2 . kɔbɛkɔbɛ [ɔ́] Adverbe. caractérise la démarche vive
kɔ [ɔ]́ Nom. 1 • testicule; testicle; Hode. kɔkili d'une personne maigre; characterizes the lively
4
testicule. testicle. Hode. kɔbɔ castrer, châtrer. gait of a thin person; charakterisiert den
castrate. kastrieren. Category: Body.
lebhaften Gang eines dünnen Menschen. A bɛ
2 • sexe, cul; sex, ass; Sex, Arsch. N kɔ tilala n
taama kɔbɛkɔbɛ ! Il marche avec beaucoup
na. J'ai pété. I farted. Ich habe gefurzt.
de vivacité ! He walks very briskly! Er geht
sehr zügig!
kɔ
5
[ɔ]́ Adverbe. 1 • très serré; very tight; sehr eng.
kɔbila [ɔ́] variante: kɔfɛfɛn. Nom. postposition;
A ye jurukisɛ siri kɔ ! Il a solidement serré la
postposition; Postposition. Musa tagara
ficelle ! He has firmly tightened the string! Er
lakɔli la. «la» ye mun ye? O ye kɔbila ye.
hat die Schnur fest angezogen!
Moussa est allé à l'école. Le ,« la » est quoi ?
2 • bien habillé; well dressed; gut gekleidet. A
C'est une postposition. Moussa went to school.
sirilen bɛ kɔ ! Il est très bien habillé ! He’s What does « la » mean? It is a postposition.
very well dressed! Er ist sehr gut gekleidet! Moussa ging zur Schule. Was bedeutet « la »?
kɔba [ɔ]̀ Nom. pagne tissé, très lourd, avec des motifs Es ist eine Postposition. Category: Grammar.
de couleur, très cher, pagne constitué de kɔbilakulu [ɔ́] Morphemes: kɔ-bila-kulu. Nom.
bandes de coton; woven fabric, very heavy, groupe circonstant; circumstantial group;
with color patterns, very expensive, cloth made Umstandsbestimmung. A dilalen bɛ ni
of cotton strips; gewebter Stoff, sehr schwer,
tɔgɔkulu ye, ka kɔbila da ka kan... Il est
mit farbigen Mustern, sehr teuer, Stoff aus
constitué d'un nom composé auquel s'ajoute
Baumwollstreifen. U ye kɔba sogin. Ils ont
une postposition... It consists of a compound
fait une couverture de différentes couleurs. noun to which is added a postposition... Es
They made a blanket in different colors. Sie besteht aus einem zusammengesetzten
haben eine Decke in verschiedenen Farben Substantiv, dem eine Postposition hinzugefügt
hergestellt. Category: Clothing. wird... Category: Grammar.
kɔbaga [ɔ]̀ Morphemes: kɔ-baga. Nom. espèce de kɔbin [ɔ̀] Nom. herbe (espèce); grass (species); Gras
plante, salade d'eau; kind of plant, water salad;
(Art). Category: Grass, herb, vine.
Pflanze (Art), Wassersalat. Category: Grass, elytrophorus spicatus.
herb, vine. pistia stratiotes.
29/01/2026 437

kɔbolo kɔdɔrɔ
kɔbolo [ɔ]́ Morphemes: kɔ-bolo. n.comp. bras d'une kɔda [ɔ́] Verbe. fuir, filer; flee; fliehen. A y'i kɔda
3
rivière, affluent, bras secondaire; branch of a ŋaniŋani ! Il a fui à toute vitesse. He fled at
river, tributary; Flussarm, Nebenfluss, full speed. Er floh mit voller Geschwindigkeit.
Zufluss. Kɔbolo de bɛ nin kɔfɛ, a bɛ ba in
kɔdan [ɔ́] Morphemes: kɔ-dan. Nom. 1 • dernier,
bɔ. Il y a derrière le fleuve un bras de rivière
ultime; last, final; zuletzt, endgültig. O ye a ka
qui est aussi large que le fleuve lui-même.
sojɔ kɔdan ye. C'est la dernière maison qu'il
There is a branch of the river behind the river
that is as wide as the river itself. Hinter dem ait construite. It was the last house he built. Es
Fluß befindet sich ein Flußarm, der so breit ist war das letzte Haus, das er baute.
wie der Fluß selbst. Category: Water. 2 • suprême; supreme, ultimate; höchste,
kɔbɔ [ɔ-́ ɔ́] Nom. coléoptère; beetle; Käfer. ultimativ. ... o kɛra daamu kɔdan ye ! ... c'est
1
Category: Insect.
le plaisir suprême ! ...it's the ultimate
pleasure! ...es ist das ultimative Vergnügen!
kɔbɔ [ɔ-́ ɔ́] synonyme: bu. 1 • Verbe. castrer, châtrer;
2 kɔdarafirifirinnin [ɔ̀-à-à-í-í-í-í-í] Nom. libellule;
castrate; kastrieren, entmannen. ntura
dragonfly; Libelle. Category: Insect.
kɔbɔlen taureau castré. castrated bull.
kɔdi [ɔ́] Verbe. 1 • se mettre dos à dos; stand back to
kastrierter Bulle. synonyme: kɔgosi.
back; Rücken an Rücken stehen. U y'u kɔdi
2 • Nom. hémorroïdes, prolapsus rectal;
haemorrhoids, rectal prolapse; ɲɔgɔn ma. Ils sont mis dos à dos. They are
Hämorrhoiden, Rektumprolaps. Kɔbɔ bɔlen placed back to back. Sie werden Rücken an
don a la. Elle a des hémorroïdes. She has
Rücken platziert.
haemorrhoids. Sie hat Hämorrhoiden.
2 • partir en tournant le dos; leave with your
back turned; geh mit dem Rücken zurück.
synonyme: nancabɔ, koko, kookoo;
2
antonyme: ɲɛfɛlabɔ. kɔdimi [ɔ́] bambara: kɔdimin. Morphemes: kɔ-dimi.
Nom. mal de dos; backache; Rückenweh,
kɔcɛkalama [ɔ́] Morphemes: kɔ-cɛ-kalama.
Rückenschmerzen. Category: Disease.
variante: kɔcɛkala. Nom. branchette (petite synonyme: kɔja.
tige) utilisée aux toilettes pour s'essuyer; twig
kɔdingɛ [ɔ̀-ĩ́-ɛ́] Nom. lit de rivière; stream-bed;
(small stem) used in the toilet to wipe; Zweig
(kleiner Stiel), der in der Toilette zum Bachbett, Flussbett. Category: Water, Land.
Abwischen verwendet wird. Diɲɛ ye jigi ye, kɔdon [ɔ́-ǒ] Morphemes: kɔ-don. Verbe. 1 • tourner
alikiyama ye jigi ye, bokɛla jigi ye a le dos, partir en sens inverse, faire demi-tour;
kɔcɛkalama ye. Le monde est fait d'espoir, to turn one's back, go away in the opposite
l'au-delà est espoir, et pour celui qui défèque, direction, to turn round; den Rücken kehren,
la branchette est espoir. (proverbe). The world in die entgegengesetzte Richtung fortgehen,
is made of hope, the afterlife is hope, and for umkehren. k'i kɔdon i kɛlɛɲɔgɔn ma tourner
the one who defecates, the branch is hope. le dos à son adversaire. turn your back on your
(proverb). Die Welt besteht aus Hoffnung, das opponent. Wende deinem Gegner den Rücken
Leben nach dem Tod ist Hoffnung, und für zu.
denjenigen, der seine Notdurft verrichtet, ist
2 • opposer; oppose; ablehnen, widersetzen. ...
der Zweig Hoffnung. (Sprichwort).
nka min bɛ u kɔdon ɲɔgɔn na... ... mais ce
kɔcɔkɔcɔnin [ɔ́] variante: kɔcɛkɔcɛnin, qui les oppose... ...but what opposes them...
kucɛkucɛnin. Nom. 1 • castagnettes; castanets; ...aber was ihnen ihnen entgegensteht... /
Kastagnetten. ...aber, was sie voneinander unterscheidet...
2 • genre de hochet; kind of rattle; Art Rasseln. kɔdonni Nom. inversion; inversion; Umkehrung.
Category: Musical instrument. synonyme: kunfilayɛlɛma.
kɔda [ɔ-́ á] Morphemes: kɔ-da. synonyme: boda.
1 kɔdɔrɔ [ɔ́] Emprunt de : arabe. Verbe. être en accord,
Nom. anus; anus; Anus. Bokɛ ko kelen tɛ kɔda
s'entendre; to agree, to get along; zustimmen,
fara. Déféquer une seule fois ne déchire pas miteinander auskommen. Ne ni Musa
l'anus. (proverbe). Defecating just once does
kɔdɔrɔla. Je me suis mis d'accord avec
not tear the anus. (proverb). Ein einmaliger
Moussa. I agreed with Moussa. Ich stimmte
Stuhlgang reißt den Anus nicht ein.
Moussa zu. / Ich bin mit Moussa überein
(Sprichwort). Category: Body.
gekommen. A kɔdɔrɔla a ma. Il est d'accord
synonyme: kɔfɛtɔ, ju , nɔgɔbɔyɔrɔ, juu ,
1 1
avec cela. He agrees with this. Er ist damit
bodingɛ, boda.
einverstanden.
kɔda [ɔ-́ á] Nom. sphincter anale; anal sphincter;
2
Aftermuskel. Category: Body.
29/01/2026 438

kɔfaga kɔfɛ
kɔfaga [ɔ-́ à-á] Morphemes: kɔ-faga. Verbe. rendre kɔfarankan [ɔ́] Morphemes: kɔ-faran-kan. Nom.
impuissant; render powerless, make impotent; suffixe; suffix; Suffix. na +–li = nali suffixe
machtlos machen, impotent machen. Masaku pour nominaliser –li ex. na « venir » ;
dun kojugu bɛ cɛ kɔfaga. Manger trop de nali « La venue ». suffix to nominalize –li ex.
patates douces rend l’homme impuissant. na “come”; nali “The Coming”. Suffix zur
Eating too many sweet potatoes makes a man Nominalisierung –li ex. na „komm“; nali
impotent. Der Verzehr von zu vielen „Das Kommen“. -muso ni -cɛ suffixe
Süßkartoffeln macht einen Mann impotent. -muso et -cɛ «femelle / mâle» ex. térimuso
kɔfala [ɔ]̀ Morphemes: kɔ-fala. Nom. bas-fond
« amie » ; téricɛ « ami » . suffix -muso and
-cɛ “female/male” e.g. termimuso “friend”;
inondable; floodable lowland; überflutbares
téricɛ “friend”. Suffix -muso und -cɛ
Tiefland. Kɔfalaba bɛ yen, ji b'a kɔnɔ. Il y a
„weiblich/männlich“, z.B. termimuso
là-bas un grand bas-fond, avec de l'eau. There „Freund“; téricɛ „Freund“.
is a big lowland, with water. Dort gibt es eine Category: Grammar.
große Tiefland mit Wasser. Category: Water,
kɔfasa [ɔ́] Morphemes: kɔ-fasa. Nom. 1 • nerf du dos;
Land.
back nerve; Rückennerv. A kɔfasa b'a dimin.
kɔfalen [ɔ-́ à-é] 1 • Verbe. compenser (par une chose
Il a mal au nerf dorsal. He has pain in his
inverse), substituer, remplacer; compensate
dorsal nerve. Er hat Schmerzen im
(by something opposite), make up for,
Rückennerv. Category: Body.
substitute, replace; kompensieren (durch
2 • à parts égales, équitablement; equally,
etwas Gegenteiliges), ausgleichen, ersetzen,
auswechseln. A y'a ka wotoro kɔfalen ni
fairly; gleichermaßen, fair. U saba jɛra ka a
tila a kɔfasa kan. Tous les trois s'entendirent
wotoro kura ye. Il a remplacé sa charrette par
pour le partager à parts égales. All three agreed
une charrette neuve. He replaced his cart with
to share it equally. Alle drei einigten sich
a new cart. Er ersetzte seinen Eselskarren
darauf, es zu gleichen Teilen zu teilen.
durch einen neuen Eselskarren.
2 • Nom. substitut, remplacement, kɔfeere [ɔ́-è-é] Morphemes: kɔ-feere. Verbe.
compensation; substitute, replacement, 1 • revendre; resell; weiterverkaufen. A sɔrɔla
compensation; Ersatz, Entschädigung. Wa, ka a kɔfeere faso jiginɛba ma dɔrɔmɛ 11. Il
Ala tun bɛ a caman kɔfalen hɛɛrɛ la... Alors, l'a ensuite revenu à l'OPAM à 55 francs. He
Dieu compensait beaucoup de ces choses par then resold it to the OPAM for 55 francs.
du bonheur... So, God compensated many of Anschließend verkaufte er es für 55 Franken
these things with happiness... Also hat Gott an die OPAM zurück.
viele dieser Dinge mit Glück entschädigt ... A 2 • revendre en cachette, revendre à l'insu du
ka fali kɔfalen ma kɛ ni ɲuman ye. Son véritable propriétaire; resell in secret, resell
nouvel âne n'est pas bon. His new donkey is no without the knowledge of the real owner;
good. Sein neuer Esel ist nicht gut. heimlich weiterverkaufen, ohne Wissen des
wahren Eigentümers weiterverkaufen.
3 • Nom. inverse, contraire; inverse, contrary;
umgekehrt, gegensätzlich. Juguman kɔfalen kɔfɛ [ɔ́-ɛ̀] 1 • Adverbe. après, derrière; after, behind;
ye ɲuman ye. Après la peine vient la joie. nach, nachher, danach, dahinter. K’an bɛn
(proverbe). After pain comes joy. (proverb). kɔfɛ ! Au revoir ! A plus tard ! Bye! See you
Nach dem Schmerz kommt Freude. later! Auf wiedersehen! Bis später! O kɔfɛ, ...
(Sprichwort).
Après cela... (et : « en outre », « de plus », «
kɔfalenni Nom. restauration; restoration; d'autre part »). After that... (and: “in
Wiederherstellung. addition”, “furthermore”, “on the other
hand”). Danach... (und: „zusätzlich“, „im
Übrigen“, „andererseits“). A bɛ kɔfɛ ka na. Il
arrive derrière. He arrives behind. Er kommt
hinten an.
2 • postp. ensuit; then; dann.
29/01/2026 439

kɔfɛ tasuma kɔfyɛ
3 • postp. en l'absence de; in the absence of; in kɔfɛtɔ Nom. anus; anus; Anus. ka supositiwari don
Abwesenheit von. Fɔ ye fila ye, kuma min bɛ
kɔfɛtɔ fɛ mettre des suppositoires dans l'anus.
fɔ i ɲɛna, ani kuma min bɛ fɔ i kɔfɛ. Il n'y a
put suppositories in the anus. Zäpfchen in den
que deux sortes de paroles. celles qu'on dit en
Anus stecken. A kɔfɛtɔ kumunnen don. Il
ta présence, et celles qu'on dit en ton absence.
pète tout le temps. He farts all the time. Er
(proverbe). There are only two kinds of words.
furzt die ganze Zeit. Category: Body.
those that are said in your presence, and those
synonyme: nɔgɔbɔyɔrɔ, boda, ju, bodingɛ,
that are said in your absence. (proverb). Es 1
gibt nur zwei Arten von Wörtern. diejenigen, kɔda 1 .
die in Ihrer Gegenwart gesagt werden, und kɔfilɛ [ɔ́] Morphemes: kɔ-filɛ. v.ref. regarder
diejenigen, die in Ihrer Abwesenheit gesagt
derrière soi, se retourner; look behind oneself,
werden. (Sprichwort).
tu turn round and look; hinter sich schauen,
4 • postp. en cachette de, en retard; in secret,
zurückschauen. I kɔfilɛ ! Regarde derrière !
late; im Geheimen, spät. Hali ni i b'o kɛ, o kɛ
Look behind you! Schau hinter dir!
o tigi kɔfɛ, fɛn t'o la... Même si tu le fais,
kɔfilɛdugalen Nom. rétroviseur; rear-view mirror,
fais-le en cachette de l'intéressé, et ça ira...
Even if you do it, do it in secret from the person mirror; Spiegel, Rückspiegel.
concerned, and it will be fine... Selbst wenn kɔfili [ɔ́] Morphemes: kɔ-fili. Nom. 1 • pas de danse;
1
Sie es tun, tun Sie es im Geheimen vor der
dance step; Tanzschritt. ka kɔfili kɛ kalojɛ la
betreffenden Person, und es wird gut sein ... A
danser le « kɔfili » à pleine lune. dance the
nana kɔfɛ. Il est venu plus tard (et : « en retard
“kɔfili” at full moon. Tanzen Sie das „Kɔfili“
»). He came later (and: “he was late”). Er bei Vollmond.
kam später (und: „verspätet“).
2 • jeu de danse des jeunes filles; young girls
kɔfɛ tasuma synonyme: ferusi. expr. feu arrière; rear dance game; Tanzspiel für junge Mädchen.
light, tail light; Rücklicht. Npogotigi ɲin tɛ kɛnɛ min kan, n'a ye kɔfili
kɔfɛfɛrɛn Morphemes: kɔfɛ-fɛrɛn. Nom. frein arrière ; bila yen, i ka a dɔn a kɔ bɛ kari. Si une jeune
fille danse le «kɔfili» là où elle n'a pas d'amis,
rear brake, back brake; Hinterradbremse.
sache qu'elle va se briser le dos. (proverbe). If
kɔfɛla [ɔ-́ ɛ́-á] Morphemes: kɔfɛ-la. Nom. 1 • arrière, a young girl dances “kɔfili” where she has no
cul, arrière-train; rear, back, ass, friends, know that she will break her back.
hindquarters; hinter, Rückseite, hintere Seite, (proverb). Wenn ein junges Mädchen „Kɔfili“
Hintern, Arsch, Hinterhand. ... bagan kɔfɛla tanzt, wo es keine Freunde hat, müssen Sie
nɔrɔkɔlen don. ... les bêtes ont l'arrière-train
wissen, daß es sich das Rückgrat brechen wird.
(Sprichwort).
souillé. ...the animals have dirty hindquarters.
...die Tiere haben schmutzige Hinterteile. kɔfili 2 [ɔ́] Morphemes: kɔ-fili. 1 • Verbe. revendre;
2 • défense (dans une équipe); defence (in a resell; weiterverkaufen. A taara jɛgɛ ta bada
team); Verteidigung (im Team). ... u ka kɔfɛla la ka na a kɔfili dɔgɔ la. Elle est allée acheter
tun ye ɲintin ye. ... leur défense était une du poisson au fleuve et est venue le revendre
passoire. ..their defence was as porous as a au marché. She went to buy fish at the river
sieve. ...ihre Verteidigung war durchlässig wie and came to sell them at the market. Sie ging
ein Sieb. zum Fluß, um Fische zu kaufen, und kam, um
sie auf dem Markt zu verkaufen.
kɔfɛsigilan Morphemes: kɔfɛ-sigilan. Nom. siège
2 • Nom. revente; resale; Wiederverkauf.
arrière; back seat; Rücksitz.
kɔfinnan [ɔ̀] Morphemes: kɔ-fin-nan. Nom.
kɔfɛtaa [ɔ́] Morphemes: kɔfɛ-taa. Nom. excrément,
quinquéliba, arbuste; Kinkeliba shrub;
selles; excrement, stools; Exkremente, Stuhl.
Kinkéliba Busch. Category: Bush, shrub.
A bɛ bɔ wɔsiji ni ɲɛgɛnɛ ni kɔfɛtaaw fɛ. C'est
combretum micranthum, combretum
évacué par la sueur, les urines et les selles. It is raimbaultii. synonyme: ngɔlɔbɛ.
passed out through sweat, urine and stools.
Die Ausscheidung erfolgt über Schweiß, Urin kɔfɔru Emprunt de : français. Nom. coffre de voiture;
und Stuhl. car trunk, car boot; Kofferraum.
kɔfɛtalan Morphemes: kɔ-fɛ-ta-lan. Nom. kɔfuru Emprunt de : français. Nom. coffre; chest;
porte-bagages; luggage rack; Gepäckträger. Kiste. Category: Household equipment.
nɛgɛso kɔfɛtalan le porte-bagages du vélo.
kɔfyɛ [ɔ́] Nom. surface du dos; back surface; Rücken
the bicycle luggage rack. Der
Fahrradgepäckträger. synonyme: donitalan,
Oberfläche. A kɔfyɛ ka bon. Il a un dos très
large. He has a very broad back. Er hat einen
donnitayɔrɔ.
sehr breiten Rücken.
29/01/2026 440

kɔgan kɔgɔdimin
kɔgan [ɔ]̀ Morphemes: kɔ-gan. variante: [kɔgwan]. kɔgɔ [ɔ́-ɔ́] vi. 1 • mûrir, arriver à maturité; mature,
3
Nom. jute congolais; Caesarweed; Kongojute. arrive at maturity; reifen, reif werden,
Category: Grass, herb, vine. urena lobata. wachsen, groß sein, stark sein, eine
kɔgɛn [ɔ]́ Verbe. 1 • poursuivre, pourchasser, chasser; Erwachsenengröße haben. A kɛlen bɛ
pursue, hunt; verfolgen, jagen. A ye
bilakoro kɔgɔlen ye. Il est devenu un grand
garçon. He has become a big boy. Er ist ein
denmisɛn kɔgɛn ka taa. Il a chassé les
großer Junge geworden. Sa dogolen bɛ kɔgɔ.
enfants. He chased the children away. Er
Le serpent caché grandit. (proverbe). The
verjagte die Kinder. synonyme: nɔfɛgɛn.
hidden snake grows. (proverb). Die
2 • faire avancer, pousser devant soi; to move verborgene Schlange wächst. (Sprichwort).
forward, to push ahead; vorantreiben, Dugu kɔgɔlen de tun don. C'était une cité
voranschreiten, vor sich hinschieben. ka fali
puissante. It was a powerful city. Es war eine
kɔgɛn / ka fali jugɛn faire avancer un âne. mächtige Stadt. synonyme: mɔya.
move a donkey forward. einen Esel vorwärts
2 • être chronique; to be chronic; chronisch
bewegen.
sein. Kɔnɔdimin kɔgɔlen bɛ a la. Il a des
kɔgira [ɔ]̀ Nom. arbuste (espèce d'); shrub (kind of); maux de ventre chroniques. He has chronic
Strauch (Art). Category: Bush, shrub. stomach aches. Er hat chronische
alchornea cordifolia. Bauchschmerzen.
kɔgosi [ɔ-́ ò-í] Morphemes: kɔ-gosi. Verbe. castrer, kɔgɔba [ɔ́] Morphemes: kɔgɔ-ba. Nom. 1 • prise de
châtrer; castrate; kastrieren. ... mɔgɔw bɛ lutte; wrestling hold; Kampfgriff. Kɔgɔba de
dononkɔrɔ kɔgosi... ... on castre les coqs... ... bɛ bilakoro bɔ ɲɔgɔn na. C'est la lutte qui
we castrate the roosters... ... wir kastrieren die permet aux enfants de se mesurer. It is the
Hähne... kɔgosili castration. castration. wrestling that allows children to measure
Kastration. synonyme: gosi , kɔbɔ , bu .
themselves. Es ist der Kampf, der es Kindern
1 2 5
ermöglicht, sich selbst zu messen.
kɔgɔ 1 [ɔ-̀ ɔ́] Nom. sel, sodium; salt; Salz. Kɔgɔ m’a 2 • lutte, corps à corps; close combat;
bɔ. Il n’y a pas assez de sel. There isn’t enough Nahkampf. An ka a kɛ kɔgɔba ye. Luttons
salt in it. Es hat nicht genug Salz darin. Kɔgɔ corps à corps. Let’s fight it out. Wir kämpfen
bɛ fali kun, a nege b'a la. L'âne transporte du Nahkampf.
sel, il en a fort envie. (proverbe). The donkey is kɔgɔbali [ɔ́] Morphemes: kɔgɔ-bali. Nom. immature,
carrying salt, he really wants it. (proverb). Der
prématuré, vert; immature; unreif. ... áw ka ɲɔ
Esel trägt Salz, er will es unbedingt.
kɔgɔbaliw tigɛ... k'u bila tile la. ... coupez les
(Sprichwort). Category: Food.
mils encore verts, et mettez-les à sécher au
kɔgɔ 2 [ɔ]́ Nom. 1 • poitrine, poitrail, thorax; chest, soleil. ... cut the millet still green, and put them
thorax; Brust, Brustkasten, Brustkorb, Thorax. to dry in the sun. ... schneiden Sie die noch
... n kɔgɔ bɛ n dimin... ... j'ai mal à la grüne Hirse ab und lassen Sie diese in der
poitrine.. ... I have a pain in my chest.. ... Ich Sonne trocknen. den kɔgɔbali enfant
habe Schmerzen in der Brust.. Category: Body. prématuré. premature baby. Frühgeburt.
synonyme: kɔgɔdisi. kɔgɔbara Morphemes: kɔgɔ-bara. Nom. salière;
2 • surface comprise entre les bras écartés; salt-cellar; Salzstreuer. Category: Container.
surface between the outstretched arms; Fläche
zwischen den ausgestreckten Armen. Mɔgɔ
kɔgɔda [ɔ́] Morphemes: kɔgɔ-da. Verbe. se mesurer
kelen kɔgɔ tɛ dɛnɛn bɛn. Les bras écartés
(dans un travail), rivaliser; measure (in a job),
compete; sich messen (in einer Arbeit),
d'un homme n'embrassent pas tout le mur.
(proverbe). A man's outstretched arms do not
konkurrieren. U y'u kɔgɔda ɲɔgɔn na, ka a
embrace the entire wall. (proverb). Die lajɛ min bɛ se min na. Ils se sont mesurés,
ausgestreckten Arme eines Mannes umfassen pour savoir qui était le meilleur. They
nicht die gesamte Wand. (Sprichwort). measured themselves, to know who was the
best. Sie haben eine Wettbewerb gemacht, um
zu sehen, wer der Beste ist. U y'u kɔgɔda
ɲɔgɔn kan. Ils se sont affrontés. They fought
each other. Sie haben sich geprügelt.
kɔgɔdimin [ɔ́] Morphemes: kɔgɔ-dimin. Nom. mal
de poitrine, bronchite; chest ache, bronchitis;
Brustkorb Schmerzen, Bronchitis.
Category: Disease.
29/01/2026 441

kɔgɔdisi kɔgɔmugu
kɔgɔdisi Morphemes: kɔgɔ-disi. Nom. poitrine, kɔgɔfin [ɔ̀-ɔ̀] Morphemes: kɔgɔ-fin. Nom. sel
poitrail; chest, breast; Brust. ... fo a kunkolo gemme, barre de sel (pour le bétail); rock salt,
n'a kɔgɔdisi... ... sauf sa tête et sa poitrine... ... salt bar (for livestock); Steinsalz, Salzstange
(für Vieh).
except his head and chest... ... außer seinem
Kopf und seiner Brust... Category: Body. kɔgɔjɛ [ɔ̀-ɔ̀] Morphemes: kɔgɔ-jɛ. Nom. 1 • sel de
synonyme: disi 1 , kɔgɔ 2 . mer; sea salt; Meersalz.
kɔgɔdugu synonyme: kɛɲɛkan. Nom. le nord 2 • blanchir comme avec du sel; whiten as with
salt; aufhellen wie mit Salz. ... mɔgɔ da ni i
(littéralement pays du sel); the north (literally
salt country); der Norden (wörtlich Salzland). sen bɛ pɛrɛn, k'i fari kɔgɔjɛ. ... la bouche et
kɔgɔdugujulaw ni worodugujulakaw les les pieds des gens se fendillent, et la peau
commerçants du nord et ceux du sud. northern devient blanche comme du sel. ...people's
and southern traders. Händler im Norden und mouths and feet crack, and their skin turns
diejenigen im Süden. white as salt. ... Mund und Füße der Menschen
werden rissig, und die Haut wird weiß wie
Kɔgɔdugu Ameriki Nom. Amérique du nord; North
Salz.
America; Nord Amerika. Category: Land.
kɔgɔji [ɔ̀-ɔ̀-í] Morphemes: kɔ̀gɔ-ji. Nom. mer,
kɔgɔdugu dugukolo dan [ɔ̀-ɔ̀-ú-ú ù-ù-ó-ó
océan; sea, ocean; Meer, Ozean. Mali ni
á] Nom. Pôle Nord; north pole; Nordpol. kɔgɔji foyi tɛ danbɔ. Le Mali n'a aucun accès
Category: Land, Region. à la mer. Mali has no access to the sea. Mali
Kɔgɔdugu dugukolonun Nom. Pôle Nord; North hat keinen Zugang zum Meer.
Pole; Nordpol. Category: Region. Category: Water. synonyme: geji, kɔgɔjiba.
kɔgɔdúgu kɔgɔjí See main entry: . Nom. Mer du nord; kɔgɔjiba [ɔ̀-ɔ̀-ì-á] Morphemes: kɔ̀gɔ̀-ji-ba. Nom.
North Sea; Nordsee. Category: Region. océan; ocean; Ozean. Category: Water.
Kɔgɔdugu kunkɛnɛ Nom. cercle polaire arctique;
synonyme: kɔgɔji.
Arctic Circle; Nördlicher Polarkreis. kɔgɔjida [ɔ̀-ɔ̀-ɩ̀] Morphemes: kɔgɔji-da. Nom. côte,
Category: Region. antonyme: Worodugu bord de la mer; coast; Küste, Meeresküste. A
kunkɛnɛ. sigilen bɛ kɔgɔjida la. Il est installé au bord
kɔgɔfa [ɔ]́ Morphemes: kɔgɔ-fa. Nom. à la poitrine de la mer. It is located by the sea. Er liegt am
Meer. Category: Water, Land.
développée, aux seins bien fermes; with a well
developed breast, firm breasts; mit Kɔgɔjifin Morphemes: Kɔgɔ-ji-fin. Nom. Mer Noire;
ausgeprägter Brust, festen Brüsten. Black Sea; Schwarzes Meer. Category: Water.
Sigimusonin y'i yɛlɛma k'i kɛ sungurun
kɔgɔjitagama synonyme: kɔgɔjifunu. Nom. marée;
kɔgɔfa ye. La petite femme-buffle se
tide, ebb; Gezeiten, Gezeitenströmung.
transforma en une jeune fille à la poitrine bien
Category: Weather.
pleine. The little female-buffalo turned into a
young girl with a full chest. Die kleine Büffel kɔgɔjiwulen Morphemes: kɔgɔ-ji-wulen. Nom. Mer
Frau verwandelte sich in ein Mädchen mit Rouge; Red Sea; Rotes Meer. Category: Water.
voller Brust. synonyme: kɔgɔfasin. kɔgɔma [ɔ̀-ɔ̀-á] Morphemes: kɔgɔ-ma. Nom. salé;
kɔgɔfasin [ɔ́] Morphemes: kɔgɔ-fa-sin. Nom. aux salted, salty; salzig. Ji kɔgɔma. Eau salée.
seins pointus, aux seins bien fermes; with Salty water. Salziges Wasser. Ɲɛ tɛ
pointed breasts, with firm breasts; mit spitzen
kɔgɔmafɛn dɔn, nka a tɛ fili tulumafɛn ma.
Brüsten, festen Brüsten. To goni tɛ mɔgɔ
L’œil ne reconnaît pas ce qui est salé, mais ne
baku, na goni tɛ mɔgɔ baku, kamalenkɔrɔ se trompe pas sur ce qui est gras. (proverbe).
bakulan ye kɔgɔfasin ye. Un « to » bien The eye does not recognize what is salty, but is
chaud ne dompte pas un jeune homme, une not mistaken about what is fatty. (proverb).
sauce bien chaude non plus, ce qui le dompte, Das Auge erkennt nicht, was salzig ist, täuscht
ce sont des seins bien fermes. (proverbe). A hot sich aber nicht darüber, was fett ist.
"porridge" does not tame a young man, a hot (Sprichwort).
sauce either, what tames him, are firm breasts. kɔgɔmugu [ɔ̀-ɔ̀] Morphemes: kɔgɔ-mugu. Nom. sel
(proverb). Ein heißes «Hirsebrei» zähmt einen
fin, sel en poudre; fine salt, powdered salt;
jungen Mann nicht, eine heiße Soße auch
feines Salz, Salzpulver.
nicht, was ihn zähmt, sind sehr feste Brüste.
(Sprichwort). synonyme: kɔgɔfa.
29/01/2026 442

kɔgɔɲɛ kɔkandɛmɛ
kɔgɔɲɛ [ɔ̀-ɔ̀] [ɔ̀-ɔ̀] Morphemes: kɔgɔ-ɲɛ. Nom. cor kɔjalannin [ɔ́] Nom. 1 • frite de patate douce
1
au pied, durillon, cal, verrue; callosity, corn; (populaire); sweet potato fries (popular);
Hühnerauge, Warze. Kɔgɔɲɛ bɛ cɛ o cɛ sen Süßkartoffel-Pommes Frites (Volksmund).
na, a tana ye bɛlɛlataama. Pour qui a des Category: Types of food.
cors au pied, la marche sur le gravier est tabou. 2 • maigre, maigrichon (populaire); skinny
(proverbe). For those with horns on their feet, (popular); schlank, dünn (Volksmund).
walking on gravel is taboo. (proverb). Für dennin kɔjalannin une fille toute
Menschen mit Hühneraugen ist das Gehen auf maigrichonne. a skinny girl. ein dünnes
Kies unangenehm. (Sprichwort). Mädchen.
Category: Disease. kɔji [ɔ́-í] n.comp. sperme, liquide rachidien; sperm;
kɔgɔɲɛ 2 [ɔ́] Morphemes: kɔgɔ-ɲɛ. variante: kɔgɔɲa. Samenzelle. synonyme: maniyu, lawaji.
Nom. 1 • mesure de longueur (pour les tissus)
kɔjiri Morphemes: kɔ-jiri. Nom. arbre du marigot; tree
qui va du milieu de la poitrine à l’extrémité du
majeur, environ 1 mètre; length measurement at the river; Baum am Fluß. Category: Tree.
(for cloth) that goes from the middle of the morelia senegalensis.
chest to the end of the middle finger, about 1 kɔjugu [ɔ́] Morphemes: kɔ-jugu. Nom. envers;
meter; Längenmessung (für Stoffe) von der
backwards, upside down; verkehrt herum. a
Mitte der Brust bis zum Ende des
Mittelfingers, ca. 1 m. kɔjugu kan à l'envers. upside down,
Category: Mathematics. backwards. verkehrt herum.
2 • brasse de tissu; fathom of fabric; Klafter kɔk [ɔ́] variante: kɔki. Adverbe. très sec, très
Stoff. finin kɔgɔɲɛ kelen une brasse de tissu. rigide, dur, serré; very dry, very rigid, hard,
a bundle of cloth. ein Bund aus Stoff. tight; sehr trocken, sehr steif, hart, eng. A ka
kɔgɔɲɛden n.comp. verrue; wart; Warze. tiga feereta jalen bɛ kɔk ! Ses arachides à
vendre sont très sèches ! His peanuts for sale
kɔgɔɲɛkuru [ɔ̀-ɔ̀-ɛ̀] Morphemes: kɔgɔɲɛ-kuru.
are very dry! Seine zum Verkauf stehenden
Nom. cheville (et parfois les boules des Erdnüsse sind sehr trocken! A ka finin
poignets); ankle (and sometimes wrist balls);
nɔrɔlen bɛ a fari la kɔk ! Ses vêtements sont
Knöchel (und manchmal die
Handgelenkkugeln), Fußgelenk. a numansen
très serrés sur lui ! His clothes are very tight on
him! Seine Kleidung sitzt ihm sehr eng!
kɔgɔɲɛkuru sa cheville gauche. her left ankle.
ihr linkes Fußgelenk. Category: Body.
kɔkan [ɔ́-ǎ] Morphemes: kɔ-kan. postp. à l'extérieur
synonyme: ntamakuru. de, à l'autre côté de; exterior of, on the other
side of; außerhalb von, auf der anderen Seite.
kɔgɔra [ɔ]́ variante: [kwaara]. Nom. étendue compris
Ŋɔmɔ bɛ jiri kɔkan. L'écorce est sur
entre les extrémités de deux bras étendus, l'extérieur de l'arbre. The bark is on the outside
brasse; extent between the ends of two of the tree. Die Rinde befindet sich außen am
extended arms, fathom; Strecke zwischen den
Baum. O y'a sɔrɔ misiriman taalen bɛ baba
Enden zweier ausgestreckter Arme, ein Tuch
in kɔkan ka taa hidaya ɲini. Il se trouva
von einem Klafter. fininkɔnɔ kɔgɔra kelen
qu'un aveugle était allé faire le mendicité sur
une étoffe d'une brasse. a cloth of one fathom.
l'autre rive du fleuve Niger. It turned out that a
ein Tuch von einem Klafter.
blind man had gone to beg on the other bank of
Category: Mathematics.
the Niger River. Es stellte sich heraus, daß ein
kɔgɔsɔkɔgɔsɔ [ɔ́] Adverbe. sans hâte; without haste; Blinder am anderen Ufer des Niger zum
ohne Eile. A bolila kɔgɔsɔkɔgɔsɔ ! Il a Betteln gegangen war.
couru sans hâte ! He ran without haste! Er kɔkandɛmɛ Morphemes: kɔ-kan-dɛmɛ. Nom. aide
rannte ohne Eile! extérieure; outside help; Hilfe von außen.
kɔja Morphemes: kɔ-ja. Nom. mal de dos; back Kɔkandɛmɛ tɛ se ka jate dɛmɛ kuntagala
pain; Rückenschmerzen. Category: Disease. janw fɛ. L'aide extérieure ne peut être comptée
synonyme: kɔdimi. comme une aide de longue durée. External aid
cannot be counted as long-term aid. Externe
kɔjaabi [ɔ́] Nom. réponse; answer; Antwort. An ye
Hilfe kann nicht als langfristige Hilfe gezählt
kɔjaabi min sɔrɔ o ɲininkali kan, o filɛ nin werden.
ye... Voici les réponses que nous avons reçues
à notre questionnaire... Here are the answers
we received to our questionnaire... Hier sind
die Antworten, die wir auf unseren
Fragebogen erhalten haben...
29/01/2026 443

kɔkanfeere kɔkɔnɔbin
kɔkanfeere [ɔ́] Morphemes: kɔ-kan-feere. Nom. kɔkari Morphemes: kɔ-kari. 1 • Verbe. contredire;
1
commerce extérieur, exportation; exportation, contradict; widersprechen, widerlegen. A ye n
foreign trade, foreign commerce; ka kuma kɔkari. Il a contredit mes paroles.
Außenhandel, Export, Auslandsgeschäft. ...
He contradicted my words. Er widersprach
olu ye malo kɔkanfeere lajɔ. ... ils ont cessé meinen Worten.
l'exportation du riz. ...they stopped exporting 2 • Nom. contraire; contrary; Gegenteil.
rice. ...sie haben aufgehört, Reis zu
kɔkari [ɔ́] Morphemes: kɔ-kari.
exportieren. 2
variante: kɔkarijirinin. Nom. arbuste (espèce
kɔkanfɛn [ɔ́] Morphemes: kɔ-kan-fɛn. Nom. produit
d'); shrub (kind of); Strauch (Art).
importé; imported product; importiertes
Category: Bush, shrub. maerua angolensis.
Produkt. Mɔgɔ minnu tun tɛ fɛn wɛrɛ san
kɔkili [ɔ́-í-í] Morphemes: kɔ-kili. Nom. rein,
kɔkanfɛnw kɔ... Les personnes qui
n'achetaient que des produits importés...
testicules; kidney, testicles; Niere, Hoden. Ala
People who only bought imported products... ka bon, a bɛ jinɔnkɛla kɔkiliw lakana. Dieu
Leute, die nur importierte Produkte gekauft est grand, il protège les testicules du nageur.
haben... (proverbe). God is great, he protects the
kɔkanjuru Nom. dette extérieure; external debt,
swimmer's testicles. (proverb). Gott ist groß, er
beschützt die Hoden des Schwimmers.
foreign debt; Schulden gegenüber dem
(Sprichwort). Category: Body. synonyme: lɔɔrɛ.
Ausland.
kɔkankali [ɔ́] Morphemes: kɔ-kan-kali. kɔkisa [ɔ̀] synonyme: kɔɲume. Nom. kisa d'eau; kind
of tree, evergreen tree; Baumart, Wasserbirne.
variante: kɔkankale. Nom. saut périlleux
Category: Tree. syzygium guineense.
arrière; back-flip; Rückwärtssalto. A ye
kɔkolo [ɔ́-ó-ó] Nom. 1 • colonne vertébrale;
kɔkankali siɲɛ tan ni fila kɛ... Elle fit douze 1
sauts périlleux en arrière... She did twelve
backbone; Wirbelsäule. Category: Body.
somersaults backwards... Sie machte zwölf
synonyme: kɔkolojuru, jɔkolo
2
, cɛmakolo,
Saltos rückwärts... synonyme: pelu; cɛkisɛkolo.
antonyme: ɲɛkankali. 2 • poutre principale pour supporter le toit;
main support beam for roof of house or
kɔkanmɔgɔ [ɔ́] Morphemes: kɔ-kan-mɔgɔ. Nom.
shelter; Hauptbalken um das Dach zu halten.
étranger, personne qui ne vit pas au village de synonyme: cɛtigɛ .
1
façon permanente; stranger, foreigner,
person who does not live in the village kɔkolo 2 [ɔ́-ó-ó] Morphemes: kɔ-kolo.
permanently; Ausländer, Fremder, Person, die variante: kɔloden. Nom. vertèbre; vertebra;
nicht dauerhaft im Dorf wohnt. Wirbel. Category: Body.
Category: Person.
kɔkoloden Morphemes: kɔ-kolo-den. Nom. vertèbre;
kɔkanna Morphemes: kɔ-kan-na. Nom. extérieur,
vertebra; Wirbel. Category: Body.
surface du dos, pays étranger, pays étranger;
kɔkolojuru Nom. colonne vertébrale; backbone;
exterior, outside, surface, foreign country;
Außenbereich, Äußere, Ausland, fremdes Wirbelsäule. Category: Body.
Land. Sumunnin bɛ a kɔkanna la. Il a un synonyme: cɛmakolo, kɔkolo 1 , jɔkolo 2 ,
abcès dans le dos. He has an abscess on his cɛkisɛkolo.
back. Er hat einen Abszeß am Rücken. tabali
kɔkolosɛmɛ Morphemes: kɔ-kolo-sɛmɛ. Nom.
kɔkanna la surface de la table. the surface of
moelle épinière; spinal cord; Rückenmark.
the table. die Oberfläche des Tisches. farikolo Category: Body.
kɔkanna n'a kɔnɔna l’extérieur et l'intérieur
kɔkoto [ɔ́] Morphemes: kɔ-koto. Nom. dos, centre du
du corps. the exterior and interior of the body.
dos; back, centre of back; Rücken, Mitte des
das Äußere und Innere des Körpers.
Rückens.
kɔkannɔmini [ɔ́] Nom. nage sur le dos; back crawl;
kɔkɔnɔbin [ɔ̀-ɔ̀-ɔ̀-í] Nom. herbe du marigot; grass
Rückenschwimmen.
from at a river; Flußgras. Category: Grass,
kɔkanseleke [ɔ́] synonyme: koorikɔkanseleke. herb, vine. elythrophorus articulatus,
Nom. angle extérieur; exterior angle; elythrophorus spicatus.
Aussenwinkel. Category: Mathematics.
29/01/2026 444

kɔkɔrɔ kɔli
kɔkɔrɔ [ɔ]́ Morphemes: kɔ-kɔrɔ. Nom. tuteur (pour kɔkurubana [ɔ́] Morphemes: kɔ-kuru-bana. Nom.
1
soutenir une arbuste); stake (to support a maladie (bosse) des pintades; guinea fowl
shrub); Pfahl (um einen Strauch zu stützen). disease (hump); Perlhuhnkrankheit (Buckel).
Kɔkɔrɔ tun bɛ a sunw bɛɛ la. Il y avait un ... kɔkurubana bɛ i ka kamidenw bɛɛ faga...
tuteur à chaque pied (de plante). There was a ... la maladie de la bosse tue tous tes
stake at each (plant) foot. An jedem Ast pintadeaux... ... humpback disease kills all
befand sich ein Pfahl. Category: Agricultural your guinea fowl... ... die Buckelkrankheit
tool. tötet alle Ihre Perlhühner ...
kɔkɔrɔ [ɔ]́ postp. avec, derrière (dans le sens de «en kɔkusinɛli Emprunt de : français. Nom. coccinelle;
2
soutien de»); with, behind (in the sense of “in ladybird, ladybug; Marienkäfer.
support of”); mit, dahinter (im Sinne von „zur Category: Insect.
Unterstützung von“), bei. Kana siga, n b'i kɔlasegin [ɔ́-á-è-í] Verbe. 1 • faire revenir; bring
kɔkɔrɔ. Ne crains rien, je suis avec toi. Do not
back; zurückbringen. Karamɔgɔ y'a
be afraid, I am with you. Hab keine Angst, ich
kɔlasegin so. Le maître l'a fait revenir chez
bin bei dir.
lui. The master made him come home. Der
kɔkɔrɔdon [ɔ́-ɔ́-ɔ́-ǒ] Morphemes: kɔ-kɔrɔ-don. Meister ließ ihn nach Hause kommen.
variante: kɔkɔrɔmadon. Verbe. encourager, 2 • rendre (par la suite), rembourser; return
soutenir, étayer; encourage, support; (subsequently), repay; zurückgeben (später),
ermutigen, unterstützen. Mɔgɔ b'i ka zurückzahlen. N y'a ka wari kɔlasegin a ma.
baarakɛla kɔkɔrɔdon a ka baara kɛko Je lui ai rendu son argent. I gave him his money
ɲuman na. On encourage quelqu'un qui back. Ich gab ihm sein Geld zurück.
travaille bien. We encourage someone who 3 • desserrer; to loosen; lockern. ka juru
works well. Wir ermutigen jemanden, der gut kɔlasegin desserrer une corde. loosen a rope.
arbeitet. ein Seil lockern.
kɔkɔti Nom. autocuiseur; pressure cooker; kɔlɛ [ɔ̀-ɛ́] variante: kɔla. Nom. 1 • domaine;
1
Schnellkochtopf, Dampfkochtopf. domain; Bereich. Category: Mathematics.
Category: Household equipment, Container. synonyme: kɛnɛ .
4
kɔku Nom. espèce de plante; kind of plant; Pflanze 2 • famille, descendants, dépendants; family,
(Art). Category: Grass, herb, vine. nymphaea descendants, dependants; Familie,
lotus / micrantha. Nachkommen, abhängige Personen. Mɔgɔ bɛ
kɔkukankɔnɔ synonyme: bulukukankɔnɔ. Nom. se ka mɔgɔ bɛɛ fili, nka e tɛ se e kɔlɛ fili. On
jacana africain; Lilly-trotter; Vogelart.
peut rejeter tout le monde, mais pas sa famille.
Category: Bird. actophilornis africana.
You can reject everyone, but not your family.
synonyme: kɔnɔfili, bulukukɔnɔnin.
Sie können jeden ablehnen, aber nicht Ihre
Familie.
kɔkuru
1
[ɔ́-ú-ú] Morphemes: kɔ-kuru. Nom. bosse;
kɔlɛ [ɛ̀] Nom. métier à tisser; loom; Webstuhl. Ni i
2
hump; Buckel. Janni ka di ɲaamɛ ye, nka a
ma ɲɛ geseda kɔ, i bɛ kɔlɛ turu. Celui qui ne
kɔkuru b'a negebɔ a la. Le dromadaire aime
peut se passer de tisser, qu'il plante son métier
bien s'allonger sur le dos, mais sa bosse lui en à tisser. (proverbe). He who cannot do without
retire l'envie. (proverbe). The dromedary likes weaving, let him build his loom. (proverb).
to lie on its back, but its hump prevents it from Wer nicht ohne Weben auskommen kann, der
doing so. (proverb). Das Dromedar möchte stelle seinen Webstuhl auf. (Sprichwort).
gerne auf dem Rücken liegen, sein Buckel
hindert es jedoch daran. (Sprichwort).
kɔli
1
Nom. ergot, éperon, pointe; spur, point; Sporn,
Category: Disease. Spitze. O y'i kɔli fila gengen... Il planta ses
kɔkuru [ɔ́-ù-ú] Morphemes: kɔ-kuru. Verbe. deux ergots... He planted his two claws... Er
2
drückte seine beiden Krallen ein...
revenir, retourner; to come back;
synonyme: gɔli, sɛbɛrɛ .
zurückkommen. ... u kɔkurula ka taa se 2
donsokɛ ka yɔrɔ la... ... ils sont revenus là où kɔli 2 [ɔ̀] Verbe. 1 • empêcher, priver, échouer;
était le chasseur... ...they came back to where prevent, deprive, fail; verhindern, entziehen,
the hunter was... ...sie kamen dorthin zurück, scheitern. Ni i kɔlila baara dɔ fɛ... Si tu es
wo der Jäger war... empêché de faire un travail... If you are
prevented from doing work... Wenn Sie an der
Arbeit gehindert sind...
29/01/2026 445

kɔlibagatɔ kɔlɔkɔlɔ
2 • être dans le dénuement, réduire à la misère; kɔlɔ comparer: sii .[ɔ́-ɔ́] Nom. 1 • noyau de karité,
2
to be destitute, to be reduced to misery;
noix de karité; Shea nut; Karite Nuss. kɔlɔ
mittellos sein, ins Elend geraten. Dɔ bɛ kɔli
sen na, dɔ b'a kɛ bonboli ye. Certains sont
2 • sexe masculin, testicules (populaire); male
sex, testicles (popular); Männliches
infirmes des pieds, d'autres s'en servent
Geschlecht, Hoden (Volksmund). N b'i kɔlɔ ci
comme des battoirs. (proverbe). Some have
sisan ! Je vais te briser les couilles toute de
mutilated feet, others use them as beaters.
(proverb). Manche haben verstümmelte Füße, suite ! (populaire). I’ll break your balls right
andere benutzen sie als Schlagstöcke. now! (popular). Ich werde dir die Eier jetzt
(Sprichwort). gleich brechen! (Volksmund). synonyme: lɔɔrɛ.
3 • misère, dénuement; misery, deprivation; 3 • gland (de la verge); gland (of the penis);
Elend, Entbehrung. Salaya bɛ mɔgɔ kɔli. La Eichel (vom Glied).
paresse réduit l'homme à la pauvreté. Laziness 4 • comprimé de drogue (populaire); drug
reduces man to poverty. Faulheit führt den tablet (popular); Droge Tablette (Volksmund).
Menschen in die Armut. Ni sɔrɔ ye ntama o kɔlɔbɛ synonyme: kɛlɛbɛbilen. variante: gɔlɔbɛ. Nom.
ntama don, ni kɔli nana, o na wuli. Une
kinkéliba (vrai); kind of shrub; Strauch (Art).
coutume instaurée en temps d'abondance Category: Bush, shrub. combretum
disparaîtra quand la misère viendra. micranthum.
(proverbe). A custom established in times of
kɔlɔbɛkɔlɔbɛ [ɔ̀-ɔ̀-ɛ̌] Verbe. 1 • faire lentement, agir
plenty will disappear when misery comes.
(proverb). Ein in Zeiten des Überflusses discrètement; do slowly, act quietly; langsam
geführter Brauch wird verschwinden, wenn machen, unauffällig tun. A y'i kɔlɔbɛkɔlɔbɛ a
das Elend kommt. (Sprichwort). ka baara la. Il se mit patiemment à son travail.
kɔlibagatɔ Morphemes: kɔli-baga-tɔ. Nom. indigent, He patiently went to work. Er machte sich
geduldig an seine Arbeit.
miséreux, pauvre hère; needy person,
miserable person, poor person; bedürftiger 2 • se débrouiller, faire des efforts; make your
Mensch, elender Mensch, armer Kerl. Faantan own way, make an effort, know how to help
ni mɔnɛ, kɔlibagatɔ ni ɲɛni. Le lot du pauvre
yourself; sich selbst zu helfen wissen,
Anstrengungen machen. A bɛ kɔlɔbɛkɔlɔbɛ
est le chagrin, le lot de l'indigent est la misère.
(proverbe). The lot of the poor is sorrow, and
ka jago kɛ. Il fait son commerce petit à petit.
the lot of the needy is misery. (proverb). Das He is doing his business little by little. Er
Los des Armen ist Kummer, das Los des macht seine Geschäfte langsam.
Armen ist Elend. (Sprichwort). kɔlɔbooro Morphemes: kɔlɔ-bo. variante: kɔlɔbo.
synonyme: misikinɛ.
Nom. 1 • résidu de pilage de noyaux de karité;
kɔlibara Nom. pot de colle; pot of glue, paste jar; residue of pounded Shea-nuts; Rückstand von
Leimtopf. gestampften Karite Nüssen. Kɔlɔbooro bɛ kɛ
bɔgɔ toli la ka so mun. On met le résidu de
kɔlikɔli [ɔ]́ variante: kɔli. Adverbe. 1 • très sombre, très
pilage de noyaux de karité dans le banco pour
fermé, très recouvert, très serré; very dark,
crépir les maisons. We put the residue from
very closed, very covered, very tight; sehr
pounding shea kernels into the clay to plaster
dunkel, sehr geschlossen, sehr bedeckt, sehr
the houses. Die Rückstände des
eng. ka fɛn minɛ kɔlikɔli tenir quelque chose
Zerstampfens von Shea-Kernen geben wir in
très serré. hold something very tight. etwas den Lehm, um die Häuser zu verputzen.
sehr eng halten.
2 • couleur brun foncé; dark brown colour;
2 • très fâché; very angry, very upset; sehr dunkelbraun. sabara kɔlɔboorolama des
wütend, sehr verärgert, sehr böse. A diminnen
chaussures brun foncé. dark brown shoes.
don kɔlikɔli ! Il est très fâché ! He’s very dunkelbraune Schuhe. Category: colour.
angry! Er ist sehr wütend!
kɔlɔfara [ɔ́] Nom. poisson léopard; leopard fish;
3 • très chaud; very hot; sehr heiß. A gannen
Leopard Fisch. Category: Fish. ctenopoma.
kɔlikɔli ! C'est très chaud ! It’s very hot! Es ist
kɔlɔkɔlɔ [ɔ̀-ɔ̀-ɔ́-ɔ́] Nom. 1 • sans importance, un peu,
sehr heiß! 1
petit; without importance, unimportant, very
4 • très éloigné; very far from, far removed,
little, only a little; ohne Wichtigkeit,
very remote; weit entfernt, sehr abgelegen,
unwichtig, sehr wenig, unbedeutende Menge,
weit weg.
nur ein wenig. ... kɔlɔkɔlɔ tɛ.... ... ce n'est pas
5 • totalement (échouer); totally (fail);
peu. ... that’s not small. ... das ist nicht wenig.
vollständig (nicht erfolgreich). A dɛsɛra ka a
kɛ kɔlikɔli ! Il a complètement échoué ! He
has failed completely! Er hat völlig versagt!
29/01/2026 446

kɔlɔkɔlɔ kɔlɔsi
2 • pas qu'un peu, énormément; not just a little, kɔlɔnkan [ɔ̀-ɔ̀] Morphemes: kɔlɔn-kan. Nom. bord,
a lot; nicht nur ein wenig, viel. A ma a
rebord du puits; edge, edge of the well;
kɔlɔkɔlɔ dun. Il n'a pas mangé qu'un peu. He Brunnenrand, Rand des Brunnens.
did not eat only a little. Er hat nicht nur ein
kɔlɔnkannajiri Morphemes: kɔlɔn-kan-na-jiri.
bißchen gegessen. ... a ma kɔlɔkɔlɔwari bɔ ka
Nom. 1 • partie (en bois) en haut du puits; part
a yɛrɛ furakɛ... ... il a dépensé énormément
at the top of the well; Teil (aus Holz) oben im
d'argent pour se soigner... ... he spent a lot of
Brunnen.
money to cure himself... ... er hat viel Geld für
2 • clavicule; collarbone; Schlüsselbein.
seine Heilung ausgegeben...
synonyme: kɔlɔndalajiri, kankolo.
kɔlɔkɔlɔ [ɔ́] Verbe. faire glouglou, faire couler,
2 kɔlɔnkɔlɔn [ɔ̀-ɔ̀] Nom. sang noir, sang veineux;
s'écouler; make glug, sink, flow; glucksen,
versinken, vergießen, verströmen, fließen. Ji
black blood, venous blood; schwarzes Blut,
venöses Blut. Sumaya bɛ bagan min na,
bɛ kɔlɔkɔlɔ ka bɔ ga sanfɛ. L'eau coule du
nagakɔrɔla bɛ lafa ji kɔlɔnkɔlɔn na (ji jugu).
toit du hangar. Water is flowing from the roof
of the shed. Wasser fließt vom Dach des
Les animaux atteints de paludisme ont
Hangars.
l'abdomen plein de sang noir. Animals with
malaria have abdomens full of black blood.
kɔlɔkɔlɔ 3 [ɔ́] Nom. auge (pour l'abreuvement des Tiere mit Malaria haben einen Bauch voller
animaux); trough (for watering animals); schwarzem Blut.
Brunnentrog (zum Tränken der Tiere).
kɔlɔnseenna [ɔ̀-ɔ̀-ɛ̀] Morphemes: kɔlɔn-seen-na.
Category: Agricultural tool, Animal
husbandry. Nom. puisatier; well digger; Brunnengräber.
Category: Worker, occupation.
kɔlɔkun [ɔ́] Nom. gland (du sexe); gland (of penis);
kɔlɔnseennan
Eichel (des Geschlechts). ... a ye joli kɛ a
[ɔ̀-ɔ̀-è] Morphemes: kɔlɔn-seen-nan. Nom.
kɔlɔkun na... ... son gland saignait... ... his
1 • pioche pour creuser les puits; pickaxe for
penis gland is bleeding... ... seine Peniseichel
digging wells; Spitzhacke zum Graben von
blutet...
Brunnen. Category: Tool.
kɔlɔlɔ [ɔ-̀ ɔ̀-ɔ́] variante: kɔɔlɔ, kɔyɔyɔ. Nom. 2 • foreuse (pour puits); drilling rig (for wells);
conséquence, suite, séquelles; consequence, Bohrgerät (für Brunnen).
after-effects; Konsequenz, Folge,
kɔlɔntintin Morphemes: kɔlɔn-tintin. Nom. margelle
Folgeerscheinungen, Nachwirkungen. bana
du puits; well coping, edge of the well; Rand
kɔlɔlɔ les conséquences de la maladie. the
des Brunnens. A nana a bila kɔlɔntintin
consequences of the disease. die Folgen der
kan... Il vint le poser sur la margelle du puits...
Krankheit.
He came to put it on the well’s edge... Er kam
kɔlɔn 1 [ɔ-̀ ɔ́] Nom. puits; well; Ziehbrunnen. Ni i bɛ und legte es auf den Rand des Brunnens...
janfakɔlɔn soni, i b'a lafɛrɛ. Si tu creuses le kɔlɔsi [ɔ̀-ɔ̀] variante: kɔlɔsijuru. Nom. chapelet
1
puits de la trahison, fais-le bien large.
musulman; Muslim prayer beads;
(proverbe). If you dig the well of betrayal, do it
muslimische Gebetsschnur, Rosenkranz.
wide. (proverb). Wenn du den Brunnen des
Mɔgɔ min tɛ kɛmɛ duuru sɔrɔ moriya la, o
Verrats gräbst, mach ihn breit. (Sprichwort).
Category: Water.
tigi man kan ka ba kelen don kɔlɔsi la. Qui
ne gagne pas 2500 francs à faire du
kɔlɔn [ɔ-̀ ɔ́] Nom. infection; infection; Infektion,
2 maraboutage ne doit pas investir 5000 francs
Entzündung. Category: Disease. dans un chapelet. (proverbe). Anyone who
kɔlɔndalajiri [ɔ̀-ɔ̀-à-à] Nom. clavicule; collarbone; does not earn 2,500 francs doing soothsaying
should not invest 5,000 francs in a rosary.
Schlüsselbein. A kɔlɔndalajiri wurukutura. Il
(proverb). Wer mit Wahrsagen nicht 2.500
s'est luxé la clavicule. He’s dislocated his
Franken verdient, sollte nicht 5.000 Franken in
collarbone. Er hat sich das Schlüsselbein
einen Rosenkranz investieren. (Sprichwort).
verrenkt. Category: Body.
synonyme: kɔlɔnkannajiri, kankolo. kɔlɔsi 2 [ɔ̀-ɔ̀-í] variante: kɔrɔsi, kolosi. Verbe.
1 • garder, surveiller, veiller sur; guard, watch
kɔlɔngisin [ɔ́] Nom. pâte de beurre de karité; shea
over, look after; bewachen, überwachen,
butter paste; Shea Butter Paste. bewahren, sich kümmern um. I bɛ sanfɛla
synonyme: sikɔlɔdɛgɛ.
kɔlɔsi... n bɛ dugumana kɔlɔsi. Tu
kɔlɔnji [ɔ-̀ ɔ ̀-í] Morphemes: kɔlɔn-ji. Nom. eau de surveilleras le haut, et moi le bas. You watch
puits; well water; Brunnenwasser.
the top, I’ll watch the bottom. Du paßt oben
Category: Water.
auf und ich unten.
29/01/2026 447

kɔmafalen kɔmɔ
2 • faire attention, être prudent, se méfier, se kɔmi [ɔ́-í] Verbe. 1 • effectuer un mouvement
1
garder de; watch out, be careful, don't trust;
d'arrière en avant, incliner; moving from back
aufpassen, vorsichtig sein, sich in Acht
to front, bend; Bewegen von hinten nach vorn,
nehmen, nicht trauen. I kɔlɔsi ! Mobili ka ca !
beugen. A y'i kun kɔmi. Il inclina la tête. He
Fais attention ! Il y a beaucoup de voitures !
inclined his head. Er neigte den Kopf.
Watch out! There are lots of cars! Paß auf! Es
hat viele Wagen /Autos! Á y'áw kɔlɔsi
2 • clignoter, cligner, sursauter; blink, jump;
blinzeln, springen, blinken. k'i ɲɛ kɔmi cligner
jagokɛla juguw la. Méfiez-vous des
de l’œil, faire un clin d’œil. blink with the eye,
commerçants malhonnêtes. Beware of
wink. mit den Augen zwinkern, blinzeln.
dishonest traders. Hüten Sie sich vor
unehrlichen Händlern. synonyme: janto.
3 • coïter; copulate; paaren, ficken. A y'i kɔmi
muso la. Il a forniqué avec la femme. He
3 • remarquer, observer; notice, observe;
beachten, beobachten. I natɔ, n y'i kɔlɔsi. Je
fornicated with the woman. Er hat mit der Frau
gefickt.
t'ai observé lorsque tu venais. I watched you
when you came. Ich habe dich beobachtet, als kɔmi 2 Nom. seconde; second; Sekunde.
du kamst.
kɔmikɔmi Verbe. 1 • avoir des mouvements brusques,
kɔmafalen [ɔ́-á-à-é] Morphemes: kɔ-ma-falen.
se convulser, être agité de spasmes; have
Verbe. transformer, remplacer, changer en; sudden movements, convulse, spasm;
transform, replace, change into; umwandeln, plötzliche Bewegungen, Krämpfe haben.
ersetzen. Nasara y'o de kɔmafalen sisan ni Dennin dɔnkɛtɔ y'i kɔmikɔmi. La jeune fille
klɛrɔn ye. Les Européens l'ont maintenant en dansant avait des mouvements convulsifs.
remplacé par le clairon. Europeans have now The girl dancing had convulsive movements.
replaced it with the bugle. Die Europäer Das Mädchen tanzte in krampfhaften
haben es nun durch das Signalhorn ersetzt. Bewegungen.
kɔmafilɛ Verbe. déduire; deduce, deduct, take away; 2 • cligner; blink; blinzeln, zwinkern. ... a b'a
wegnehmen. Category: Mathematics.
numanfɛɲɛ kɔmikɔmi. ... il cligne de l’œil
gauche. ... he’s blinking his left eye. ... blinzelt
kɔmalo [ɔ]̀ Morphemes: kɔ-malo. Nom. riz sauvage;
das linke Auge.
wild rice; Wildreis. Category: Grass, herb,
kɔmini [ɔ́-í-í] Nom. battement; beating, fluttering,
vine. oryza barthii. synonyme: malosina.
flap; Schläge, Schlag, Flattern.
kɔmasegi [ɔ́-á-è-í] variante: kɔmasegin. 1 • Verbe. Category: Grammar.
rendre, retourner, répondre; give back, answer;
kɔmisariyaba Nom. commissariat central; central
zurückgeben, antworten. A kɔmasegi a tigi
police station; Polizeiwache, Hauptsitz der
ma. Rendez-le à son propriétaire. Return it to
Polizei. Category: Building.
its owner. Geben Sie es seinem Besitzer
zurück. A fɔra ciden ye a ka taa nin
kɔmitɛri Emprunt de : français. variante: pɔmitɛri.
kɔmaseginn in di faaga ma. On dit au
Nom. pomme de terre, patate; potato; Kartoffel.
Category: Food. synonyme: pɔmutɛɛri,
messager qu'il aille donner cette réponse au
roi. The messenger was told to go and give this
komitɛrɛ.
answer to the king. Dem Boten wurde gesagt, kɔmiw nɛgɛnin expr. aiguilles des secondes;
er solle gehen und dem König diese Antwort
seconds hand; Sekundenzeiger.
geben.
2 • Nom. réponse, retour; response, return; kɔmɔ [ɔ̀] Nom. l'une des institutions initiatiques
Antwort, Rückkehr. Nin ntolatan fila bambara; one of the Bambara initiatory
kɔmasegi bɛ kɛ Mali la... Le match retour de institutions; eine der
Bambara-Initiationsinstitutionen. Don bɛ
ces deux rencontres de football aura lieu au
Mali. The return match of these two football kɔmɔko la, nka bɔ t'a la. On peut entrer dans
matches will take place in Mali. Das Rückspiel le «komo», mais on ne peut en sortir.
dieser beiden Fußballspiele findet in Mali statt. (proverbe). You can enter the “komo”, but you
cannot leave it. (proverb). Sie können dem
kɔmayɛlɛma
„komo“ beitreten, aber nicht verlassen.
[ɔ-́ á-ɛ̀-ɛ̀-á] Morphemes: kɔ-ma-yɛlɛma. (Sprichwort).
Verbe. repartir, retourner; leave, return; gehen,
zurückkehren. A y'i kɔmayɛlɛma ka segin. Il
est reparti. He left again. Er ging wieder.
29/01/2026 448

kɔmɔgɔ kɔn
kɔmɔgɔ [ɔ́] variante: [kɔmaa]. Nom. 1 • la plus jeune, kɔmuru [ɔ̀-ú-ú] Nom. herbe-couteau; kind of plant,
le dernier; the youngest, the last; die Jüngste, golden beaksedge and matamat; Pflanze (Art),
der Letzte. tɔndenw ka kɔmɔgɔ le plus jeune Goldgelbes schnabelried. Category: Grass,
des membres de l'association. the youngest herb, vine. rhynchospora corymbosa.
member of the association. das jüngste kɔn [ɔ̀] variante: kwan. vi. précéder, arriver avant,
1
Mitglied des Vereins.
faire tôt (sans perdre du temps); precede,
2 • dépendant, sujet; dependent, subject; arrive before, do it early (without wasting
abhängig, Untertan. ... a n'a kɔmɔgɔw cɛla. ... time); vorangehen, zuvorkommen, früh
entre lui et ses sujets. ...between him and his machen, früh ankommen, früh (ohne
subjects. ...zwischen ihm und seinen Zeitverlust) machen. Min kɔni ɲɔgɔn tɛ, o ye
Untertanen. ka kɔn ka denmisɛnw boloci. Ce qui est
3 • parents, famille; parents, family; Eltern, préférable, c'est de vacciner très tôt les enfants.
Verwandtschaft, Familie. N taara a ɲɛfɔ n The best thing is to vaccinate children early.
kɔmɔgɔw ɲɛna. Je suis allé expliquer cela à Am besten ist es, die Kinder sehr früh zu
ma famille. I went to explain this to my family. impfen. ... sanji kɔnna ka tigɛ. ... la pluie a
Ich ging, um es meiner Familie zu erklären. cessé très tôt. ... the rain stopped early. ... der
4 • descendant, héritier, successeur; Regen hat sehr früh aufgehört.
descendant, heir, successor; Nachkomme, kɔn [ɔ́] Verbe. 1 • haïr, détester, combattre,
Erbe, Nachfolger. U mana sa, kɔmɔgɔw tɛ
2
prohiber, interdire; hate, detest, fight against,
dɔrɔmɛ sɔrɔ u kɔ. Quand ils meurent, leurs
forbid; hassen, verabscheuen, widersetzen,
descendants ne trouvent pas un seul centime. verbieten. N ye siramin kɔn i la. Je t'ai interdit
When they die, their descendants don't find a
de fumer. I forbade you to smoke. Ich habe dir
single penny. Wenn sie sterben, finden ihre
das Rauchen verboten.
Nachkommen keinen einzigen Cent.
2 • isoler, écarter; isolate, separate; isolieren,
kɔmɔkili Nom. rein, rognon; kidney; Niere. Fɔlɔfɔlɔ, trennen. ... n'á ye a tigilamɔgɔ koladɔn ka
biɲɛ, kɔmɔkili ani tulo tun bɛ kɛ wayibara ban dɔrɔn, a b'a kɔn ka bɔ tɔw la. ... alors
la... Autrefois on mettait dans la saucisse du dès que vous êtes au courant pour la personne,
foie, des rognons et de l'oreille... In the past, vous l’isolez des autres. ...so as soon as you
we used to put liver, kidney and ear in know about the person, you isolate them from
sausage... Früher wurde in die Wurst Leber, others. ...also sobald Sie etwas über die
Nieren und Ohr gegeben... Person wissen, isolieren Sie sie von anderen.
Kɔmɔnɔ [ɔ̀-ɔ́] Nom. personne de l'ethnie komono kɔn 3 [ɔ́] Nom. 1 • intervalle, tronçon entre deux
Ouest du Burkina Faso, Sud de Banfora; nœuds de tige de mil; interval, section between
person of the Komono people; Person aus der two millet stem nodes; Intervall, Abschnitt
Komono Volksgruppe. Category: Community. zwischen zwei Hirsestammknoten. Ɲɔju kelen
kɔmɔsi [ɔ-̀ ɔ̀] Verbe. toucher quelqu'un du doigt pour kɔn bɛ tan ni kɔ bɔ. Sur un seul pied de mil on
peut avoir plus de dix tronçons. On a single
attirer son attention; touch someone to get their
stalk of millet we can have more than ten
attention; Jemanden mit dem Finger berühren,
um seine Aufmerksamkeit zu erregen. ... o ye
sections. Auf einem einzigen Hirsestengel
können wir mehr als zehn Abschnitte haben.
a kɛrɛfɛmuso dɔ kɔmɔsi... ... celle-là toucha
2 • flûte de bambou; bamboo flute;
du doigt la femme qui était près d'elle... ... this
Bambusflöte. ka kɔn fyɛ jouer de la flûte. play
one touched the woman who was near her... ...
the flute. Flöte spielen. Category: Musical
diese berührte mit dem Finger die Frau, die in
ihrer Nähe war...
instrument.
kɔmɔtulon n.comp. sortie du Komo (fête); coming out kɔn 4 Verbe. être à l'affût, être sur le qui-vive; to be
on the lookout, to be on the alert; auf der Hut
of the Komo (celebration); Fest wenn der
Komo herauskommt.
sein, wachsam sein. E kɔnnen de don ne
kama wa ? Est-ce que tu te prépares à
kɔmunun [ɔ́] Morphemes: kɔ-munun. Verbe. tourner
m'attaquer comme ça ? Are you getting ready
le dos, se tourner; turn one's back, turn
to attack me like that? Bereitest du dich darauf
around; sich umdrehen, umdrehen. An k'án
vor, mich so anzugreifen?
kɔmunun k'u lajɛ. Tournons-nous afin de les
kɔn [ɔ́] comparer: buu. Jula: kɔɔn. variante: gɔɔn.
voir. Let's turn around to see them. Drehen wir
5
uns um, um sie zu sehen.
Nom. tisserin gendarme; Village Weaver;
Weber Vogel. Category: Bird. ploceus
cucullatus. synonyme: nkɔncɔrɔɲɛbilen, nkɔn.
29/01/2026 449

kɔn ko ma kɔngɔtɔ
kɔn ko ma variante: kɔnkoma. n.comp. anticiper; kɔngɔli [ɔ̀] variante: gɔngɔli, kɔgɔli, kɔnkɔli. Verbe.
anticipate; ahnen, erwarten, rechnen mit. 1 • retrousser, retourner, replier; roll up, turn
kɔn koo ma [ɔ ̀ ó à] expr. anticiper; anticipate; ahnen,
over, fold back; aufrollen, umdrehen,
zurück-klappen. ... bana bɛ sii de kɔngɔli fo
erhoffen, voraussehen, freudig erwarten.
a bɛna turu ɲɛden la. ... c'est la maladie qui
Kɔnɛ n.pro. nom de famille; family name; Familien
fait se recourber les cils dans l’œil. ...this is the
Name. disease that causes the eyelashes in the eye to
kɔnɛrɛ Nom. néré des berges; kind of tree, dawadawa curl. ...das ist die Krankheit, die dazu führt,
daß sich die Wimpern im Auge kräuseln.
tree by the banks; Baumart, Nere von den
Ufern. Category: Tree. samanea dinklagei.
2 • extrémité de la main (doigts serrés et
repliés), demi-poignée; end of hand (fingers
kɔnferansi Emprunt de : français. Nom. conférence; clenched and folded), half grip, half a handful;
conference; Konferenz, Sitzung, Tagung. Handende (Finger geballt und gefaltet), halber
kɔnferansiden Emprunt de : français. Nom. délégué, Griff, eine halbe Handvoll. I kɔngɔli fa tiga la
ka a di n ma. Donne-moi une demi-poignée
à une conférence; delegate, at a conference;
Abgeordnete, Abgesandte, Delegierte. d'arachide. Give me half a handful of peanuts.
Gib mir eine halbe Handvoll Erdnüsse.
kɔnfɛn [ɔ]́ Morphemes: kɔn-fɛn. Nom. boisson
kɔngɔngɔki [ɔ̀-ɔ̀-ɔ́-ǐ] synonyme: cɛkankan,
enivrante; intoxicating drink, strong drink;
starkes Getränk. O minfɛnw ye kɔnfɛnw ye... toolen. Nom. petit calao à bec rouge;
Ces boissons sont des boissons qui enivrent... red-beaked Horn-bill; Hornvogel.
These drinks are drinks that intoxicate... Category: Bird. tockus erythrorhynchus.
Diese Getränke sind Getränke, die synonyme: ntolen.
berauschen...
kɔngɔrɔn [ɔ́] comparer: kɔnkɔrɔ. variante: konkɔrɔ,
1
Kɔngo Nom. Congo, République du Congo; Congo, kɔnkɔrɔ. Nom. cobe redunca; Bohor
Republic of the Congo; Kongo, Republik reed-buck, Common Reedbuck; Antilope
Kongo. Category: Country. (Art), Riedbock. Category: Mammal. redunca
Kɔngó démokaratiki See main entry: . Nom. redunca. synonyme: kɔnkɔrɔ 1 .
République Démocratique du Congo; kɔngɔrɔn [ɔ́] Verbe. jeter, lancer; throw; werfen. Daa
2
Democratic Republic of Congo;
ye aladeli sɛbɛn in don kamalen dɔ bolo, a
Demokratische Republik Kongo.
Category: Country.
ka taa a kɔngɔrɔn kɔnɔ. Musa confia
l'amulette à un jeune homme, pour qu'il aille la
kɔngɔ [ɔ- ́ ɔ́] 1 • Nom. faim, famine, disette; hunger,
jeter dans la ville. Moussa entrusted the amulet
famine, food shortage, dearth; Hunger, to a young man, so that he could throw it away
Hungersnot, Nahrungsknappheit. Kɔngɔ b’a in the city. Moussa vertraute das Amulett
la. Il/elle a faim. He/she is hungry. Er / sie hat einem jungen Mann an, damit dieser es in der
Hunger. Kɔngɔ y’a minɛ. Il/elle a faim.
Stadt werfen konnte.
He/she is hungry. Er sie ist hungrig. Ala k’an kɔngɔtɔ Verbe. affamé; hungry; hungrig,
kisi kɔngɔ ma ! Que Dieu nous préserve de la ausgehungert. Girinti tɛ fa ye, nka kɔngɔtɔ
famine ! May God keep us from starving! t'a kɛ. Le rot n'est pas signe de rassasiement,
Möge Gott euch vor dem Hunger bewahren. cependant l'affamé ne rote pas. (proverbe).
synonyme: dumuninege. Burping is not a sign of satiation, however the
2 • Verbe. avoir faim, souffrir de faim, affamer; hungry do not burp. (proverb). Aufstoßen ist
to be hungry, starve; hungrig sein, verhungern. kein Zeichen von Sättigung, Hungrige rülpsen
Foyi tɛ mɔgɔ ni faantanya tɛ. C'est la jedoch nicht. (Sprichwort). Kɔngɔtɔ tɛ
pauvreté seule qui affame l'homme. It is dumuni goman dɔn. L'affamé ne sait pas ce
poverty alone that starves man. Es ist allein qu'est une mauvaise nourriture. (proverbe).
die Armut, die den Menschen hungern lässt. The hungry do not know what bad food is.
kɔngɔba [ɔ́] Nom. grande famine; severe famine;
(proverb). Die Hungrigen wissen nicht, was
schlechtes Essen ist. (Sprichwort).
schwere Hungersnot.
kɔngɔbagatɔ [ɔ́] Nom. affamé, souffrant de la faim;
starving, starved; ausgehungert, hungrig,
verhungernd. ... walasa ka kɔngɔbagatɔw
dusu saalo. ... afin de réconforter ceux qui ont
faim. ...in order to comfort those who are
hungry. ...um die Hungrigen zu trösten.
29/01/2026 450

kɔni kɔnkɔnburu
kɔni [ɔ-̀ í] inter. marque de la question (oui ou non); kɔnkawili n.comp. partir tôt; go away early, leave
1
question mark (yes or no question); early; früh fortgehen.
Fragemarkierung (ja oder nein Fragen). Kɔni a kɔnkɔli variante: kɔngɔli. n.comp. 1 • guillemets;
bi ji min ? Ɔnhɔn ! Boit-elle de l'eau ? Oui !
brackets; Klammern.
Does she drink water? Yes! Trinkt sie Wasser?
2 • accolade; hug; Umarmung.
Ja! Kɔni baba ka kɛnɛ? Papa serait-il en
bonne santé ? Daddy, is he in good health?
kɔnkɔn
1
[ɔ ́-ɔ ́] vt. frapper (avec les doigts repliés);
Papa, ist er gesund? knock; schlagen, pochen, anklopfen. daa
kɔni part. 1 • valeur de contraste: pour sa part, quant kɔnkɔn frapper à la porte. knock at the door.
2
an der Türe klopfen. Denw nana u ka dunan
à, pour ce qui concerne, effectivement, en tout
cas; contrast: as for, concerning, really, in any kɔnkɔn. Les enfants vinrent frapper leurs
case, anyway; Kontrastwert: betreffend, tambours. The children came to beat their
wirklich, jedenfalls, auf jeden Fall. Muso kɔni drums. Die Kinder kamen und schlugen auf
nana. La femme, pour sa part, est venue. As ihre Trommeln.
for the woman, she has come. Was die Frau kɔnkɔn [ɔ ̀-ɔ ́] Nom. poisson-chat; catfish; Wels,
2
betrifft, sie ist gekommen. A ye nin nɛnɛ kɔni. Katzenfisch. Category: Fish. Synodontis sp..
Elle a effectivement goûté cela. She really synonyme: kɔɔnkɔn, mugukɔɔnkɔn.
tasted that. Sie hat es wirklich ausprobiert. A
kɔnkɔn [ɔ̀-ɔ́] Verbe. 1 • prendre la ferme décision de,
ma se kɔni. En tout cas il n'a pas pu. In any 3
se préparer à l'attaque, se charger; take a
case he couldn't. Auf jeden Fall konnte er es
strong decision to, to prepare to attack; sich
nicht.
fest vornehmen zu, auf den Angriff
2 • or, certes; but, certainly; aber, sicherlich. O vorbereiten. A y'i kɔnkɔn baara kama.. Il a
y'a sɔrɔ kɔni... Or il se trouva que... But it pris la décision de travailler. He made the
turned out that... Aber es stellte sich heraus, decision to work. Er hat sich vorgenommen zu
daß... I ka kɔrɔ ni n ye kɔni, nka i man fisa ni arbeiten. A y'i kɔnkɔn fa dɔgɔ la. Il s'est
n ye. Tu es certes plus âgé que moi, mais tu chargé de bois. He loaded himself with wood.
n'est pas meilleur que moi. (proverbe). You are Er belud sich mit Holz.
certainly older than me, but you are not better 2 • brassée; take in one's arms; in die Arme
than me. (proverb). Du bist sicherlich älter als nehmen. A y'a ta a kɔnkɔn kɔnɔ. Il l'a pris
ich, aber du bist nicht besser als ich.
contre son corps. He took it against his body.
(Sprichwort).
Er nahm es gegen seinen Körper.
kɔnin [ɔ-̀ ĩ́] Nom. rivière; small river; Bach. kɔnkɔn [ɔ̀] Emprunt de : français «concombre».
4
Category: Water. Nom. concombre; cucumber; Gurke. ka
kɔniya 1 [ɔ- ́ í-á] Verbe. haïr, envier; hate, envy; hassen, kɔnkɔn lɛsɛ éplucher un concombre. peel a
beneiden, neidisch sein. Kana mɔgɔ kɔniya, i cucumber. eine Gurke schälen.
diyanyeko kɛ. Il ne faut pas envier quelqu'un, Category: Types of food.
fais ce que te plaît. Don't be envious towards kɔnkɔn [ɔ̀] variante: kɔɔngɔ. Nom. puisette,
5
somebody, just do what you like. Sei nicht
calebasse munie d'une anse en bois (pour tirer
neidisch auf jemand, tue was du willst.
l'eau du puits); bucket, gourd with a wooden
synonyme: koniya. handle (to draw water from the well); Wasser
kɔniya 1 • Nom. haine, envie, jalousie; hate, envy, Schöpfgefäß, Kürbis mit Holzgriff (um
2
Wasser aus dem Brunnen zu schöpfen), Eimer.
jealousy; Hass, Neid, Eifersucht.
Ni kɔnkɔn cira, a bɛ kala. Quand la puisette
2 • vt. détester, envier; hate, envy; hassen,
se déchire, on la recoud. When the bucket
neidisch sein. Ala bi jurumu kɔniya. Dieu
tears, we sew it back together. Wenn der
déteste le péché. God hates sin. Gott hasst Eimer reißt, nähen wir ihn wieder zusammen.
Sünde. Category: Container.
kɔniyabagatɔ Nom. jaloux, envieux; jealous person, kɔnkɔnburu Emprunt de : français. Nom. concombre;
envious person; eifersüchtige Person, cucumber; Gurke.
neidische Person. synonyme: koniyabagatɔ.
kɔnkase n.comp. arriver tôt; arrive early; früh
kommen. kɔnkawuli ti kɔnkase ye
kɔnkatɛmɛjo min bɛ tɔw ɲɛ expr. priorité;
priority, precedence, preference, right of way;
Priorität, Vorrang, Vorzug, Vortritt.
29/01/2026 451

kɔnkɔnkɔn kɔnɔ
kɔnkɔnkɔn [ɔ́] Adverbe. très froid, très calme; very 3 • pensée, avis, secret; thought, opinion, point
1
of view, secret; Gedanke, Meinung, Ansicht,
cold, very calm; sehr kalt, sehr ruhig. A
Geheimnis. Bɛɛ n'i kɔnɔ don. A chacun son
sumalen kɔnkɔnkɔn ! Il fait très froid ! It's
avis ! (proverbe). Everyone has their own
very cold! Es ist sehr kalt! Cɛnin sumalen opinion! (proverb). Jeder hat seine eigene
don kɔnkɔnkɔn ! Cet homme-là est Meinung! (Sprichwort).
extrêmement calme ! This man is extremely kɔnɔ [ɔ́] postp. 1 • dans, à l’intérieur; inside; in, im. A
calm! Dieser Mann ist äußerst ruhig!
2
synonyme: welewele .
bɛ so kɔnɔ. Elle est dans la maison. She is in
2
the house. Sie ist im Haus. N bɛ taa dugu
kɔnkɔnkɔn
2
[ɔ́] interj. toc ! toc ! toc ! (en frappant à la
kɔnɔ. Je vais en ville. I am going into town.
porte de quelqu'un); knock! knock! knock!
Ich gehe in die Stadt.
(knocking on someone's door); klopfen!
2 • en, pendant, au bout de; for (period of time),
klopfen! klopfen! (an jemandes Tür klopfen).
during, after; für, während (Zeit), nach. Tile
A ye da gosi kɔnkɔnkɔn ! Il frappe à la porte,
tan kɔnɔ. Pendant dix jours. For ten days.
toc ! toc ! toc ! He’s knocking on the door,
knock! knock! knock! Er klopft an die Tür, Während zehn Tagen. Ala ye fɛɛn bɛɛ dilan
klopf! klopf! klopf! tile wɔɔrɔ kɔnɔ. Dieu a créé toutes choses en
kɔnkɔnliw Nom. les guillemets; quotation marks, six jours. God made everything in six days.
Gott hat alles in sechs Tagen geschaffen. A
inverted commas; Anführungs- und
Schlusszeichen. « ... » Category: Grammar. san tan ani duuru in kɔnɔ... Au bout de ces
quinze années... After these fifteen years...
kɔnkɔnw [ɔ ̀-ɔ ́] Nom. accolades; braces; Umarmung, Nach diesen fünfzehn Jahren...
geschweifte Klammern. {...} kɔnɔ [ɔ̀-ɔ̀] comparer: makɔnɔ. vt. attendre; wait
3
Category: Grammar.
for; warten auf. N kɔnɔ ! Attends ! Wait!
kɔnkɔrɔ 1 Nom. rédunca; Bohor reed-buck; Warte! E ka n kɔnɔ yan, n bɛ na sisan.
Antilopenart, Riedbock. Category: Mammal. Attends-moi ici, je reviens toute de suite. Wait
redunca redunca. synonyme: kɔngɔrɔn 1 . for me here, I’ll be right back. Warte hier, ich
kɔnkɔrɔ [ɔ́] Nom. 1 • part; part, share, portion; Anteil. bin gleich wieder da. Jɔnninkunnandi bugɔ
2
I bolo kana se n kɔnkɔrɔ la. Ne mets pas ta
bɛ bila ka sini kɔnɔ. La bastonnade du
chanceux est remis à demain. (proverbe). The
main sur ma part [de nourriture]. Don't put
flogging of the lucky ones is postponed until
your hand on my share [of food]. Lege deine
tomorrow. (proverb). Die Prügelstrafe des
Hand nicht auf meinen Anteil [an Essen].
Glücklichen wird auf morgen verschoben.
2 • à proximité; near, close by; nahe, Nähe. Na
(Sprichwort).
na kɔnkɔrɔ. Viens près de moi. Come near
kɔnɔ [ɔ̀-ɔ́] synonyme: kɔnɔnin. Nom. 1 • oiseau;
me. Komm in meine Nähe. 4
bird; Vogel. Kɔnɔw bɛ kasi. Les oiseaux
3 • dans le giron de, contre le corps de; in the
chantent. The birds are singing. Die Vögel
lap of, against the body of; im Schoß von,
gegen den Körper von. A ye den sigi a
zwitschern. Category: Bird.
kɔnkɔrɔ. Elle a mis l'enfant dans son giron.
2 • convulsion (accès pernicieux de
paludisme, tétanos infantile, épilepsie);
She placed the child in her lap. Sie legte das
convulsion (pernicious attacks of malaria,
Kind auf ihren Schoß.
infantile tetanus, epilepsy); Krämpfe
kɔnɔ [ɔ-́ ɔ́] Nom. 1 • ventre, estomac, intérieur; (schädliche Anfälle von Malaria, infantiler
1
stomach, belly, interior; Bauch, Magen, das Tetanus, Epilepsie). Fasajabana, ni dɔw b'a
Innere. N kɔnɔ fara. Je suis rassasié. J’ai bien weele ko kɔnɔ... Le tétanos, que certains
mangé. I am full. I have eaten enough. Ich appellent « maladie de l'oiseau »... Tetanus,
habe genug gegessen. Kɔnɔ ta. Devenir which some call «bird disease»... Tetanus, den
enceinte. Become pregnant. Schwanger manche «Vogelkrankheit» nennen...
werden. Category: Body. Category: Disease.
2 • grossesse; pregnancy; Schwangerschaft. I kɔnɔ Nom. inclusion; inclusion; Einschluss,
5
kɔnɔ bɛ kalo joli la ? Ta grossesse est à quel Einbeziehung. Category: Mathematics, Sign,
mois ? What month is your pregnancy? In Symbol. synonyme: kɔnɔnadon.
welchem Monat sind Sie schwanger?
29/01/2026 452

kɔnɔ kɔnɔbɔrɔtigi
kɔnɔ Nom. une des sociétés initiatiques; one of the kɔnɔbaralasu [ɔ́] Nom. goinfre; glutton; Vielfraß.
6
initiatory societies; eine der Kɔnɔbaralasu tɛmɛnen t'a kan ! Il n'y a pas
Initiationsgesellschaften. Kɔtɛbaw ni kɔnɔw plus goinfre que lui ! There is no more
bɔra. Les masques du « kotèba » et du « kɔnɔ » gluttonous person than him! Es gibt keinen
sont sortis. The “kotèba” and “kɔnɔ” masks gefräßigeren Menschen als ihn!
are out. Die „Kotèba“- und „Kɔnɔ“-Masken synonyme: nugulasu.
sind erschienen.
kɔnɔbarantanlen [ɔ́] Nom. douleur de l'abdomen,
kɔnɔ 7 [ɔ]̀ Nom. bouton de fleur, floraison; flower bud, douleur de la paroi abdominale; abdominal
flowering; Blütenknospe, blühend, Blüte. Syɔ pain, abdominal wall pain; Bauchschmerzen,
ye kɔnɔ tigɛ. La floraison des haricots a Bauchwandschmerzen. Category: Disease.
commencé. The flowering of beans has begun. kɔnɔbaya Nom. obésité; obesity; Fettleibigkeit,
Die Bohnen haben angefangen zu blühen. Korpulenz, Übergewichtig. Category: Disease.
Category: Parts of a plant.
kɔnɔbelebelebana
kɔnɔ [ɔ]́ Nom. bande; strip; Streifen. fininkɔnɔ une
8 [ɔ́] Morphemes: kɔnɔ-belebele-bana. Nom.
bande de tissu. a strip of fabric, a strip of cloth.
cirrhose, ascite; cirrhosis, ascites; Zirrhose,
ein Streifen aus Stoff.
Aszites. Category: Disease.
kɔnɔ
9
[ɔ]́ Nom. largeur; width; Breite. a bolo, a kɔnɔ
kɔnɔboli Morphemes: kɔnɔ-boli. Nom. diarrhée;
sa longueur, sa largeur. its length, its width.
diarrhoea, diarrhea; Durchfall. Kɔnɔboli tɛ
seine Länge, seine Breite.
bana ye, bo n'a ɲɛtuma don. La diarrhée
kɔnɔ sii variante: kɔnɔsi. Nom. plumage; plumage,
n'est pas une maladie, l’excrément vient à son
feathers; Gefieder. Category: Parts of an heure. (proverbe). Diarrhea is not an illness,
animal. excrement comes in its own time. (proverb).
kɔnɔba [ɔ́] Morphemes: kɔnɔ-ba. Nom. gros ventre, Durchfall ist keine Krankheit, der Kot kommt
zur rechten Zeit. (Sprichwort).
bedaine; big belly, paunch; großer Bauch.
Category: Disease. synonyme: boji, kɔnɔkari,
tubabukɛ kɔnɔba un blanc au gros ventre. a
white person with a big belly. ein Weißer mit
kɔnɔkari.
dickem Bauch. synonyme: kɔnɔdaga. kɔnɔboli banbali synonyme: kɔnɔboli gwɛlɛn.
kɔnɔbaabu [ɔ́-ɔ́-á-ú] Morphemes: kɔnɔ-baabu. Nom. diarrhée chronique; chronic diarrhoea;
Chronischer Durchfall. Category: Disease.
Nom. contenu (d'un livre), sommaire; content
(of a book), summary; Inhalt (eines Buches), kɔnɔbolitɔ [ɔ́] Morphemes: kɔnɔ-boli-tɔ. Nom.
Zusammenfassung. diarrhéique; diarrhoeal; durchfallartig. den
kɔnɔbaganin [ɔ́] Morphemes: kɔnɔ-baga-nin. kɔnɔbolitɔw les enfants atteints de la diarrhée.
Nom. dysenterie chronique; chronic dysentery; children with diarrhoea. Kinder mit Durchfall.
chronische Ruhr. Category: Disease. kɔnɔbonmanan Morphemes: kɔnɔ-bon-manan.
synonyme: kɔnɔkelebenin.
Nom. lance-pierres; catapult; Schleuder,
kɔnɔbara [ɔ́-ɔ́-á-á] Nom. 1 • ventre, abdomen; womb, Steinschleuder. Category: Tool.
stomach, abdomen; Bauch, Abdomen. Wari jɛ kɔnɔbɔ Nom. avortement; abortion; Abtreibung.
1
ye tiɲɛ ye, nka kɔnɔbara falen cɛ ka ɲi. synonyme: kɔnɔcɛn, kɔnɔjabi, kɔnɔwolowolo,
L'argent sonnant c'est bien, mais un ventre kɔnɔtiɲɛ.
bien rempli c'est mieux. (proverbe). Money /
cash is good, but a well-filled belly is better. kɔnɔbɔ 2 [ɔ́] Morphemes: kɔnɔ-bɔ.
(proverb). Bargeld ist gut, aber ein voller variante: kɔnɔnabɔ. Verbe. curer, évider; clean,
Bauch ist besser. (Sprichwort). clear; aufräumen, ausgraben, reinigen. ka
Category: Body, Parts of an animal.
kɔlɔn kɔnɔbɔ curer un puits. clean a well.
2 • grossesse; pregnancy; Schwangerschaft. ...
einen Brunnen reinigen.
k'u ban ka jɔ o kɔnɔbara tigiya la. ... et
kɔnɔbɔrɔtigi
refusent de reconnaître la paternité de ces
grossesses. ... and refuse to acknowledge the [ɔ̀-ɔ́-ɔ̀-ɔ̀-í-í] Morphemes: kɔnɔ-bɔrɔ-tigi.
paternity of these pregnancies. ...und Nom. pélican gris; grey pelican; grauer
weigern sich, die Vaterschaft dieser Pelikan. Category: Bird. pelecanus rufescens,
Schwangerschaften anzuerkennen. pelecanus onocrotalus. synonyme: forokoba,
kɔnɔbarajolitɛmɛsira Nom. aorte abdominal; kɔsɔgɔkɔnɔ, kulanjan, konkɔnɔ.
abdominal aorta; Aorta. Category: Body.
29/01/2026 453

kɔnɔburun kɔnɔfuru
kɔnɔburun [ɔ́] Morphemes: kɔnɔ-burun. Nom. 2 • douleurs de l'accouchement; labour pain,
pain of childbirth; Schmerzen bei der Geburt,
avortement, fausse couche; abortion,
Wehen.
miscarriage; Schwangerschaftsabbruch,
Fehlgeburt. synonyme: kɔnɔlagosi, kɔnɔjabi, kɔnɔdon [ɔ́-ɔ́-ǒ] Morphemes: kɔnɔ-don. Verbe.
kɔnɔwolowolo, kɔnɔtiɲɛ, kɔnɔcɛn. pousser à, inciter; to push, to incite; drängen,
anregen, sticheln. U y'a kɔnɔdon ka kɛlɛ tigɛ
kɔnɔcɛn [ɔ́-ɔ́-ɛ ́] Nom. avortement; abortion;
Musa la. Ils l'ont poussé à se quereller avec
Abtreibung. synonyme: kɔnɔjabi, kɔnɔtiɲɛ,
Moussa. They pushed him to quarrel with
kɔnɔbɔ 1 , kɔnɔburun, kɔnɔwolowolo, Moussa. Sie drängten ihn zum Streit mit
kɔnɔtiɲɛ. Moussa.
kɔnɔcibange [ɔ́] Morphemes: kɔnɔ-ci-bange. kɔnɔdun [ɔ́] Morphemes: kɔnɔ-dun. Nom. profond;
Nom. césarienne; caesarian section; deep, profound; tief. synonyme: dunman,
Kaiserschnitt. Kɔnɔcibange bɛna kɛ fu la. dun.
2
Les césariennes seront faites gratuitement.
kɔnɔfankelendimin
Caesareans will be done free of charge. Die
Kaiserschnitte werden kostenlos durchgeführt. [ɔ́] Morphemes: kɔnɔ-fan-kelen-dimin.
Category: Treat disease. Nom. appendicite; appendicitis;
synonyme: kɔnɔfarajiginni. Blinddarmentzündung,, Blinddarm.
Category: Disease. synonyme: bɛlɛnin.
kɔnɔda [ɔ́] Morphemes: kɔnɔ-da. Nom. fait de rendre
kɔnɔfarajiginni
enceinte; cause to become pregnant; die
Schwangerschaft bewirken. ... ka kɔnɔda ko [ɔ́] Morphemes: kɔnɔ-fara-jiginni. Nom.
fila kɛ a la... ... et la rendre deux fois césarienne; Caesarean section; Kaiserschnitt.
enceinte... ... and make her twice pregnant... ... Kɔnɔfarajiginni bɛ kɛ fu la Mali kɔnɔ. Les
und sie zweimal schwanger machen... césariennes seront pratiquées gratuitement au
kɔnɔdaga [ɔ́] Morphemes: kɔnɔ-daga. Nom. gros
Mali. Caesarean sections will be performed
free of charge in Mali. Die Kaiserschnitte
ventre, bedaine; big belly, paunch; großer
werden in Mali kostenlos durchgeführt.
Bauch. synonyme: kɔnɔba.
synonyme: kɔnɔcibange.
kɔnɔdatugu [ɔ́] Morphemes: kɔnɔ-datugu. Nom. kɔnɔfɛn Morphemes: kɔnɔ-fɛn. Nom. organe interne;
diaphragme; diaphragm; Membran,
organ inside a body; inneres Organ. kɔnɔfɛn
Zwerchfell. Kɔnɔdatugu ye falaka ye, min
fɛgɛnmanw les organes fragiles. fragile
kɛlen bɛ ka disi ni kɔnɔbara danfara. Le
organs. empfindliche Organe. Category: Body.
diaphragme est une membrane qui sépare la
poitrine de l'abdomen. The diaphragm is a kɔnɔfili [ɔ̀-ɔ́-ì-í] Morphemes: kɔnɔ-fili. Nom. jacana;
membrane that separates the chest from the African jacana; Blaustirn-Blatthühnchen.
abdomen. Das Zwerchfell ist eine Membran, Category: Bird. actophilornis africana.
die die Brust vom Bauch trennt. synonyme: ngɔkukankɔnɔ, bulukukɔnɔnin,
Category: Body. synonyme: sɔnnabiri, kɔkukankɔnɔ, bulukankɔnɔ.
tantandatugu, kɔnɔwolo, disidanfara.
kɔnɔfin [ɔ̀-ɔ̀-ĩ́] synonyme: kaankaan, kaakaa. Nom.
kɔnɔden [ɔ̀-ɔ̀] Morphemes: kɔnɔ-den. corbeau d'Afrique; raven, pied crow; Rabe.
variante: kɔnɔdennin. Nom. oisillon; chick, Category: Bird. corvus albus.
young bird; junger Vogel. kɔnɔden siibɔ kɔnɔfinfin [ɔ́] Morphemes: kɔnɔ-finfin. Nom.
tanga ku tɛ bɛrɛ ye. L’oisillon aux premières ballonnement; bloating; Blähung. Den ma
plumes, sa queue n'est pas bien longue. sunɔgɔ kɔnɔfinfin y'a sababu ye. L'enfant
(proverbe). The bird with the first feathers, its
n'a pas pu dormir à cause de ballonnements.
tail is not very long. (proverb). Das Vögelchen
The child was unable to sleep because of
mit den ersten Federn, sein Schwanz ist nicht
bloating. Das Kind konnte aufgrund von
sehr lang. (Sprichwort). Category: Bird.
Blähungen nicht schlafen. Category: Disease.
kɔnɔdimin [ɔ́-ɔ́-í-í] Morphemes: kɔnɔ-dimin. Nom. synonyme: finfinni.
1 • maux de ventre, coliques; stomach ache, kɔnɔfuru [ɔ́] Morphemes: kɔnɔ-furu. Nom. ventre,
colic; Bauchweh, Bauchschmerzen, Kolik.
panse; stomach, belly; Bauch, Pansen.
Kɔnɔdimin jugu y'a minɛ. Elle fut pris de
Kɔnɔfuru b'a la. Il a du ventre. He has a belly.
violents maux de ventre. She had violent
stomach aches. Sie hatte heftige
Er hat einen Bauch.
Bauchschmerzen. Category: Disease.
synonyme: kɔnɔtigɛ.
29/01/2026 454

kɔnɔgan kɔnɔkala
kɔnɔgan [ɔ́-ɔ́-à] Jula: kɔnɔgwan. 2 • fronde; sling, slingshot; Steinschleuder.
Category: Hunt and fish.
Morphemes: kɔnɔ-gan. synonyme: kɔnɔnafili.
variante: kɔnɔnagan. 1 • Nom. angoisse,
kɔnɔja [ɔ́-ɔ́-á] Morphemes: kɔnɔ-jà. Nom.
tourment, inquiétude, tracas; anxiety, worry, constipation; constipation; Verstopfung.
trouble; Ängstlichkeit, Besorgnis. Kɔnɔja tile saba ye nin ye a la. Voici trois
synonyme: kɔnɔnafili . jours qu'il est constipé. He has been
1
constipated for three days. Seit drei Tagen ist
2 • Verbe. inquiéter, tracasser, angoisser,
er verstopft. Category: Disease.
embarrasser; to worry about, to be anxious, to
synonyme: banakɔtagasɔrɔbaliya.
be troubled by, embarrass; besorgt sein, sich
Sorgen machen, beängstigt sein, in kɔnɔjabi [ɔ́] Morphemes: kɔnɔ-jabi. Nom.
Verlegenheit bringen, bloßstellen, verlegen
avortement, fausse couche; abortion,
sein. An bɛ kɔnɔgan wariko la. Nous sommes
miscarriage; Abtreibung, Fehlgeburt.
inquiètes pour l'argent. We are concerned Kɔnɔjabi m'u si sɔrɔ. Aucune d'elles n'a fait
about money. Wir machen uns Sorgen um das
de fausse couche. None of them miscarried.
Geld. Ni mɔgɔ min ye i ka bonkɔnɔtakurun
Keine von ihnen hatte eine Fehlgeburt.
sisima bɛɛ labɔ, i na tila kakɔnɔgan. Celui synonyme: kɔnɔcɛn, kɔnɔtiɲɛ, kɔnɔbɔ ,
1
qui veut enlever de sa case toutes les bûches kɔnɔburun, kɔnɔwolowolo, kɔnɔlagosi.
qui font de la fumée, sera finalement bien
embarrasse. (proverbe). He who wants to kɔnɔjafura [ɔ́] Morphemes: kɔnɔ-ja-fura. Nom.
remove from his house all the logs that make médicament contre la constipation; medication
smoke, will finally be well embarrassed. for constipation; Arzneimittel gegen
(proverb). Wer all die rauchenden Stämme aus Verstopfung. Category: Treat disease.
seiner Hütte entfernen will, wird am Ende
kɔnɔjanfin Morphemes: kɔnɔ-jan-fin. Nom. merle
wohl verlegen sein. (Sprichwort). 1
synonyme: lafilibagatɔ.
métallique à longue queue; long-tailed glossy
starling; Glanzstar. Category: Bird.
kɔnɔganbaga [ɔ́] Morphemes: kɔnɔ-gan-baga. lamprotornis caudatus. synonyme: mɔɔlɔ.
Nom. personne qui a (ou qui crée) des
kɔnɔjanfin [ɔ̀-ɔ́-à-í] Nom. pica-piac, Piapiac
difficultés; person who has (or creates) 2
africain; black magpie, piapiac crow;
difficulties; Person, die Schwierigkeiten hat
oder verursacht.
Vogelart, Ptilostomus afer Krähe.
Category: Bird. ptilostomus afer.
kɔnɔganbagatɔ [ɔ́] Nom. 1 • inquiet, tourmenté par
kɔnɔjɛ [ɔ́] Jula: kɔnɔgwɛ. Morphemes: kɔnɔ-jɛ.
des problèmes graves; worried, tormented by
serious problems; beunruhigt, gequält von Verbe. être franc, honnête, sincère; to be
ernsten Problemen. A kɔnɔganbagatɔ de honest, sincere; offen sein, ehrlich sein. Hawa
taara. Il est parti très tourmenté. He left very y'a kɔnɔjɛ i ye wa ? Est-ce que Hawa a été
tormented. Er ging sehr gequält.
honnête avec toi ? Was Hawa honest with you?
War Hawa ehrlich zu Ihnen?
2 • personne angoissée; anxious person;
ängstliche Person. kɔnɔjɛya Jula: kɔnɔgwɛya. Morphemes: kɔnɔ-jɛ-ya.
kɔnɔgɛlɛn ['ó] Morphemes: kɔnɔ-gɛlɛn. Nom. synonyme: gwɛya, hɔɔrɔnya. Nom.
1 • méchant, dur; bad, hard; gemein, hart. transparence, franchise, sincérité;
transparency, honesty, sincerity; Transparenz,
2 • entêté; stubborn; stur, dickköpfig,
eigensinnig. denmisɛn kɔnɔgɛlɛn un enfant
Ehrlichkeit, Aufrichtigkeit. ... ka jamana
entêté. a stubborn child. ein eigensinniges
dɛmɛ ni kɔnɔjɛya ye... ... aider sincèrement le
Kind. pays... ... sincerely help the country... ... dem
Land aufrichtig helfen ...
kɔnɔgɛnnan
kɔnɔkala [ɔ̀-ɔ̀] Nom. pédoncule; peduncle; Stiel. Jiri
[ɔ-̀ ɔ̀-ɛ̀-á] Morphemes: kɔnɔ-gɛn-nan. Nom.
1 • épouvantail; scarecrow; Vogelscheuche.
bɛ den juru min na, ko o ye kɔnɔkala ye. Le
rameau au bout duquel se trouve le fruit de
Kɔnɔgɛnnan bɛ kɛ ni nɛgɛ kolon sirilen
l'arbre, c'est cela qu'on appelle «kɔnɔkala».
ɲɔgɔn na. Un épouvantail est fait avec de
The branch at the end of which the fruit of the
vieux morceaux de fer attachés ensemble. A
tree is found is what we call “kɔnɔkala”. Der
scarecrow is made with old pieces of iron tied
Ast, an dessen Ende sich die Frucht des
together. Eine Vogelscheuche besteht aus
Baumes befindet, nennen wir „kɔnɔkala“.
alten Eisenstücken, die zusammengebunden
synonyme: ɲɔɔnɔ, gɔnkun, feerekala.
sind. Category: Agriculture.
synonyme: cɛkolonba.
29/01/2026 455

kɔnɔkan kɔnɔna
kɔnɔkan [ɔ́] Morphemes: kɔnɔ-kan. Nom. douleur de kɔnɔma [ɔ́-ɔ́-ã́] Jula: kɔnɔman. synonyme: lasirinin.
bas-ventre; lower abdomen pain; Schmerzen adj. femme enceinte, grosse (d'un petit), pleine,
im Unterleib. Category: Disease. formé (pour un épi); pregnant, full;
kɔnɔkari Nom. diarrhée; diarrhoea; Durchfall. schwanger. A kɔnɔman lo. Elle est enceinte.
kɔnɔkarifura remède contre la diarrhée,
She is pregnant. Sie ist schwanger. Muso
purge. remedy for diarrhoea, purge. Mittel
kɔnɔman man kan ka sisɛfan dumu. Une
gegen Durchfall, Entschlackung. femme enceinte ne devrait pas manger les
Category: Disease. synonyme: kɔnɔboli, œufs. A pregnant woman should not eat eggs.
Eine schwangere Frau sollte keine Eier essen.
kɔnɔboli, boji.
Kɔnɔma bɛ juru don tintɔ la. La femme
kɔnɔkelebenin [ɔ́] Morphemes: kɔnɔ-kelebe-nin. enceinte prête à la femme en couches.
Nom. dysenterie chronique; chronic dysentery; (proverbe). The pregnant woman lends to the
chronische Ruhr. synonyme: kɔnɔbaganin. woman in childbirth. (proverb). Die
schwangere Frau leiht der Frau im Kindbett
kɔnɔkɔnɔ
1
[ɔ̀-ɔ̀] Nom. vase qui enlise, alluvions dues
Geld. (Sprichwort). synonyme: kɔnɔmamuso,
aux eaux d'écoulement; mud that gets bogged
kɔnɔmaya, lasirinin.
down, alluvium due to run-off water;
Schlamm, der sich festsetzt, Schwemmland kɔnɔmamuso [ɔ́] Jula: kɔnɔmanmuso. n.comp.
durch abfließendes Wasser. A yɔrɔ bɛɛ ye femme enceinte; pregnant woman;
kɔnɔkɔnɔ ye. Ça n'est que la vase partout. It's schwangere Frau. synonyme: kɔnɔma.
just mud everywhere. Überall ist nur Schlamm. kɔnɔmaracogoɲuman Nom. aviculture
Category: Water, Land.
rationnelle; rational poultry farming;
kɔnɔkɔnɔ 2 [ɔ̀-ɔ́-ɔ̀-ɔ́] Verbe. attendre longtemps; wait rationelle Geflügelzucht. Category: Animal
for a long time; lange warten. An ye áw husbandry.
kɔnɔkɔnɔ ka dɛsɛ. Nous vous avons attendus kɔnɔmaya [ɔ́] Jula: kɔnɔmanya.
longtemps. We’ve been waiting for you a long Morphemes: kɔnɔ-ma-ya. 1 • Nom. grossesse;
time. Wir haben lange auf euch gewartet.
pregnancy; Schwangerschaft. kɔnɔmaya
kɔnɔkɔnɔnin [ɔ̀-ɔ̀-ɔ̀-ɔ̀-í] Nom. silure, poisson-chat; wagati période de grossesse. period of
Catfish; Wels, Welse. Category: Fish. clarias pregnancy. Zeitraum der Schwangerschaft.
anguillaris. synonyme: konkonnin. synonyme: kɔnɔma.
kɔnɔku [ɔ̀-ɔ̀] Morphemes: kɔnɔ-ku. Nom. 1 • mouton 2 • Verbe. rendre enceinte, engrosser; cause a
pregnancy, make pregnant; schwängern.
de Panurge, suiviste, mouton; follower, sheep;
Nachläufer, Schaf. Musa ye kɔnɔku yɛrɛ de kɔnɔn [ɔ́-ɔ́] variante: kɔnɔkisɛ, kɔnɔ. Nom. perle,
1
ye, a tɛ se ka foyi bɔ a muso ta la. Moussa rang de perles; pearl, row of pearls; Perle,
est un mouton, il ne contredit jamais sa femme. Perlenreihe. synonyme: kɔnɔnkisɛ.
Moussa is like a sheep, he never contradicts
kɔnɔn [ɔ̀] Nom. 1 • petit supplément donné par le
his wife. Moussa ist wie ein Schaf, er 2
widerspricht seiner Frau nie. vendeur à l'acheteur, cadeau; small supplement
given by the seller to the buyer, gift; kleiner
2 • personne sur qui l'on ne peut compter; a
Zuschlag, den der Verkäufer dem Käufer gibt,
person who cannot be counted on; eine Person,
Geschenk. A ye n sɔn kɔnɔn na. Il m'a fait un
auf die man sich nicht verlassen kann,
unzuverlässige Person. petit cadeau. He gave me a little gift. Er hat mir
ein kleines Geschenk gemacht.
kɔnɔkulu [ɔ́] Morphemes: kɔnɔ-kulu. Nom.
2 • faire un ristourne, ajouter un peu à la
borborygme, gargouillement; gurgling;
quantité achetée; a discount, add a little to the
Gurgeln.
quantity purchased; einen Rabatt zu erhalten,
kɔnɔlagosi [ɔ́] Morphemes: kɔnɔ-lagosi. Nom. addieren Sie etwas zur gekauften Menge
hinzu.
avortement, fausse couche; abortion,
miscarriage; Abtreibung, Fehlgeburt. San kɔnɔna [ɔ́-ɔ́-á] Morphemes: kɔnɔ-na. 1 • postp.
caman b'a la kɔnɔlagosi b'a sɔrɔ. Elle fait entre, dedans, intérieur; between, inside,
des fausses couches depuis des années. She's interior; zwischen, drin, darin, Innen. A y'a
been having miscarriages for years. Sie hat kɔnɔna lajɛ minkɛ, a maloyara. Quand elle
seit Jahren Fehlgeburten.
vit ce qu'il y avait dedans, elle eut honte. When
synonyme: kɔnɔburun, kɔnɔjabi, she saw what was inside, she was ashamed.
kɔnɔwolowolo, kɔnɔtiɲɛ. Als sie sah, was drin war, schämte sie sich.
29/01/2026 456

kɔnɔnabana kɔnɔnako dɔ
2 • postp. pendant; during; während. O wagati kɔnɔnafili [ɔ́] vt. troubler, inquiéter, tracasser,
2
kɔnɔna na... Pendant ce temps... During this déstabiliser; to trouble, worry, to disturb, to
time... Während dieser Zeit... destabilize, bother; ärgern, plagen, zusetzen,
3 • Nom. durée, période; length of time, period, stören, destabilisieren. A bɛ n kɔnɔnafili Cela
time, duration; Zeitraum, Zeitspanne, Dauer. m'inquiète. This worries me. Das macht mir
... olu ka kalan tɛ tɛmɛ kalo saba kɔnɔna Sorgen. A ma se ka sunɔgɔ kɔnɔnafili fɛ. Il
kan. ... leurs études ne dépassent pas une durée ne put s'endormir, à cause de ce qui le
de trois mois. ...their studies do not exceed a tracassait. He couldn't fall asleep because of
duration of three months. ...ihre Studiendauer what was bothering him. Er konnte aufgrund
eine Dauer von drei Monaten nicht dessen, was ihn störte, nicht einschlafen.
überschreitet. kɔnɔnagolo [ɔ́-ɔ́-á-ó-ó] Nom. muqueuse; mucous
kɔnɔnabana [ɔ́] Morphemes: kɔnɔ-na-bana. Nom. membrane; Schleimhaut.
maladie interne, maladie de l'intérieur du kɔnɔnajɛ Jula: kɔnɔnagwɛ. Morphemes: kɔnɔ-na-jɛ.
corps; internal disease, disease from inside the
Nom. franc, sympathique; franc, outspoken,
body; innere Krankheit, Krankheit aus dem
straight, sympathetic, likeable, pleasant,
Inneren des Körpers. antonyme: farikolobana.
congenial; aufrichtig, offen, ehrlich, freimütig,
kɔnɔnadon Morphemes: kɔnɔ-na-don. Nom. ehrlich, sympathisch, freundlich, nett,
inclusion; inclusion; Einschluß, Einbezug.
liebenswert.
Category: Finance. synonyme: kɔnɔ 5 . kɔnɔnajoli Morphemes: kɔnɔ-na-joli. n.comp. ulcère;
kɔnɔnadugalen Morphemes: kɔnɔ-na-dugalen. ulcer; Geschwür, Eiterbeutel.
Category: Disease.
Nom. rétroviseur intérieur; interior mirror;
Innenspiegel. kɔnɔnajugu Morphemes: kɔnɔ-na-jugu. Nom. mal
kɔnɔnafan [ɔ́] Morphemes: kɔnɔ-na-fan. Nom. intentionné, méchant; ill-intentioned, mean,
evil, bad; mit bösen Absichten, bösartig,
ovule; egg cell, ovum; Eizelle, Samenanlage.
gemein. synonyme: kɔnɔnanjugu, kɔnɔnango.
Category: Body. synonyme: fankisɛ, fan ,
1
denfan. kɔnɔnakasi [ɔ́] comparer: furuku.
kɔnɔnafɛn [ɔ́] Morphemes: kɔnɔ-na-fɛn. Nom.
Morphemes: kɔnɔ-na-kasi. Verbe. être triste,
attrister, être mécontent; be sad, to sadden, to
1 • pensées; thoughts; Gedanken.
be unhappy; traurig sein, betrüben, traurig
synonyme: kɔnɔnanko.
stimmen, unglücklich sein. A ma kɔnɔnakasi
2 • entrailles, abats; entrails, offal; Innereien.
dɛ ! Il ne s'est pas du tout attristé ! He wasn't
saga kɔnɔnafɛnw les entrailles du mouton.
sad at all! Er war überhaupt nicht traurig!
the entrails of sheep. die Eingeweide des
Schafes.
kɔnɔnakelebenin
3 • nourriture; food; Essen, Nahrung, [ɔ́] Morphemes: kɔnɔ-na-kelebe-nin. Nom.
Lebensmittel. An kɔnɔnafɛn de tun tɛ. Ce entérite, syndrome dysentérique; enteritis,
n'était pas de la nourriture pour nous. It was dysenteric syndrome; Enteritis, Ruhrsyndrom.
not food for us. Das war kein Essen für uns. Category: Disease.
kɔnɔnafili [ɔ́] n.comp. angoisses, inquiétude, kɔnɔnako n.comp. 1 • sentiment, pensée, intention;
1
embarras, perplexité; anxiety, anguish, feeling, sentiment, thought, intention;
perplexity, embarrassment; Ängstlichkeit, Empfindung, Gefühl, Gedanke, Absicht,
Unruhe, Besorgnis, Verlegenheit. Kɔnɔnafili Eindruck. synonyme: kɔnɔnanko.
bonya, i k'i sigi ka Ala lajɛ. Si grand soit 2 • objet; subject, purpose, focus; Thema,
l'inquiétude, assieds-toi et regarde Dieu. betreffend, Anliegen, Zweck. Kɔnɔnako:
(proverbe). No matter how great the worry, sit baaraɲini demandi Objet (de la lettre) :
down and look at God. (proverb). Egal wie Demande d'emploi. Purpose (of the letter):
groß die Sorge ist, setze dich hin und schaue Application for a job. Zweck (des Briefes):
auf Gott. (Sprichwort). synonyme: kɔnɔgan. Gesuch um eine Anstellung.
kɔnɔnako dɔ [ɔ́] synonyme: kunnafonidisɛbɛ. Nom.
article (journal); article (in a journal);
Zeitungsartikel.
29/01/2026 457

kɔnɔnakuru kɔnɔnanjɛya
kɔnɔnakuru [ɔ́] Morphemes: kɔnɔ-na-kuru. Nom. kɔnɔnanfinya [ɔ́] Morphemes: kɔnɔ-nan-fin-ya.
rancune, ressentiment, grief, désir de Nom. méchanceté profonde, malhonnêteté
vengeance; resentment, rancour, grudge, foncière; deep wickedness, fundamental
bitterness, grievance, desire for revenge; dishonesty; tiefe Bosheit, grundlegende
Groll, Ärger, Verbitterung, Unmut, Unehrlichkeit.
Beschwerde, Verlangen nach Rache. A kɔnɔnango [ɔ́] Nom. 1 • mal intentionné;
kɔnɔnakuru de y'a to a ma se ka don án ka
ill-intentioned; böswillig.
jɛ la. C'est à cause de son ressentiment qu'il n'a synonyme: kɔnɔnanfin, kɔnɔnajugu,
pas pu entrer dans notre association. It was kɔnɔnanjugu.
because of his resentment that he could not
join our association. Aufgrund seines Grolls
2 • insincère, dissimulé; insincere, concealed;
konnte er unserem Verein nicht beitreten.
unaufrichtig, verborgen.
3 • qui pense du mal des autres; who thinks
kɔnɔnamiiri [ɔ́] Morphemes: kɔnɔ-na-miiri.
badly of others; der schlecht über andere
1 • n.comp. méditation, ressentiment; denkt.
meditation, contemplation, resentment,
kɔnɔnangoya [ɔ́] Morphemes: kɔnɔ-nan-go-ya.
grudge, rancour; Meditieren, Besinnlichkeit,
Groll, Ärger, Empfindlichkeit, Verdruss, Nom. 1 • mauvaises intentions; bad intentions;
Verstimmung. A fa saya kɔnɔnamiiri ma ban schlechte Absichten. Yɛrɛyebaara ni
a la fɔlɔ. Il est encore dans ses pensées au sujet kɔnɔnangoya tɛ bɛn. Quand on travaille pour
de la mort de son père. He is still in thought toi, on ne peut pas être mal intentionné. When
about his father's death. Er denkt noch immer we work for you, we can't be ill-intentioned.
an den Tod seines Vaters. Wenn wir für Sie arbeiten, dürfen wir keine
bösen Absichten haben. synonyme: nijuguya.
2 • Verbe. méditer, réfléchir; meditate, reflect;
meditieren, nachdenken. 2 • vilenie, insincérité, dissimulation; villainy,
kɔnɔnandi [ɔ́] Morphemes: kɔnɔ-na-n-di. Nom.
insincerity, dissimulation; Schurkerei,
Unaufrichtigkeit, Verstellung.
bien intentionné, serviable, foncièrement bon;
well-meaning, helpful, fundamentally good; kɔnɔnanjɛ [ɔ́] Nom. franc, sympathique; frank,
gut gemeint, hilfreich, grundsätzlich gut. friendly; offenherzig, freundlich, sympathisch.
antonyme: kɔnɔnanfin, kɔnɔnanjugu. kɔnɔnanjɛlenya [ɔ́] Nom. franchise, sincérité;
kɔnɔnandiya [ɔ́] 1 • Verbe. se réjouir; rejoice, be frankness, sincerity; Ehrlichkeit,
glad; sich freuen. A taara bɔ ne ye, k'i Aufrichtigkeit. Ala ka kɔnɔnanjɛlenya sabati
kɔnɔnandiya ne kɔrɔ kosɛbɛ. Il est allé me án ni ɲɔgɔn cɛ ! Que Dieu renforce la
rendre visite, et s'est réjoui d’être auprès de sincérité entre nous ! May God strengthen the
moi. He came to visit me, and was glad to be sincerity between us! Möge Gott die
with me. Er kam mich besuchen und freute Aufrichtigkeit zwischen uns stärken!
sich, bei mir zu sein. kɔnɔnanjɛya [ɔ́] Emprunt de : kɔnɔ-nan-jɛ-ya.
2 • Nom. bonnes intentions, bonnes dispositions variante: kɔnɔnajɛya. Verbe. 1 • être franc, être
envers autrui; good intentions, good
sincère; be frank, be sincere; offen sein,
dispositions towards others; gute Absichten,
aufrichtig sein. Aw minnu ye furuɲɔgɔnmaw
gute Voreingenommenheit gegenüber
anderen. An y'a sugandi a ka kɔnɔnandiya
ye, a ye a kɔnɔnanjɛya ɲɔgɔn ye... Vous qui
kama. Nous l’avons choisi pour ses bonnes
êtes des conjoints, soyez francs l'un envers
l'autre... You who are spouses, be frank with
dispositions envers le autres. We chose him for
each other... Seien Sie als Ehepartner offen
his good disposition towards others. Wir
miteinander...
wählten ihn wegen seiner guten Gesinnung
gegenüber anderen.
2 • franchise, sincérité; frankness, sincerity;
Offenheit, Aufrichtigkeit. Kɔnɔnanjɛya bɛ
kɔnɔnanfin [ɔ́] Morphemes: kɔnɔ-na-n-fin.
teriya mɛɛn si la. La sincérité fait durer
variante: kɔnɔnango, kɔnɔnafin. Nom.
l'amitié. Sincerity makes friendship last.
malhonnête, mauvais, foncièrement méchant; Aufrichtigkeit macht Freundschaft dauerhaft.
dishonest, bad, fundamentally mean;
unehrlich, schlecht, grundsätzlich gemein.
synonyme: kɔnɔnango; antonyme: kɔnɔnandi.
29/01/2026 458

kɔnɔnanjugu kɔnɔnata
kɔnɔnanjugu [ɔ́] Emprunt de : kɔnɔ-nan-jugu. kɔnɔnaseleke synonyme: koorikɔnɔseleke. Nom.
Nom. 1 • mal intentionné, mauvais, méchant; angle intérieur; interior angle; Innenwinkel.
ill-intentioned, bad, wicked; böswillig, Category: Mathematics.
schlecht, böse. Ni i ma kɛ mɔgɔ kɔnɔnanjugu kɔnɔnasu [ɔ́] Morphemes: kɔnɔ-na-su.
ye... Si tu n'est pas quelqu'un de mal
variante: kɔnɔnasuguri, kɔnɔsu. vt. inciter,
intentionné... If you are not someone with bad
provoquer, influencer en mal, détourner du
intentions... Wenn Sie nicht jemand mit
droit chemin; incite, provoke, influence for
schlechten Absichten sind ...
evil, deviate from the right path; anregen,
synonyme: kɔnɔnajugu, kɔnɔnango;
anreizen, aufhetzen, provozieren, zum Bösen
antonyme: kɔnɔnandi. beeinflussen, vom rechten Weg abbringen.
2 • foncièrement méchant, qui aime à faire le Kana Musa kɔnɔnasu ka a kɛ n kan ! Ne va
mal, fourbe; fundamentally evil, who likes to pas exciter Moussa contre moi ! Don't go
do evil, deceitful; grundsätzlich böse, der turning Moussa against me! Bring Moussa
gerne Böses tut, betrügerisch. nicht gegen mich auf!
kɔnɔnanjuguya [ɔ́] Verbe. 1 • être ou rendre synonyme: kɔnɔnasuruku.
méchant; to be or make evil; böse sein oder kɔnɔnasukolen
machen. Ŋana tanunbaliya bɛ ŋana [ɔ́] Morphemes: kɔnɔ-na-su-ko-len. Nom.
kɔnɔnanjuguya. Ne pas louer le héros finit 1 • indécis, velléitaire, pas très éveillé;
par le rendre mauvais. (proverbe). Not indecisive, weak-willed, not very alert;
praising the hero ends up making him bad. unentschlossen, willensschwach, nicht sehr
(proverb). Den Helden nicht zu loben, macht wachsam.
ihn letztendlich schlecht. (Sprichwort). 2 • lent à comprendre, étourdi; slow to
2 • méchanceté foncière; fundamental understand, dizzy; langsam zu verstehen,
wickedness; grundsätzliche Bosheit. schwindelig.
3 • mauvaise volonté; bad will; böser Wille. 3 • perfide, dissimulé; treacherous, concealed;
Yɛrɛɲiniboli ni kɔnɔnanjuguya tɛ bɛn. heimtückisch, verborgen.
Quand on fuit pour sauver sa tête, on n'y met kɔnɔnasukolenya
pas de la mauvaise volonté. (proverbe). When
[ɔ́] Morphemes: kɔnɔ-na-su-ko-len-ya.
you flee to save your head, you don't put bad
will into it. (proverb). Wenn du fliehst, um Nom. 1 • lenteur de compréhension; slow
understanding; langsames Verständnis.
deinen Kopf zu retten, hegst du keinen bösen
Willen. (Sprichwort). 2 • perfidie, dissimulation; perfidy,
dissimulation, concealment; Perfidie,
kɔnɔnanko [ɔ́] Morphemes: kɔnɔ-nan-ko. Nom.
Verstellung, Vertuschung.
1 • pensée; thought, thinking; Gedanke. Mɔgɔ
kɔnɔnasuruku [ɔ́] Morphemes: kɔnɔ-na-suruku.
bɛ se ka mɔgɔ minɛ a dalakuma na, nka i tɛ
variante: kɔnɔsuruku. 1 • Verbe. pousser à,
se ka a minɛ a kɔnɔnanko ma. On peut saisir
exciter à; to push to, arouse, incite, stimulate;
quelqu'un par sa parole, mais non par sa
anregen, anstacheln, aufstacheln zu.
pensée. We can grasp someone by their words,
kɔnɔnasurukubaga le tentateur. the tempter.
but not by their thoughts. Wir können
jemanden anhand seiner Worte erfassen, nicht der Versucher. synonyme: suguri 2 , kɔnɔnasu.
jedoch anhand seiner Gedanken. 2 • Nom. influence, instigation; influence,
synonyme: miirili, kɔnɔnafɛn, kɔnɔnako. instigation; Einfluß, Veranlassung,
2 • inspiration; inspiration; Inspiration. Anstiftung. Kɔnɔnasurukuw ni hakilisoɲɛw
kɔlɔsira. Des instigations et des tromperies ont
kɔnɔnantumun
été constatées. Instigations and deceptions
[ɔ]́ Morphemes: kɔnɔ-nan-tumun. Nom. vers
have been noted. Es wurden Anstiftungen
intestinaux; intestinal worms; Darmwürmer. und Täuschungen festgestellt.
Category: Small animals.
kɔnɔnata [ɔ́-ɔ́-á-á] Morphemes: kɔnɔ-na-ta.
kɔnɔnaŋɛ Nom. cadran (d'une montre); clock face, dial
synonyme: kɔnɔnafɛn. Nom. 1 • table des
(of a watch); Zifferblatt (Uhr).
matières, contenu; table of content, content;
synonyme: mɔntɔrɔɲa.
Inhaltsverzeichnis, Inhalt. synonyme: kɔnɔta.
kɔnɔnasariya Nom. règlement intérieur; by-laws,
house rules, rules of the house, interior rules,
rules and regulations; Hausordnung,
Geschäftsordnung.
29/01/2026 459

kɔnɔnatumu kɔnɔɲama
2 • opinion, avis personnel, sentiment; opinion, kɔnɔninnpegu Morphemes: kɔnɔ-nin-npegu.
personal opinion, sentiment; Meinung,
variante: kɔɔninnpegu. Nom. raisins sauvages;
Ansicht, persönliche Meinung, Gefühl. E
wild grapes; wilde Trauben. pseudospondias
kɔnɔnata ye jumɛn ye ? Quelle est ton
microcarpa; lannea microcarpa; lannea
opinion ? What is your opinion? Was ist deine velutina.
Meinung? A y'a kɔnɔnata fɔ ne ye. Il m'a dit
kɔnɔninsyɔ [ɔ̀-ɔ̀-ì] Jula: kɔnɔninsiyɔ.
son avis personnel. He told me his personal
opinion. Er hat mir seine persönliche Meinung Morphemes: kɔnɔ-nin-syɔ. Nom. espèce de
gesagt. plante; kind of plant; Pflanze (Art).
Category: Grass, herb, vine. cassia
kɔnɔnatumu
mimosoides.
[ɔ-́ ɔ́-á-ú-ú] synonyme: kɔnɔbalatumunin.
kɔnɔnintuluma Morphemes: kɔnɔ-nin-tulu-ma.
variante: kɔnɔnatumunin. ténia, vers
Nom. sarcelle d'été, petit canard sauvage;
intestinales; tapeworm, intestinal worms;
garganey duck, little wild duck; Knäkente,
Bandwurm, Würmer. Category: Small
kleine Wildente. Category: Bird. anas
animals. synonyme: nsɛbɛrɛ, kaliyakisɛ.
querquedula. synonyme: ntugu, tulumanin.
kɔnɔnatumunin Nom. ténia; tapeworm; Bandwurm.
kɔnɔnkisɛ [ɔ̀-ɔ̀] Morphemes: kɔnɔn-kisɛ. Nom.
Category: Small animals.
perle; pearl; Perle. kɔnɔnkisɛ kunbaba
synonyme: kaliyakisɛ, nsɛbɛrɛ.
d'énormes perles. huge pearls. riesige Perlen.
kɔnɔnin [ɔ̀-ɔ̀-ĩ́] synonyme: kɔnɔ. Nom. oiseau; bird; synonyme: kɔnɔn, kɛmɛkɔnɔn.
1
Vogel. Category: Bird.
kɔnɔntɔn [ɔ̀-ɔ̀-ɔ ́] variante: kɔnɔntɔ. num. neuf (9);
kɔnɔninbin [ɔ̀-ɔ̀-ì] Morphemes: kɔnɔ-nin-bin.
nine (9); neun, 9. I bɛ kɔnɔntɔn dɔn, ne bɛ
Nom. riz sauvage; wild rice; Wildreis. tan dɔn. Tu as beau en connaître neuf, moi j'en
Category: Grass, herb, vine. oryza barthii;
connais dix. (proverbe). You may know nine,
brachiara stigmatisata; sporobolus festivus;
but I know ten. (proverb). Sie kennen vielleicht
digitaria lecardii; eragrotis pilosa.
neun, aber ich kenne zehn. (Sprichwort).
synonyme: malosina.
kɔnɔntɔnnan
kɔnɔninfin [ɔ̀-ɔ̀-ì-í] Morphemes: kɔnɔ-nin-fin.
[ɔ̀-ɔ̀-ɔ̀-á] Morphemes: kɔnɔntɔn-nan. adj.
Nom. espèce d'oiseau; kind of bird; Vogelart.
neuvième; ninth; neunte, neunter. Olu ye si
Category: Bird. vidua chalybeata.
kɔnɔntɔnnan ye. Ils constituent la neuvième
kɔnɔninjɛ [ɔ̀-ɔ̀-ì-ɛ́] Jula: kɔnɔningwɛ.
génération. They constitute the ninth
Morphemes: kɔnɔ-nin-jɛ. Nom. espèce generation. Sie bilden die neunte Generation.
d’oiseau, aigrette garzette; kind of bird, little
kɔnɔnugu [ɔ́] Morphemes: kɔnɔ-nugu. Nom.
Egret; Vogelart, Seidenreiher. Category: Bird.
egretta garzetta. synonyme: nkunanjɛ,
intestin; intestine; Eingeweide, Gedärm.
synonyme: nugu .
bosonkunanjɛ. 1
kɔnɔnugutigɛ [ɔ́] Morphemes: kɔnɔ-nugu-tigɛ.
kɔnɔninkadɔlɔ Morphemes: kɔnɔ-nin-ka-dɔlɔ.
1
Nom. 1 • douleur intestinale; intestinal pains;
Nom. espèce de plante; kind of plant; Pflanze
Bauchweh, Bauchschmerzen. Kɔnɔnugutigɛ
(Art). Category: Grass, herb, vine. nelsonia
canescens; nelsonia campestris. y'a minɛ. Des maux de ventre la saisirent.
Stomach aches seized her. Magenschmerzen
kɔnɔninkadɔlɔ Morphemes: kɔnɔ-nin-ka-dɔlɔ.
2 packten sie. Category: Disease.
Nom. espèce de plante; kind of plant; Pflanze
2 • colique; colic; Kolik.
(Art). Category: Grass, herb, vine. spilanthes
sp. kɔnɔɲama [ɔ̀-ɔ̀] Morphemes: kɔnɔ-ɲama. Nom.
kɔnɔninkafinin Morphemes: kɔnɔ-nin-ka-finin.
accès pernicieux du paludisme, tétanos
ombilical; pernicious attack of malaria,
Nom. espèce d'herbe; kind of grass; Grasart.
umbilical tetanus; bösartiger Anfall von
Category: Grass, herb, vine. digitaria
Malaria, Nabelschnur-Tetanus. Ni jaŋɔyi y'a
argillacea; sporobolus festivus.
minɛ, ni dɔw k'a ma kɔnɔɲama... Quand elle
kɔnɔninkakɔgɔ Morphemes: kɔnɔ-nin-ka-kɔgɔ.
fut pris de tétanos, que certains appellent
Nom. plante rampante (espèce de); creeping kɔnɔɲama... When she was taken by tetanus,
plant (kind of); kriechende Pflanze (eine Art). which some call kɔnɔɲama... Als sie an
evolvulus alsinoides. Tetanus erkrankte, was manche als kɔnɔɲama
bezeichnen ... Category: Disease.
29/01/2026 460

kɔnɔɲɛ kɔnɔtiɲɛ
kɔnɔɲɛ [ɔ]́ Morphemes: kɔnɔ-ɲɛ. Nom. portée, kɔnɔsutɔmɔnkan
grossesse, enfant; pregnancy, child; Geburt, Morphemes: kɔnɔ-su-tɔmɔn-kan. Nom.
Schwangerschaft, Kind. Nin ye ne kɔnɔɲɛ paroles insensées, paroles invérifiables; foolish
naaninan ye. C'est mon quatrième enfant. words, unverifiable words; dumme Worte,
This is my fourth child. Das ist mein viertes nicht überprüfbare Worte. Kana n tɔɔrɔ ni i ka
Kind. synonyme: kɔnɔya. kɔnɔsutɔmɔnkan ye. Ne m'ennuie pas avec
kɔnɔɲɛfɔlɔden [ɔ́] Morphemes: kɔnɔ-ɲɛ-fɔlɔ-den.
tes paroles insensées. Don't bore me with your
foolish words. Langweile mich nicht mit
Nom. premier-né, premier enfant; first born,
deinen dummen Worten.
first child; Erstgeborene, erstes Kind.
synonyme: kaalokaalo.
Npogotigi caman ka kɔnɔɲɛfɔlɔden tɛ wolo
u cɛla la. Beaucoup de jeunes filles n'ont pas kɔnɔta [ɔ́-ɔ́-á] Nom. opinion, idée, sentiment;
leur premier enfant chez leur mari. Many opinion, idea, feeling; Meinung, Idee. Ni
young girls do not have their first child with fasojɔkuma nana, bɛɛ k'i kɔnɔta fɔ. Quand il
their husband. Viele junge Mädchen y a un débat concernant la construction de la
bekommen ihr erstes Kind nicht mit ihrem patrie, chacun a le devoir de dire ce qu'il pense.
Mann. (proverbe). When there is a debate concerning
kɔnɔrɔ [ɔ-́ ɔ́-ɔ́] Morphemes: kɔ-nɔrɔ. Nom. suffixe; the construction of the homeland, everyone
has the duty to say what they think. (proverb).
suffix; Suffix, Nachsilbe. wale kɔnɔrɔ suffixe
Wenn es um den Aufbau des Heimatlandes
verbal. verbal suffix. Verbsuffix. tɔgɔ kɔnɔrɔ
geht, hat jeder die Pflicht, seine Meinung zu
suffixe nominal. nominal suffix. Nomen äußern. (Sprichwort). synonyme: miiriya,
Suffix. Daɲɛ minnu dilannen bɛ ni daɲɛ ni
hakilinan, hakililata, fɛta, ɲumana,
kɔnɔrɔ ye, a bɛ fɔ olu ma «bɔnna». Les mots
kɔnɔnata.
qui sont construits d'un mot plus un suffixe, on
les appelle des dérivés. Words that are kɔnɔtabalifura kunuta expr. contraceptif oral;
constructed of a word plus a suffix are called oral contraceptive; orales
derivatives. Wörter, die aus einem Wort plus Empfängnisverhütungsmittel.
einem Suffix aufgebaut sind, werden als
kɔnɔtabaliya [ɔ́] Morphemes: kɔnɔ-ta-bali-ya.
Derivate bezeichnet. Category: Grammar.
Nom. stérilité féminine; female sterility;
kɔnɔsenkalajan Nom. oiseau échassier; stilt; weibliche Unfruchtbarkeit. ... ka fɛɛrɛw ɲini
Stelzenläufer, Sumpfvogel, Stelzvogel. musow ka kɔnɔtabaliya la. ... chercher des
Category: Bird.
remèdes à la stérilité des femmes. ... to seek
kɔnɔsiya variante: kɔnɔsi. Nom. espèce d'oiseau; remedies for women’s infertility. ... Heilmittel
species of bird, kinds of birds; Vogelarten. für die Unfruchtbarkeit der Frauen suchen.
Category: Bird. kɔnɔtigɛ [ɔ́] Morphemes: kɔnɔ-tigɛ.
kɔnɔsogolon [ɔ̀-ɔ́-ò-ò-ṍ] variante: kɔnɔsogonti. variante: kɔnɔwalaki. Nom. douleurs
Nom. autruche; ostrich; Strauss. Category: Bird. abdominales brusques; sudden abdominal
synonyme: kɔnɔsogonin. pain; plötzliche Bauchschmerzen.
Category: Disease. synonyme: kɔnɔdimin.
kɔnɔsogonin Morphemes: kɔnɔ-sogo-nin.
variante: kɔnɔsogonti. Nom. autruche; ostrich; kɔnɔtiɲɛ [ɔ́] Morphemes: kɔnɔ-tiɲɛ. Nom.
Strauss. Category: Bird. struthio camelus. avortement, fausse couche; abortion,
synonyme: kɔnɔsogolon. miscarriage; Abreibung,
Schwangerschaftsunterbruch, Fehlgeburt.
kɔnɔsuma [ɔ́] Morphemes: kɔnɔ-suma. 1 • Verbe. Kɔnɔtiɲɛw ka ca muso la, minnu balolen tɛ
calmer, apaiser; calm down, ease, appease; ka ɲɛ. Les fausses couches sont fréquentes
beruhigen, mildern, lindern, beschwichtigen.
chez les femmes mal nourries. Miscarriages
synonyme: mala 1 , lafiɲɛbɔ, lafiɲɛbɔ. are common among malnourished women.
2 • Nom. calme, apaisement; calm, Fehlgeburten treten häufig bei unterernährten
appeasement; Ruhe, Beruhigung, Frauen auf. synonyme: kɔnɔwolowolo,
Besänftigung. Jamana ma kɔnɔsuma fewu ! kɔnɔbɔ, kɔnɔburun, kɔnɔjabi, kɔnɔcɛn,
1
Le pays n'a pas retrouvé du tout le calme. The kɔnɔcɛn, kɔnɔlagosi.
country has not regained calm at all. Das Land
ist überhaupt nicht zur Ruhe gekommen.
29/01/2026 461

kɔnɔtɔn kɔɲɛ
kɔnɔtɔn [ɔ́-ɔ́-ɔ́] Morphemes: kɔnɔ-tɔn. Nom. kɔnpilɛ Nom. tailleur; woman's suit; Damenkostüm,
gonflement du ventre, ballonnement du ventre Jackenkleid.
généralement accompagné de constipation;
kɔnseye Emprunt de : français. Nom. conseiller;
swelling of belly, belly bloating usually
counsellor, adviser, consultant; Berater.
accompanied by constipation; Blähungen,,
Blähungen im Bauch gehen meist mit Category: Government. synonyme: laadibaga,
Verstopfung einher. Syɔ ye kɔnɔtɔn bila a kɛrɛfɛsigi, laadilikɛla.
la... Les haricots lui ont donné des kɔnsɔgɔ variante: gɔnsɔgɔ, gɔnsɔrɔ. Nom. 1 • cuillère,
ballonnements... The beans gave her petite louche; spoon, small ladle; Löffel,
bloating... Die Bohnen verursachten ihr kleine Schöpfkelle. Category: Tool.
Blähungen... Category: Disease.
2 • petite calebasse à manche; small calabash
kɔnɔw Nom. volaille; poultry, fowls; Geflügel, with handle; kleine Kalebasse mit Griff. ka
Federvieh. Category: Animal husbandry. seri soli ni kɔnsɔgɔ ye prendre de la bouille
synonyme: sululaka. avec une calebasse à manche. take porridge
kɔnɔwara [ɔ̀-ɔ̀-à-á] Morphemes: kɔnɔ-wara. Nom.
with a handled calabash. mit einer Kalebasse
Hirsebrei nehmen.
1 • chauve-souris; bat; Fledermaus. centropus
senegalensis. synonyme: toolen, tonso. kɔntaba [ɔ̀] Nom. casse-ailée, dartrier; Candle Bush or
3 1
Ringworm Bush; Pflanzenart, Kerzenstrauch.
2 • coucal du Sénégal; Senegal coucal;
Spornkuckuck. centropus senegalensis.
Category: Bush, shrub. cassia alata.
synonyme: baɲandi, bakɛ, ɲamatutu. kɔntabulu Emprunt de : français. Nom. comptable;
Kɔnɔwari n.pro. Côte d’Ivoire; Ivory Coast; accountant; Buchhalter. Category: Person.
Elfenbeinküste. Category: Country. kɔntenɛritabato Emprunt de : français. Nom. cargo
kɔnɔwolo Nom. diaphragme; diaphragm; Membran. porte-conteneurs; container ship, container
freighter; Frachtschiff, Fracht- oder
Category: Body. synonyme: sɔnnabiri,
Containerschiff.
tantandatugu, disidanfara, kɔnɔdatugu.
kɔntɛri Emprunt de : français. Nom. compteur; meter;
kɔnɔwolowolo variante: kɔnɔwɔlɔwɔlɔ. Nom. Zähler, Stromzähler. Category: Household
avortement, fausse couche; abortion, equipment.
miscarriage; Abtreibung, Fehlgeburt.
kɔntɔrɔn [ɔ́] Nom. 1 • autel des chasseurs; altar of
synonyme: kɔnɔlagosi, kɔnɔtiɲɛ, kɔnɔburun, 1
hunters; Altar der Jäger. Category: Religion.
kɔnɔcɛn, kɔnɔbɔ, kɔnɔjabi.
1
2 • génie protecteur (mâle) des chasseurs;
kɔnɔya [ɔ]́ Morphemes: kɔnɔ-ya. Nom. portée, protective genius (male) of hunters;
grossesse; pregnancy; Geburt, Schutzgenie (männlich) der Jäger.
Schwangerschaft. misi kɔnɔya fɔlɔ la kɔntɔrɔn [ɔ́] Morphemes: kɔn-tɔrɔn. Nom. sabot
2
première portée de la vache. the first litter of arrière; rear hoof; Hinterhuf.
the cow. das erste Kalb der Kuh. I kɔnɔya
kɔntɔrɔnmabɔ Morphemes: kɔn-tɔrɔn-ma-bɔ.
jolinan don ? Cette grossesse-ci est ta
variante: kɔtɛrɛmabɔ, kɔtɔrɔmabɔ. Verbe.
quatrième ? Is this your fourth pregnancy? Ist
das Ihre vierte Schwangerschaft?
reculer, marcher en arrière; go back, walk
synonyme: kɔnɔɲɛ.
backwards; rückwärts gehen. Suruku y'i
terunterun k'i kɔntɔrɔnmabɔ k'i jɔ...
kɔnɔyaalabaga Nom. avifaune migratrice; migratory
L'hyène pas a pas recula et s'arrêta... The hyena
bird-life; Zugvogelwelt. Category: Bird. stepped back and stopped... Die Hyäne trat
kɔnɔyaalabali Nom. avifaune sédentaire; resident zurück und blieb stehen .. synonyme: tɔtɔma.
birds; sesshafte Vögel. Category: Bird. kɔnze Emprunt de : français. Nom. congé; vacation,
kɔnɔyɛlɛma [ɔ́] Morphemes: kɔnɔ-yɛlɛma. Nom. holiday; Urlaub, Ferien.
huitième mois de la grossesse (où l'enfant kɔnzelatɛri Emprunt de : français. Nom. congélateur;
change de position); eighth month of
freezer; Tiefkühlschrank.
pregnancy (where the child changes position);
Category: Household equipment.
achter Schwangerschaftsmonat
(Positionswechsel des Kindes). kɔɲɛ [ɔ̀] Morphemes: kɔ-ɲɛ. Nom. source; fountain,
kɔnpɛrɛsijonin Nom. compresse stérilisée; sterilized source, spring; Quelle. U taara ji ta kɔɲɛ la.
compress; sterile Kompresse. Category: Treat
Elles sont allées prendre de l'eau à la source.
disease.
They went to get water from the spring. Sie
holten Wasser aus der Quelle. Category: Water.
29/01/2026 462

kɔɲinɛ kɔɲɔna
kɔɲinɛ [ɔ-̀ í-á] Jula: kɔɲinan. Morphemes: kɔ-ɲinɛ. kɔɲɔda Nom. noce, lieu de noce; wedding, place of
synonyme: kansole. variante: kɔɲina, kɔɲinɛ. wedding; Hochzeit, Ort der Hochzeit. N'u
Nom. aulacode, agouti, castor; grass cutter, nana woro tigɛ, u ye kɔɲɔda labɛn. Quand
beaver, ground hog, cane rat, greater cane les colas furent données, on prépara la noce.
rat; Ratte (Art), Große Rohrratte. Tankɔn When the cola-nuts were given, the wedding
kuntora kɔɲinɛbinjeni na. Le feu a été mis was prepared. Als die Kolanüsse gegeben
aux herbes pour chasser les rats de marigots et wurden, wurde die Hochzeit vorbereitet.
l'antilope bubale en a été la victime. kɔɲɔden [ɔ́] Morphemes: kɔɲɔ-den. Nom. invité
(proverbe). Grass was set on fire to drive away
participant à la noce; invited guest
swamp rats and the hartebeest antelope was
participating in the mirage ceremony;
the victim. (proverb). Um Sumpfratten zu
eingeladener Gast, der am Hochzeitsfest
vertreiben, wurde Gras angezündet und die
teilnimmt. A ka kɔɲɔdenw natuma ma
Kuhantilope wurde zum Opfer. (Sprichwort).
Category: Mammal. thryonomys swinderianus. mɛɛn. Ses invités pour le mariage sont venus il
n'y a pas longtemps. His wedding guests came
kɔɲɔ comparer: furusiri.[ɔ́-ɔ́] Nom. noce, cérémonie
not long ago. Seine Hochzeitsgäste kamen vor
de mariage; marriage ceremony; nicht allzu langer Zeit.
Hochzeitsfest. O kɔɲɔ nana kɛ... O n célébra
kɔɲɔkɛ Jula: kɔɲɔcɛ. Morphemes: kɔɲɔ-kɛ. Nom. jeune
la noce... We celebrated the wedding... Wir
haben die Hochzeit gefeiert... Dans le passé,
marié; bridegroom; jung verheirateter Mann,
Gatte, Bräutigam. Kɔɲɔkɛ yo, ɲinan diyara i
dans une cérémonie traditionnelle, les vieilles
lavent la tête de la mariée et l’emmènent à la la. O marié ! cette année-ci t'est bien
chambre nuptiale. Après avoir consommé le favorable ! O bridegroom ! this year is very
mariage, le mari sort et déclare à tout le monde favourable to you! O Bräutigam! ist dieses
s’il a trouvé qu’elle était vierge. In the past, in Jahr sehr günstig für dich!
a traditional marriage ceremony, the older
kɔɲɔkɔrɔwulunin
women would wash the head of the bride and
take her to the bridal bedroom. After she and [ɔ́] Morphemes: kɔɲɔ-kɔrɔ-wulu-nin.
her husband have consummated the marriage, variante: kɔɲɔwulunin. Nom. fillette qui aide la
the husband declares to the waiting family nouvelle mariée aux travaux du ménage; girl
whether or not he found her to be a virgin. helping the bride with housework; Mädchen,
kɔɲɔbɛnna [ɔ́] Morphemes: kɔɲɔ-bɛn-na. das der Braut bei den Hausarbeiten hilft,
Magd.
variante: kɔɲɔkunbɛnna. Nom. personne qui
kɔɲɔminɛn Nom. trousseau (de la mariée); trousseau
accompagne le cortège nuptial, membre de la
famille du mari qui vient accueillir la mariée à (of the bride); Aussteuer (der Braut).
son arrivée dans le village du marié; person Kɔɲɔminɛn mana ɲun, o bɛ da. Si les
who accompanies the wedding procession, affaires de la noce se chargent, elles se
member of the husband's family who comes to déchargent aussi. (proverbe). If the wedding
welcome the bride upon her arrival in the affairs are loaded, they are also unloaded.
groom's village; Person, die den Hochzeitszug (proverb). Wenn die
begleitet, Mitglied der Familie des Mannes, Hochzeitsangelegenheiten aufgeladen werden,
das die Braut bei ihrer Ankunft im Dorf des werden sie auch wieder abgeladen.
Bräutigams begrüßt. (Sprichwort).
kɔɲɔbɔ n.comp. 1 • sortie de la mariée; the coming out kɔɲɔmuso [ɔ́] Morphemes: kɔɲɔ-muso. Nom.
of the bride; das Herauskommen der Braut. nouvelle mariée, mariée, nouvelle épouse;
2 • doter (cadeaux offerts à la mariée par ses bride; Braut, neuvermählte Frau.
père et mère); give the dowry, gifts given by the kɔɲɔmusokofu
bride's father and mother; den Brautpreis
[ɔ́] Morphemes: kɔɲɔ-muso-ko-fu. Nom.
geben, Geschenke an die Braut ihres Vaters
und Mutter. A y'a denmusonin kelen kɔɲɔbɔ espèce de plant, éponge végétale; kind of plant,
vegetable sponge,, loofah; Pflanzenart,
ka a kɛ fisifasa ! Il a doté très
Pflanzenschwamm. Category: Grass, herb,
somptueusement sa fille unique ! He has
vine. luffa aegyptiaca.
sumptuously endowed his only daughter! Er
hat seine einzige Tochter sehr prächtig kɔɲɔna [ɔ́] Morphemes: kɔɲɔ-na. Nom. participant
ausgestattet! d'une noce; wedding participant; Teilnehmer
kɔɲɔcɛ [ɔ-́ ɔ́-ɛ́] Morphemes: kɔɲɔ-cɛ.
einer Hochzeitsfeier.
variante: kɔɲɔkɛ. Nom. nouveau marié; newly
married husband; frisch verheirateter Mann.
29/01/2026 463

kɔɲɔsɛɛnsɛn kɔɔmuso
kɔɲɔsɛɛnsɛn [ɔ́] Morphemes: kɔɲɔ-sɛɛnsɛn. kɔɔlɔ [ɔ̀] Nom. galet donnant de l'ocre rouge; pebble
1
1 • Nom. cortège nuptial; wedding procession; giving red ocher; Kieselstein, der roten Ocker
Hochzeitszug. Kɔɲɔsɛɛnsɛn bɛ kɛ kɔɲɔdon ergibt.
su, musow bɛ kuyu ni dɔnkili da. L'escorte kɔɔlɔ [ɔ̀] Nom. poisson (espèce); African
2
de la mariée se fait la nuit qui précède le jour Characidae; Nilfisch. Category: Fish. alestes
du mariage, les femmes crient et chantent. The macrolepidotus; brycinus macrolepidotus.
bride's escort takes place the night before the
wedding day, the women shout and sing. Die
kɔɔlɔ
3
[ɔ̀] Nom. étamines, inflorescences, fleur du mil
Brautbegleitung findet am Abend vor dem et de certaines herbes; stamens, inflorescences,
Hochzeitstag statt, die Frauen schreien und flowers of millet and certain herbs;
singen. Staubblätter, Blütenstände, Hirseblüten und
2 • Verbe. accompagner une mariée; bestimmte Kräuter. Fiɲɛ ye ɲɔ kɔɔlɔ bɔ ka
accompany a bride; eine Braut begleiten. ban. Le vent a déjà enlevé les fleurs du mil.
kɔɲɔso [ɔ́] Morphemes: kɔɲɔ-so. Nom. chambre de The wind has already removed the flowers of
the millet. Der Wind hat die Blüten der Hirse
mariage, chambre nuptiale; marriage
bereits entfernt. binkɔɔlɔ inflorescences des
chamber; Hochzeitskammer.
herbes. herb inflorescences / inflorescences of
kɔɲɔya [ɔ-́ ɔ́-á] synonyme: Ala m'a kɛra furu ye.. the herbs. Kräuterblütenstände / Blütenstände
Nom. manifestations pour le mariage; der Kräuter. Category: Parts of a plant.
manifestations for wedding; Heiratsereignisse.
kɔɔlɔ [ɔ̀] Nom. maladie infantile, suite de maladie,
A ni kɔɲɔya. Heureux mariage (salutation). 4
séquelle de maladie; childhood illness,
Happy marriage (Greeting). Frohe Hochzeit
after-effects of illness; Kinderkrankheit, Folge
(Gruss).
einer Krankheit, Nachwirkungen. Bana in
kɔɲuman [ɔ́] Morphemes: kɔ-ɲuman. Nom. endroit, banna ka a tɔ to kɔɔlɔ ye. Il a guéri de cette
bon côté; place, good side; Platz, gute Seite. a maladie mais il lui reste des séquelles. He
kɔɲuman kan à l'endroit. in the place. im Ort. recovered from this illness but still has
after-effects. Krankheit erholt, hat aber immer
kɔɲume variante: kɔkisa. Nom. espèce d'arbre, kisa
noch Nachwirkungen. Category: Disease.
d'eau; kind of tree, evergreen tree; Baumart,
Wasserbirne. Category: Tree. syzygium
kɔɔlɔ
5
[ɔ́] Nom. rizière; rice field; Reisfeld. A taara a
guineense. ka kɔɔlɔ la. Il est allé à sa rizière. He went to
kɔɔ [ɔ]́ bambara: kɔ. Nom. dos; back; Rücken.
his rice field. Er ging zu seinem Reisfeld.
1
Category: Agriculture.
Category: Body. synonyme: kɔ.
2
kɔɔmuso [ɔ̀] Morphemes: kɔɔ-muso.
kɔɔ [ɔɔ̀ ́] bambara: kɔ. variante: kɔ. Nom. rivière,
2 variante: kɔɔso, kɔrɔmuso. Nom. sœur aînée
ruisseau, marigot; river, stream; Fluss, Bach.
(terme d'adresse pour une aînée); older sister
Category: Water. synonyme: kɔ.
3 (term of address for an elder lady); ältere
kɔɔ [ɔ]́ variante: kɔ. Nom. 1 • dos, arrière, derrière, Schwester (Anrede an eine ältere Frau). N tɛ n
3
extérieur; back, rear, behind, exterior; cɛ fɛ, o ye tiɲɛ, nka kɔɔmuso t'a ta fɛ, o ye
Rücken, Rückseite, Aussenseite. ɲɛdon ye kɔɔmuso la. On peut dire qu'on
Category: Body. n'aime pas son mari, mais si l'on prétend que sa
2 • descendance, parents, famille; descendants, sœur aînée n'aime pas le sien, on lui manque de
relatives, family; Nachkommen, Verwandte, respect. (proverbe). You can say that you don't
Familienmitglieder. love your husband, but if you say that your
kɔɔ donni Nom. contraire; contrary; Gegenteil.
older sister doesn't love hers, you're
disrespecting her. (proverb). Sie können
kɔɔ donnin [ɔ́ õ̀-ĩ́] Nom. antonyme; antonym; sagen, daß Sie Ihren Mann nicht lieben, aber
Antonym. Category: Grammar.
wenn Sie sagen, daß Ihre ältere Schwester
ihren Mann nicht liebt, respektieren Sie sie
kɔɔkɛ [ɔ]̀ Morphemes: kɔɔ-kɛ. variante: kɔrɔkɛ. nicht. (Sprichwort).
Nom. 1 • frère aîné, grand frère; older brother,
big brother; älterer Bruder, großer Bruder.
Dɔgɔninw ko kɔɔkɛ o ye jumɛn ye ? Les
cadets dirent : «Grand frère, de quoi
s'agit-il ?». The cadets said, “Big brother,
what is this?” Die jüngeren Brüder sagten:
„Großer Bruder, um was geht es?“.
2 • mari; husband; Ehemann.
29/01/2026 464

kɔɔnkɔn kɔrada
kɔɔnkɔn [ɔ́] Nom. silure, poisson-chat; catfish; Wels. kɔɔrikolobɔmasin
Mɔgɔ bɛ i kɔɔnkɔnninbɔɔsi ni i ma i [ɔ́] Morphemes: kɔɔri-kolo-bɔ-masin. Nom.
ntɛbɛnfirifiri. On peut se retirer comme une machine à décortiquer le coton; cotton hulling
silure, sans le faire comme un tilapia. machine; Baumwollschälmaschine.
(proverbe). You can retreat like a catfish, Category: Machine.
without doing so like a tilapia. (proverb). Sie kɔɔrimugu [ɔ́] Morphemes: kɔɔri-mugu. Nom.
können sich wie ein Wels zurückziehen, ohne
coton, ouate; cotton fibres; Baumwollfaser,
dies wie ein Tilapia zu tun. (Sprichwort).
Watte.
Category: Fish. synodontis. synonyme: kɔnkɔn.
2
kɔɔrimugukala Nom. coton-tige; cotton-bud;
kɔɔnkɔnbilen [ɔ́] Morphemes: kɔɔnkɔn-bilen.
Wattenstäbchen. Category: Tool.
Nom. poisson-chat rouge; red catfish; Roter
Wels. Category: Fish. synodontis
kɔɔrinin synonyme: bamanakɔɔri. Nom. espèce de
vermiculatus. synonyme: mugukɔɔnkɔn. plante; kind of plant; Pflanze (Art).
Category: Grass, herb, vine. gossypium
kɔɔnkɔnfin [ɔ́] Morphemes: kɔɔnkɔn-fin. Nom. hirsutum.
poisson-chat noir; black catfish; schwarzer
kɔɔrintɔn [ɔ́] Morphemes: kɔɔri-ntɔn. Nom. criquet
Wels. Category: Fish. synodontis nigrita.
synonyme: mugukɔɔnkɔn.
du coton; cotton locust;
Baumwollheuschrecke. Category: Insect.
kɔɔnkɔnjɛ [ɔ́] Morphemes: kɔɔnkɔn-jɛ. Nom.
kɔɔriparakɔnɔnin
poisson-chat blanc; white catfish; weißer
[ɔ́] Morphemes: kɔɔri-para-kɔnɔ-nin. Nom.
Wels. Category: Fish. synodontis batensoda;
brachy-synodontis batensoda.
cochevis huppé; crested lark; Haubenlerche.
Category: Bird. galerida cristata.
kɔɔnkɔnkalakalalen
kɔɔrisɛnɛla Morphemes: kɔɔri-sɛnɛ-la. Nom.
Morphemes: kɔɔnkɔn-kalakalalen. Nom.
producteur de coton; cotton grower;
poisson-chat bariolé; colorful catfish; bunter
Baumwollanbauer.
Wels. Category: Fish. synodontis ocellifer.
synonyme: mugukɔɔnkɔn. kɔɔsikɔɔsi [ɔ́] Adverbe. d'une lenteur maladive,
faiblement (pour une démarche), de mauvaise
kɔɔnkɔnnin [ɔ́] Morphemes: kɔɔnkɔn-nin. Nom.
grâce; morbidly slow, weakly (for a gait),
silure; mudfish, air-breathing catfish; with bad grace; krankhaft langsam, schwach
Aalraubwels, Raubwels. Category: Fish. (für einen Gang), mit schlechter Anmut.
clarias anguillaris.
baganw kɔɔsikɔɔsitɔ des animaux en train de
kɔɔri [ɔ-́ í] Nom. coton; cotton; Baumwolle. ka kɔɔri marcher difficilement. animals walking with
1
sɛnɛ cultiver du coton. grow cotton. difficulty. Tiere, die schwerfällig und
Baumwolle anbauen. Category: Grass, herb,
mühevoll laufen.
vine. Gossypium hirsutum. kɔɔso [ɔ̀] Nom. sœur aînée (terme utilisé vis-à-vis
kɔɔri [ɔ-́ í] Nom. cotonnier; cotton plant; d'une aînée); elder sister (term used for elder);
2
Baumwollpflanze. Category: Grass, herb,
ältere Schwester (Anrede für eine ältere Frau).
vine. gossypium barbadense.
synonyme: kɔrɔmuso.
kɔɔriba Nom. espèce de plante; kind of plant; Pflanze kɔɔsɔ [ɔ̀] variante: kɔɔsi. Nom. crasse des mains et
(Art). Category: Grass, herb, vine. gossypium des pieds; dirt on hands and feet; Schmutz an
barbadense; gossypium jamaicense. Händen und Füßen. Kɔɔsɔ dara a sen na. Il a
synonyme: bamanakɔɔri. les pieds crasseux. His feet are dirty. Seine
Füße sind schmutzig.
kɔɔriden [ɔ́] Morphemes: kɔɔri-den. Nom. fruit du
kɔpu [ɔ́] Emprunt de : English: cup. Nom. verre à
coton; fruit of cotton plant; Frucht der
Baumwollpflanze. café, tasse; coffee glass, cup; Kaffeeglas,
Tasse. Category: Container.
kɔɔrikolo [ɔ́] Morphemes: kɔɔri-kolo. Nom. bourre
kɔrada [ɔ́] Morphemes: kɔ-ra-da. Nom. tapis de selle
de coton à égrener; cotton wool for ginning;
Watte zum Entkörnen. A muso bɛ tilen (cheval, bœuf, âne); saddle mat (horse, bull,
kɔɔrikolobɔ la. Sa femme passe la journée à
donkey); Satteldecke (Pferd, Ochse, Esel).
Kɔrada b'a ka misi kɔra. Son bœuf a un tapis
égrener de coton. His wife spends the day
ginning cotton. Seine Frau verbringt den Tag
de selle sur le dos. His ox has a saddle mat on
damit, Baumwolle zu entkörnen.
the back. Sein Rind hat eine Satteldecke auf
dem Rücken.
29/01/2026 465

kɔraden kɔrɔ
kɔraden [ɔ́] Morphemes: kɔ-ra-den. 2 • se faire signe discrètement du bout des
doigts; give each other a discreet sign with
variante: kɔladen. Nom. bébé, enfant au dos,
your fingertips; sich unauffällig mit den
nourrisson; baby; Baby, Säugling, Kleinkind.
Fingerspitzen winken. ... mɔgɔw de bɛ ka
Muso dɔ bɛ na, a kɔradennin bɛ a kɔ ra.
ɲɔgɔn kɔrikɔri, ka ne natɔ jira... ... les gens
Arrive une femme, son nourrisson au dos. A
se font discrètement signe en me montrant en
woman arrives, her baby on the back. Da
train de venir... ... people are quietly signalling
kommt eine Frau, ihr Baby auf dem Rücken.
to me while coming... ... die Leute winken sich
Category: Person.
leise, indem sie zu mir kommen ...
kɔrali [ɔ]́ Emprunt de : français. Nom. chorale;
3 • toucher légèrement; touch slightly; leicht
choir; Chor. berühren.
kɔraliden [ɔ́] Morphemes: kɔrali-den. Nom. membre 4 • mordiller à l’hameçon; bite the hook; den
d’une chorale; choir member; Chormitglied.
Haken knabbern.
kɔri inter. est-ce que... (avec nuance de doute, kɔrikɔri 3 [ɔ́] Adverbe. très sale, très vieux; very dirty,
1
very old; sehr schmutzig, sehr alt. A nɔgɔla
d'agacement, d’insinuation...); is it that... (with
a hint of doubt, annoyance, innuendo...); ist es kɔrikɔri ! C'est très sale ! It’s very dirty! Es ist
so, daß... (mit einer Nuance von Zweifel, sehr schmutzig! synonyme: kɔrɔkɔrɔman.
Verärgerung, Anspielung...) Kɔri i ka kɛnɛ ?
kɔrɔ postp. 1 • sous, en dessous de; under; unter. A
Est-ce que tu vas bien ? Are you well? Geht es
1
dir gut? Kɔri i ma a fɔ k'i bɛ na yan ? Es-tu
bɛ jiri kɔrɔ. Il est sous l’arbre. He is under the
certain de ne pas avoir dit que tu venais ici ?
tree. Er ist unter dem Baum.
Are you sure you didn’t say you were coming 2 • à côté de, auprès de, à la merci de, à portée
here? Bist du sicher, daß du nicht gesagt hast, de; beside, next to, at the mercy of, within
daß du hierher kommst? reach of; neben, auf Kosten von, in
Reichweite. Fanta Maa ye a kɔrɔ. Voici Fanta
kɔri variante: kɔrin. Nom. virgule; comma; Komma.
2
Maa à votre merci. Fanta Maa is at your
..., ... Category: Grammar.
mercy. Fanta Maa ist in Ihrer Gewalt. A nana
kɔri [ɔ]̀ Nom. liane; tree of the Acacia family, liana; ka na i ɲɔngiri a kɔrɔ. Elle vint s'agenouiller
3
Akazienbaumart, Liane. ka lɔgɔ siri ni kɔri auprès de lui. She came to kneel next to him.
ye. attacher du bois avec une liane. attach
Sie kniete sich neben ihn hin.
wood with a liana. Holz mit einer Liane 3 • contre, pour; for, against, to; dagegen,
befestigen. Category: Tree. acacia pennata. hingegen, für. ... sani u ka funun n kɔrɔ... ...
au lieu qu'ils s'emportent contre moi... ...
kɔri [ɔ]́ Verbe. 1 • toucher du bout des doigts pour
4 instead of coming at me... ... anstatt sich gegen
faire signe, gratter du bout des doigts; fingertip mich aufzuregen... Syɛba dun tɛ fɛn jugu
to wave, fingertip to scratch; Fingerspitzen
yɛrɛkɛ a denw kɔrɔ. La mère poule qui gratte
berühren, um zu winken, mit den
Fingerspitzen kratzen. A ye jelikɛ kɔri
le sol ne donne pas de mauvaises choses à ses
poussins. (proverbe). The mother hen who
ncɛncɛnin. Il fit un signe discret au griot. He
scratches the ground does not give bad things
gave a discreet sign to the griot. Er gab dem to her chicks. (proverb). Die Hühnermutter,
Griot ein unauffälliges Zeichen. die am Boden kratzt, gibt ihren Küken keine
2 • faire un cadeau; give a gift; ein Geschenk schlechten Dinge. (Sprichwort).
machen. A ye n kɔri. Il m'a fait un cadeau. He
gave me a gift. Er hat mir ein Geschenk
gemacht.
kɔrikɔri [ɔ̀-ì] Nom. gros mil rouge; big red millet or
1
sorghum; große rote Hirse. Dɔw ka bagan
dumuni ye kɔrikɔri ye. Certains donnent à
leurs animaux de gros mil rouge. Some give
their animals large red sorghum. Einige geben
ihren Tieren große rote Hirse.
kɔrikɔri [ɔ́] Verbe. 1 • gratter avec le doigt de façon
2
répétée; repeatedly scratch with your finger;
Mit dem Finger wiederholt kratzen. ka bɔgɔ
kɔrikɔri gratter légèrement la terre. lightly
scrape the soil. Erde leicht abkratzen.
29/01/2026 466

kɔrɔ kɔrɔbaya
kɔrɔ comparer: taafan.[ɔ́-ɔ́] Nom. sens, 5 • vi. vieillesse; old age; Alter, Lebensabend.
2 1
N'a tun y'a sɔrɔ boonsiibɔ bɛ mɔgɔ kɔrɔ,
signification, dessous; meaning, sense; Sinn,
Bedeutung. O kɔrɔ ye mun ye ? Qu’est-ce que ɲɔgɔntuma bakɔrɔnin kɔrɔyara a tigi ye. Si
ça veut dire ? What is the meaning of this? vraiment avoir de la barbe était signe de
Was bedeutet das? O kɔrɔ (ko) ... Ça veut
vieillesse, le petit bouc serait plus vieux que
son maître. (proverbe). If having a beard was
dire..., cela signifie... That means... Das
really a sign of old age, the little goat would be
bedeutet ... A bɛ min fɔ, ne tɛ o kɔrɔ dɔn. Je
older than its master. (proverb). Wenn der
ne comprends pas le sens de ce qu’il dit. I
Bart wirklich ein Zeichen des Alters wäre,
don’t understand what he means. Ich versehe
wäre der kleine Bock älter als sein Herr.
nicht, was er meint. N’a ma foyi fɔ, o kɔrɔ ye (Sprichwort). Kɔrɔ ka na man di. La sauce de
ko tɔɔrɔ si tɛ. S’il ne dit rien, ça veut dire qu’il la vieillesse n'est pas agréable. (proverbe). The
n’y a pas de problème. If he says nothing, that sauce of old age is not pleasant. (proverb). Die
means there’s no problem. Wenn er nichts Sauce des Alters ist nicht angenehm.
sagt, bedeutet das, dass es keine Probleme gibt. (Sprichwort).
Dɔnkili man di, nka a kɔrɔ ka di. La chanson
kɔrɔ [ɔ̀] Verbe. abandonner, laisser; give up, leave;
5
n'est pas belle, mais son sens est intéressant.
(proverbe). The song is not beautiful, but its
aufgeben, lassen, verlassen. N'a tɛ sɛbɛ kɛ, a
meaning is interesting. (proverb). Das Lied ist ka yɔrɔ kɔrɔ. S'il ne fait pas des choses
nicht schön, aber seine Bedeutung ist sérieuses, qu'il abandonne l'endroit. If he
interessant. (Sprichwort). doesn’t do serious things, let him leave the
place. Wenn er nichts Ernstes tut, soll er den
kɔrɔ [ɔ-̀ ɔ́] Nom. grand frère ou grande sœur, frère
3 Ort verlassen.
aîné, aîné; older brother or sister; älterer
Bruder oder Schwester. Category: Kinship. kɔrɔbalen [ɔ̀-ɔ̀-à-é] Morphemes: kɔrɔ-ba-len.
synonyme: kɔrɔbalen. Nom. aîné, le plus âgé; elder, the oldest; der
ältere, ältester. ... den ninnu na kɔrɔbalen...
kɔrɔ [ɔ-̀ ɔ̀] 1 • adj.pred. vieux, âgé, ancien; old,
4 ... le plus âgé de tous ses enfants... ... the oldest
former, ancient; alt, alter, früherer. E ka kɔrɔ of all his children... ... das älteste aller
ne ye. Tu es plus âgé que moi. You are older Kinder... synonyme: kɔrɔ .
3
than me. Du bist ältere als ich. so kɔrɔ
kɔrɔbari [ɔ́] Morphemes: kɔrɔ-bari. Verbe. butter (les
ancienne maison. old house. altes Haus.
céréales); to hoe (cereals plants); hacken (um
antonyme: kura.
Getreide Pflanzen), eine Pflanze mit Erde
2 • vi. antérieur à, auparavant; prior to, before, anhäufen. Maaɲɔ kɔrɔbarili bɛ kɛ wagati
previously, earlier; vor, zuvor, vorher, früher.
min, sunw jaɲa bɛ santimɛtɛrɛ 50, walima
Gabugu ka kɔrɔ misiri ye. La cuisine est
santimɛtɛrɛ 60 hakɛ la. On butte le maïs
antérieure à la mosquée. (proverbe). The
lorsqu’il atteint 50 ou 60 centimètres. We hill
kitchen is prior to the mosque. (proverb). Die
up the corn when it reaches 50 or 60
Küche ist älter als die Moschee. (Sprichwort).
centimeters. Wir häufen den Mais an, wenn er
A ma a fɔ n ye ka kɔrɔ. Il ne me l'a pas dit
eine Höhe von 50 oder 60 Zentimetern
auparavant. He did not tell me before. Er hat es
erreicht. Category: Agriculture.
mir vorher nicht gesagt.
3 • vi. aîné; older, elder; älterer. N'i ye kɔrɔ
kɔrɔbaya [ɔ̀-ɔ̀-à] Morphemes: kɔrɔ-ba-ya. Verbe.
bin, i ɲɛ bɛ bɔ dɔgɔ fɛ. Quand tu as fait
être avancé (nuit, grossesse ...), vieillir; be
advanced (night, pregnancy ...), get older;
tomber l'aîné, tu t'intéresses au cadet.
fortgeschritten sein (Nacht, Schwangerschaft
(proverbe). When you have knocked down the
...), altern. ... ani muso min kɔrɔbayara
elder, you are interested in the younger one.
(proverb). Wenn du den Älteren fallen
kojugu. ... ainsi que les femmes très avancées
gelassen hast, interessierst du dich für den en âge. ...as well as women who are very
Jüngeren. (Sprichwort). advanced in age. ...sowie Frauen, die im
4 • vi. vieillir; grow old, get old, to age; altern,, fortgeschrittenen Alter sind. Yanni su ka
alt werden. Tiɲɛ tɛ kɔrɔ. La vérité ne vieillit kɔrɔbaya... Avant que la nuit ne soit très
pas. The truth does not age. Die Wahrheit avancée.. Before the night is very late... Bevor
altert nicht. die Nacht sehr spät wird... Ni den bɛ
kɔrɔbaya... Quand l'enfant grandit... When the
child grows up... Wenn das Kind erwachsen
wird...
29/01/2026 467

kɔrɔbila kɔrɔcɛ
kɔrɔbila [ɔ́] Morphemes: kɔrɔ-bila. Nom. kɔrɔbɔbali [ɔ́] Morphemes: kɔrɔ-bɔ-bali. Nom.
1 • sous-vêtement; underwear; Unterwäsche. invérifiable, non encore vérifié, qui ne peut pas
Category: Clothing. synonyme: kɔrɔdon. être défié; not verifiable, not yet verified, that
2 • économies; savings; Ersparnisse.
cannot be challenged; nicht überprüfbar, der
Category: Finance.
nicht herausgefordert werden kann. cɛbakɔrɔ
kɔrɔbɔbali un vieux qui ne peut pas être défié.
kɔrɔbirili [ɔ́] [ɔ́] Nom. buttage (des céréales); third
an old man who cannot be challenged. ein
hoeing (in September); drittes Hacken
alter Mann, der nicht herausgefordert werden
(September). Category: Agriculture.
kann.
kɔrɔbɔ 1 [ɔ́-ɔ́-ɔ́] Morphemes: kɔrɔ-bɔ. vt. 1 • tester, kɔrɔbɔli [ɔ́-ɔ́-ɔ́-í] Morphemes: kɔrɔ-bɔ-li. Nom.
mettre à l’épreuve, faire la preuve, prouver,
épreuve, mise à l’épreuve, essai, examen,
expérimenter, essayer, vérifier; test, try, to
vérification, expérimentation; test, testing,
proof something, test, verify; versuchen,
exam, trial, experimentation; Test, Versuch,
testen, ausprobieren, den Beweis erbringen,
Prüfung, Examen, Überprüfung, Experiment.
untersuchen. An taa ɲɔgɔn fɛ, o bɛ nkalon
O na kɛ kɔrɔbɔli ye. Cela fera une expérience.
kɔrɔbɔ. Allons voir ensemble, c'est là le
It will be an experiment. Es wird ein
moyen de prouver que c'est un mensonge. Experiment sein. ... i bɛ se ka kɔrɔbɔli dɔ kɛ.
(proverbe). Let's go and see together, this is
... on peut faire une expérience. ... we can do
the way to prove that it's a lie. (proverb).
an experiment. ... wir können ein Experiment
Laßt uns gemeinsam nachschauen, das ist der
machen.
Weg, um zu beweisen, daß es eine Lüge ist.
(Sprichwort). kɔrɔbɔlikɛla Morphemes: kɔrɔ-bɔ-li-kɛ-la. Nom.
2 • concurrencer; compete; wetteifern. Suya tentateur; tempter; Versucher, Verführer.
tɛ sanfɛn ye, numuya tɛ kɔrɔbɔ. La kɔrɔbɔrɔ [ɔ́-ɔ́-ɔ̀-ɔ́] Nom. Sonrhaï (ethnie); Sonrhaï
sorcellerie ne s'achète pas, de même on ne peut (ethnic group); Songhay Volksgruppe. Bɛɛlaw
pas concurrencer le forgeron. (proverbe).
ye kɔrɔbɔrɔw la mɔgɔw ye... Les Bellas sont
Witchcraft cannot be bought, nor can you
les gens des Sonraïs... The Bellas belong to the
compete with the blacksmith. (proverb).
people of the Sonrais... Die Bellas gehören
Hexerei kann man nicht kaufen, man kann
zu den Sonrais... Category: Community.
auch nicht mit dem Schmied konkurrieren.
(Sprichwort). kɔrɔbɔrɔkan Morphemes: kɔrɔbɔrɔ-kan. Nom.
3 • dévoiler; reveal, disclose; aufdecken. O Sonrhaï / Songhaï (langue); Sonrhaï
gundo kɔrɔbɔbaga... Celui qui dévoilera le (language); Songhai Sprache.
secret... The one who will reveal the secret...
Category: Language.
Derjenige, der das Geheimnis lüften wird ... kɔrɔcɛ [ɔ̀-ɔ̀-ɛ̀] variante: kɔɔcɛ. Nom. frère aîné,
1
kɔrɔbɔ [ɔ́] Morphemes: kɔrɔ-bɔ. Verbe. 1 • enlever grand frère, cousin germain plus âgé (côté
2
paternel); older brother; älterer Bruder.
une partie des tubercules d'une plante; remove
Category: Kinship. synonyme: kɔrɔkɛ.
part of the tubers from a plant; Entfernen eines
Teils der Knollen einer Pflanze. Sula ye tiga kɔrɔcɛ [ɔ́-ɔ́-ɛ̌] Morphemes: kɔrɔ-cɛ. Verbe.
2
kɔrɔbɔ. Le singe déterra des arachides. The 1 • retrousser, relever (un vêtement); roll up,
monkey dug out peanuts. Der Affe holte raise (a piece of clothing); aufrollen,
Erdnüsse aus der Erde. hochheben (ein Kleidungsstück). ka finin
2 • raser les cheveux du pourtour de la tête; kɔrɔcɛ retrousser un pagne. roll up a cloth.
shaving the hair around the head; die Haare Einen Stoff zusammenrollen.
am Haaransatz rasieren. A kunkolo kɔrɔbɔlen
2 • arranger le bord, souligner; arrange the
don. Sa tête est rasée sur le pourtour. His head edge, underline; Rand anordnen,
is shaved on the circumference. Sein Kopf ist unterstreichen. k'i kun kɔrɔcɛ arranger la
rundherum rasiert. bordure de rasage des cheveux. arrange hair
3 • sarcler (mil...), fouiller le sol (animaux); shaving edge. Rasurrand der Haare anordnen.
hoeing (millet...), search the ground 3 • commencer, entamer, conclure; start,
(animals); hacken (Hirse...),, Boden begin, conclude, close; beginnen, abschließen.
durchsuchen (Tiere). An ye baabu kɔrɔcɛ. Nous avons commencé à
converser. (et également l’inverse : «conclu»).
We started talking. (and also the other way
around: "concluded"). Wir haben angefangen
zu plaudern. (und auch umgekehrt:
«abgeschlossen»).
29/01/2026 468

kɔrɔci kɔrɔfuran
kɔrɔci Verbe. 1 • souligner; underline; unterstreichen. kɔrɔdɔn Jula: kɔrɔlɔn. Morphemes: kɔrɔ-dɔn. Verbe.
2
daɲɛ kɔrɔcilenw mots soulignés. underlined découvrir; discover; entdecken.
words, words underlined. unterstrichenen Category: Learn. synonyme: bɔ fɛnkura kan,
Wörter. kɔrɔdɔn .
1
2 • tracer (un sillon); draw (a groove), marking kɔrɔfɛla [ɔ́] Morphemes: kɔrɔ-fɛ-la.
furrows; zeichnen (eine Spur), Furchen
machen. Saribilennin bɛ se ka kɔrɔsyɛnni ni
variante: kɔrɔnna, kɔrɔyanfan. Nom. région
kɔrɔcili kɛ. La petite charrue rouge peut faire
orientale, est, orient; eastern area / region;
östliche Region.
le sarclage et le traçage des sillons. The little
red plow can do weeding and marking kɔrɔfɔ [ɔ́-ɔ́-ɔ́] Morphemes: kɔrɔ-fɔ. 1 • Nom.
furrows. Der kleine rote Pflug kann Unkraut discussion, palabre, explication, observation,
jäten und Furchen markieren. remarque; discussion, conversation,
Category: Agriculture. explication, observation; Diskussion, Debatte,
kɔrɔdaɲɛ [ɔ́] Morphemes: kɔrɔ-daɲɛ. Nom. mot Aussprache, Gespräch, Unterhaltung,
Erklärung. N ye e ka kɔrɔfɔ mɛn... J'ai bien
lexical; lexical word; lexikalisches Wort.
compris tes explications... I understood your
Mabɛnnidaɲɛw de bɛ don kɔrɔdaɲɛw ni
explanation... Ich habe deine Erklärung
ɲɔgɔn cɛ, ka kumasen latilen. Les mots
verstanden... synonyme: ɲɛnafɔ.
grammaticaux se placent entre les mots
lexicaux pour former une phrase correcte.
2 • Verbe. discuter, expliquer; discuss, explain;
Grammatical words are placed between diskutieren, erklären. Mɔgɔ kɔrɔfɔɲɔgɔn, a
lexical words to form a correct sentence. Die bɛɛ tɛ e ɲin ye. Tous ceux qui discutent
grammatikalischen Wörter werden zwischen ensemble ne sont pas des amis. (proverbe). Not
den lexikalischen Wörtern platziert, um einen all who talk together are friends. (proverb).
korrekten Satz zu bilden. Nicht alle, die miteinander reden, sind
antonyme: mabɛnnidaɲɛ. Freunde. (Sprichwort).
kɔrɔdon [ɔ́-ɔ́-ǒ] Morphemes: kɔrɔ-don. 1 • Verbe. 3 • Verbe. critiquer, disputer, gronder; criticize,
argue, scold; kritisieren, streiten, schimpfen.
reprendre (feu, dispute, maladie, plaie ...);
Umaru kɔrɔfɔla a kɔ. Omar a été critiqué en
resume, regain, pick up, restart (fire, quarrel,
son absence. Omar was criticized in his
illness, wound ...); wieder aufnehmen,
absence. Omar wurde in seiner Abwesenheit
weitergehen (Feuer, Streit, Krankheit, Wunde
kritisiert.
...) Joli ye kɔrɔdon kɛ. La plaie a repris. The
wound has started again. Die Wunde hat kɔrɔfɔkan [ɔ́] Morphemes: kɔrɔ-fɔ-kan. Nom.
wieder begonnen. reproches, critiques; reproaches, criticism;
2 • Verbe. butter; hoe; hacken. Vorwürfe, Kritik.
Category: Agriculture. kɔrɔfɔli 1 • Nom. entretien; interview; Besprechung,
3 • Verbe. caler, soutenir, tuteurer; support;
Interview.
unterstützen, gestützt werden. Ni jiri denna
2 • Nom. critique; criticism; Kritik.
kosɛbɛ, a ka kan ka kɔrɔdon. Quand un
3 • Verbe. critiquer; criticize; kritisieren.
arbre est très chargé de fruits, il faut qu'il soit
soutenu. When a tree is very laden with fruit, it
kɔrɔfɔnkɔli [ɔ́] Morphemes: kɔrɔ-fɔ-n-kɔ-li. Nom.
must be supported. Wenn ein Baum sehr reich médisance, critique d'une absence,
an Früchten ist, muß er gestützt werden. dénigrement; criticism of an absence, slander;
4 • Verbe. rallonger la sauce; delude the sauce; Verleumdung, Kritik an einer Abwesenheit. U
die Soße strecken, verdünnen. tɛ fosi kɛ ni kɔrɔfɔnkɔli tɛ. Ils ne font rien
5 • Nom. sous-vêtement; underwear; d'autre que de dire du mal des gens. They do
Unterwäsche. synonyme: kɔrɔbila. nothing but speak ill of people. Sie tun nichts
anderes, als schlecht über die Menschen zu
kɔrɔdɔn
1
[ɔ́] Jula: kɔrɔlɔn. Morphemes: kɔrɔ-dɔn.
reden.
Verbe. découvrir; discover; entdecken.
kɔrɔfuran [ɔ́] Morphemes: kɔrɔ-furan.
Kojugukɛla bɛ laban ka kɔrɔdɔn. Le
malfaiteur finit par être découvert. The
variante: kɔrɔfura. Verbe. 1 • dépouiller; strip;
perpetrator is eventually discovered. Der plündern, berauben, abstreifen. U y'a
Täter wird schließlich entdeckt. kɔrɔfuran baloko la. Ils l'ont dépouillé de ses
synonyme: kɔrɔdɔn 2 . vivres. They have stripped him of his food. Sie
haben ihm seine Vorräte geraubt.
29/01/2026 469

kɔrɔgɛrɛn kɔrɔlen
2 • rançonner; ransom, extort money from; kɔrɔkɔrɔ [ɔ́] Verbe. trembler de froid, trembler,
1
erpressen. Polisicɛw y'a kɔrɔfuran. Les
grelotter; tremble with cold, tremble, shiver;
policiers l'ont rançonné. The police extorted
zittern. A bɛ ka kɔrɔkɔrɔ. Elle grelotte. She is
money from him. Die Polizei hat ihn erpreßt.
shivering. Sie zittert.
3 • balayer, rafler; sweep, grab; fegen,
wegfegen. kɔrɔkɔrɔ 2 [ɔ́] variante: kɔrɔnkɔrɔ. Verbe. 1 • bien
conserver, bien garder, économiser, être
kɔrɔgɛrɛn [ɔ́] Morphemes: kɔrɔ-gɛrɛn. Verbe.
chiche; keep well, save, be stingy; gut
1 • faire cuire jusqu'à évaporation de l'eau; aufbewahren, sparen, knauserig sein. A b'a ka
cook until water evaporates; kochen, bis das
wari kɔrɔkɔrɔ, a b'a ɲɔsilabɔ. Il est chiche
Wasser verdunstet.
avec son argent, il le sort au compte-gouttes
2 • procédé de conservation de la viande par
(littéralement: comme de la semence de mil).
dessiccation; method of preserving meat by
He is stingy with his money, he takes it out by
drying; Verfahren zur Konservierung von
the dropper (literally: like millet seed). Er ist
Fleisch durch Trocknen. Sogo bɛ kɔrɔgɛrɛn.
knauserig mit seinem Geld, er zieht es aus dem
On fait sécher la viande. We dry the meat. Das
Tröpfchen (wörtlich: wie Hirsesamen). ka ji
Fleisch wird getrocknet.
kɔrɔkɔrɔ économiser l'eau. save water,
kɔrɔjɛ [ɔ-́ ɔ́-ɛ́] Jula: kɔrɔgwɛ. Morphemes: kɔrɔ-jɛ.
conserve water. Wasser sparen.
Verbe. 1 • expliciter, clarifier; make explicit, 2 • avoir une attitude humble, réservée; have a
clarify; erläutern, explizit machen. N y'a ɲini humble, reserved attitude; eine demütige,
ka a kɔrɔjɛ. J'ai cherché à clarifier la chose. I zurückhaltende Haltung. kɔrɔkɔrɔ
tried to clarify the matter. Ich habe versucht,
kɔrɔkɔrɔ [ɔ́] Verbe. dépérir; waste away, wither away;
die Sache zu klären. 3
verkümmern, verdorren, verwelken. A
2 • explorer; explore; erkunden, erforschen.
3 • nettoyer; clean up; reinigen, säubern.
kɔrɔkɔrɔla. Il a dépérit. He wasted away. Er
verkümmerte.
4 • dépouiller, délester; strip, unload;
abnehmen, abladen. U nana a kɔrɔjɛ wariko kɔrɔkɔrɔman
la. Ils sont venus le dépouiller de son argent. [ɔ̀-ɔ̀-ɔ̀-ɔ̀-á] Morphemes: kɔrɔ-kɔrɔ-man.
They came to take his money. Sie kamen, um Nom. très vieux; very old; sehr alt. Aw
ihm sein Geld wegzunehmen. kɔrɔkɔrɔman kana taa tunga na. Ne partez
kɔrɔjifɛnɲanaman faraman Nom. crustacés; pas à l'aventure quand vous êtes très âgés.
shellfish, crustacean; Krustentier. Don't go on an adventure when you are very
Category: Small animals. old. Begeben Sie sich nicht auf ein Abenteuer,
wenn Sie sehr alt sind. synonyme: gɔjɔ,
kɔrɔjugaya [ɔ̀-ɔ̀-ù-à-á] Nom. bouffonnerie;
gɔbigɔbi, kɔrikɔri.
comicality, buffoonery; Komik. I ka
3
kɔrɔjugaya dabila sa ! Arrête tes kɔrɔla [ɔ́] Morphemes: kɔrɔ-la. Nom. 1 • dessous;
bouffonneries ! Stop your nonsense! Hör auf below, under, underneath; unter, darunter,
mit dem Quatsch! unten. A ye fiɲɛ kɔrɔla kɔrɔbɔ. Il a souillé le
kɔrɔkalan [ɔ́] Morphemes: kɔrɔ-kàlan. Nom.
dessous de la jarre. He has soiled the bottom of
the jar. Er hat die Unterseite des Topfes
sémantique; semantics; Semantik,
beschmutzt.
Wortbedeutungslehre. Category: Grammar,
2 • parties sexuelles; sexual parts;
Learn.
Geschlechtsteile.
kɔrɔkelen n.comp. monosémie; has one single sense;
kɔrɔlatɔmɔ Morphemes: kɔrɔ-la-tɔmɔ. Nom.
hat nur eine Bedeutung, hat nur einen Sinn.
décodage; decoding; Entzifferung,
Category: Learn.
Dekodierung, Datenentschlüsselung.
kɔrɔkɛ [ɔ-̀ ɔ̀] Morphemes: kɔrɔ-kɛ. Nom. frère aîné, Category: Language and thought.
cousin germain plus âgé (côté paternel); elder kɔrɔlen [ɔ̀-ɔ̀-é] Morphemes: kɔrɔ-len. part. 1 • passé,
brother, older first cousin (paternal side);
autrefois, jadis auparavant; past, formerly;
älterer Bruder, älterer Cousin (väterliche
Vergangenheit, früher, damals. An tun t'a
Seite). A kɔrɔkɛ den don. C'est l'enfant de son
frère aîné. It’s his older brother’s child. Es ist
cogo dɔn kɔrɔlen... Nous ne savions pas faire
das Kind seines älteren Bruders.
cela auparavant... We didn't know how to do
Category: Relationships. synonyme: kɔrɔcɛ .
this before... Wir wußten vorher nicht, wie das
1
geht...
kɔrɔkɛnɛ [ɔ́-ɔ́-ɛ́-ɛ́] n.comp. champ sémantique;
semantic field; Bedeutungsfeld.
Category: Grammar.
29/01/2026 470

kɔrɔlenfɛnw maraso kɔrɔngɛyin
2 • chose du passé; thing of the past; Sache der kɔrɔmasurun [ɔ́] Morphemes: kɔrɔ-ma-surun.
Vergangenheit. Kɔrɔlenw bɛ ka tunun... On
Nom. sens proche; close sense; naher Sinn. A
perd les traditions d'autrefois... We lose the
kɔrɔmasurun tɛ dɔwɛrɛ ye o ! Son sens le
traditions of yesteryear... Wir verlieren die
alten Traditionen...
plus proche n'est rien d'autre que cela. Its
closest sense is none other than that. Seine
kɔrɔlenfɛnw maraso Nom. musée; museum; nächste Bedeutung ist nichts anderes als das.
Museum. Category: Building. kɔrɔmatigɛ Morphemes: kɔrɔ-ma-tigɛ. Verbe.
kɔrɔlensira danbe Nom. valeur culturelle; cultural dénigrer, critiquer (de façon détournée),
value; kultureller Wert. ironiser, saboter; denigrate, criticize (in a
kɔrɔma [ɔ]́ Morphemes: kɔrɔ-ma. variante: kɔrɔtan.
roundabout way), ironize, sabotage;
verunglimpfen, kritisieren (auf Umwegen),
Nom. 1 • pourvu de sens / signification;
ironisieren, sabotieren. Kɔrɔmatigɛlibaga bɛ
senseless, meaningless; sinnlos. Dɔnkili
siran a tulo cibaga ɲɛ. Celui qui attaque
kɔrɔma, o ka di ɲanibagatɔ da, a sinɲɛna
indirectement a peur de celui qui peut lui
kun bɛ bɔ a la. Le miséreux aime à chanter
flanquer une gifle. (proverbe). The one who
des chants expressifs, mais c'est pour lui une attacks indirectly is afraid of the one who can
cause de nuits blanches. (proverbe). The slap him in the face. (proverb). Wer indirekt
wretch loves to sing expressive songs, but for angreift, hat Angst vor dem, der ihm ins
him it is a cause of sleepless nights. (proverb). Gesicht schlagen kann. (Sprichwort).
Der Elende singt gerne ausdrucksstarke synonyme: lɛɛbu.
Lieder, aber das ist für ihn ein Grund für
schlaflose Nächte. (Sprichwort). kɔrɔmuso [ɔ̀-ɔ̀-ú-ó] Morphemes: kɔ̀rɔ-muso.
2 • qui a une signification cachée, un sens variante: kɔɔmuso. Nom. grande sœur, sœur
secret; which has a hidden meaning, a secret aînée, cousine germaine paternelle plis âgée;
meaning; die eine verborgene Bedeutung, older sister; ältere Schwester. ... ale ni
einen geheimen Sinn hat. kuma kɔrɔma kɔrɔmuso lamɔna mɔmuso bolo. ... lui et sa
devinette (et : proverbe ). riddle (and: proverb
grande sœur ont été élevés par la grande-mère.
). Rätsel (und: Sprichwort ).
...he and his older sister were raised by the
kɔrɔman [ɔ̀-ɔ̀-ã́] Morphemes: kɔrɔ-man. adj. âgé, grandmother. ...er und seine ältere Schwester
wurden von der Großmutter großgezogen.
vieux, ancien; old, former; alt, früher. Bana
Category: Kinship. synonyme: kɔɔso.
kɔrɔmanw dun... Mais pour ce qui concerne
les maladies anciennes... But as far as old -kɔrɔn mâle adulte; adult male; erwachsener und
diseases are concerned... Aber was die alten männlich. bakɔrɔn bouc. goatee. Ziegenbock.
Krankheiten angeht...
kɔrɔn [ɔ́-ɔ ́] synonyme: tilebɔ. Nom. l’est, l’orient;
kɔrɔmanko [ɔ̀-ɔ̀-à-ó] Nom. choses anciennes,
east; Osten. N bɛ taa kɔrɔn fɛ. Je vais à l’est. I
tradition; former things, tradition; Sachen von
am going east. Ich gehe nach Osten. ... kɔrɔn,
früher, Tradition. ... a ka a jija ka kɔrɔmanko
tilebin, worodugu ani kɛɲɛka ye diɲɛ fan
kɛ... ... qu'il s'efforce d'accomplir les
naani ye. ... l'est, l'ouest, le sud, le nord sont
anciennes coutumes... ... that he strive to fulfill
the ancient customs... ... daß er sich bemüht,
les quatre points cardinaux. ... east, west,
die alten Bräuche zu erfüllen...
south, north are the four cardinal points. ...
Osten, Westen, Süden und Norden sind die
kɔrɔmaɲɔgɔn
vier Himmelsrichtungen. Category: Sky, Land.
[ɔ-̀ ɔ̀-à] Morphemes: kɔrɔ-ma-ɲɔgɔn. Nom. kɔrɔnfɛla [ɔ́] Morphemes: kɔrɔn-fɛ-la. Nom. région
personne plus âgée que soi; person older than
orientale, est; eastern region, east; östliche
self; Person, die älter ist als du. Musa ko a ka
Region, östlich. Joliba n'a bolow kɛlen bɛ ka
foli ni waleɲumandɔn bɛ ka taa
Mali camancɛ n'a kɔrɔnfɛla lahinɛ. Le Niger
jamananakuntigiw bɛɛ ye sanko a
et ses affluents desservent le centre et l'est du
kɔrɔmaɲɔgɔn... Moussa a remercié et dit sa Mali. The Niger and its tributaries serve
gratitude à tous les chefs d'état et central and eastern Mali. Der Niger und seine
particulièrement à ses aînés... Moussa thanked Nebenflüsse versorgen Zentral- und Ostmali.
and expressed his gratitude to all the heads of
kɔrɔngɛyin Nom. prunellier-liane; kind of liana; Liane
state and especially to his elders... Moussa
bedankte sich bei allen Staatsoberhäuptern und (Art). Category: Grass, herb, vine. opilia
celtidifolia.
drückte seine Dankbarkeit aus, besonders bei
seinen Ältesten...
29/01/2026 471

kɔrɔnna kɔrɔtanan
kɔrɔnna [ɔ́] Morphemes: kɔrɔn-na. Nom. 1 • est; kɔrɔsigi [ɔ́] Morphemes: kɔrɔ-sigi.
East; Ost. Kabini tilesini bɛ bɔ kɔrɔnna... variante: kankɔrɔsigi. Nom. adjoint,
Dès le lever du soleil à l'est... At sunrise in the remplaçant, conseiller, courtisan,
east... Bei Sonnenaufgang im Osten... homme-ligne, subordonné; deputy, assistant,
2 • pays orientaux, orient; oriental countries, substitute, counsellor, courtier, subordinate;
east, eastern countries; orientalische Länder, Assistent, Gehilfe, Helfer, Mitarbeiter,
Osten, östliche Länder. Stellvertreter, Berater. dugutigi n'a kɔrɔsigiw
kɔrɔntan [ɔ́] Morphemes: kɔrɔ-ntan. Nom. dépourvu
le chef de village et ses conseillers. the village
chief and his councillors. der Dorfvorsteher
de sens, de signification; devoid of meaning,
und seine Berater.
significance; ohne Sinn, ohne Bedeutung,
bedeutungslos. Mɔgɔ tɛ dɔnkili kɔrɔntan da. kɔrɔsikɛla Nom. observateur; observer; Beobachter,
On ne chante pas de chanson dépourvue de Zuschauer.
signification. We do not sing a song without kɔrɔsili [ɔ̀-ɔ̀-ì-í] synonyme: sɛgɛsɛgɛli. Nom.
meaning. Man singt kein bedeutungsloses
observation, constat, remarque, recherche;
Lied.
observation, finding, remark, indication;
kɔrɔntɔ [ɔ-̀ ɔ̀-ɔ́] variante: gɔrɔntɔ. vi. 1 • ronfler; Beobachtung, Feststellung, Anmerkung,
snore; schnarchen. synonyme: gɔrɔndɔ. Befund.
2 • rugir; roar; brüllen, heulen. kɔrɔsiɲɛ 1 synonyme: ɲɛgɛnɛwulen. Nom. bilharziose;
3 • gronder; growl; brummen, knurren. bilharzia; Bilharziose. Category: Disease.
kɔrɔɲanfan [ɔ́] Morphemes: kɔrɔ-ɲan-fan. Nom. kɔrɔsiɲɛ 2 Morphemes: kɔrɔ-siɲɛ. variante: kɔrɔsiyɛn.
est, orient; east; Ost, Osten. vt. sarcler; hoe; hacken. Category: Agriculture.
kɔrɔɲɔgɔnma [ɔ́] Jula: kɔrɔɲɔgɔnman. Nom. kɔrɔsiɲɛli variante: kɔrɔsiyɛnli. Nom. sarclage;
synonyme; synonym; Synonym, das weeding; Hacken, Jäten.
sinnverwandte Wort. Karamɔgɔ bɛ Category: Agriculture.
kalandenw bila, u ka kɔrɔɲɔgɔnmaw ɲini kɔrɔsiɲɛli ni bugubuguli expr. sarcle-binage;
nin daɲɛw la... Le maître fait chercher par les earthing-up; Hacken und Jäten.
élèves les synonymes parmi les mots Category: Agriculture.
suivants... The teacher asks the students to
kɔrɔsyɛn [ɔ́] Morphemes: kɔrɔ-syɛn. Verbe. sarcler,
look for synonyms among the following
words... Der Lehrer bittet die Schüler, nach
désherber; to weed; jäten, hacken. Hakili tɛ
Synonymen für die folgenden Wörter zu dan, nka a bɛ kɔrɔsyɛn. On ne sème pas
suchen... Category: Grammar. l'intelligence, mais on la sarcle. (proverbe). We
kɔrɔɲɔn [ɔ́] Morphemes: kɔrɔ-ɲɔn.
do not sow intelligence, but we weed it.
(proverb). Wir säen keine Intelligenz, aber wir
variante: kɔraɲɔn. Verbe. 1 • se reposer; to rest, jäten sie. (Sprichwort). Category: Agriculture.
relax; ausruhen.
kɔrɔta [ɔ́-ɔ́-ǎ] Morphemes: kɔrɔ-ta. vt. 1 • soulever,
2 • repos, pause; rest, pause, break; Ruhe,
Pause. ka kɔrɔɲɔn sigi faire une pause. take a
relever (un plat), élever (la voix); lift up, raise
up; aufheben, hochheben, erheben. A’y'aw
break. eine Pause machen.
tigɛ kɔrɔta san ! Levez la main ! Put up your
3 • repas pris à la pause; lunch at break;
Mahlzeiten in der Pause. hand! Erhebt eure Hand ! I kan kɔrɔta
dɔɔnin ! Parlez un peu plus fort ! Speak up a
kɔrɔɲɔntɔ [ɔ́] Morphemes: kɔrɔ-ɲɔn-tɔ. Nom.
bit! Erhebe deine Stimme und sprich lauter.
casse-croûte, en-cas constitué par le reste de to
Waraba y'a kunkolo kɔrɔta... Le lion souleva
du midi; snack, consisting of the rest of the
la tête... The lion raised his head... Der Löwe
porridge eaten at lunch; Imbiß, bestehend aus
dem Rest vom Hirsebrei des Mittagessens.
hob seinen Kopf...
Category: Food. 2 • peser, mesurer; to weight, measure; wägen,
messen, abmessen. N ye n ka ɲɔ kɔrɔta ka a
kɔrɔsi [ɔ-̀ ɔ̀-ì] vt. surveiller, observer; watch, keep an
filɛ. J'ai mesuré mon mil. I measured my
eye on, oversee, observe; beobachten,
millet. Ich habe meine Hirse abgemessen.
bewachen, aufpassen, überwachen.
kɔrɔtafɛn mansin expr. chariot élévateur; forklift,
lift truck, pallet stacker; Gabelstapler,
Hubstapler.
kɔrɔtanan Morphemes: kɔrɔ-ta-nan. Nom. peson;
spring balance; Schnellwaage. Category: Tool.
29/01/2026 472

kɔrɔti kɔsa
kɔrɔti [ɔ-̀ ɔ̀-í] variante: [kɔrti], kɔrɔtɛ. Nom. kɔrɔya [ɔ̀-ɔ̀-á] n.comp. 1 • vieillesse, ancienneté;
mauvais sort, jeté à distance; object carrying a oldness, old age, seniority; Alter. Aw ka du
curse, aimed at people, curse somebody at a
kɔnɔ musofuru ye kɔrɔya kɔrɔya de ye wa ?
distance; jemanden auf Distanz verzaubern,
Est-ce que dans votre famille les mariages se
verfluchen. A ye kɔrɔti dɔ ni mugu ɲagami.
font par ordre d’ancienneté ? Are marriages in
Il a mélangé du poison avec de la poudre. He your family in order of seniority? Gibt es in
mixed poison with powder. Er mischte Gift mit Ihrer Familie Eheschließungen in der
Pulver. Reihenfolge ihres Alters?
kɔrɔtigɛ [ɔ́-ɔ́-ì-ɛ́] Morphemes: kɔrɔ-tigɛ. Verbe. 2 • vieillir; getting old; alt werden, älter
1 • tromper, mystifier; deceive, mystify; werden, altern. A ma kɔrɔya ne ye. Il n'est pas
täuschen, mystifizieren. Yelikɛlaw ko án t'a plus âge. que moi. He's not any older. than me.
kɔrɔtigɛ. Les voyants dirent : «Nous ne vous
Er ist nicht älter. als ich.
trompons pas !». The seers said, "We do not kɔrɔyuguri vt. tourner le sol autour des plantes, ex.
deceive you!" Die Seher sagten: «Wir täuschen pour mélanger avec de l’engrais; turn over soil
euch nicht!». Kɔrɔtigɛ ye banfanmɔn ye, bɛɛ around plants, e.g. to mix in fertilizer; die Erde
y'a dɔn jɛgɛ t'a kɔnɔ. C'est mystifier les gens um die Pflanze mit Dünger vermischen.
que de pêcher dans la flaque d'eau aux bords Category: Agriculture.
du puits, tout le monde sait qu'il n'y a pas de kɔrɔyugurinan Morphemes: kɔrɔyuguri-nan. vt.
poisson. (proverbe). It is to mislead people that
sorte de houe pour tourner le sol autour des
fishing in the puddle at the edge of the well,
plantes; type of hoe for turning over soil
everyone knows there are no fish. (proverb).
around plants; Art von Hacke um die Erde um
Die Leute werden getäuscht, wenn sie in der
die Pflanzen zu kehren. Category: Agricultural
Pfütze am Rande des Brunnens fischen. Jeder
tool.
weiß, dass es keinen Fisch gibt. (Sprichwort).
kɔs [ɔ́] variante: kɔsi. Adverbe. très maigre, très
2 • détourner; divert, distract, hijack;
ablenken, abwenden, abbringen. A ye dur, très sec; very thin, very hard, very dry;
walimuso in kɔrɔtigɛ... Il détourna cette
sehr dünn, sehr hart, sehr trocken. A jara kɔs !
femme... He turned this woman away... Er
Il a beaucoup maigri. He lost a lot of weight.
wandte diese Frau ab...
Er hat viel Gewicht verloren.
synonyme: ngɔyin.
3 • dénigrer; denigrate, belittle, disparage;
verunglimpfen, herabsetzen, verachten, kɔsa [ɔ́] Emprunt de : arabe. variante: kɔsan. Nom.
1
diffamieren.
récent, dernier, tardif; recent, latest, late; neu,
kɔrɔtɔ vi. 1 • se presser, être pressé, hâter, être spätestens, spät. Malo ye kɔsa ye. Le riz est
1
impatient, s'impatienter; be in a hurry, be récent. The rice is recent. The rice is fresh. Der
inpatient; in Eile sein, pressieren, sich beeilen. Reis ist frisch. ji kɔsa pluie tardive. latter rain.
I tun kɔrɔtɔnin lo. Tu étais pressé. You were später Regen. Kamalenkɔrɔ na kɔsa tɛ. Un
in a hurry. Du warst in eile. Suruku kɔrɔtɔra gars vigoureux ne vient jamais trop tard.
dugu jɛli la. L'hyène était impatiente que le (proverbe). A strong guy never comes too late.
jour se lève. The hyena couldn't wait for the (proverb). Ein kräftiger Kerl kommt nie zu
day to break. Die Hyäne konnte es kaum spät. (Sprichwort). Wolo kɔsa tɛ namaya
erwarten, daß der Tag anbrach. ... a kana dɔn. Le dernier-né n'a aucune notion de
kɔrɔtɔ wa a kana sumaya. ... qu'il n'aille ni parenté. (proverbe). The last born has no
trop vite ni trop lentement. ...that he goes
notion of kinship. (proverb). Der Jüngste hat
neither too fast nor too slowly. ...daß er weder
keine Ahnung von Verwandtschaft.
zu schnell noch zu langsam fährt. Mɔgɔ tɛ
(Sprichwort).
kɔrɔtɔ Ala kɔrɔ. L'homme ne s’impatiente pas kɔsa 2 [ɔ́-ǎ] 1 • Verbe. se refroidir, être déçu; get cold,
à l’égard de dieu. (proverbe). Man is not be disappointed; abkühlen, enttäuscht werden.
impatient with God. (proverb). Der Mensch ist A kɔsara. Il a été déçu [dans ses espérances].
Gott gegenüber nicht ungeduldig. He was disappointed [in his hopes]. Er war
(Sprichwort). enttäuscht [in seinen Hoffnungen].
2 • impatience, urgence; impatience, urgency; 2 • Verbe. être apathique; be apathetic;
Ungeduld, Dringlichkeit. apathisch sein.
kɔrɔtɔ [ɔ-̀ ɔ̀-ɔ́] Nom. acacia légumineuse au bord des
2
fleuves; flame thorn; Acacia am Flussufer.
Category: Tree. acacia ataxacanthba.
29/01/2026 473

kɔsa nin na kɔsin
3 • Verbe. devenir mou et impropre à la kɔsegin [ɔ́-è-í] Morphemes: kɔ-segin. 1 • Verbe.
1
consommation; become soft and unsuitable for
restituer, rendre, renvoyer, rembourser;
consumption; weich und ungenießbar werden.
restore, give back, send back, pay back;
To kɔsara. Le to est devenu immangeable.
zurückerstatten, wiederherstellen,
The porridge has become inedible. Der
zurückschicken. Lɛtɛrɛ bɛ se ka kɔsegin i
Hirsebrei ist ungenießbar geworden.
ma... La lettre peut t'être renvoyée... The letter
4 • Nom. impuissance masculine; male
can be sent back to you... Der Brief kann an
impotence; männliche Impotenz. Muso
Sie zurückgeschickt werden...
murutisababu kɛra a cɛ ka kɔsa ye. C'est
2 • Nom. remboursement; reimbursement,
l’impuissance de son mari qui provoqua la
refund, repayment; Rückerstattung,
révolte de la femme. It was her husband's
Rückzahlung. warikɔsegin Remboursement
impotence that provoked the woman's revolt.
de l'argent. refund of the money.
Es war die Impotenz ihres Mannes, die den
Rückerstattung des Geldes.
Aufstand der Frau auslöste.
3 • Verbe. mourir; die; sterben. Den y'i
kɔsa nin na Adverbe. récemment, il n'y a pas
kɔsegin... L'enfant s'en retourna... (et:
longtemps; recently; kürzlich, letzthin,
«l'enfant mourut»). The child returned... (and:
neulich.
“the child died”). Das Kind ging zurück...
kɔsafunɛ [-ɔ́-à-í-ɛ́] Jula: kɔsafinɛ. (und: „das Kind ist gestorben“).
Morphemes: kɔ-safunɛ. n.comp. plante kɔsegin Jula: kɔsegi. Morphemes: kɔ-segin. 1 • vi.
2
médicinal (espèce); kind of plant; Pflanze revenir, retourner; return, come back;
(Art). ... kɔsafunɛ bɛ tobi, k'a kɛ ɲuguna zurückkommen, umkehren. I bɛ kɔsegin
ye... ... on fait cuire ses feuilles pour faire une wagati juman ? Tu reviendras quand ? When
sauce feuilles... ... we cook its leaves to make a are you coming back? Wann kommst du
leaves sauce... ... man kocht seine Blätter, um zurück?
eine Blattsoße zu machen... Category: Bush,
2 • Nom. retour; the return; Rückkehr. ... ka
shrub. macrosphyra longistyla; vernonia
colorata; phyllanthus reticulatus.
Hawa kɔsegin kɔnɔ... ... attendre le retour de
Hawa. ...wait for Hawa to return. .... auf
kɔsagon [ɔ́-à-ó] Verbe. enjamber, passer par-dessus;
Hawas Rückkehr warten. a furura kɔsegi ye
span, get over, jump over, cross over;
überbrücken, darüber gehen. U ye su kɔsagon kɔsen [ɔ́] Morphemes: kɔ-sen. Nom. 1 • partie
ka tɛmɛ. Ils ont enjambé le cadavre et ont arrière, roue arrière; back part, rear part, back
wheel; Hinterteil, Hinterbein, Hinterreifen.
continué [leur chemin]... They stepped over the
corpse and went on [their way]... Sie stiegen 2 • patte arrière; hind leg; Hinterbein,
über die Leiche und setzten ihren Weg fort... Hinterpfote. ... kɔsen b'a dageren... ... les
synonyme: lasagon . pattes arrières le bouchent... ... the hind legs
2
clog it... ... die Hinterbeine verstopfen ihn...
kɔsaladen Morphemes: kɔsa-la-den.
3 • nageoire pelvienne; pelvic fin;
variante: kɔsafɛden, kɔsaden. Nom. Beckenflosse. jɛgɛ sen ani a kɔsen la
dernier-né; last born; zuletzt geboren, jüngste
nageoire ventrale du poisson et sa nageoire
Mitglied. A ka kɔsaladen mɔ ka go. Son pelvienne. the fish’s ventral fin and its pelvic
dernier-né a du mal à pousser. Her last born is fin. die Brust- und Beckenflosse des Fisches.
having trouble growing. Ihr neugeborenes
kɔsɛ [ɔ̀] Nom. porc; pig; Schwein. ka kɔsɛ mara
Kind hat Probleme beim Wachsen.
synonyme: sinnaban, lagare , sinlaban.
élever des porcs. raise pigs. Schweine
1
züchten. Category: Animal husbandry.
kɔsankɔsan [ɔ́] variante: kɔsakɔsa. Nom. tout
kɔsin Verbe. tourner le dos, se détourner de; turn
récent, tout dernier; very recent, very latest;
one's back, turn away; sich umdrehen, sich
sehr neu, sehr aktuell. kɔsankɔsan in na tout
abwenden. A y'i kɔsin n ma. Il m'a tourné le
dernièrement. very recently. ganz neulich.
dos. He turned his back on me. Er drehte mir
kɔsegili 1 Nom. restitution; restitution; Restitution, den Rücken zu. Ni i y'i kɔsin mɔgɔw la... Si tu
Ersatz, Entschädigung. te détournes des gens... If you turn away from
kɔsegili Morphemes: kɔsegi-li. Nom. 1 • retour; people... Wenn du dich von den Menschen
2
abwendest...
return; Zurückkommen, Umkehr, Rückkehr.
2 • rebobinage; rewind; Zurückspulen.
Category: Sign, Symbol.
29/01/2026 474

kɔsinin kɔtɛ
kɔsinin [ɔ́] Morphemes: kɔsi-nin. Nom. maigrichon, kɔsyɔ [ɔ́] Morphemes: kɔ-syɔ. Nom. haricot d'eau;
maigrelet; skinny; schlank, dünn, mager. Nin Rosewood; Wasserbohnenbaum.
kɔsinin in de ye e bugɔ wa ? C'est ce Category: Tree. berlinia grandiflora.
maigrichon qui t'a frappé ? Is that the skinny kɔta [ɔ́] Nom. prochain, qui vient de suite, d'après,
guy who hit you? Ist es der magere Kerl, der de derrière; following, next one, after that;
dich geschlagen hat? nächste, folgender. O kɔta bɛ min ? Où est
kɔsiyɛnin comparer: jirɔsiyɛ. Nom. râle noir, poule celui d'après ? Where’s the next one? Wo ist
d'eau; black Rail, water chicken; Vogelart. der nächste?
Category: Bird. limnocorax flavirostra, kɔtɛ [ɔ̀-ɛ́] synonyme: kerekete. Nom. escargot,
1
gallinula chloropus. synonyme: kɔsyɛnin.
coquille d'escargot; snail, snail shell;
kɔsɔ [ɔ]̀ variante: kɔsɔn. Nom. gerçure; crack; Riß. Schnecke, Schneckenhaus. Ni kɔtɛ fara cira a
Nɛnɛ mana se, kɔsɔ bɛ bɔ a sen n'a bolow kan, a fanga banna. Si on écrase la coquille
la. Quand il faisait froid, il avait des gerçures de l'escargot, il perd toute sa force. (proverbe).
aux bras et aux jambes. When it was cold, he
If the shell of the snail is crushed, it loses all its
had cracks on his arms and legs. Wenn es kalt
strength. (proverb). Wenn man das
war, hatte er Risse an den Armen und Beinen.
Schneckenhaus zerquetscht, verliert er seine
Category: Disease.
ganze Kraft. (Sprichwort). Category: Small
animals. synonyme: kerekete.
kɔsɔgɔkɔnɔ [ɔ̀-ɔ̀-ɔ̀] variante: [kɔshwakɔnɔ]. Nom.
kɔtɛ Nom. toupie; spinning top; Kreisel. Kɔtɛ bɛ
1 • pélican gris; pink-backed pelican; 2
Rötelpelikan. Category: Bird. pelecanus simin. La toupie tourne vivement. The
rufescens. synonyme: kulanjan, konkɔnɔ, spinning top turns fast. Der Kreisel dreht sich
kɔnɔbɔrɔtigi, kolanjan, forokoba. schnell. A ye n kɛ kɔtɛ ye. Il s'est joué de moi.
(littéralement : «il a fait de moi une toupie »).
2 • pélican blanc; great white pelican;
Weißpelikan. Category: Bird. pelecanus
He played me. (literally: «he made me a
onocrotalus.
spinning top»). Er hat mich reingelegt.
(wörtlich: «Er hat mich zu einem Kreisel
kɔsɔkɔsɔ [ɔ́] Adverbe. depuis longtemps; for a long gemacht»).
time; seit langem, schon lange, längst. A y'a kɔ kɔtɛ [ɔ̀] variante: kɔtɛba, kɔtɛtulon. Nom.
3
kɛ bɔ ye kɔsɔkɔsɔ ! Il a fichu le camp depuis
1 • théâtre traditionnel; traditional theatre;
un bon bout de temps ! (populaire). Er ist traditionelles Theater. A' ye bɔ sira la, kɔtɛ
schon lange weg! (Volksmund).
nalen. Dégagez la route, voici le théâtre qui
kɔsɔmɔ Nom. somon des forêts, somon de Guinée; vient. Clear the road, this is the theater
kind of tree; Baumart. Category: Tree. uapaca coming. Macht die Straße frei, hier kommt das
heudelotii / guineensis. Theater.
kɔsɔn variante: kosɔn. postp. à cause de, pour, grâce 2 • fête bambara (danses souvent suivies de
1
théâtre); Bambara festival (dancing often
à; because of, for; wegen, weil, um zu.
followed by theatre); Bambara-Fest (oft mit
kɔsɔn 2 [ɔ]́ Verbe. rester petit, rester chétif, être Tänzen und anschließendem Theater).
malingre, ne pas se développer; stay small, kɔtɛ [ɔ̀] Nom. petit instrument pour couper le mil,
4
stay feeble, be frail, do not develop; klein
fait d'une lame droite insérée dans une manche
bleiben, schwach sein, sich nicht entwickeln.
en bois; small instrument to cut millet, made of
Ni den min ba t'a balo ka ɲɛ, a bɛ fasa... a
a straight blade inserted into a wooden
bɛ nɔgɔsi ka a kɔsɔn. L'enfant que la maman handle; kleines Instrument zum Schneiden von
nourrit mal maigrit, et finit par devenir Hirse, bestehend aus einer geraden Klinge in
malingre. The child that the mother feeds einem Holzstiel. Category: Agricultural tool.
poorly loses weight, and ends up becoming
kɔtɛ [ɔ́] Verbe. posséder sexuellement (une femme),
sickly. Das Kind, das die Mutter schlecht 5
ernährt, wird dünn und wird am Ende baiser (populaire); possess sexually (a
kränklich. synonyme: mirimɔrɔ.
woman), kiss, fuck (popular); sexuell (eine
Frau) besitzen, küssen, ficken (Volksmund).
kɔsyɛnin [ɔ̌-ɛ̀-í] Morphemes: kɔ-syɛ-nin. Nom. Na n k'i kɔtɛ ! Viens que je te prenne ! Come
1 • poule d'eau; moorhen; Teichhuhn,, and I’ll take you! Komm, ich nehme dich! A
Teichralle. Category: Bird. gallinula y'a kɔtɛ. Il a baisé cette fille. He fucked that
chloropus. synonyme: jirɔsyɛ, kɔsiyɛnin,
girl. Er hat dieses Mädchen gefickt.
jilasyɛ.
2 • râle noir; black crake; Rallen Art.
Category: Bird. limnos corax flavirostra.
29/01/2026 475

kɔtɛbabɔla kɔyɔ
kɔtɛbabɔla [ɔ̀-ɛ̀-à-ɔ̀-á] Nom. acteur, actrice; actor, kɔtigɛbali [ɔ́] Morphemes: kɔ-tigɛ-bali. Nom.
actress; Schauspieler, Schauspielerin. Mali ininterrompu, incessant; uninterrupted,
kɔtɛbabɔlaw les acteurs maliens. Malian incessant, perpetual; ununterbrochen,
actors. Malische Schauspieler.
fortwährend, ständig, unaufhörlich. Sɔgɔsɔgɔ
bɛ kɛ a kɔtigɛbali ye... La toux devient
kɔtɛbaden Morphemes: kɔtɛ-ba-den. Nom. acteur,
ininterrompue... The cough becomes
personnage d'une pièce de théâtre; actor,
uninterrupted... Der Husten wird
character in a play; Schauspieler, Figur in
ununterbrochen...
einem Theaterstück.
kɔtigɛjoona [ɔ́] Morphemes: kɔ-tigɛ-joona. Nom.
kɔtɛɛ [ɔ]́ Adverbe. toujours, sans cesse; always,
pantalon court serré aux genoux; short pants
constantly; immer, ständig. A b'a ka nɛgɛso tight at the knees; kurze, an den Knien enge
boli kɔtɛɛ ! Il est out le temps sur sa Hosen. kɔtigɛjoona Category: Clothing.
bicyclette ! He's always on his bike! Er ist
immer auf seinem Fahrrad!
kɔtigi [ɔ́] Morphemes: kɔ-tigi. Nom. 1 • cadet,
successeur; cadet, successor; Kadett,
kɔtɛkɔtɛ
1
[ɔ́] variante: kɔtɔkɔtɔ. Verbe. 1 • faire du
Nachfolger.
bruit (pour un liquide en train de cuire); make
2 • qui a des appuis; who has support; mit
noise (for a cooking liquid); Lärm machen (für
Unterstützung. Jɔnmaya kɛ man di kɔtigi la.
eine Kochflüssigkeit).
Il n'est pas facile de minimiser celui qui a a des
2 • cuire à feu doux, mijoter; cook over low
appuis. (proverbe). It is not easy to minimize
heat, simmer; bei schwacher Hitze kochen,
the one who has supports. (proverb). Es ist
köcheln lassen. Dumuni bɛ kɔtɛkɔtɛ la. La nicht leicht, den zu verharmlosen, der
nourriture mijote. The food simmers. Das Unterstützung hat. (Sprichwort).
Essen kocht.
3 • derrière, parties sexuelles; the butt, sexual
kɔtɛkɔtɛ [ɔ́] variante: kutekute. Adverbe. réduit en parts; Hintern, sexuelle Teile. Category: Body.
2
poussière, réduit en poudre; reduced to dust, kɔtikɔti [ɔ́] Adverbe. très sale; very dirty; sehr
reduced to powder; zu Staub zerfallen, zu
schmutzig, stark verschmutzt. A nɔgɔlen
Pulver zerfallen. Ɲɔ sira fo ka a kɛ kɔtɛkɔtɛ !
kɔtikɔti ! Il est très sale ! It’s very dirty! Es ist
Le mil a été complètement réduit en poudre.
sehr schmutzig!
The millet was completely ground into powder.
Die Hirse wurde vollständig zu Pulver kɔtoronin [ɔ̌-ò-ò-í] Nom. espèce de figuier; kind of
gemahlen. fog tree, river sandpaper fig; Feigenbaum Art.
kɔtɛlikɛla [ɔ́] Morphemes: kɔtɛ-li-kɛ-la. Nom. Category: Bush, shrub. ficus capraefolia.
fornicateur, baiseur (populaire); fornicator, kɔtɔkɔtɔ [ɔ́] variante: kɔyɔkɔyɔ. Adverbe. très vieux,
fucker (popular); Unzüchtiger, Ficker sénile; very old, senile; sehr alt, senil. A kɔrɔla
(Volksmund).
kɔtɔkɔtɔ ! Il est sénile. He is senile. Er ist
kɔtigɛ 1 [ɔ-́ ì-ɛ́] Morphemes: kɔ-tigɛ. Verbe. 1 • cesser, senil. synonyme: gɔbigɔbi.
interrompre, finir, terminer; stop, cease, end,
kɔtulo [ɔ̀] Morphemes: kɔ-tulo. Nom. nénuphar;
interrupt, halt, finish, complete; einstellen,
aufhören, unterbrechen, beenden, water lily; Seerose, Wasserlilie, Seerosenblatt.
abschliessen. A yɛrɛ t'a fɛ kuma ka kɔtigɛ kɔwulu [ɔ̀-ù-ú] n.comp. loutre; otter; Otter.
1
bilen. Il ne voulait d'ailleurs pas qu'on cesse de Category: Mammal. lutra maculicollis /aonyx
parler. He didn't want us to stop talking. Er capensis.
wollte nicht, daß wir aufhörten zu reden.
kɔwulu [ɔ̀-ù-ú] Nom. fourmi rouge (pique); red ant;
2
2 • se dissiper (fumée); dissipate (smoke);
rote Ameise. Category: Insect.
sich auflösen (Rauch). Sisi kɔtigɛra, a wulila
synonyme: ntɔrɔn .
3
k'i jɔ. La fumée se dissipa, il se mit debout.
The smoke cleared, he stood up. Der Rauch
kɔyɔ Nom. tomate amère, aubergine africaine; bitter
verzog sich, er stand auf. tomato, African eggplant; Aubergine,
3 • racler, gratter, rendre lisse; scrape, make Eierfrucht. Category: Food. Solanum
smooth; schaben, glatt machen. Muso y'a sen aethiopicum. synonyme: gɔyɔ, bankɔyɔ, nkɔyɔ.
kɔtigɛ. La femme s'est raclé le dessous des
pieds. The woman scraped the bottom of her
feet. Die Frau kratzte sich an der Fußsohle.
kɔtigɛ [ɔ]́ Nom. hémorroïdes; hemorrhoids;
2
Hämorrhoiden. Category: Disease.
synonyme: nancabɔ.
29/01/2026 476

kɔyɔkɔyɔ kudu
kɔyɔkɔyɔ Adverbe. complètement muet; completely kubedadenin [ú] Nom. arrondissement; district,
silent, completely mute; völlig stumm. administrative area; Bezirk, Gau.
Dugukolo kɔyɔkɔyɔ, dugukolo ma kuma. Category: Government, Region.
La terre est restée muette, la terre n'a pas synonyme: arɔndiseman.
parlé ! The earth has remained silent, the earth
kubekun [ú] Morphemes: kube-kun.
has not spoken! Die Erde ist stumm geblieben,
die Erde hat nicht gesprochen!
synonyme: mirabu. Nom. minaret; minaret;
Minarett. Misiri kubekun ka ca, nka a la
ku vt. contenir; contain; enthalten, beinhalten.
1
belebeleba bɛ ka taa kɔrɔn fɛ. La mosquée a
ku 2 [ú] Jula: kuu. Nom. igname comestible, plusieurs minarets, mais le plus grand est
tubercule en général, racine, bulbe; yam, orienté à l'est. The mosque has several
edible yam, tuber in general, root, bulb; Yams, minarets, but the largest faces east. Die
eßbare Yamswurzel, Knolle im Allgemeinen, Moschee hat mehrere Minarette, aber das
Wurzel, Zwiebel. ka ku beleke cuire des größte ist nach Osten ausgerichtet.
ignames à l'eau. boil yams. Yamswurzeln im Category: Building. synonyme: muradu 2 ,
Wasser kochen. Tiga ni woso ma ku ɲinan. miherabi.
Ni les arachides ni les patates douces n'ont
kubilen Morphemes: ku-bilen.
réussi cette année. Neither peanuts nor sweet
potatoes did well this year. Weder Erdnüsse
variante: nsarakubilen. Nom. espèce de
noch Süßkartoffeln schnitten dieses Jahr gut poisson; kind of fish, pebbly fish, pink fin tetra;
ab. Category: Food. dioscorea ssp. Fischart,, Salmler. Category: Fish. alestes
nurse. synonyme: nsara.
ku [ú] Jula: kuu. Nom. 1 • queue, bout; tail, end,
3
tip; Schwanz, Ende, Spitze. A ye wulu ta a ku kubɔlɔ [ú] Morphemes: ku-bɔlɔ. variante: kugen.
ma. Il a pris le chien par la queue. Er packte Nom. 1 • queue; tail; Schwanz.
den Hund am Schwanz. Category: Parts of an 2 • croupion du poulet; chicken rump;
animal. Hühnerhintern. Kubɔlɔ bɛɛ ye tulu ye. Le
2 • manche; handle; Griff. croupion, c'est tout gras. The rump is all fat.
Der Hintern ist ganz fett.
3 • cul (populaire); ass (popular); Arsch
(Volksmund), Hintern. A ku ka bon dɛ ! Il a 3 • coccyx; tail-bone, coccyx; Steißbein.
un gros cul ! He has a big ass! Er hat einen
synonyme: kukun.
großen Arsch! kudayi [ú] Adverbe. 1 • toujours, de tout temps,
kube [ú] Emprunt de : arabe. Nom. administration, éternellement; always, forever, all the time;
bureau, bâtiment officiel, tribunal, bureau de immer, für immer,die ganze Zeit. Sɛbɛn
police; administration, office, official building, kudayi. Écris toujours. Write always.
court, police office; Administration, Büro, Schreibe immer. A bɛ yan kudayi ! Il est tout
öffentliches Gebäude, Gericht, Polizeibüro. U
le temps là ! He's there all the time! Er ist die
taara a kofɔ kube la. Ils allèrent l'accuser ganze Zeit da!
devant le tribunal. They went to accuse him in 2 • constamment, indéfiniment, continûment;
court. Sie gingen vor Gericht, um ihn constantly, indefinitely, continuously; ständig,
anzuklagen. Category: Building. auf unbestimmte Zeit, kontinuierlich. A b'a ka
kubeda [ú-é-á] synonyme: marada. Nom. so kɔnɔ kudayi ! Il est constamment chez lui !
1
département, cercle, circonscription, He’s always at home! Er ist ständig zu Hause!
arrondissement, commune, chef-lieu; 3 • directement, tout droit; directly, straight;
department, county, district, municipality, direkt, geradeaus. ... dɔw ta kɛra taa ye
capital; Departement, Region, Bezirk,
kudayi ! ... d'autres partirent tout droit ! ...
Gemeinde, Hauptstadt. a kubeda ɲɛmɔgɔ
others went straight on! ... andere gingen
les autorités du chef-lieu. the authorities of the
geradeaus!
capital. die Behörden der Hauptstadt.
Category: Region. synonyme: maradugu.
kudu [ù-ú] variante: kuru, kuruden, kutu. Nom.
louche métallique, cuillère, cuiller; ladle,
kubeda
2
[ú] Nom. bâtiment administratif, bureau
spoon; Schöpfkelle, Schöpflöffel, Löffel. A ye
administratif; administrative building, office;
kudu bila ka tɔ kɛ bololadunni ye. Elle
administratives Gebäude, Verwaltungsbüro,
laissa la cuillère et continua de manger à la
Büro. Category: Building.
main. She left the spoon and continued to eat
by hand. Sie ließ den Löffel stehen und aß
weiter von Hand. Category: Tool.
29/01/2026 477

kudu sɔgɔsɔgɔnin kulekan
kudu sɔgɔsɔgɔnin Nom. écumoire; skimming ladle; kulanjan [ú] Morphemes: kulan-jan. Nom. pélican
Schaumlöffel. Category: Tool. gris, pélican blanc; pelican; Pelikan.
kujannin [ú] Nom. Veuve à collier d'or; Sahel Category: Bird. pelecanus rufescens;
pelecanus onocrotalus.
paradise whydah; Östliche Paradieswitwe.
synonyme: kɔsɔgɔkɔnɔ, jɛgɛdumukɔnɔ,
Category: Bird. vidua orientalis.
konkɔnɔ, taladunkɔnɔ, kokun, forokoba,
2
kukala [ú] Morphemes: ku-kala. Nom. queue; tail;
kɔnɔbɔrɔtigi.
Schwanz. Basa min bɛ kɛ terege ye, a bɛ dɔn
kulankun [ú] Morphemes: kulan-kun. Nom.
a kukala la. Le margouillat qui va devenir un
enclume, partie de l'enclume où l'on pose le
gros margouillat se reconnaît à sa queue.
fer; anvil, part of the anvil where the iron is
(proverbe). The lizard which will become a
placed; Amboß, Teil des Ambosses, auf dem
large lizard can be recognized by its tail.
(proverb). Die Echse, die sich zu einer großen
das Eisen platziert wird. synonyme: tɔnɔn
1
,
Echse entwickelt, ist an ihrem Schwanz zu kulan.
erkennen. (Sprichwort). Category: Parts of an kule [ú-é] variante: kulo. vi. crier, s'écrier,
animal. synonyme: kuu .
1
1 gronder (pour le ciel), émettre un bruit intense,
kukisɛ [ú] Morphemes: ku-kisɛ. Nom. houppe de la hurler; cry, shout, exclaim, scream, make a
queue; tail tuft; Schwanzbüschel. loud noise; schreien, ausrufen, heulen, ein
lautes Geräusch machen. ... Musa kulela
kuko Nom. qu'ils disent (k'u ko), on dit, racontar; that
dewu ! Moussa cria très fort ! Moussa shouted
they say (k'u ko), we say, a gossip; sie sagen
(k'u ko), man sagt, ein Geschwätz, Klatsch.
very loudly! Moussa schrie sehr laut! Ni san
Kana da kuko bɛɛ la ! Ne crois pas tous les kulela... Quand le ciel gronde... When the sky
racontars ! Don't believe all the gossip! roars... Wenn der Himmel grollt... Sokɛ
Glauben Sie nicht den ganzen Klatsch! kulela siɲɛ saba. Le cheval hennit trois fois.
kukolo [ú] Morphemes: ku-kolo. Nom. sacrum, partie The horse whinnied three times. Das Pferd
wieherte dreimal. synonyme: kooro .
dure de la queue, coccyx; sacrum, hard part of 3
the tail, coccyx; Sacrum, harter Schwanzteil, kule [ù-é] Nom. une des castes de la société
2
Steißbein. ka bin kukolo kan tomber sur le
mandingue: travailleur de bois, bûcheron; one
coccyx. fall on the coccyx. auf das Steißbein of the castes of Mandinka society: wood
fallen. synonyme: kukun. worker, lumberjack; eine der Kasten der
Mandingue Gesellschaft: Holzarbeiter,
kuku [ǔ-ǔ] interj. cri d'appel (au secours, à l'aide...);
Holzfäller. Category: Worker, occupation.
cry of appeal (for help...); Hilferuf (um
Hilfe...) Muso ye kuyu susu. La femme a crié
kule
3
[ù] Nom. menteur, rapporteur; liar, reporter;
« au secours ». The woman screamed “help”. Lügner, Berichterstatter. Ale ye kule ye de !
Die Frau schrie „Hilfe“. Lui, c'est un vrai menteur ! He’s a real liar! Er
kukun [ú] Morphemes: ku-kun. ist ein echter Lügner! synonyme: nkalontigɛla.
variante: kukunkolo. Nom. coccyx; coccyx; kule 4 [ú] variante: kulen. Verbe. mélanger; mix,
Steissbein. A binna a kukun yɛrɛ de kan. blend; mischen. I bɛ ji kule dɔlɔ la. Tu
C'est sur le coccyx même qu'il est tombé. It mélanges l'eau à la bière. You mix water with
was on the coccyx itself that he fell. Er fiel auf beer. Sie mischen Wasser mit Bier.
das Steißbein selbst. Category: Body. kuleden [ù-è-é] Nom. rapporteur, menteur, enfant
synonyme: kukolo, bosokolo, kubɔlɔ, ntala ,
3 dénaturé; liar, rapporteur; Berichterstatter,
ntiri
2
, tala
3
, bokolo
1
.
Lügner, verdorbenes Kind. Á y'á makun,
kukurunin Nom. arbre (espèce); tree sp; Baumart. kuleden in bɛ nalen. Taisez-vous, voilà le
Category: Tree. opilia celtidifolia. rapporteur qui arrive. Be quiet, here comes the
rapporteur. Seien Sie ruhig, hier kommt der
kula [ù] variante: kuta. Nom. petite tortue de terre;
Berichterstatter.
little land turtle; kleine Landschildkröte.
kulekan [ú] Morphemes: kule-kan.
kulan [ú] variante: kolan. Nom. enclume de
variante: kulokan. Nom. cri; scream, shout,
forgeron; blacksmith’s anvil; Amboss vom
cry; Schrei. ... ka kulekan ɲɛ kelen kɛ
Schmied. Category: Tool. synonyme: kulankun.
dewu ! ... et poussa un grand cri ! ...and let
out a loud cry! ...und stieß einen lauten Schrei
aus!
29/01/2026 478

kulekule kulu
kulekule [ù-é-ù-é] Nom. très pauvre; very poor; sehr kulokulo [ù-ó-ù-ó] synonyme: maawula.
1
arm. Kɛmɛsarada la jamanaden 40 ye variante: kolokolo. Nom. dindon; turkey;
faantan kulekule ye. 40% des habitants du Truthahn. Category: Bird. synonyme: kulekule .
2
pays sont des personnes très pauvres. 40% of
kulokulomuso variante: kolokolomuso. Nom.
the country's inhabitants are very poor people.
dinde; turkey hen; Truthenne.
40 % der Einwohner des Landes sind sehr
arme Menschen.
Category: Animal husbandry, Bird.
kulekule [ù-é-ù-é] Nom. dindon, dinde; turkey; kulɔri Emprunt de : français. Nom. chlore; chlorine;
2
Truthahn. Category: Animal husbandry, Bird.
Chlor.
synonyme: kulokulo, kolokolo , maawula. kulu [ú-ú] Nom. 1 • groupe, bande, comité,
1 1
kulekulenin [ù-è-ù-è-í] variante: kulekule. Nom. troupeau; group, committee; Gruppe,
Gremium, Komitee. An b'án tila, kulu kulu.
coqueluche; whooping cough; Keuchhusten.
Kulekulenin ye sɔgɔsɔgɔ sifa dɔ ye. La
Nous nous divisons par groupes. We divide
ourselves into groups. Wir teilen uns in
coqueluche est une sorte de toux. Whooping
Gruppen auf. Mɔgɔ tɛ ntorikulu gɛngɛn ni i
cough is a type of cough. Keuchhusten ist eine
Hustenart. Category: Disease. ma bilenkulu ye. On ne conduit pas un
synonyme: kalosabasɔgɔsɔgɔ, kɛtɛkɛtɛ , troupeau de crapauds sans voir un essaim de
1
keteketenin.
mouches. (proverbe). You cannot lead a herd
of toads without seeing a swarm of flies.
kulekulenintɔ Nom. coquelucheux; a person with (proverb). Man führt keine Krötenherde, ohne
whooping cough; eine Person mit einen Fliegenschwarm zu sehen. (Sprichwort).
Keuchhusten. Bananfura bɛ se ka tobi ka di synonyme: jɛkulu.
kulekulenintɔ ma. On peut donner au 2 • catégorie, syntagme; category, phrase;
coquelucheux une décoction de feuilles de Kategorie, Klasse, Phrase. dumuni kulu saba
fromager. To the person with a whooping trois catégories d'aliments. three food
cough can be given a decoction of tree leaves. categories. drei Kategorien von
Der Person mit Keuchhusten kann ein Lebensmitteln. kulukuntigi tête de syntagme.
Abkochung von Blättern gegeben werden. head of speech. Kopf der Rede. tɔgɔkulu
kulensɔn [ù-è] variante: kulenson. Nom. varicelle; groupe nominal. noun group.
chicken pox; Windpocken. Category: Disease. Substantivgruppe.
synonyme: lawɔɔrɔ, bakɔrɔnson, faritɔntɔn. 3 • grouper, regrouper; group, regroup;
gruppieren, neu gruppieren.
kuleɲɛba Nom. 1 • martin-pêcheur géant; giant
1 kulu [ù-ú] Nom. colline, montagne, falaise; hill,
kingfisher; Eisvogel (Art). Category: Bird. 2
ceryle maxima. mountain, cliff; Hügel, Berg, Fels. Kulu
2 • kuncɛ. Sommet. Summit. Gipfel. Taakasegin
kuleɲɛba Nom. martin-pêcheur pie; pied kingfisher; bɛ ngɔn ma, n'o tɛ kulu b'a nɔna. Le singe
2
fait des va-et-vient, mais la montagne, elle, ne
Vogelart. Category: Bird. ceryle rudis.
bouge pas. (proverbe). The monkey goes back
kuleɲinɛ [ù-é-ì-ɛ́] Jula: kuleɲinan. Nom. and forth, but the mountain does not move.
1 • musaraigne; shrew; Spitzmaus. (proverb). Der Affe geht hin und her, aber der
Category: Mammal. Berg bewegt sich nicht. (Sprichwort).
synonyme: ncicandugutigi. Category: Land.
2 • rat musqué; muskrat; Bisamratte. kulu [ú] Verbe. 1 • précipiter (se), plonger,
3
Category: Mammal. Ondatra zibethicus. engouffrer; rush, dive, knock over, engulf;
kuleyoro [ù-é-ò-ó] Nom. touraco violet; Violet überstürzen, tauchen, stürzen. A y'i bolo kulu
Turaco, violaceous plantain eater; a ka jufa kɔnɔ. Il plongea sa main dans sa
Helmturakos. Category: Bird. musophaga poche. He put his hand in his pocket. Er
violacea. steckte seine Hand in die Tasche. U kulula
kulo vi. crier, hurler; cry, shout, scream; schreien, ɲɔgɔn kan. Ils se sont tous engouffrés. They
heulen. synonyme: kooro . all rushed in. Sie stürmten alle herein.
3
kulokan n.comp. cri; scream, cry; schreien. kulokan ci
pousser un cri. to scream. aufschreien,, einen
Schrei ausstossen.
29/01/2026 479

kulu kulukulu
2 • faire tomber avec force, frapper kulubolonin Nom. sous-commission;
violemment, flanquer; to fall with force, to
sub-commission; Unterausschuss.
strike violently, knock over, throw; mit Gewalt
fallen lassen, hart schlagen, heftig zuschlagen, kuluda Morphemes: kùlu-da. Nom. pied de la colline;
umwerfen, schmeißen. Ma Hawa ye Sitan ta, foot/bottom of the hill; Bergfuss.
k'o kulu dugu ma, k'i ton o kan, k'o kulu kulukan [ú] Morphemes: kulu-kan. Nom. tonnerre;
kosɛbɛ n'a bolokuru ye. Ma Hawa a attrapé
thunder; Donner. Ni tulogeren ma san
Sitan et l'a flanquée par terre, et s'est précipitée
kulukan mɛn, ni sanji binna, a n'o ye. Si le
sur elle et l'a bourrée de coups de poings. Ma
sourd n'entend pas la tonnerre, quand les
Hawa grabbed Sitan and slammed her to the
gouttes de pluies tomberont, il s'en rendra
ground, then rushed at her and punched her.
compte. (proverbe). If the deaf man does not
Ma Hawa packte Sitan und warf sie zu Boden,
hear the thunder, when the raindrops fall, he
dann stürzte sie sich auf sie und schlug sie.
will realize it. (proverb). Wenn der Taube den
kulu 4 [ù] variante: senterekekulu. Nom. pierre Donner nicht hört, wird er es bemerken, wenn
utilisée pour se nettoyer les pieds, pierre die Regentropfen fallen. (Sprichwort).
ponce; stone used to clean feet, pumice stone; Category: Weather. synonyme: sankalama,
Fußreinigungsstein, Bimsstein. sanpɛrɛnkan, sankulu, kabapɛrɛnkan,
kulu [ú] variante: gulu. Verbe. tonner, gronder, kabakulu.
5
gargouiller (ventre); thunder, rumble, gargle kulukɔnɔjarasisi Nom. sports d’équipe; team sports;
(belly), growl; donnern, dröhnen, knurren,
Mannschaftssportarten.
gurgeln (Bauch). San mana soli ka kulu don
o don, sanji bɛ na o don. Quand il tonne le kulukulu 1 [ú-ú-ú-ú] variante: kurukuru. Nom.
matin, la pluie vient dans la journée. poulailler, abri pour animaux, grenier de petite
(proverbe). When it thunders in the morning, taille; hen-house, coop, shed for animals,
the rain comes in the day. (proverb). Wenn es small grain-storage shed; Hühnerstall,
morgens donnert, kommt tagsüber der Regen. Tierunterstand, kleiner Kornspeicher.
(Sprichwort). A kɔnɔ tɛ kulu. Son ventre ne Denmisɛn tɛ se ga kunna, cɛkɔrɔba tɛ se ka
gargouille pas. Her belly does not growl. Ihr don kulukulu kɔnɔ: denmisɛn n'a ɲɛci,
Bauch gurgelt nicht. cɛkɔrɔba n'a ɲɛci. L'enfant ne peut atteindre
kulu dɔ minanw expr. composantes d’un système; le haut du hangar, le vieux ne peut entrer dans
le grenier, à chacun son utilité. (proverbe).
components of the system; Komponenten des
The child can’t reach the top of the shed, the
Systems.
old man can’t get into the grain-store,
kuluba 1 Morphemes: kulu-ba. Nom. montagne; everyone has their use. (proverb). Das Kind
mountain; Berg. Category: Land. kann den die Decke nicht erreichen, der Alte
kann nicht in den Kornspeicher kriechen, jeder
kuluba [ú-ú-á] Nom. syntagme; phrase, syntagm;
2 hat seinen Nutzen. (Sprichwort).
Phrase, Satzteil. Category: Grammar. Category: Building. synonyme: syɛkulukulu.
kuluba dafanan syntagme complétif; object clause,
kulukulu [ú] Adverbe. complètement, totalement;
2
completive noun phrase; Satzergänzung.
completely, totally; völlig, vollständig. Kɔnɔw
Category: Grammar.
jiginna finin kan ka a gosi kulukulu ! Les
kuluba mankutuman syntagme qualificatif;
oiseaux fondirent sur le fonio et le picorèrent
qualifying phrase; qualifizierender Satzteil. complètement ! The birds swooped down on
kuluba tɔgɔman syntagme nominal; nominal the fonio and pecked it all up! Die Vögel
stürzten sich auf das Fonio und pickten es
phrase; Nominalphrase. Category: Grammar.
vollständig auf!
kuluba waleman syntagme verbal; verbal phrase;
kulukulu [ú] Verbe. 1 • s'engouffrer; to rush in, stuff;
Verbphrase. Category: Grammar.
3
einstürmen, strömen, eindringen. O tuma, fiɲɛ
kulubalen [ú-ú-à-é] variante: kulubanin. Nom.
bɛ kulukulu ka don fogonfogon kɔnɔ.
daman des rochers; rock hyrax; Kippdachs.
Alors, l'air s'engouffre dans les poumons.
Category: Mammal. procavia capensis.
Then, the air rushes into the lungs. Dann
synonyme: farakɔrɔba. dringt die Luft in die Lunge ein.
kulubɛn [ù-ù] Morphemes: kulu-bɛn. Nom. col,
défilé; pass, parade; Paß, Parade.
kulubolo [ú-ú-ó-ó] synonyme: cira. Nom.
commission; task force, commission;
Kommission, Ausschuss, Arbeitsgruppe.
29/01/2026 480

kulukuluma kulusijala
2 • se presser bruyamment, se précipiter en kulusi Emprunt de : arabe. variante: kurusi. Nom.
grand nombre; to hurry noisily, to rush in large
pantalon, culotte; trousers, pants, knickers,
numbers; lautstark eilen, in großen Mengen
drawers; Hose, Unterhosen. kulusi fitini
eilen. Dodenw kulukulula ka taa. Les
short. short trousers. kurze Hose. Kulusi bɛ
abeilles partirent, se pressant en grand nombre.
The bees left, gathering in great numbers. Die n ju la ka ca, nka kamalen kɔrɔ ka dɔgɔ.
Bienen zogen in großer Zahl los. Nombreux sont les porteurs de pantalons, mais
les vrais gaillards sont rares. (proverbe). There
3 • mettre en déroute; to rout; vernichtend
schlagen. kulukulu
are many people who wear trousers, but the
real guys are rare. (proverb). Viele tragen
kulukuluma [ù-ù-ù-ù-á] variante: kilikilima. Hosen, aber echte Kerle sind selten.
Verbe. trébucher, marcher en titubant (comme (Sprichwort). Category: Clothing.
un fou, comme un ivrogne); to stumble, to synonyme: pantalɔn.
walk staggeringly (like a madman, like a
kulusibɔfana Morphemes: kulusi-bɔ-fana. Nom. plat
drunkard); stolpern, taumeln (wie ein
Verrückter, wie ein Betrunkener). O taatɔ ka
préféré du mari (qui met celui-ci dans de
bonnes dispositions envers son épouse);
kulukuluma ka bin... En partant il se prit à
husband’s favourite dish (which puts him in
trébucher et tomber... As he was leaving he
good dispositions towards his wife);
started to stumble and fall... Als er ging,
Lieblingsgericht des Ehemanns (das ihn in
stolperte er und fiel...
gute Laune mit seiner Frau versetzt). ka kɔɔkɛ
kulukutu 1 [ú] variante: kolokoto, kulukuni. Nom. ka kulusibɔfana bila soju la déposer le plat
1 • sphère, rond, en boule, non ouvert (fruit, préféré du mari au fond de la maison. place the
calebasse); sphere, round, unopened (fruit, husband’s favorite dish at the back of the
gourd); Kugel, rund, ungeöffnet (Obst, house. das Lieblingsgericht des Ehemanns auf
Kalebasse). bara kulukutu calebasse ronde, den Boden legen.
non ouverte. round gourd, unopened. runde kulusida [ù-ù-ì-á] Morphemes: kulusi-da. Nom. le
Kalebasse, ungeöffnet.
haut du pantalon; the top of the pants; die
Category: Mathematics.
Oberseite der Hose. A y'a ka kulusida cɔrin.
2 • ensemble, totalité, entier; whole, totality,
Il a serré le haut de son pantalon. He tightened
entire; Gesamtheit, Ganzes. Danan, a bɛ
the top of his pants. Er zog den oberen Teil
balabala, ka a fara wɔrɔ, ka a dun, a seiner Hose enger.
kulukutunin don. L'igname-guinée, on la fait
kulusigi [ú-ú-ì-í] Morphemes: kulu-sigi. Verbe.
cuire à l'eau, on enlève la peau et on la mange,
classer, ordonner; put into an orderly manner,
comme ça, entièrement. The yam is cooked in
classify, arrange, range; klassieren, ordnen,
water, peeled and eaten, like this, completely.
einordnen, sortieren. Daɲɛw bɛ se ka kulusigi
Die Yamswurzel wird in Wasser gekocht, die
Haut entfernt und dann ganz gegessen. u ɲɛci fɛ. Les mots peuvent être classés selon
3 • enfant; child; Kind. Kulukutu tɛ kegunya leur fonction. Words can be classified
according to their function. Die Wörter
n'a cɛcilen tɛ. Un enfant ne devient pas avisé
können nach ihrer Funktion sortiert werden.
tant qu'il n'a été coupé en deux. (proverbe). A
child does not become wise until it has been kulusijala [ù-ù-ì] Morphemes: kulusi-jala. Nom.
cut in half. (proverb). Ein Kind wird erst cordelière (du pantalon); cord (of the pants);
gewarnt, wenn es in zwei Hälften geschnitten Kordel (von Hosen). ka kulusijala tigɛ uriner
wurde. (Sprichwort). (littéralement : «couper la cordelière»).
kulukutu [ú] Nom. nu, sans rien; naked, with nothing; urinate (literally: «cut the cord»). urinieren
2
(wörtlich: «Seil abschneiden /lösen»).
nackt, ohne nichts, mit nichts. A kana án
kulukutu ja ta ! Qu'il ne nous prenne pas en
photo toutes nues ! Don’t let him take a naked
picture of us! Er soll uns nicht nackt
fotografieren!
kulunin Morphemes: kulu-nin. Nom. colline; hill;
Hügel. Category: Land.
29/01/2026 481

kulusijalasiri kumaden tigɛnin
kulusijalasiri Morphemes: kulusi-jala-siri. Nom. kumabali [ú] Morphemes: kuma-bali. Nom. qui ne
impuissance masculine; male impotence; parle pas, qui parle peu; who doesn't speak,
männliche Impotenz. Kulusijalasiri, o ye who doesn't speak a lot; der nicht spricht, der
bana ye, min bɛ mɔgɔ la cɛya faga. Ni i y'a nicht viel spricht. Mɔgɔ kumabali ye hɔrɔn
mɛn kulusijalasiri, cɛya tɛ wuli, a tɛ se ka ye. Celui qui parle peu est un noble. He who
baara kɛ... L'impuissance masculine, c'est une speaks little is a noble. Wer wenig redet, ist ein
Edelmann.
maladie qui tue la virilité d'un homme : le sexe
n'entre plus en érection, il ne peut plus kumabaliya [ú] Morphemes: kuma-bali-ya. Nom.
fonctionner... Male impotence is a disease that silence, fait de se taire; silence, absence of
kills the manhood of a man: his penis no speaking, shut up, keep still; Stille, das
longer enters into erection, it can no longer Schweigen. Kuma man di, kumabaliya man
function... Die männliche Impotenz ist eine
di. Il n'est pas bon de parler, mais se taire n'est
Krankheit, die die Männlichkeit eines Mannes
pas bon non plus. (proverbe). It is not good to
tötet: sein Glied kommt nicht mehr in
Erektion, es kann nicht mehr funktionieren...
speak, but silence is not good either. (proverb).
Category: Disease.
Es ist nicht gut zu reden, aber auch nicht zu
schweigen. (Sprichwort).
kulusimugu [ù-ù-ì] Morphemes: kulusi-mugu.
kumabaranin [ú-á-á-á-ĩ́] variante: kumabara.
Nom. pantalon ample, fond du pantalon; loose
Nom. micro; microphone; Mikrophon.
pants, bottom of the pants; weite Hose,
Hosenboden. kulusimuguba grand pantalon
Category: Machine.
bouffant. big puffy pants. große weite Hosen. kumabatigi [ú] Morphemes: kuma-ba-tigi. Nom.
Category: Clothing. 1 • personne qui discute beaucoup et
kulusininfili [ù-ù-ì-ì] variante: kulusininfilen. inutilement; person who talks a lot and
unnecessarily; Person, die viel und
Nom. espèce de plante, pignon d'Inde,
unnötigerweise redet.
pourguère; purging nut tree;
Purgiernussbaum. Category: Bush, shrub.
2 • grand parleur; big talker, talk jockey;
großer Redner.
jaetropha curcas. synonyme: muluku.
2
3 • personne aux paroles de poids; person with
kuluwo [ù-ù-ó] Nom. grotte, caverne; cave, cavern; words of weight; Person mit Worten von
Grotte, Höhle. A donna kuluwo la... Il entra Gewicht.
dans la grotte... He entered the cave... Er ging kumabolo [ú] Morphemes: kuma-bolo. Nom.
in die Höhle... synonyme: farawo.
chapitre, article; chapter, article; Kapitel,
kuma [ú-á] Nom. parole, discours, discussion; word, Artikel. kumabolo fɔlɔ premier chapitre. first
1
what is spoken; Wort, Rede, Diskussion, chapter. erstes Kapitel. A bɛ kumabolow ni
Aussprache. Kuma b'i bolo. Tu as la parole. poyiw sɛbɛn. Il écrit des articles et des
It’s your turn to speak. Du hast jetzt das Wort. poèmes. He writes articles and poems. Er
Jɔn bɛ kuma ta ? Qui va prendre la parole ? schreibt Artikel und Gedichte.
Who will speak? Wer wir das Wort ergreifen? kumabɔ [ú] Morphemes: kuma-bɔ. Verbe. avertir,
Ala ka kuma Parole de Dieu. Word of God.
prévenir, informer; inform, tell; informieren,
Das Wort Gottes. Kuma dɔ bɛ, min tɛ sagen. Taa gatigiw kumabɔ ! Va prévenir les
mɔgɔkɔrɔba dadonkuma ye. Il y a des chefs de familles. Go and warn the heads of
conversations où les vieux n'ont pas leur mot à families. Gehen Sie und warnen Sie die
dire. (proverbe). There are conversations Familienoberhäupter.
where old people don’t have a say. (proverb).
kumadegikalan [ú] synonyme: kumaɲɔgɔnya.
Es gibt Gespräche, bei denen die alten
Nom. dialogue; dialogue; Dialog.
Menschen kein Mitspracherecht haben.
(Sprichwort). synonyme: manfila , jɛmukan. kumaden [ú-á-ẽ́] Morphemes: kuma-den. Nom.
1
kuma [ú-á] vi. parler; speak, talk; sprechen, reden. A 1 • mot, parole; word; Wort. kumaden
2
kumana n fɛ. Il m’a parlé. He spoke to me. Er
dorokolen mot composé. compound word.
zusammengesetztes Wort.
hat mit mir gesprochen. U kumana a fɛ. Ils lui
Category: Grammar. synonyme: daɲɛ, kalima.
ont parlé. They talked to him. Sie haben mit
ihm gesprochen. 2 • morphème; morpheme; Morphem.
kuma ɲɔgɔn fɛ expr. communiquer; communicate; kumaden tigɛnin morphème discontinue;
kommunizieren. discontinuous morpheme; diskontinuierliches
Morphem. Category: Grammar.
29/01/2026 482

kumadengafe kumalɔnanw
kumadengafe Nom. lexique, dictionnaire; lexicon, 2 • demande, vœu; request, wish; Bitte,
Wunsch. Ala fana y'a ka kumakan laabi...
glossary, vocabulary, dictionary; Wörterbuch,
Lexikon. Category: Learn. Dieu exauça sa demande... God granted her
synonyme: daɲɛgafeba.
request... Gott erhörte seine Bitte...
3 • langage, manière de parler; language, way
kumadonso [ú] Morphemes: kuma-donso. Nom.
of speaking; Sprache, Sprechweise. ... u bɛ u
maître de la parole, connaisseur de la parole; kumakanw majigin... ... ils ont des façons de
master at speaking; Sprechkünstler,
parler très humbles... ... they have very humble
Sprachgewandt. Kumadonso ko ni kogo
ways of speaking... ...sie haben eine sehr
pɛrɛnna, basa bɛ don a fɛ. Les maîtres de la bescheidene Art zu sprechen...
parole disent que si le mur se fend, les
kumakɛla [ú] Morphemes: kuma-kɛ-la.
margouillats y passent. The masters of speech
say that if the wall cracks, the lizards pass variante: kumala. Nom. 1 • celui qui parle; the
through. Die Meister des Wortes sagen, wenn one who speaks; derjenige, der spricht.
die Mauer aufbricht, gehen die Echsen durch. 2 • beau parleur; smooth talker, sweet talker;
kumafɛn [ú] Nom. tubercules (pomme de terre, geschmeidiger Redner,, Schwätzer. Ale ye
kumakɛla yɛrɛ de ye. Lui, c'est vraiment un
igname, manioc...); tubers (potato, yam,
cassava...); Knollen (Kartoffeln, beau parleur. He’s a really good talker. Er ist
Yamswurzeln, Maniok...) Category: Types of wirklich ein guter Redner.
food. kumakɔnɔman n.comp. métaphore; metaphor;
kumagwɛlɛn variante: kumagwɛlɛ. Nom. Metapher. Category: Grammar.
recommandation; recommendation; kumakuma [ú] Verbe. 1 • bégayer; stutter, stammer;
Empfehlung, Vorschlag.
stottern. synonyme: kaka , susu, sigisigi .
1 3 2
kumagwɛlɛya comparer: fɔ ka gwɛlɛya. vi.
2 • délire, parler comme un fou; delirious,
recommander; advice, recommend; anraten, delirium, talking like a madman; reden wie ein
Ratschlag geben, empfehlen. Verrückter.
synonyme: komagɛlɛya.
3 • parler sans arrêt; talking non-stop;
kumajeli [ú] Morphemes: kuma-jeli. Nom. ununterbrochen reden. Fatɔ bɛ kumakuma.
1 • personne qui répercute les paroles, qui fait Le fou parle sans arrêt. The madman talks
les annonces; person who will pass on the non-stop. Der Verrückte redet
ununterbrochen.
words, who makes the announcements;
Person, die die Worte weitergibt, die Anzeigen kumalasela [ú] Morphemes: kuma-lase-la. Nom.
macht.
porte-parole, représentant; spokesperson,
2 • porte-parole; spokesperson, spokesman; spokesman, representative, delegate;
Sprecher, Sprecherin. Wortführer, Sprachrohr, Pressesprecher,
kumajɛnsɛnnan Morphemes: kuma-jɛnsɛn-nan. Vertreter, Stellvertreter, Repräsentant.
Nom. haut-parleur; loud speaker; Lautsprecher.
bagandɔkɔtɔrɔw ka kumalasela le
synonyme: kankɔrɔtalan. porte-parole des vétérinaires. the
veterinarians' spokesperson. der Sprecher der
kumajuru [ú] Morphemes: kuma-juru. Nom. Tierärzte.
téléphone; telephone, phone; Telefon. kumalaseta [ú-á-á-é-á] synonyme: koɲɛfɔli,
synonyme: jufalatelefɔni, telefɔni, pɔritabulu,
koɲɛyirali. n.comp. message, déclaration;
nɛgɛjuru.
message, declaration; Botschaft, Meldung,
kumakan [ú-á-á] n.comp. 1 • voix, son de la voix, Mitteilung.
parole, propos, avis; voice, sound of voice, kumalasigi [ú] Morphemes: kuma-la-sigi. Nom.
word, speech, comments, opinion; stimme,
palabre, convocation, réunion; discussion,
Klang der Stimme, Wort, Rede, Ansprache,
convocation, summons, meeting to talk things
Meinung, Ansicht. N ye Musa kumakan mɛn.
through; Diskussion, Vorladung zum
J'ai entendu la voix de Moussa. I heard Gespräch.
Moussa's voice. Ich hörte Moussas Stimme.
kumalasurunya la n.comp. en résumé; in summary;
Hɔrɔn jakisii ni a karafe ye a kumakan ye.
zusammenfassend, Zusammenfassung.
Les paroles du noble sont sa crinière et son
mors. (proverbe). The words of the noble are kumalɔnanw n.comp. ponctuation; punctuation;
his mane and his jaw. (proverb). Die Worte Satzzeichen. Category: Grammar.
des Adligen sind seine Mähne und sein Maul.
(Sprichwort).
29/01/2026 483

kumamayɛlɛma kumasenbolo dulonnin dafata
kumamayɛlɛma kumaɲɔgɔnya
[ú] Morphemes: kuma-ma-yɛlɛma. Nom. [ú-á-ɔ́-ɔ ́-á] Morphemes: kuma-ɲɔgɔn-ya.
mauvaise transmission d'un message; poor Nom. 1 • dialoguer, communiquer, négocier, se
transmission of a message; schlechte parler, discuter, se concerter; discuss, talk
Übermittlung einer Nachricht. together, confer; verhandeln, sich beraten,
kumamugu [ú] Morphemes: kuma-mugu. Nom. besprechen. U bɛ ɲɔgɔn kumaɲɔgɔnya. Ils se
parlent entre eux. They talk to each other. Sie
paroles trop nombreuses, parlottes; too many
reden miteinander.
words, chatter; zu viele Worte, Geschwätz.
Kumamugu banna, baara tuma sera. Le 2 • discussion, dialogue, communication;
discussion, dialogue, communication;
temps des paroles est terminé, est temps de
Diskussion, Dialog, Mitteilung,
travailler. The time of words is over, it’s time
Kommunikation.
to work. Die Zeit der Worte ist vorbei, es ist
Zeit zu arbeiten. kumaɲɔgɔnyasira expr. voie de communication;
kumanan [ú] Morphemes: kuma-nan. Nom. micro, communication channel, channel of
communication; Kommunikationsweg,
microphone; microphone; Mikrofon.
Verbindungsweg.
synonyme: kankɔrɔtalan.
kumasen [ú-á-ẽ́] Morphemes: kuma-sen. Nom.
kumanci Morphemes: kuma-nci. Nom. beau parleur,
1 • phrase, énoncé; phrase, sentence; Satz,
bavard; talker, chatty, smooth talker,
Aussage. Kumasen fila bɛɛ kɔrɔ ye kelen ye.
chatterbox; gesprächiger Mensch,
Les deux phrases ont le même sens. Both
geschmeidiger Redner. Kumanci ka ca,
phrases mean the same thing. Beide Sätze
walenci de ka dɔgɔ. Les bons parleurs sont haben den gleichen Sinn. kumasen ganan,
nombreux, ce sont les gens efficaces qui
kumasen sogolonnen phrase simple, phrase
manquent. (proverbes). There are many good
complexe. simple sentence, complex sentence.
speakers, but there is a lack of effective people.
einfacher Satz, komplexer Satz.
(proverbs). Es gibt viele gute Redner, aber
Category: Grammar.
effiziente Menschen fehlen. (Sprichwörter).
2 • sujet d'un discours, centre du sujet, vif du
kumandan [ú] Emprunt de : français. Nom. propos, fond d'un discours; subject of a speech,
gouverneur, commandant; Governor, center of the subject, heart of the subject,
Commander-in-Chief; Gouverneur, substance of a speech; Thema der Diskussion,
Kommandant. Ni i ye i den kɛ kumandan ye, Thema einer Rede, Mittelpunkt des Themas,
i bɛ nisɔngɔ sara a ye. Si tu fais de ton fils un Kernpunkt, Inhalt einer Rede. Kumasenw
commandant, tu lui paieras l'impôt. (proverbe). kɛra jiri nafa ye. On aborda le sujet de l'utilité
If you make your son a commander, you will des arbres. The topic of the usefulness of trees
pay his tax. (proverb). Wenn du deinen Sohn was discussed. Wir haben die Nützlichkeit von
zum Kommandanten machst, zahlst du ihm die Bäumen angesprochen.
Steuer. (Sprichwort). Category: Government,
kumasen mabɛn construction de phrase; sentence
Worker, occupation.
construction; Satzaufbau, Satzkonstruktion.
kumanfɛnɔna Nom. deuxième personne; second Category: Grammar.
person; zweite Person. Category: Grammar.
kumasen sigicogo syntaxe; syntax; Syntax,
kumaɲabila variante: kumaɲɛbila. n.comp. avant Satzlehre. Category: Grammar.
propos, préface; preface, foreword, prologue;
kumasenbolo Morphemes: kuma-sen-bolo. Nom.
Vorwort, Prolog. Category: Grammar.
proposition; clause; Satzteil. Karamɔgɔ bɛ
kumaɲɛbila [ú] variante: kumaɲabila. n.comp.
kumasenbolo fɔlɔ cɔrɔci... Le maître
préface, avant-propos; preface, foreword,
souligne la première proposition... The teacher
prologue; Vorwort, Prolog, Einführung.
underlines the first proposition... Der Lehrer
Category: Grammar.
unterstreicht den ersten Satzteil...
kumaɲɔgɔn [ú] Morphemes: kuma-ɲɔgɔn. Nom. Category: Grammar.
interlocuteur; interlocutor, contact person, kumasenbolo dafanin n.comp. proposition
discussion partner; Gesprächspartner,
indépendante; independent sentence;
Ansprechperson.
unabhängiger Satz. Category: Grammar.
kumasenbolo dulonnin dafata n.comp.
proposition subordonnée complétive;
subordinated completive sentence;
untergeordneter ergänzungs Nebensatz.
Category: Grammar.
29/01/2026 484

kumasenbolo dulonnin tuguta kumunbafura
kumasenbolo dulonnin tuguta n.comp. kumuda synonyme: kungoforokofaraka. Nom. espèce
proposition subordonnée relative; de plante à tige grimpante; kind of plant
subordinated relative sentence; climbing stems; Pflanze (Art) die sich
untergeordneter Relativsatz. hoch-kriecht. Category: Grass, herb, vine.
Category: Grammar. ampelocissus leonensis / pelocissus leonensis.
kumasenbolo fɔlɔ n.comp. proposition principale; kumulan variante: kumunan. Nom. élément acidifiant
main sentence; Hauptsatz. (citron, tamarin, vinaigre ...), ferment;
Category: Grammar. acidifying agent (lemon, vinegar ...);
kumasenbolo tugunin n.comp. proposition
Säuerungsmittel (Zitrone, Essig ...)
coordonnée; coordinate sentence; kumuli [ù-ù-í] Nom. fermentation; fermentation;
koordinierter Satz. Category: Grammar. Gärung.
kumasenjɔnjɔn [ú] n.comp. phrase clé; key sentence; kumuman Nom. aigre, tourné; sour, acid; sauer,
Schlüsselsatz. Category: Grammar. säuerlich. synonyme: kumunman.
kumasenkun [ú] Morphemes: kuma-sen-kun. kumun [ù] variante: kumu. 1 • adj.pred. aigre, caillé,
1
Nom. sujet; subject; Subjekt. ... kumasenkun tourner (nourriture); sour, curdled; sauer.
ni dafa cɛ. ... entre le sujet et le complément nɔnɔ kumu lait aigre. sour milk. saure Milch.
d'objet. ... between subject and object 2 • Nom. produit acidifiant, acide; acid,
complement. ... zwischen dem Subjekt und der acidifying product; Säure, Säuerungsmittel.
Gegenstandsergänzung. Category: Grammar. Lenburu kumunnen ntonton. Le citron est
kumasensigi n.comp. syntaxe; syntax, grammar; très, très acide ! Lemon is very, very acidic!
Syntax, Satzlehre, Grammatik.
Zitrone ist sehr, sehr sauer!
Category: Grammar. 3 • Nom. agacer (par acidité); to irritate (by
kumasensugu [ú] Morphemes: kuma-sen-sugu.
acidity); irritieren (durch Säure). Nto i de ye n
ɲin kumun. Le jus de tamarin m'a agacé les
n.comp. type de phrase; type of sentence;
Satzart. Category: Grammar.
dents. The tamarind juice made my teeth
irritated. Der Tamarindensaft hat meine
kumasentugulan
Zähne gereizt.
[ú] Morphemes: kuma-sen-tugu-lan. Nom. 4 • Nom. tourner (nourriture), fermenter; turn
conjonction; conjunction; Konjunktion, (food), ferment; drehen (Essen), gären. Dɛgɛ
Bindewort. Kalandenw bɛ kumasen dɔ dilan bɛ kumun mɔgɔkɔrɔminɛn kɔnɔ. Dans le
ni kumasentugulan «sabu» ye. Les élèves récipient d'un vieux, la bouille fermente.
construisent dune phrase en utilisant la (proverbe). In an old man's container, the
conjonction «sabu». Students construct a mush ferments. (proverb). In einem Behälter
sentence using the conjunction “sabu”. Die eines alten Mannes gärt der Brei. (Sprichwort).
Schüler bilden einen Satz mit der Konjunktion
kumun [ù] 1 • Verbe. endolorir, donner des
„sabu“. Category: Grammar. 2
synonyme: kalansonan.
courbatures, faire souffrir; to ache, to make
stiff, to cause pain; Schmerz verursachen,
kumatala [ú] Morphemes: kuma-ta-la. Nom. schmerzen. Baara suguya bɛɛ bɛ kolo ani
orateur, celui qui a la parole; speaker; Redner. sogo kumun. Tous les travaux font souffrir
Category: Worker, occupation. les os et la chair. All work hurts the bones and
kumatasɛbɛn Morphemes: kuma-ta-sɛbɛn. flesh. Die ganze Arbeit tut den Knochen und
dem Fleisch weh.
variante: tumɛtumɛ. Nom. compte rendu;
2 • Verbe. être fâché, faire la tête; to be angry,
report, review; Bericht, Protokoll.
to sulk; wütend sein, schmollen. A ɲɛ
kumayɛlɛma Morphemes: kuma-yɛlɛma. n.comp.
kumunna bi. Elle est fâchée aujourd'hui. She
déformation de propos; deformation of
is angry today. Sie ist heute wütend.
comments; Entstellung der Aussagen.
synonyme: funun.
kumekume 1 Nom. vanneau à tête noire; Black-headed 3 • Nom. courbature, douleur; aches, pain;
plover; Vogelart. Category: Bird. vanellus Schmerzen.
tectus.
kumunbafura [ù-ù-à] variante: kumunba. Nom.
kumekume 2 synonyme: tumɛtumɛ. Nom. vanneau arbuste (espèce de); shrub (species of);
armé; Spur-winged Plover; Vogelart. Strauch Art. Category: Bush, shrub. pavetta
Category: Bird. vanellus spinosus. crassipes.
kumu [ù-ù] vi. fermenter; ferment; säuren, zur
Gärung bringen, fermentieren.
29/01/2026 485

kumunda kun
kumunda Nom. plante à tige grimpante (espèce de); kun [ù] postp. sur, pour, à, vers, chez, avec, contre
1
climbing plant (species of); Kletterpflanze (valeurs : possession sur soi, charge,
(Art). Category: Bush, shrub. ampelocissus responsabilité, profit, bénéfice, contact); on,
seonensis. for, to, towards, at, with, against (values:
kumunman Nom. aigre, tourné; spoiled, sour, unfit
possession on oneself, charge, responsibility,
profit, benefit, contact); auf, für, bei, in
for consumption food; sauer, ungenießbar zum
Richtung, bei, mit, gegen (Werte: Selbstbesitz,
Verzehr. kumunmanfɛn nourriture aigre, Verantwortung, Verantwortung, Gewinn,
tournée, impropre à la consommation. sour Nutzen, Kontakt). Wari tɛ n kun. Je n'ai pas
food, spoiled, unfit for consumption food.
d'argent sur moi. I don't have any money with
saures Essen, ungenießbar zum Verzehr.
me. Ich habe kein Geld auf mir. Tulo bɛ dɛnɛn
synonyme: kumuman.
kun. Les murs ont des oreilles. (proverbe).
kumunnan [ù-ù] Morphemes: kumun-nan. Nom. Walls have ears. (proverb). Die Wände haben
1 • élément acidifiant (citron, tamarin, Ohren. (Sprichwort). A' y'a kɛ n kun. Faites
vinaigre...); acidifying element (lemon, [de la musique] pour moi. Make [music] for
tamarind, vinegar, etc.); säuerndes Element me. Macht [Musik] für mich. ka kalan kɛ
(Zitrone, Tamarinde, Essig usw.) kumunnan mɔgɔ kun donner un cours à quelqu'un. Teach
2 • produit piquant; spicy product; würziges a class. jemanden unterrichten. Ni ɲɔ fyɛra su
Produkt. Kumunnan kɛra mɔni la wa ? Est-ce
fɛ, janfa donna syɛw kun. Vanner le mil la
qu'on a mis du piquant dans la bouille ? Did we
nuit, c'est trahir les poules. (proverbe).
put some spice in the porridge? Haben wir den
Winnowing millet at night is betraying the
Brei gewürzt?
chickens. (proverb). Nachts Hirse zu sichten
3 • ferment, levure; ferment, yeast; Ferment, bedeutet, die Hühner zu verraten.
Hefe. (Sprichwort). Muso saba b'a kun. Il a trois
kumunya [ù-ù] Jula: kumuya. 1 • Verbe. cailler, femmes à charge. He has three wives to
tourner, être ou devenir acide; curdle, clot, be support. Er hat drei abhängige Ehefrauen.
sour or become sour; gerinnen, übergehen, kun [ṹ] Verbe. 1 • supporter, tolérer, accepter,
2
sauer werden oder sauer sein. Dɛgɛ in ka
s'entendre avec quelqu'un, résister à; bear
kumunya man bon. Ce «dèguè» n'est pas with, endure, tolerate, accept, resist; ertragen,
bien caillé. This "dèguè" is not very curdled. tolerieren, annehmen, akzeptieren,
Dieses „Dèguè“ ist nicht gut geronnen. auskommen mit jemanden,, widerstehen. ...
2 • Nom. aigreur, acidité; bitterness, sourness, n'án y'a fɔ u ɲɛna, dɔw b'a kun, dɔw t'a kun.
acidity, tartness; Säure, Bitterkeit, ... si on le leur dit, certains le supportent,
Säuregehalt. Da ni kumunya bɛ falen. d'autres non. ...if you tell them, some can
L'hibiscus croît avec son acidité. (proverbe). handle it, some can't. ... wenn man es ihnen
Hibiscus grows with its acidity. (proverb). Der sagt, können einige das ertragen, andere nicht.
Hibiskus wächst mit seiner Säure. Faama fila tɛ kun wolo kelen kan. Deux rois
(Sprichwort). ne peuvent être ensemble sur une seule peau.
(proverbe). Two kings cannot be together on
one skin ? throne. (proverb). Zwei Könige
können nicht zusammen auf einer Haut / Thron
sein. (Sprichwort). Ne ni cɛ wɛrɛ tɛ kun furu
la. Je ne pourrai m'entendre avec un autre
époux. I won't be able to get along with
another husband. Ich werde mit einem
anderen Ehepartner nicht klarkommen. ... olu
bɛ ja kun... ... ceux-là résistent à la
sécheresse... ...these are drought resistant...
...diese widerstehen der Dürre...
2 • contenir; contain, hold; enthalten. Mɔgɔ
tan tɛ se ka kun so in kɔnɔ. Dix hommes ne
peuvent tenir dans cette maison. Ten men can’t
fit in this house. Zehn Männer passen nicht in
dieses Haus.
29/01/2026 486

kun kunakunabara
3 • posséder, avoir; to own, to have; besitzen, 6 • énergique, qui mène les autres; energetic,
haben. Ni mugan kunra min na, o b'o di u leading others; voller Energie, die andere
ma... Celui qui a cent francs, il les leur führt. musokun une femme énergique, une
donne... He who has a hundred francs, he meneuse. an energetic woman, a leader. eine
gives them to them... Wer hundert Francs hat, energische Frau, eine Anführerin.
der gibt sie ihnen... kun [ù] Nom. initiative, de son propre chef, au
5
kun [ṹ] Verbe. rejoindre, rattraper; meet up with, hasard, à l'aventure; initiative, on its own, at
3
catch up with, join; einholen, treffen mit, random, in adventure; Eigeninitiative, Zufall,
anschliessen, angliedern, stossen zu. N'á Abenteuer. O tɛ kɛ án kun fɛ ten o ! Cela ne
kunna a la yɔrɔ min ... Là où vous le se fait pas ainsi, au hasard ! This is not done at
rejoignez ... There where you will meet up with
random! Das geschieht nicht zufällig! Mɔgɔ si
him ... Wo ihr ihn einholen werdet ... ... i tɛ tɛ se ka donsoya kɛ i kun fɛ dɛ ! Personne ne
kun tɔw la tugun. ... tu ne peux plus rattraper peut chasser à sa propre initiative. No one can
les autres. ... you can’t catch up with the
hunt on their own initiative. Niemand darf aus
others. ... du kannst die anderen nicht mehr
eigener Initiative jagen. A taara a kun fɛ. Il
einholen. est parti au hasard. ( et: « à l'aventure » , sans
l'accord des parents...) He left randomly. (and:
kun [ù] Jula: kuun. Nom. 1 • tête, bout, extrémité,
4 "on an adventure", without the parents'
sommet; head, tip, end, extremity, peak, top; consent...) Er ging aufs Geratewohl. (und:
Kopf, Spitze, Gipfel. k'i kun munumunu „Abenteuer“, ohne Zustimmung der Eltern...)
tourner la tête. turn your head. den Kopf Fura tɛ ta kun fɛ. Un médicament, ça ne se
drehen. Juru kun filɛ nin ye. Voici le bout de prend pas n'importe comment. You can't take
la corde. Here is the end of the rope. Hier ist medicine just anyhow. Medikamente können
das Ende des Seils. Category: Body, Parts of nicht einfach so eingenommen werden.
an animal. kun fɔ vt. justifier; justify; rechtfertigen.
2 • début, partie; beginning, part; Anfang, Teil.
su kun fɔlɔ au début de la nuit. at the kuna 1 [ú-á] synonyme: kunaman. Nom. lèpre
beginning of the night. zu Beginn der Nacht. A (amputant); leprosy (amputating); Lepra
y'a ka kalan kun fɔlɔw kɛ... Il a fait la
(amputierend). Kuna ye bana ye min bi
première partie de ses études... He did the hadamaden bolokunnaden n'a seen
first part of his studies... Den ersten Teil seines tigɛtigɛ. La lèpre est une maladie qui fait
Studiums absolvierte er... a kun fɔlɔ perdre les doigts et les pieds aux gens. Leprosy
premièrement. first of all, in the first place. is an illness in which people lose fingers and
erstens. feet. Lepra ist eine Krankheit bei der der
Betroffene die Finger und die Füsse verliert.
3 • raison, sens, objectif, but, sujet, problème;
reason, sense, motive, objective, aim, problem, Category: Disease.
issue; Grund, Motiv, Ziel, Problem. N nana kuna [ú] synonyme: kunakala. Nom. espèce d'arbre;
2
nin kun in na. Je suis venu pour cette kind of tree; Baumart. Category: Tree.
raison-ci. I came for this reason. Ich bin aus stropahtus sarmentosus.
diesem Grund gekommen. Kun si t'o la. Ça kunakala [ú] variante: kuna. Nom. 1 • espèce d'arbre;
n'a pas de sens. It doesn't make sense. Es
kind of tree; Baumart. Category: Tree.
macht keinen Sinn. N ka bataki in kun stropahtus sarmentosus.
filanan... Le deuxième sujet de ma lettre... The 2 • poison tiré de cette plante; poison made
second subject of my letter... Das zweite from this plant; Gift von dieser Pflanze.
Thema meines Briefes... U ye ɲɔgɔn ye
kunakunabara variante: kunankunanbara. Nom.
kalansow kun kan. Ils se sont rencontrés à
vésicule biliaire; gall bladder; Gallenblase.
propos du problème des classes. They met
Category: Body, Parts of an animal.
about the class problem. Sie trafen sich über
synonyme: kaliyakuru.
das Klassenproblem.
4 • chance, manière, façon; luck, manner;
Glück, Art und Weise. Kun fila b'o la. Il a
deux façons. It has two ways. Es hat zwei
Möglichkeiten.
5 • morceau, part, partie, côté; part, bit, side,
piece of ; Teil, Stück. safɛnɛkun morceau de
savon. piece of soap. Stück Seife.
29/01/2026 487

kunan kunaya
kunan [ú-á] adj.pred. 1 • être amer, piquant; to be kunanɲɔ [ú] Morphemes: kunan-ɲɔ. Nom. liane
1
bitter, piquant, prickly; bitter sein, sauer sein, grimpante (espèce de); climbing vine (species
scharf, pikant, beissend. Nin fura in ka of); Kletterliane (Art von). Category: Grass,
kunan. Ce remède est amer. This remedy is herb, vine. strophanthus hispidus.
bitter. Dieses Mittel ist bitter. Kabini kɛlɛkɛlɛ kunanya [ú] Morphemes: kunan-ya. 1 • Verbe.
geren, a ka kunan. Alors qu'il est encore vert, rendre amer; make bitter; bitter machen.
déjà le piment est piquant. (proverbe). While it 2 • Verbe. aggraver, devenir désagréable; to
is still green, the pepper is already spicy. aggravate, to become unpleasant;
(proverb). Während es noch grün ist, ist das verschlimmern, unangenehm werden. A ka
Chili schon scharf. (Sprichwort). diɲɛnatigɛ kunanyara. Sa situation s'est
synonyme: kunanman.
aggravée. His situation worsened. Seine
2 • désagréable, dur, pénible, difficile; Situation verschlechterte sich. A ka kuma
unpleasant, hard, painful, difficult;
kunanyara. Ses paroles sont devenues
unangenehm, unschön, schmerzhaft, mühsam.
désagréables. His words became unpleasant.
Cɛ in ka kunan. Ce type-là est désagréable. (:
Seine Worte wurden unangenehm.
« il n'aime pas les gens »). This guy is
3 • Nom. amertume, avarice; bitterness, greed;
unpleasant. (: «he doesn’t like people»).
Bitterkeit, Gier. synonyme: tɛgɛmagɛlɛnya.
Dieser Typ ist unangenehm. (:«er mag keine
Menschen»). Sɛgɛn ka kunan ni fɛn bɛɛ ye. kunasini [ú-à-í-ì] Nom. avant-hier; day before
La pauvreté est plus dure que tout. (proverbe). yesterday; vorgestern. Musa nana kunasini.
Poverty is harder than anything. (proverb). Moussa est venu avant-hier. Moussa came the
Armut ist härter als alles. (Sprichwort). ji day before yesterday. Moussa ist vorgestern
kunan eau impropre à la consommation. gekommen. synonyme: kunasininko.
water unfit for consumption. nicht trinkbares
kunasininko variante: kunasiniwo. Nom. avant-hier;
Wasser.
the day before yesterday; vorgestern. Ne nana
3 • avare; stingy; geizig. ... a ka kunan, a
bolofɛn tɛ sɔrɔ. ... il est avare, il ne donne
kabini kunasininko ! Je suis arrivé depuis
avant-hier ! I arrived the day before yesterday!
rien. ... he is stingy, he gives nothing. ... er ist
Ich bin vorgestern angekommen!
geizig, er gibt nichts.
synonyme: kununasini, kunasini.
kunan Nom. écuelle en bois, plat en bois; bowl; Napf.
2
kunatɔ [ú-á-ɔ́] Nom. lépreux; leper; Leprakranker. Ni
Denmisɛnw bɛɛ nana u koori kunan na.
i ye kunatɔ muso ye ka kale da, a ɲɛ bɛ
Tous les enfants sont venus se mettre autour du
plat. All the children came to sit around the mɔgɔ wɛrɛ la. Si tu vois l'épouse du lépreux se
dish. Alle Kinder kamen, um sich um den farder, c'est qu'elle convoite un autre homme.
Teller zu setzen. Category: Container. (proverbe). If you see the leper's wife wearing
makeup, it means she desires another man.
kunanjɛ [ù-ǎ-ɛ́] Jula: kunangwɛ.
(proverb). Wenn Sie sehen, wie die Frau des
Morphemes: kunan-jɛ. Nom. aigrette; egret; Aussätzigen sich schminkt, dann deshalb, weil
Seidenreiher. Category: Bird. sie einen anderen Mann begehrt. (Sprichwort).
synonyme: bosonkunanjɛ. Category: Disease.
kunankunanbara variante: kunakunabara. Nom. kunatɔbana [ú-á-ɔ́-á-á] Nom. lèpre (maladie);
vésicule biliaire; gall bladder; Gallenblase. leprosy; Lepra. Category: Disease.
Category: Body. synonyme: kaliyakuru. kunatɔya [ú] Morphemes: kuna-tɔ-ya. Nom. lèpre,
kunankunanbilen Jula: kunakunabilen. Nom. état de lépreux; leprosy; Lepra, Aussatz.
espèce d'arbre; kind of tree; Baumart. Category: Disease.
Category: Tree. ekebergia senegalensis. kunawolo n.comp. succès; success; Erfolg.
kunanman See main entry: .[ú-á-à] Jula: kunaman. kunaya [ú-ú-á] Nom. amertume; bitterness;
adj. amer; bitter; bitter. A ko o kunanman, o Bitterkeit.
de ye saankoji ye. Il dit : « Cette eau amère,
c'est de l'eau de pluie de l'an dernier. ». He
says, "This bitter water is last year’s
rainwater." Er sagt: «Dieses bittere Wasser ist
das Regenwasser vom letzten Jahr.».
synonyme: kunan .
1
29/01/2026 488

kunba kunberekurufolo
kunba [ũ-̀ á] synonyme: bon. adj.pred. 1 • être gros, 2 • Nom. rondeur, grosseur; roundness, curve,
thickness; Rundungen, Kurven. Kumbaman
grand, important, costaud; to be fat, big,
important, strong; fett sein, gross, wichtig, saba kɛra a la. Elle avait trois rondeurs. She
stark. Jɛgɛ kunba bɛ balo jɛgɛ misɛnw na. had three curves. Sie hatte drei Rundungen.
Les gros poissons se nourrissent des petits. kunbaya [ù-à-á] 1 • Nom. grosseur, volume;
(proverbe). Big fish feed on small fish.
thickness, size, volume; Grösse, Volumen.
(proverb). Die großen Fische ernähren sich
2 • Verbe. être ou devenir plus grand, gros,
von den kleinen. (Sprichwort). A ka ko ka
important, être plus grave; to be or to become
kunba... C'est quelqu'un d'important... He’s
bigger, thicker, more important, be more
an important man... Er ist ein wichtiger... serious, be worse; größer sein oder größer
2 • entier; whole; ganze, gesamt. San kunba werden, dicker, wichtiger, ernster sein. A kala
ani kalo saba... Une année entière et trois kunbayara. Les tiges grossirent. The stems
mois... A whole year and three months... Ein grew larger. Die Stiele wurden größer. O ko
ganzes Jahr und drei Monate... kunbayara koyi ! Cette affaire est devenue
3 • principal, essentiel; main, principal, très grave ! This matter has become very
essential; Hauptteil, die Hauptsache, das serious! Diese Sache ist sehr ernst geworden!
Wesentliche. boloci kunba. Les vaccinations
kunbere [ú] Nom. 1 • genou; knee; Knie. A bɛ coron
essentielles. The main vaccinations. Die
wesentlichen Impfungen. mugu la, fo a kunbere... Elle enfonce dans la
poudre jusqu’aux genoux... It sinks in the
kunbaba [ù-à-á] Morphemes: kun-ba-ba. Nom.
powder up to the knees... Sie dringt in den
essentiel, principal, le plus important; Staub bis zu den Knien... synonyme: kunbiri.
essential, central, principal, main, primary,
2 • sexe masculin; penis, male private parts;
most important; Kernstück, Hauptpunkt, das
Wichtigste, die Hauptsache. gɛlɛyaw la
das männliche Geschlecht. Kun bɛ di, nka
kunbaba la principale difficulté. the main
kunbere tɛ di. On rase la tête, mais pas le
difficulty / the main challenge. die größte
genou. (et: « mais pas le sexe ») (proverbe).
Schwierigkeit / die größte Herausforderung.
Shave the head but not the knee. (and: “but not
the sexual parts”) (proverb). Man rasiert den
kunbabafɔ n.comp. récapitulatif; summary of the main Kopf, aber nicht das Knie. (und: «aber nicht
points, summary table; Zusammenfassung. das Geschlechtsorgan») (Sprichwort).
kunbaben [ũ̀-à-ẽ́] n.comp. maux de têtes très kunberekun [ú] Morphemes: kunbere-kun. Nom.
violentes; very bad headaches; sehr schwere genou; knee; Knie. A y'a kunberekun bɛ ka
Kopfschmerzen. Category: Disease. dugu minɛ... Elle mit le genou à terre... She
synonyme: kunkolodimin, kundimi. knelt down... Sie kniete nieder...
kunbakunba [ù-á-ù-á] Nom. essentiel, très kunberekuru [ú] Morphemes: kunbere-kuru.
important; essential, very important; variante: kunberekurufilennin. Nom. rotule,
wesentlich, sehr wichtig. maana genou, articulation du genou; patella, knee,
kunbakunba l'essentiel du récit. The essence knee joint; Kniescheibe, Knie, Kniegelenk. Ni
of the story. Das Wesentliche der Erzählung. i ye daga sigi i kunberekuru kan, Ala b'a
kunbalan [ù] Nom. 1 • problème, obstacle, ennuis, lase i kun. Si tu installes le canari sur tes
embarras; problem, obstacle, troubles, genoux, Dieu va le faire parvenir sur la tête.
embarrassment; Problem, Hindernis, (proverbe). If you put the jar on your knees,
Schwierigkeiten. k'i don kunbalan na se God will send it on your head. (proverb).
mettre dans les ennuis. get into trouble. in
Wenn du den Krug auf dein Knie legst, wird
Gott ihn auf den Kopf bringen. (Sprichwort).
Schwierigkeiten geraten / sich in
Schwierigkeiten bringen. synonyme: kunbirikuru.
2 • ennuyer, embêter; bore, bother, annoy; kunberekurufolo
langweilen, stören, ärgern, belästigen, plagen.
[ú] Morphemes: kunbere-kuru-folo. Nom.
I kana n kunbalan dɛ ! Ne viens pas
gonarthrose (maladie du genou); gonarthrosis
m’embêter ! Don’t bother me! Komm nicht
(knee disease); Gonarthrose (Erkrankung des
und störe mich!
Kniegelenks). Category: Disease.
kunbaman [ù-à-ã́] 1 • adj. gros, rond; fat, thick; fett,
dick.
29/01/2026 489

kunbɛn kunbɔ
kunbɛn 1 • vt. rencontrer, accueillir, se réunir, aller à la kunbɛnni [ù-ɛ̀] Morphemes: kunbɛn-ni. Nom.
rencontre de; meet, welcome; begegnen, 1 • protection, prévention; protection,
begrüßen, empfangen, willkommen heissen, prevention; Schutz, Prävention. Bana
treffen (sich). Mɔgɔw golobara k'a n'a den kunbɛnni ka fisa a furakɛli ye. Mieux vaut
kunbɛn. Les gens se précipitèrent pour prévenir une maladie que la soigner. It is better
l'accueillir, elle et son enfant. People rushed to to prevent a disease than to cure it. Es ist
welcome her and her child. Die Leute strömten besser, einer Krankheit vorzubeugen als sie zu
herbei, um sie und ihr Kind willkommen zu heilen.
heißen. 2 • réception; reception; Rezeption, Empfang.
2 • Verbe. prévenir (une maladie), intercepter, Kunbɛnni kɛra Kuluba bo. Une réception a
protéger contre; prevent, intercept, protect eu lieu aujourd'hui à Koulouba. A reception
against; abwenden, verhindern, vorbeugen, was held today in Koulouba. Heute fand in
abfangen. Bana kunbɛn ka fisa ni bana Koulouba ein Empfang statt.
furukɛ ye. Mieux vaut prévenir que guérir. kunbɛnseleke Nom. angles opposés par le sommet;
Prevention is better than cure. Vorbeugen ist
angles that are opposed at the peak; Winkel,
besser als heilen. An bi se ka sumaya kunbɛn
die an der Spitze sich gegenüber stehen.
cogo di ? Comment pouvons-nous prévenir le Category: Mathematics.
paludisme ? How can we prevent malaria?
kunbɛnseli [ù-ɛ̀-é-í] Morphemes: kunbɛn-seli.
Wie können wir Malaria verhüten /
vorbeugen? Nom. anniversaire; memorial, yearly
celebration; Geburtstagsfeier, jährliches Fest.
3 • Verbe. affronter, combattre, résoudre; to
synonyme: donkunbɛn .
face, confront; entgegentreten, konfrontieren. 1
4 • Verbe. semaine, anniversaire, en huit; week, kunbila [ù-ì-á] Morphemes: kun-bila. Verbe.
birthday, in eight; Woche, Geburtstag, in acht. 1 • renoncer, abandonner, lâcher; renounce,
kunbɛn o kunbɛn chaque semaine. every abandon, give up, release, drop; verzichten,
week. jede Woche. Ntɛnɛn nata in tɛ, o aufgeben, verlassen, loslassen. A ye baara
ntɛnɛn kunbɛn tɛ. Ce n'est ni lundi prochain, kunbila. Il a lâché le travail. He quit his job.
ni lundi en huit. It's neither next Monday nor Er gab die Arbeit auf. A ye o kiri kunbila. Il a
Monday in a week. Es ist weder nächster renoncé à aller en justice pour cela. He has
Montag noch Montag in acht Tagen. given up on going to court over this. Er
kunbɛncogo [ù-ɛ̀] comparer: bisimilabaga. verzichtete darauf, dafür vor Gericht zu gehen.
1
Morphemes: kunbɛn-cogo. Nom. protocole,
2 • se rendre compte, être au courant; to
realize, to be aware; erkennen, sich bewußt
parade; formalities, protocol, draft agreement,
sein. Ne m'i ka nali kunbila. Je ne me suis pas
procedure, parade; Formalitäten,
Vorgehensweise, Parade.
rendu compte de ton arrivée. I didn't realize
you were coming. Ich wußte nicht, daß du
kunbɛncogo
2
Morphemes: kunbɛn-cogo. Nom.
angekommen bist.
prévention, solution, remède; prevention,
kunbiri [ú-í-í] variante: kunbere. Nom. genou; knee;
solution, remedy; Vorbeugung, Lösung,
Heilmittel. ... a ko ka gɛlɛn, nka Knie. Category: Body, Parts of an animal.
synonyme: kunbere.
kunbɛncogo b'a la. Il s'agit d'un problème
difficile, mais il y a des solutions. The problem kunbirikuru [ú] Nom. rotule, genou, articulation du
is difficult, but there are solutions. Das genou; kneecap, patella, joint of the knee,
Problem ist schwierig, aber es gibt Lösungen. articulation of the knee; Kniescheibe,
kunbɛnnan [ù-ɛ̀] Morphemes: kunbɛn-nan. Nom. Kniegelenk. Category: Body.
synonyme: kunberekuru.
protection; protection; Schutz. ... kunbɛnnan
b'i bolo wa ? ... as-tu des protections ? ...do kunbirinanw Nom. coiffures; headgear;
you have protection? ...haben Sie irgendeinen Kopfbedeckung. Category: Clothing.
Schutz? Nɛnɛ kunbɛnnan ye birifinin ye. La kunbɔ [ù] Morphemes: kun-bɔ. Verbe. 1 • apparaître,
couverture est une protection contre le froid.
réapparaître; appear, emerge, reappear;
The blanket is a protection against the cold.
erscheinen, auftreten, wieder erscheinen.
Die Decke schützt vor Kälte.
Kabini u mana a kunbɔlen ye ka ban... Dès
qu'ils le voyaient apparaître... As soon as they
saw him appear... Sobald sie ihn auftauchen
sahen...
29/01/2026 490

kunbɔkola kuncɛdɔgɔya
2 • détourner, dévier, ôter; divert, deviate, kuncɛba [ù-ɛ̀-á] Morphemes: kun-cɛ-ba. Nom.
remove; umleiten, entfernen. I ka senkolaya
1 • orgueilleux (personne); proud person;
kunbɔ n kan. Ôte de moi ta domination. . stolze Person, hochmütige Person. Kuncɛba
Take away your dominion from me. Nimm
jigisigiyɔrɔ ye kunbɔkola ye. L'orgueilleux
deine Herrschaft von mir.
prend appui sur son égoïsme. (proverbe). The
3 • présentation, apparition, commencement; proud man relies on his selfishness. (proverb).
presentation, appearance, beginning;
Der stolze Mensch verläßt sich auf seinen
Präsentation, Auftritt, Anfang.
Egoismus. (Sprichwort). Den kuncɛba tɛ hali
kunbɔkola [ù-ɔ̀-ò] Morphemes: kun-bɔ-ko-la. a fa kɔnɔ sɔrɔ. L'enfant orgueilleux n'aura pas
Nom. égoïsme; egoism; Egoismus. Kuncɛba même les secrets de son père. The proud child
jigisigiyɔrɔ ye kunbɔkola ye. L'orgueilleux will not even have his father's secrets. Das
prend appui sur son égoïsme. (proverbe). The
stolze Kind wird nicht einmal die Geheimnisse
proud man relies on his selfishness. (proverb).
seines Vaters kennen. synonyme: kuncɛbaya.
Der stolze Mensch verläßt sich auf seinen 2 • têtu, buté, obstiné; stubborn, obstinate;
Egoismus. (Sprichwort). stur, hartnäckig.
kunbɔnkola kuncɛbaya Morphemes: kǔn-cɛ-ba-ya. Nom. orgueil
[ù-ɔ̀-ò] Morphemes: kun-bɔ-n-ko-la. Nom. déplacé, vantardise; pride, boastfulness;
négligence; neglect, negligence, carelessness; Hochmut, Stolz, Prahlerei, Frechheit,
Fahrlässigkeit, Vernachlässigung, Unverschämtheit. A ma se ka ɲinɛ kamalen
fahrlässiges Verhalten, Unachtsamkeit, in ka kuncɛbaya kɔ. Elle ne put oublier
Nachlässigkeit. Fɛn min fɔra i ye ko i ka a l’impudence du jeune homme. She could not
kɛɲi i ma a kɛ, o de ye kunbɔnkola ye. Ce forget the young man's impudence. Sie konnte
qu'on t'a dit de faire, si tu ne le fais pas, c'est die Unverschämtheit des jungen Mannes nicht
cela de la négligence. What you were told to vergessen. synonyme: yɛrɛba, yaada, yawuse,
do, if you don't do it, that's negligence. Was kuncɛbonya, yɛrɛbonya, yawuseya, fanya,
Ihnen gesagt wurde, wenn Sie es nicht tun, ist kafa , fanya, yɛrɛbaya, disibaya, disiba,
1
Fahrlässigkeit.
kuncɛba.
kunbɔsɛbɛ Nom. décharge; acquittal, discharge
kuncɛbonya Nom. orgueil, impudence, vanité; pride,
document; Entlastungsschrift.
Category: Finance. synonyme: seereyasɛbɛn.
impudence, vanity; Stolz, Unverschämtheit,
Eitelkeit. A ka kuncɛbonya ma kun mɔgɔw
kuncɛ 1 [ù] Morphemes: kun-cɛ. vt. terminer, la, bɛɛ taara ka a to. Les gens n'ont pas
conclure, clore, achever; end, finish, conclude; supporté son orgueil, ils l'ont tous quitté.
enden, fertig machen, beenden, aufhören, People couldn't stand his pride, they all left
abschließen. Sɛnɛ kuncɛra. La culture est him. Die Leute konnten seinen Stolz nicht
terminée. The farming is finished. Die ertragen, sie alle verließen ihn.
Landwirtschaftsarbeiten sind beendet. A y'o synonyme: kuncɛbaya.
kuncɛ ni kirikow kunkɔrɔtasɛbɛn ye. Il a kuncɛdɔgɔ [ù-ɛ̀] Morphemes: kun-cɛ-dɔgɔ. Nom.
achevé ses études par un diplôme d’études
humble, modeste; humble, modest;
juridiques. He completed his studies with a
bescheiden, demütig.
degree in legal studies. Sein Studium schloß er
mit einem Diplom in Rechtswissenschaften ab. kuncɛdɔgɔya
kuncɛkuma discours de clôture. closing [ù-ɛ̀-ɔ̀-ɔ̀-á] Morphemes: kun-cɛ-dɔgɔ-ya.
speech. Abschlußrede. Nom. modestie, humilité; modesty, humility;
kuncɛ Nom. au sommet de, sommet de la tête, centre; Bescheidenheit, Genügsamkeit, Demut. Ni
2
summit, on the top of, center; Gipfel, kuncɛdɔgɔya t'i la, án tɛ se ka bɛn. Si tu n'as
Höhepunkt, auf dem Gipfel, Zentrum. A bi pas de modestie, nous ne pourrons pas nous
kuru kuncɛ. Il se trouve au sommet de la
entendre. If you don't have modesty, we won't
be able to get along. Ohne Bescheidenheit
montagne. He is on the summit of the
werden wir nicht miteinander auskommen.
mountain. Er ist auf dem Gipfel des Berges. Ni
synonyme: majiginnenya.
gɔngɔrɔ bɔra sanfɛ, bɛɛ bolo b'i kuncɛ la.
Quand un caillou tombe du ciel, chacun met sa
main sur sa tête. (proverbe). When a stone falls
from the sky, everyone puts his hand on his
head. (proverb). Wenn ein Stein vom Himmel
fällt, legen alle ihre Hand auf ihren Kopf.
(Sprichwort).
29/01/2026 491

kuncɛgan kundanma
kuncɛgan [ù-ɛ́-ǎ] Morphemes: kun-cɛ-gan. Verbe. kunda [ù-á] Nom. 1 • groupe (ensemble social),
1
1 • corriger, frapper; correct, strike; groupement, association; association, group
korrigieren, schlagen, zurechtweisen. U ye (social group); Verband, Gemeinschaft,
nsonkɛ kuncɛgan ni gɛɲɛ ye. Ils ont fouetté Gruppe (soziales Ganzes). ... a ka ca
le voleur. They whipped the thief. Sie haben denmisɛnnin kunda, a ka ca mɔgɔkɔrɔba
den Dieb ausgepeitscht. synonyme: laki, kunda... ... c'est fréquent pour les groupes des
lakuru . jeunes, c'est fréquent pour les groupes des gens
3
âgés... ...it's common for groups of young
2 • ennui, problème; trouble, problem; Ärger,
Problem. Tulogeren bɛ fana se kuncɛgan
people, it's common for groups of older
people... ... es ist bei Gruppen junger
ma. Le malentendant attire des ennuis au
Menschen üblich, es ist bei Gruppen älterer
rapporteur. (proverbe). The deaf person causes Menschen üblich ...
trouble for the rapporteur. (proverb). Der
2 • génération; generation; Generation. N'án
Schwerhörige bringt den Berichterstatter in
Schwierigkeiten. (Sprichwort).
ye sida ka tiɲɛninɔw lajɛ denmisɛn kunda,
farafinna kɔnɔ... Si l'on examine les
kuncɛli [ù-ɛ̀] Morphemes: kun-cɛ-li. Nom.
conséquences qu'a le sida pour la génération
conclusion, clôture (d'une réunion);
des jeunes en Afrique... Looking at the impact
conclusion, closing of a meeting; Abschluß,
of AIDS on the youth generation in Africa...
Beschluß, Folgerung. O ɲɔgɔnye kuncɛli ye Wenn man die Auswirkungen von AIDS auf
sibiri fitiri ye. La clôture de cette réunion aura die junge Generation in Afrika betrachtet...
lieu samedi dans la soirée. The closing of this 3 • secteur, quartier, région; sector, area,
meeting will take place on Saturday evening. district, neighbourhood, region;
Der Abschluß dieser Sitzung findet am Nachbarschaft, Region, Sektor, Ausschnitt,
Samstagabend statt. Abschnitt, Quartier. jamana kundaw régions
kuncɛmana du pays. regions of the country / areas of the
[ù-ɛ̀-à-á] Morphemes: kun-cɛ-ma-na.
country. Regionen des Landes.
synonyme: kinda.
variante: kuncɛmala. Nom. milieu, centre,
sommet; middle, centre, summit, top, peak; kunda 2 [ù] Morphemes: kun-da. Verbe. se rendre à, se
Mitte, Zentrum, Höhepunkt, Spitze, Gipfel. tourner vers, se diriger ; go towards, to go to,
Hakilima bɛɛ ye kulu kuncɛmana dɔn fuga head towards; sich begeben, gehen, sich
ye. Tous les gens intelligents savent que le zuwenden. O fila b'u kunda kɛɲɛkan kan.
sommet d'une colline est une clairière inculte. Tous les deux se dirigent vers le nord. Both of
(proverbe). Every intelligent person knows them go towards the North. beide gehen nach
that the top of a hill is an uncultivated Norden. Senegali jagokɛlaw y'u kunda Mali
clearing. (proverb). Alle intelligenten kan... ... les commerçants du Sénégal se sont
Menschen wissen, daß die Spitze eines Hügels
tournés vers le Mali... ... the traders of Senegal
eine unbebaute Lichtung ist. (Sprichwort).
turned to Mali... ... die Händler aus dem
kunci [ù-í] Morphemes: kun-ci. Verbe. assommer, Senegal wandten sich an Mali...
tromper, escroquer; knock somebody synonyme: nɔngɔnkuru.
senseless, deceive, swindle; niederschlagen, kundama [ũ̀-á-á] Morphemes: kun-dama.
betrügen, schwindeln. Jɔgɔramɛ kuncilen bɛ
variante: kunkɔrɔdama. Nom. taille, hauteur;
diɲɛ wuli. Même la tête brisée, un Diogoramé
size, height; Größe, Höhe. A wulila ka se
peut soulever le monde. (proverbe). Even with
mɔgɔ kundama na. Il a poussé jusqu’à la
a broken head, a Diogoramé can lift the world.
(proverb). Selbst mit gebrochenem Kopf kann taille d’une personne. It grew as high as a
ein Diogoramé die Welt aufrichten. person. Er wuchs bis zur Größe einer Person.
(Sprichwort). kundamapanni Nom. saut en hauteur; high jump;
Hochsprung.
kundanla Morphemes: kun-dan-la. Nom. tresseuse de
cheveux; person who plaits/braids hair;
Friseur. Category: Worker, occupation.
synonyme: kundigila.
kundanma [ù-á-á] Nom. hauteur; height; Höhe.
Category: Mathematics.
29/01/2026 492

kundanyɔrɔ kunfalen
kundanyɔrɔ kundu [ù] Verbe. dompter, maîtriser, dresser; tame,
[ũ̀-ã̀-ɔ́-ɔ́] Morphemes: kun-dan-yɔrɔ. master, train; zähmen, beherrschen, trainieren,
n.comp. salon de coiffure; hairdressing salon; dressieren. ka wulu kundu dresser un chien.
Haarsalon, Friseursalon. Category: Building. train a dog. einen Hund trainieren.
kundasen Emprunt de : kun-da-sen. Nom. coiffure; kunɛnɛnɛ [ú] Adverbe. très lisse; very smooth; sehr
hairstyle, hairdressing; Frisur. glatt. A fari ka nugu kunɛnɛnɛ ! Elle a le
kundigila [ù-ì-ì-á] Morphemes: kun-digi-la. Nom. corps très lisse. She has a very smooth body.
Sie hat einen sehr glatten Körper.
tresseuse de cheveux; hair braider; Friseurin,
Haarflechterin. Category: Worker,
synonyme: tileku
2
.
occupation. synonyme: kundanla. kunfa [ù] Morphemes: kun-fa. Verbe. charger qqn
kundimi n.comp. maux de tête, céphalé; headache; (d'un objet à emporter); to charge someone
(with an object to take away), put something
Kopfweh, Kopfschmerzen. Category: Disease.
on somebody (to carry away); jemanden mit
synonyme: kunkolodimin, kunbaben.
etwas beladen (zum forttragen). U ye wotoro
kunditɔgɔ [ù-ì] Morphemes: kun-di-tɔgɔ. Nom. kunfa sagaw la tewu ! Ils ont complètement
nom de baptême, nom de naissance; baptismal chargé la charrette de moutons ! They
name, birth name; Taufname, Geburtsname. completely loaded the cart with sheep! Sie
Biton kunditɔgɔ de ye ko Mamari. Le nom haben den Karren komplett mit Schafen
de baptême de Biton était Mamari. Biton's beladen! A kunfalen don jama la ! Il a une
baptismal name was Mamari. Bitons lourde charge familiale. He has a heavy family
Taufname war Mamari. burden. Er hat eine schwere familiäre
kundogo [ǔ-ò-ó] Morphemes: kun-dogo. Verbe. se Verantwortung.
réfugier, se cacher; take refuge, to hide; sich kunfaga 1 [ù-á-á] Nom. crâne, boîte crânienne; skull;
flüchten, sich verstecken. A taara i kundogo Schädel. Category: Parts of an animal.
Bobo. Il est allé se cacher à Bobo. He went to synonyme: kunkolokolo.
Bobo to hide himself. Er ging nach Bobo um kunfaga [ǔ-à-á] Morphemes: kun-faga. Verbe.
sich dort zu verstecken. U ye kundogoyɔrɔ
2
apaiser, éteindre (une querelle); appease,
ɲini. Ils cherchèrent un endroit où se réfugier.
calm, stop a quarrel; beschwichtigen, einen
They looked for a place to take refuge. Sie Streit schlichten. A fa nali ye n'a terikɛ ka
suchten nach einem Zufluchtsort.
kɛlɛ kunfaga. La venue de son père a fait
kundon Verbe. 1 • mettre dedans (le bout de quelque s'apaiser la querelle entre son ami et lui. The
chose); put in (the end of something); einfügen arrival of his father calmed the quarrel
(das Ende von etwas). Ni fɛn sigira ta kan, between him and his friend. Die Ankunft
seines Vaters beruhigte den Streit zwischen
n'án ye ta kundon sɔn, n'a mɛɛnna cogo o
seinem Freund und ihm.
cogo, a na mɔ. Quand on a mis quelque chose
sur le feu, et qu'on ranime le feu de temps en kunfalen [ǔ-à-é] Morphemes: kun-falen. Verbe.
temps, même si ça prend du temps, ça finira 1 • donner l'équivalent, échanger; to give the
par être cuit à point. (proverbe). When you put equivalent, exchange; das gleichwertige
something on the fire, and you rekindle the fire geben, auswechseln. A ye n ka ɲɔ kunfalen ni
from time to time, even if it takes time, it will malo ye. Il a échangé mon mil contre du riz.
eventually be cooked to the point. (proverb).
He exchanged my millet for rice. Er hat meine
Wenn man etwas auf das Feuer gelegt hat, und
Hirse gegen Reis getauscht.
das Feuer von Zeit zu Zeit wieder entfacht
2 • équivalent, change, remplaçant; equivalent,
wird, auch wenn es eine Weile dauert, wird es
change, replacement; Äquivalent, Änderung,
am Ende ganz durchgegart sein. (Sprichwort).
Ersatz. Syɔ tɛ kɛ dɛgɛ ye, nka a kunfalen bɛ
2 • concentrer, activer; concentrate, activate;
konzentrieren, aktivieren. ... a bɛ tasuma
kɛ a ye. On ne fait pas de brouet avec des
haricots mais avec l'équivalent en mil de
kundon a ka... daga la... ... elle active le feu
haricots. (proverbe). We do not make broth
sous la marmite... ...she turns on the fire under
with beans but with the equivalent in millet of
the pot... ...sie aktiviert das Feuer unter dem
beans. (proverb). Wir machen keine Brühe mit
Topf...
Bohnen, sondern mit dem Äquivalent in
kundonyɔrɔ Nom. échappatoire; way out; Ausweg. Hirsebohnen. (Sprichwort).
29/01/2026 493

kunfɛ kunfilayɛlɛma
kunfɛ postp. sans faire attention; without paying 2 • personne au comportement anormal,
bizarre, asocial; person with abnormal,
attention; ohne Rücksicht zu nehmen,
bizarre, asocial behaviour; Person mit
aufpassen. A bɛ kuma a kunfɛ. Il parle sans
abnormalem, bizarrem oder unsozialem
faire attention. He speaks without paying
Verhalten.
attention. Er redet ohne aufzupassen.
3 • personne qui fait les choses au hasard, qui
kunfɛjate Jula: kunfɛjati. Nom. calcul mental; mental agit sans réfléchir; someone who does things at
arithmetic; Kopfrechnen. random, acting without thinking; jemand, der
Category: Mathematics. synonyme: kunnajate, Dinge nach dem Zufallsprinzip tut und ohne
dalajate.
nachzudenken handelt. kunfɛtɔmɔgɔ
personne qui agit sans réfléchir. someone
kunfɛko [ù-ɛ̀-ó] Morphemes: kun-fɛ-ko. Nom. acting without thinking. Eine Person, die ohne
initiative hasardeuse (prise sans avoir tenu au nachzudenken handelt.
courant les personnes intéressées), chose 4 • hasardeux, aventureux; adventurous;
aléatoire, chose risquée, chose incertaine; risky risikoreich, abenteuerlich. An t'a fɛ ka kuma
initiative (taken without having informed the
fu fɔ, walima ka kunfɛtɔ kɛ. Nous ne voulons
people concerned), random thing, risky thing,
rien dire ou faire d’aventureux. We don’t want
uncertain thing; unsichere Initiative (ohne die
to say or do anything adventurous. Wir wollen
betroffenen Personen informiert zu haben),
nichts Abenteuerliches sagen oder tun.
Zufall, Risiko, Ungewißheit. kunfɛko ɲuman
initiative hasardeuse mais bonne. risky but kunfila [ǔ-ì-á] Morphemes: kun-fila. Nom. gecko à
good initiative. risikoreich, aber gut. Nin kɛra deux têtes; two-headed gecko; Gecko mit zwei
kunfɛko ye. C'est tout à fait aléatoire. It is Köpfen. Category: Reptile.
completely random. Es ist völlig zufällig. kunfilanintu synonyme: tonnkan. variante: kunfilatu.
kunfɛn Nom. 1 • maladie mentale; mental illness; Nom. 1 • choléra; cholera; Cholera.
psychische Erkrankung, Geisteskrankheit.
Category: Disease. synonyme: tonkan,
Category: Disease. synonyme: jinabana, kunfilatu 1 .
jinɛbana, hakililabana, kunnabana, 2 • toute maladie qui s'accompagne de diarrhée
kunkolowuli. et de vomissements; any illness that is
accompanied by diarrhea and vomiting;
2 • crise de folie; fit of madness, mental
Krankheiten, die mit Durchfall und Erbrechen
breakdown; Wahnsinn.
einhergehen.
3 • hystérie et maladies analogues; hysteria
kunfilatu synonyme: tonnkan. variante: kunfilanintu.
and similar diseases; Hysterie und ähnliche 1
Krankheiten. Nom. choléra, toute maladie qui
s'accompagne de diarrhée et de vomissement;
kunfɛntɔ [ù-ɛ̀] Morphemes: kun-fɛn-tɔ. Nom.
cholera, disease with diarrhea and vomiting;
1 • fou; mad; Verrückter. Cholera, Krankheiten von Durchfall und
2 • possédé; possessed; besessen. kunfɛntɔw Erbrechen begleitet. Category: Disease.
ka dɔn danse de possédés. dance of the synonyme: kunfilanintu.
possessed. Tanz der Besessenen. kunfilatu [ù-ì-à] Nom. tambour dont on peut frapper
2
3 • personne qui s’énerve facilement; person
les deux faces; drum with two beating
who gets angry easily; Person, die leicht
surfaces; Trommel mit zwei Schlagflächen.
wütend wird.
ntaman, bari, dɔnkan... Category: Musical
kunfɛtaa [ù-ɛ̀] Morphemes: kun-fɛ-taa. Nom. instrument.
1 • errance, aventure; wandering, adventure; kunfilayɛlɛma variante: kɔɔ don. 1 • Verbe. faire
Wandern, Abenteuer.
inverser; inverse, invert; umkehren,
2 • fait d'aller loin de chez soi, sans l'accord des
invertieren.
siens; the act of going far from home without
2 • Nom. inversion; inversion; Umkehrung.
the consent of one's family; weit weg von zu
synonyme: kɔdonni.
Hause gehen, ohne die Zustimmung seiner
Lieben.
kunfɛtɔ [ù-ɛ̀] Morphemes: kun-fɛ-tɔ. Nom.
1 • aventuriste; adventurous person;
Abenteurer.
29/01/2026 494

kunfin kungoden
kunfin [ù] Morphemes: kun-fin. Nom. kungɛlɛya [ù-ɛ̀-ɛ̀] Morphemes: kun-gɛlɛ-ya. Nom.
1 • analphabète, illettré, ignorant; illiterate; dureté; hardness, harshness, toughness; Härte.
Analphabet, Ungebildet, des Lesens und Mɔgɔ tɛ to so ka foro kungɛlɛya dɔn. Ce
Schreibens unkundig. Kunfin ye jɔn ye? Mɔgɔ n'est pas en restant à la maison qu'on connaît la
min ma kalan fan si kɛ: mɔgɔ min ti se dureté du travail des champs. (proverbe). It is
kalanjɛ ni sɛbɛnni na kan si la diɲɛ kɔnɔ.
not by staying at home that one learns the
hardness of work in the fields. (proverb). Man
Qui est analphabète? Celui qui n’a pas étudié
spürt nicht, wie hart die Arbeit auf dem Feld
dans aucune langue, celui qui ne sait pas lire ni
écrire dans aucune langue du monde. Who is
ist, wenn man zu Hause bleibt. (Sprichwort).
illiterate? A person who has not studied in any kungɛrɛfɛkolo [ù-ɛ̀-ɛ̀-ó-ó] Nom. pariétal; parietal
language, a person who cannot read or write bone; Scheitelbein. Category: Body.
in any language of the world. Wer ist ein
kungo [ú] Jula: kongo. Nom. 1 • brousse, espace non
Analphabet? Jemand, der in keiner Sprache
schreiben oder lesen kann. Note: Kibaru: mɛkalo cultivé hors du village; bush, uncultivated
2004, p.10 space outside the village; Busch, unbebautes
2 • imbécile, niais, lourdaud, pauvre type; Gebiet außerhalb des Dorfes.
imbecile, simpleton, oaf, poor guy; dumm, kungokɔnɔsogow animaux sauvages. wild
einfältig, ungeschickt, armer Kerl. animals. wilde Tiere. synonyme: kongo .
1
kunfinya [ù-ì-á] Morphemes: kun-fin-ya. 2 • campagne (par opposition à la ville);
synonyme: kolɔnbaliya. Nom.
countryside (as opposed to city); auf dem Land
(im Gegensatz zur Stadt). Kungo diyara. La
1 • analphabétisme, illettrisme, ignorance;
illiteracy, ignorance; Analphabetentum, brousse a été favorable. The bush was
Unwissenheit. kunfinya kɛlɛli la lutte contre
favourable. Der Busch war vorteilhaft.
l'analphabétisme. the fight against illiteracy. 3 • maladie (due aux génies de brousse);
die Bekämpfung des Analphabetismus.
disease (due to bush spirits); Krankheit
Category: Learn.
(aufgrund von Buschgeister).
Category: Disease.
2 • imbécillité, sottise; stupidity, foolishness;
Dummheit. kungobalansan [ú] Jula: kongobalansan. Nom.
kunfɔ [ù-ɔ́] Verbe. exposer ses problèmes, se espèce d'arbre, gommier blanc; kind of tree;
Baumart. Category: Tree. acacia senegal.
plaindre, se déclarer; explain one's problems,
complain about, explain oneself; seine kungobana [ú] Jula: kongobana.
Belange vorbringen, sich beschweren, klagen, Morphemes: kungo-bana. Nom. maladie
sich erklären. Ni i ye i kunfɔyɔrɔ caya, a
(d'origine mystérieuse : maux de crâne, raideur
laban i na i kunfɔ i jugu ye. Si tu multiplies du cou...); mysterious illness, disease (of
tes confidents, tu finiras par faire des mysterious origin: headache, stiff neck...);
confidences à ton ennemi. (proverbe). If you mysteriöse Krankheit, Krankheit (mysteriöser
multiply your confidants, you will eventually Ursprung: Kopfschmerzen, Nackensteifheit...)
make confidences to your enemy. (proverb). Category: Disease.
Wenn du deine Vertrauten multiplizierst, wirst
kungobɔn [ú] Jula: kongobɔn.
du deinem Feind am Ende Geheimnisse
anvertrauen. (Sprichwort).
Morphemes: kungo-bɔn. Nom. charbon,
dermatoses chroniques; anthrax, chronic
kunfɔɲɔgɔn [ù-ɔ̀] Morphemes: kun-fɔ-ɲɔgɔn.
dermatitis; Karbunkel, Milzbrand.
Nom. un confident; a confidant; ein Vertrauter, Category: Disease.
Vertrauensperson. Gɛlɛya o gɛlɛya, a b'a
kungoda [ú] Morphemes: kungo-da. Nom. brousse
kunfɔɲɔgɔn sɛgɛrɛ n'o ye. Quelle que soit la
(lieu); bushland (place); Busch (Ort).
difficulté qu'il rencontre, il va en parler à son
Jirikakala ye man di kungoda la. On voit
confident. Whatever difficulty he encounters,
he will talk about it to his confidant. Egal auf
rarement un menuisier dans les coins de
brousse. You rarely see a carpenter in the
welche Schwierigkeiten er stößt, er wird mit
seinem Vertrauten darüber sprechen.
bush. Man sieht selten einen Schreiner im
synonyme: kunkofɔɲɔgɔn.
Busch.
kungoden [ú] Morphemes: kungo-den. Nom.
brassée, botte, gerbe; armful, bundle, sheaf;
Armvoll, Bündel, Garbe.
29/01/2026 495

kungodondon kunjɛ
kungodondon Jula: kongodono. kungotigi [ú] Morphemes: kungo-tigi. Nom. lion
synonyme: maatɛfili. variante: kogodondo. (surnom du lion); lion (nickname of lion);
Nom. huppe; hoopoe; Wiedehopf. Löwe (Spitzname des Löwen). synonyme: jara,
Kungodondon, yebalagale, mɔgɔ tɛ fili fɛn waraba.
jugu ma. La huppe, porte-malheur, personne kungotuganba Jula: kongotuganba.
ne se trompe sur ce qui arrive de mauvais.
Morphemes: kungo-tugan-ba. Nom.
(proverbe). The hoopoe brings misfortune, no
tourterelle pleureuse, tourterelle à collier;
one is wrong about what happens bad.
(proverb). Der Wiedehopf bringt Unglück,
turtle dove (kind of); Turteltaube.
Category: Bird. streptopelia decipiens.
niemand irrt sich über das, was schlecht
kommt. (Sprichwort). Category: Bird. upupa kungotugannin
epops; upupa senegalensis.
[ú] Morphemes: kungo-tugan-nin. Nom.
kungofali [ú] Morphemes: kungo-fali. Nom. âne tourterelle vineuse; Vinaceous dove;
ensauvagé; wild donkey; wilder Esel. Röteltaube. Category: Bird. streptopelia
vinacea. synonyme: tufanninkanfin.
kungoforoko [ú] Jula: kongoforoko.
variante: kungoforokofaraka. Nom. plante kungowulunin [ú] Morphemes: kungo-wulu-nin.
grimpante (espèce de); climbing plant (species variante: kungowulu. Nom. 1 • chacal doré;
of); Kletterpflanze (Art). Category: Grass, Golden Jackal; Goldschakal. Ni
herb, vine. ampelocissus leonensis.
kungowulunin min ye i ta kɛ sunɔgɔ ye, o tɛ
kungokami [ú] Morphemes: kungo-kami. Nom. kami minɛ. Le chacal qui passe son temps à
pintade sauvage; wild guinea fowl; wildes dormir n'attrapera pas de pintade. (proverbe).
Perlhuhn. numida meleagris. The jackal who spends his time sleeping will
synonyme: kongokami. not catch a guinea fowl. (proverb). Der
Schakal, der seine Zeit mit Schlafen verbringt,
kungokɔnɔjɛ variante: kungojɛ, kungolɛ. Nom.
wird keine Perlhühner fangen. (Sprichwort).
phacochère; warthog; Warzenschwein. Category: Mammal. canis canis aureus.
Category: Mammal. phacochoerus aethiopicus. synonyme: ŋaga.
synonyme: lɛfali, kongolɛ, jɛfali.
2 • chacal à flancs rayés; side-striped jackal;
kungolo [ù-ó-ó] tête; head; Kopf. Category: Body. Streifenschakal. Category: Mammal. canis
canis adustus.
kungonaani [ú] Nom. biche-cochon; deer (kind of),
3 • chien sauvage; wild dog; Wildhund.
doe-pig; Reh Art. Kungonaani sogo ka ca.
kunguruba Nom. plante (espèce); plant sp;
La biche-cochon a beaucoup de chair. The
doe-pig has a lot of flesh. Das Rehschwein hat
Pflanzenart. Category: Grass, herb, vine.
viel Fleisch. Category: Mammal.
mitrocarpus scaber.
kungosibali [ù-ò-ì] Nom. mal élevé, effronté; kungurun n.comp. morceau, bout, pièce de qqch,
tronçon; piece, bit, fragment, part, section;
ill-mannered, cheeky, rude, brazen; schlecht
erzogen, unverschämt, unartig, schamlos. A
Stück, Fragment, Abschnitt, Teil.
synonyme: kunkurun.
bɔlen kojugu, i n'a fɔ mɔgɔ kungosibali. Il
aime beaucoup se faire voir, comme quelqu’un kunjalan [ù] Adverbe. juste, pile, tout rond; just,
qui n'est pas bien élevé. He likes to be seen, as exactly, exactly round; genau, richtig,
someone who is not well behaved. Er liebt es, rundherum. kɛmɛ fila kunjalan mille francs
gesehen zu werden, als jemand, der nicht gut
tout rond. exactly one thousand francs. genau
erzogen ist.
tausend Franken. A y'a muso furu waa
kungosira Nom. arbre (espèce); tree sp; Baumart. mugan kunjalan. Il a épousé sa femme pour
Category: Bush, shrub. sterculia setigera. cent mille francs juste. He married his wife for
kungosogo [ó-ó-ó-ó] Jula: kongosogo. just a hundred thousand francs. Er hat seine
Frau für nur 100.000 Francs geheiratet.
Morphemes: kungo-sogo. Nom. animal
synonyme: tas.
sauvage, antilope; wild animal, game; wildes
Tier, Wild. Category: Mammal. kunjɛ 1 Jula: kungwɛ. Morphemes: kun-jɛ.
kungosyɛnin Jula: kongosisɛnin. Nom. poule de variante: kɔɲɛ, nguɲɛ. Nom. arbre (espèce);
rocher; Stone partridge; Felsenwachtel.
tree sp; Baumart. Category: Bush, shrub.
Category: Bird. ptilopachus petrosus.
guiera senegalensis.
synonyme: kongosisɛnin, tusyɛnin.
29/01/2026 496

kunjɛ kunkɛnɛya
kunjɛ [ù] Morphemes: kun-jɛ. Nom. naïf; naive; kunkari [ù] Morphemes: kun-kari. variante: kunkɔri.
2
naiv. A tɛ foyi dɔn, kunjɛ de don. Il ne sait Verbe. 1 • casser en deux; break in two;
rien, c'est un naïf. He doesn’t know anything, entzweibrechen. ka kaba kunkari couper un
he’s naive. Er weiß nichts, er ist naiv. épi de maïs en deux. cut a corn cob in half.
synonyme: juga, fɔlɔmɔgɔ, gawa. einen Maiskolben halbieren.
kunjugu [ù] Morphemes: kun-jugu. Nom. 2 • couper la parole; interrupt; ins Wort fallen.
1
3 • entamer; start, begin, initiate; beginnen,
1 • vagabond; vagabond; Landstreicher,
Vagabund.
einleiten. A ye kuma dɔ kunkari ne ye... Il a
commencé à me parler de quelque chose... He
2 • qui est obstiné dans l'erreur, entêté; who is
started talking about something... Er fing an,
obstinate in error, stubborn; der hartnäckig im
mir von etwas zu erzählen...
Irrtum ist, stur.
4 • mettre en conflit; cause a conflict; Konflikt
kunjugu
2
[ù] Nom. envers; the reverse, wrong
verursachen. Aw kana u kunkari ɲɔgɔn na
upside-down, inside-out; gegenteilig, verkehrt,
dɛ ! Ne les mettez pas en conflit l'un avec
umgekehrt.
l'autre ! Don't put them in conflict with each
kunkalifaden synonyme: kɛlɛɲabolila. Nom. réfugié; other! Bringen Sie sie nicht in Konflikt
refugee; Flüchtling, Asylant. miteinander!
kunkan [ù] Morphemes: kun-kan. Nom. bruit, kunkelen [ù] Morphemes: kun-kelen. Nom. franc,
1
détonation, déflagration; noise, detonation, direct, simple, loyal; franc, straight, direct,
deflagration; Geräusch, Detonation, Lärm. simple, straightforward, loyal, faithful;
kunkan mugu ni tan vingt coups de fusil. aufrichtig, direkt, einfach, schlicht, einfältig,
twenty gunshots. zwanzig Schüsse von
loyal. Mɔgɔ kunkelen fɛ ko si man gɛlɛn.
Gewehren. ... nin ye n den kunkan ye ... ce Avec quelqu'un de simple, il est facile de
bruit est celui que fait mon enfant. ... that’s the
s'entendre. With someone simple, it's easy to
sound my child makes. ... das ist der Klang
get along. Mit einem einfachen Menschen ist
meines Kindes.
es leicht, sich zu verstehen.
kunkan [ù] Morphemes: kun-kan. Nom. problème, kunkelenya Morphemes: kun-kelen-ya. Nom.
2
loyauté, franchise, droiture; loyalty, fidelity,
question, souci, préoccupation; problem,
allegiance, franchise, honesty, righteousness;
question, concern, preoccupation; Problem,
Frage, Sorge. Kalansow kunkan gɛlɛyara. Le
Loyalität, Treue, Offenheit, Ehrlichkeit,
Aufrichtigkeit. Maadu ka kunkelenya ɲɔgɔn
problème des locaux scolaires est devenu
préoccupant. The problem of school premises
tɛ. La loyauté de Madou n'a pas d'égale.
has become a concern. Das Problem der Madou's loyalty is unmatched. Madous
Schulräumlichkeiten ist besorgniserregend Loyalität sucht ihresgleichen.
geworden. ... u ka hadamadenya kunkan... kunkɛnɛ [ù-ɛ́-ɛ́] Morphemes: kun-kɛnɛ. Nom.
... leur problème de société... ... their social vivace, ardent, dynamique, vif, dégourdi;
problem... ... ihr gesellschaftliches Problem...
vivacious, vivid, keen, passionate, vibrant
synonyme: kunkanko. active, energetic, lively, resourceful; lebhaft,
kunkanko [ù-à] Morphemes: kun-kan-ko. Nom.
eifrig, feurig, dynamisch, schwungvoll,
einfallsreich . denmisɛn kunkɛnɛ un enfant
problème, question, souci, préoccupation;
dégourdi. a smart child.
problem, question, concern, preoccupation;
Problem, Frage, Sorge. Mɔgɔ kelen kunkɛnɛya [ù-ɛ̀-ɛ̀] Morphemes: kun-kɛnɛ-ya.
kunkanko tɛ... Ce n'est pas le problème d'une Nom. esprit d’initiative, rapidité d'esprit et de
seule personne... This is not the problem of one jugement, vivacité, dynamisme, énergie,
person... Es ist nicht das Problem einer ardeur, compétence; initiative, quickness of
einzigen Person... Sokɔnɔna kunkankokuma mind and judgement, liveliness, dynamism,
don. C'est une discussion qui concerne la
energy, ardour, competence; Initiativegeist,
Schnelligkeit des Geistes und
famille. This is a discussion that concerns the
Urteilsvermögens, Lebendigkeit, Dynamik,
family. Dies ist eine Diskussion, die die
Energie, Begeisterung, Kompetenz. O tɛ taa
Familie betrifft. synonyme: kunko , kunkan.
2 2
kunkɛnɛya ni pya kɔ. Cela ne se fera ni sans
kunkanna [ù-à-á] Morphemes: kun-kan-na. Nom. esprit initiative, ni sans « fric ». This will not
coiffeur; hairdresser; Friseur. happen without initiative or without “cash”.
synonyme: kunsigitigɛla, kunkɔfela. Dies wird weder ohne Initiative noch ohne
„Geld“ geschehen.
kunkantɔnɔ Nom. intérêt du capital; interests of the
capital; Kapitalzinssatz. Category: Finance.
29/01/2026 497

kunkɛɲɔgɔn kunkolon
kunkɛɲɔgɔn [ù-ɛ̀] Morphemes: kun-kɛ-ɲɔgɔn. kunkolo [ù-ó-ó] Morphemes: kun-kolo. Nom. tête;
1
Nom. équivalent; equivalent; Äquivalent. N head; Kopf. Dononkɔrɔ kunkolo tɛ dogo
bɛna kɔɔri di i ma, i k'i jija k'o naji la. La tête du coq ne disparaît pas dans la
kunkɛɲɔgɔnmalo bila n ɲɛ. Le coton que je sauce. (proverbe). The rooster's head does not
vais te donner, tu te débrouilleras pour m'en disappear in the sauce. (proverb). Der Kopf
réserver l’équivalent en riz. The cotton that I des Hahns verschwindet nicht in der Soße.
am going to give you, you will manage to (Sprichwort). Category: Body.
reserve the equivalent in rice for me. Von der kunkolo Verbe. maîtriser, venir à bout de; control,
2
Baumwolle, die ich dir geben werde, wirst du
master, contain; beherrschen, meistern,
es schaffen, das Äquivalent an Reis für mich
zügeln.
aufzubewahren. ... o sanun
kunkɛɲɔgɔnwari... ... l'équivalent en argent
kunkolobara synonyme: kunkolofilen, kunkoloso,
de cet or... ... the money equivalent of this kunkolokolo. Nom. crâne, tête, sommet du
gold... ... das Geld äquivalent dieses Goldes... crâne; skull, head, top of skull; Schädel,
Hirnschale, Kopf, Schädeldecke. A
kunko [ù-ó] Morphemes: kun-ko. Nom. 1 • affaire,
1
kunkolobara ka bon kosɛbɛ. Il a un très gros
responsabilité; affair, responsibility, business;
Pflicht, Verantwortung, Angelegenheit. Bɛɛ
crâne. He has a very big skull. Er hat einen
sehr großen Schädel. Category: Body.
lajɛlen kunko don. C'est l'affaire de tous. It’s
everyone’s business. Das ist jedermanns
kunkoloci [ù-ò-ò] Morphemes: kun-kolo-ci. Nom.
Sache. / Es geht jeden etwas an. maladie d'enfant (abaissement de la fontanelle)
souvent causé par la malnutrition; disease of
2 • événement social (mariage, baptême,
children (lowering of fontanel) often caused by
enterrement...); social event (wedding,
malnutrition; Kinderkrankheit (Senkung der
baptism, funeral, etc.); gesellschaftliches
Ereignis (Hochzeit, Taufe, Beerdigung usw.)
Fontanelle) oft durch Mangelernährung
verursacht. Category: Disease.
kunko [ù] Morphemes: kun-ko.
2
kunkolodimin comparer: dimi .
synonyme: kunkanko. Nom. 1 • problème, 2
Morphemes: kunkolo-dimin. Nom. maux de
soucis, préoccupation, difficulté, ennui;
tête, mal de tête; headache; Kopfweh,
problem, worry, concern, matter; Problem,
Sorge, Kummer, Besorgnis, Anliegen, Kopfschmerzen. Category: Disease.
Schwierigkeit. ka kunko sɔrɔ avoir des synonyme: kunbaben, kundimi.
problèmes. have problems. Probleme haben. kunkolofilen Morphemes: kun-kolo-filen.
... n bɛ na ka na n kunko jira i la. ... je viens
synonyme: kunkolobara. Nom. crâne; skull;
t'exposer mes problèmes. ... I’m here to tell
Schädel. Category: Body.
you about my problems. ... Ich bin gekommen,
synonyme: kunkolokolo.
um dir meine Probleme zu erklären.
synonyme: kunkanko. kunkolojabana
2 • peine, punition; sentence, punishment; [ù-ò-ò-à] Morphemes: kun-kolo-ja-bana.
Strafe. Faama ye kunko bin a kan. Le Nom. maladie des pintades (maladie de
commandant l'a puni. The commander carence, la tête de l'animal se déplume); guinea
punished him. Der Kommandant bestrafte ihn. fowl disease (deficiency disease; the animal's
head loses feathers); Perlhuhnkrankheit
kunkofɔɲɔgɔn
(Mangelkrankheit; der Kopf des Tieres wird
[ù-ò-ɔ̀] Morphemes: kunko-fɔ-ɲɔgɔn. Nom. federlos).
confident; confidant; Vertrauter,
kunkolokolo
Vertrauensperson. Gɛlɛya o gɛlɛya, a b'a
[ù-ò-ò] Morphemes: kun-kolo-kolo. Nom.
kunkofɔɲɔgɔn sɛgɛrɛ n'o ye. Quelle que soit
boîte crânienne, crâne; skull, cranium;
la difficulté qu'il rencontre, il va en parler à son
Schädeldecke, Schädel. Category: Body.
confident. Whatever difficulty he encounters,
synonyme: kunkolofilen, kunfaga .
he will talk about it to his confidant. Egal auf 1
welche Schwierigkeiten er stößt, er wird mit kunkolon [ù] Morphemes: kun-kolon.
seinem Vertrauten darüber sprechen.
variante: kunkolo. Verbe. maîtriser, être plus
synonyme: kunfɔɲɔgɔn.
fort que, venir à bout de; to master, to be
stronger than; beherrschen, stärker sein als.
Hali a ma se ka a muso kunkolon. Il n'a
même pas pu venir à bout de sa femme. He
couldn't even win against his wife. Er konnte
nicht einmal gegen seine Frau gewinnen.
29/01/2026 498

kunkolontɛgɛn kunkɔrɔko
kunkolontɛgɛn [ù-ò-ò] Jula: kunkolondɛgɛn. kunkotɔ [ù-ò] Morphemes: kun-ko-tɔ. Nom.
synonyme: kunkolosɛmɛ. Nom. cerveau, personne qui a des problèmes; person who has
cervelle; brain; Hirn. synonyme: kunsɛmɛ, problems; Personen mit Problemen.
kunkolosɛmɛ, kunsɔmɛ. kunkɔfela Nom. coiffeur,coiffeuse; hairdresser;
kunkolosɛmɛ Nom. cerveau, cervelle; brain; Gehirn. Friseur. synonyme: kunkanna.
O tuma na, a bɛ jigin i kunkolosɛmɛ de la. kunkɔri [ù] Morphemes: kun-kɔri. Verbe. faire
Alors, ça te descend dans le cerveau. So it goes allusion, aborder, entrer en matière, amorcer;
down into your brain. Dann kommt es dir ins to allude, to approach, to enter into, to initiate;
Gehirn. Category: Body. synonyme: ntɛgɛn 1 , anspielen, sich nähern, eintreten, initiieren. An
kunkolontɛgɛn. ye min kunkɔri ka a bila, án ka tɛmɛ n'a ye.
kunkoloso [ù-ò-ò] Morphemes: kun-kolo-so.
Reprenons ce que nous avions abordé puis
laissé. Let's pick up where we left off and then
Nom. crâne, boîte crânienne, cavité crânienne;
discuss. / Let’s go back to what we had
skull, cranial cavity; Schädel,
discussed and then left. Laßt uns aufgreifen,
Schädelknochen, Schädelhöhle. Kunsɛmɛ bɛ
was wir angesprochen und zurückgelassen
kunkoloso kɔnɔ. Le cerveau est dans la boîte haben. ka muka kunkɔri aborder un sujet.
crânienne. The brain is in the cranial cavity. address a topic, tackle a subject. ein Thema
Das Gehirn ist im Schädel. diskutieren.
kunkolotalan kunkɔrɔ postp. 1 • pour, en échange de, en gage; for, in
[ù-ò-ò-à] Morphemes: kun-kolo-ta-lan. exchange of, besides of; für, im Gegenzug zu.
variante: kunkɔrɔlanan. Nom. oreiller, coussin; A tagara Bobo baarako kunkɔrɔ. Il est allé à
pillow, cushion; Kissen, Kopfkissen. ka a kun Bobo pour une affaire de travail. He went to
da kunkolotalan kan poser sa tête sur un
Bobo for work matters. Er ging nach Bobo für
Arbeitsangelegenheiten.
oreiller. put his head on a pillow. den Kopf auf
ein Kissen legen. synonyme: kunkɔrɔdalan, 2 • à côté de, au chevet de; next to, at the
bedside of; neben, am Kopfende von, daneben,
kunkɔrɔdonnan.
am Bett von. A nana i sigi n kunkɔrɔ. Il est
kunkolotɔ [ù-ò-ò] Morphemes: kun-kolo-tɔ. venu s’asseoir à mon chevet. He came and sat
variante: kunkolowulitɔ. Nom. fou, malade at my bedside. Er setzte sich an mein Bett.
mental, malade des nerfs; mad person, kunkɔrɔdalan
madman, crazy person, fool; Irre,
[ù-ɔ̀-ɔ̀-à] Morphemes: kun-kɔrɔ-da-lan.
Wahnsinnige« Geisteskranker. ... ka
Nom. oreiller, coussin; pillow, cushion; Kissen,
kunkolotɔw furakɛyɔrɔ caya... ... augmenter
Kopfkissen. synonyme: kunkolotalan,
le nombre des centres de soins pour malades
kunkɔrɔdonnan, piti.
mentaux... ... increase the number of mental
health centres... ... die Zahl der Zentren für kunkɔrɔdonnan [ù-ɔ̀-ɔ̀-ò] Nom. oreiller; pillow;
psychisch kranke Menschen zu erhöhen... Kissen, Kopfkissen. synonyme: kunkɔrɔdalan,
Category: Disease.
kunkolotalan.
kunkolowuli [ù-ò-ò] Nom. maladie mentale; mental
kunkɔrɔko [ù-ɔ̀-ɔ̀-ó] Morphemes: kun-kɔrɔ-ko.
illness; Geisteskrankheit, psychischen
Erkrankung. synonyme: jinɛbana, jinabana,
Nom. préoccupation; worry, concern; Sorgen,
Kummer, Besorgnis, Anliegen. Ni
kunnabana, hakililabana, kunkoloyɛlɛma,
politikimɔgɔw ma ánw denmisɛnw
kunfɛn.
haminankow kɛ u kunkɔrɔkow ye... Si les
kunkoloyɛlɛma
hommes politiques ne font pas de nos
[ù-ò-ò] Morphemes: kun-kolo-yɛlɛma. problèmes à nous, les jeunes, leur
préoccupation essentielle... If politicians do
Nom. maladie mentale; mental illness;
Geisteskrankheit, psychischen Erkrankungen. not make our problems, the young, their
synonyme: kunkolowuli.
primary concern... Wenn die Politik nicht
unsere Probleme, die Jugend, zu ihrem
kunkontan Morphemes: kun-ko-ntan. Nom. sans Hauptanliegen macht...
problèmes, sans soucis; without problems,
without worries; problemlos, sorgenlos. Mɔgɔ
si kunkontan tɛ. Personne n'est sans soucis.
(proverbe). Nobody is without problems.
(proverb). Niemand ist ohne Sorgen.
(Sprichwort).
29/01/2026 499

kunkɔrɔta kunmabɔbaga
kunkɔrɔta [ù-ɔ́-ɔ́] Morphemes: kun-kɔrɔta. 2 • court, petit; short, small; kurz, klein. waati
1 • Verbe. mettre à l'honneur, honorer, rendre kunkurunnin un tout petit moment. a little
fier, relever; honor, make proud, lift up; ehren, while, just a little while. ein ganz kleiner
stolz machen, hochheben, erheben. Mali Moment. Don dɔ kunkurun ka fisa don dɔ
musow ka baaraw kunkɔrɔtara ɲinansan... kanmanjan ye. «Court» un jour vaut mieux
Les réalisations des femmes maliennes ont été que «long» un autre jour. (proverbe). "Short"
mises à l'honneur cette année... The one day is better than "long" another day.
achievements of Malian women were honored (proverb). „Kurz“ an einem Tag ist besser als
this year... Die Leistungen malischer Frauen „lang“ an einem anderen. (Sprichwort).
wurden dieses Jahr hervorgehoben ... kunlaben Nom. coiffure; hairstyle; Frisur, Haartracht.
2 • Nom. honneur, fierté; honor, pride; Ehre,
Stolz. ... án bɛɛ lajɛlen ka kunkɔrɔta b'o la. kunma Nom. 1 • principal, majeur, central; main,
... nous tous sommes honorés par cela. ...we major, central; Hauptteil, wichtigste Teil,
are all honoured by this. ...das ehrt uns alle. Kernstück, Hauptsache. kɔ kunma lit
3 • Verbe. relever; raise, enhance; erheben, principal du marigot. main riverbed.
verstärken. Kɛlɛkɛlɛ bɛ kɔgɔ kunkɔrɔta. Le Hauptflußbett.
piment relève la saveur du sel. (proverbe). 2 • intelligent; intelligent; intelligent. Donsocɛ
Chili pepper enhances the flavor of salt. kunma don. C'est un chasseur intelligent. He
(proverb). Der Pfeffer verstärkt den is an intelligent hunter. Er ist ein intelligenter
Geschmack des Salzes. (Sprichwort).
Jäger.
kunkɔrɔtasɛbɛn kunmabin [ù-à] Morphemes: kun-ma-bin.
[ù-ɔ̀-ɔ̀-à] Morphemes: kun-kɔrɔ-ta-sɛbɛn. variante: kunbabin. Nom. migraine, maux de
Nom. diplôme, prix; diploma, certificate, price; tête; migraine, headache; Migräne,
Diplom, Auszeichnung, Preis. A y'o kuncɛ ni Kopfschmerzen, Kopfweh. Kunmabin y'a
kirikow kunkɔrɔtasɛbɛn ye. Il a achevé ses minɛ. Il fut pris de forts maux de tête. He was
études par un diplôme d'études. seized with severe headaches. Er hatte starke
Category: Learn. Kopfschmerzen. Category: Disease.
kunkun [ù] Nom. 1 • miettes; crumbs; Brosamen. kunmabobaga Nom. libérateur; liberator; Befreier.
2 • balle (de céréale), ensemble formé par le
kunmabɔ [ù-à] Morphemes: kun-ma-bɔ. vt.
grain et la balle; husk (of grain) , the grain and
the husk together; Schale (von Getreide), aus 1 • racheter (quelqu'un mis en gage), délivrer;
Korn und Schale gebildete Verbindung. U ka
redeem, free; erlösen, auslösen, loskaufen,
retten, befreien. N fa ye nafolo kɛ... ka a
kan k'u ka .nɔw fyɛ, ka kunkun... bɔ a la. Il
kunmabɔ. Mon père l'a racheté avec de
leur faut vanner leur mil, et en sortir la balle.
l'argent. My father bought it back with money.
They have to winnow their millet and take out
the chaff. Sie müssen ihre Hirse sichten und Mein Vater hat es mit Geld zurückgekauft. ...
die Spreu entfernen. saya na ne kunmabɔ. ... la mort me délivrera.
kunkurun [ù] Morphemes: kun-kurun. Nom. ...death will deliver me. ...der Tod wird mich
erlösen.
1 • morceau, bout, pièce de quelque chose,
2 • prendre la place, assurer la relève; take the
tronçon, moignon; piece, end, part of
place, ensure the succession; den Platz
something, section, stump; Stück, Ende, Stück
von etwas, Abschnitt, Stumpf. Sa kunkurun
einnehmen, übernehmen. kunmabɔnafolo
bɔra a kɔnɔ... Un morceau de serpent sortit de
rançon. ransom. Lösegeld.
son ventre... A piece of snake came out of his kunmabɔbaga
belly... Ein Stück Schlange kam aus seinem [ù-à-ɔ̀] Morphemes: kunmabɔ-baga. Nom.
Bauch... sira kunkurun tronçon de route. rédempteur, remplaçant, libérateur; redeemer,
section of road, stretch of road. substitute, liberator; Retter, Befreier,
Straßenabschnitt, Stück Straße. buru Stellvertreter.
kunkurun morceau de pain. piece of bread.
Stück Brot. synonyme: kungurun.
29/01/2026 500

kunmabɔli kunmasuuli
kunmabɔli Morphemes: kunmabɔ-li. vt. rédemption; kunmaniya [ù-à-ì] Verbe. 1 • manquer, faire défaut
redemption; Erlösung, Errettung, Sühne. A ka de, être déficitaire; lack, not be sufficient,
showing a shortfall; fehlen, nicht genug sein,
kunmabɔli baara la, Krisita ye kunmabɔli
sɔngɔ sara hadamadenw bɛɛ ye. Dans son
Defizit aufweisen. Faamuya man kan ka
kunmaniya fasojama ma habada. Le peuple
œuvre de rédemption, Christ a payé le prix du
rachat pour toute l'humanité. . In his work of ne doit pas manquer des informations lui
redemption, Christ paid the price of permettant de comprendre. The people must
redemption for all mankind. . In seinem not be short of information that enables them
Erlösungswerk hat Christus den Preis der to understand. Dem Volk dürfen keine
Erlösung für die ganze Menschheit bezahlt. Informationen zum Verständnis fehlen.
kunmadɔgɔ [ù-à] Morphemes: kun-ma-dɔgɔ. 2 • léser; doing wrong, hurt; falsch machen,
verletzen, ungerecht behandeln. Mɔgɔ ka kan
Nom. chétif, malingre; puny, sickly; kränklich.
ni fɛn min ye, ni i ma o di a ma, i ye a
mɔgɔ kunmadɔgɔ personne chétive. sickly
kunmaniya. Si tu ne donnes pas à quelqu'un
person. kränklicher Mensch.
synonyme: mirimɔrɔ.
ce que tu devais lui donner, tu l'as lésé. If you
don’t give someone what you were supposed to
kunmadɔgɔya give them, you have hurt them. Wenn du
[ù-à-ɔ̀-ɔ̀] Morphemes: kun-ma-dɔgɔ-ya. jemandem nicht gibst, was du ihm geben
solltest, hast du ihn verletzt.
Verbe. 1 • rendre chétif; make one puny;
mickrig machen. Syɛba ka kunmadɔgɔya tɛ kunmasii [u-à] Morphemes: kun-ma-sii. Nom.
se k'a kɛ danga ye. La petite taille d'une mère cheveux (dans l'expression signifiant «avoir
poule ne doit pas faire qu'on la considère les cheveux qui se dressent», «frissonner de
comme une poulette. (proverbe). The small peur ou d'émotion», «avoir la chair de poule»);
size of a mother hen should not make her hair (in the phrase meaning «have hair that
considered a chicken. (proverb). Die geringe stands up», «shiver of fear or emotion», «have
Größe einer Mutterhenne sollte nicht dazu goose bumps»); Haare (in der Bedeutung «Die
führen, daß sie als bloßes Hühnchen betrachtet Haare stehen», «Zittern vor Angst oder
wird. (Sprichwort). Gefühl», «Gänsehaut haben»). Siran tɛ
2 • humilier; humiliate; demütigen. subonda la, nka kunmasiicɛ bɛ yen. On n'a
kunmafalen pas peur dans la maison mortuaire, mais on y
frissonne d'émotion. (proverbe). There is no
[ù-á-à-é] Morphemes: kun-ma-falen.
fear in the mortuary, but one shivers with
1 • Verbe. échanger, remplacer, troquer; emotion. (proverb). Man hat keine Angst im
exchange, replace; austauschen, ersetzen,
Totenhaus, aber man zittert vor Emotion.
eintauschen. A y'a ka nɛgɛso kunmafalen so (Sprichwort).
la. Il a troqué sa bicyclette contre un cheval.
kunmasirinanw Nom. accessoires de coiffure;
He traded his bicycle for a horse. Er tauschte
hairstyle accessories; Frisur Zubehör.
sein Fahrrad gegen ein Pferd.
Category: Tool.
2 • Nom. échange, remplaçant, relève;
kunmasuuli
exchange, replacement, relief; Austausch,
Ersatz, Ablösung, Entlastung. Waraba [ù-á-ù-í] Morphemes: kun-ma-suuli.
kunmafalen ye a den ye. Le remplaçant du 1 • Verbe. baisser la tête; bow his head; den
lion, c'est le lionceau. (proverbe). The lion's Kopf neigen. synonyme: kunsuuruli.
replacement is the lion cub. (proverb). 2 • Verbe. humilier, avoir honte; humiliate, be
kunmajigin [ù-a.-ì-í] Morphemes: kun-ma-jigin. ashamed; demütigen, beschämen, beschämt
sein. A somɔgɔw kunmasuulila. Ses parents
synonyme: lamaloya. Verbe. humilier, abaisser,
furent humiliés. His parents were humiliated.
entacher l'honneur, faire honte; humble, lower,
Seine Eltern wurden gedemütigt.
shame; demütigen, beschämen. A ye n
3 • Nom. honte, humiliation; shame,
kunmajiginko kɛ. Il m'a humilié. He
humiliation; Scham, Demütigung. u ka
humiliated me. synonyme: madɔgɔya,
kunmasuulikow leurs actes honteux. their
lamaloya.
shameful deeds. ihre schändlichen
Handlungen.
29/01/2026 501

kunmayɛlɛma kunnabila
kunmayɛlɛma kunna [ù] postp. 1 • au-dessus de, par-dessus, à la tête
[ù-á-ɛ̀-ɛ̀] Morphemes: kun-ma-yɛlɛma. de, sur; above, on top of, over; über, an der
Verbe. 1 • troubler quelqu'un, déranger l'esprit; Spitze von. A bɛ an kunna. Il est à notre tête
to disturb someone, to disturb the mind; (il nous commande). He is above us (he directs
jemanden stören, den Geist stören. Bana in de us). Er ist über uns (er leitet uns). An ka
y'a kunmayɛlɛma C'est la maladie qui lui a ganinw jɔ sɛnɛfɛnw kunna, k'u tanga tile
troublé l'esprit. It was the illness that troubled ma. Fabriquons de petits abris au-dessus des
his mind. Es ist die Krankheit, die ihn plantes pour les protéger su soleil. Make small
beunruhigt hat. shelters over the plants to protect them from
2 • trouble mental; mental disorder; the sun. Wir bauen kleine Unterstände über
psychische Störung. Mɔgɔ ni i kunmayɛlɛma den Pflanzen, um sie vor der Sonne zu
tɛ don kaburu kɔnɔ. On n'est pas enterré avec schützen. ... Maamari sigira tɔn kunna. ...
ses troubles mentaux. (proverbe). One is not Maamari fut mis à la tête de l'association. ...,
buried with his mental disorders. (proverb). Maamari was appointed director of the
Man wird nicht mit seinen psychischen association. ... Maamari wurde zum Leiter der
Störungen begraben. (Sprichwort). Vereinigung ernannt.
kunmayɛlɛn 2 • au bout de, a' l’extrémité de; at the end of, at
the extremity of; am Ende von, am Ende des.
[ù-á-ɛ̀-ɛ́] Morphemes: kun-ma-yɛlɛn.
Jurunin bɛ don... kukala kunna. On attache
synonyme: bonya. 1 • Verbe. honorer; honour; une petite ficelle à l'extrémité de la queue. A
ehren. synonyme: kunnawolo. small string is attached to the end of the tail.
2 • Nom. honneur; honor; Ehre. A ye Eine kleine Schnur wird am Ende des
Schwanzes befestigt.
kunmayɛlɛn sɔrɔ a ka baara la. Il a reçu des
3 • auprès de, à côté de, au service de; next to,
honneurs pour son travail. He received
besides of, at the disposal of; neben, seitlich
honors for his work. Für seine Arbeit erhielt er
von, auf der Seite von, zu Diensten von.
Ehrungen.
Silamakan ka mɔgɔw sira a kunna. Les gens
kunminɛ [ǔ-ì-ɛ́] Morphemes: kun-minɛ. Verbe.
de Silamakan passèrent la nuit auprès de lui.
satisfaire, convenir, plaire; satisfy, suit, like, The people of Silamakan spent the night with
find attractive ; befriedigen, zufriedenstellen, him. Die Leute von Silamakan verbrachten die
gefallen. O kuma ma Musa kunminɛ... Cette Nacht bei ihm.
parole n'a pas satisfait Moussa... This word did 4 • contre, avec; against, with; gegen, mit. ...
not satisfy Moussa... Dieses Wort befriedigte
ka i jaman dajɛ kunna kosɛbɛ ! ...et de se
Moussa nicht ... synonyme: ɲɛfa.
fâcher contre l'antilope ! ...and get angry with
kunmɔ [ù] Morphemes: kun-mɔ. Verbe. mettre en the antelope! ... und wütend auf die Antilope
boules; put into balls; in Kugeln formen. Dɔw
zu werden!
bɛ kɛ ka bɔgɔden kunmɔ... Certains sont en kunnabana [ù-à] Morphemes: kun-na-bana. Nom.
train de faire des boules de «banco»... Some maladie mentale, folie; mental illness,
are making clay balls... Einige machen Ton madness; geistige Krankheit, Wahnsinn.
Erde Bälle... Category: Disease. synonyme: jinɛbana,
kunmugu [ù] Morphemes: kun-mugu. Nom. jinabana, kunkolowuli, kunfɛn, kunnafɛn,
hakililabana.
tignasse, cheveux avant qu'ils soient tressés;
hair, mane, hair before it is braided; Haare, kunnabila [ù-à] Morphemes: kun-na-bila. Nom.
1
bevor sie geflochten werden. I ma se ka finin
foulard, châle, toute espèce de couvre-chef en
siri i kunmugu la wa ? Tu ne peux pas nouer tissu; headscarf, shawl, all kinds of headgear
tes cheveux ? Can’t you tie your hair? Du made of cloth; Kopftuch, Schal, jede Art von
kannst dir nicht die Haare binden? Kopfbedeckung aus Stoff. Category: Clothing.
synonyme: disa.
29/01/2026 502

kunnabila kunnafoni
kunnabila [ù-á-ì-á] Verbe. faire des reproches, kunnadiya n.comp. chance; luck; Glück. I ni
2
rappeler un bienfait, faire honte à quelqu'un kunnadiya. Toi et la chance. You and luck. Du
pour son ingratitude; make reproaches, blame, und das Glück.
recall a blessing, shame someone for his
kunnadiya dama kɛɲɛni expr. égalité de chance;
ingratitude; vorwerfen, Vorwürfe machen,
eine Wohltat in Erinnerung rufen, jemanden equality of opportunity and treatment, equal
für seine Undankbarkeit beschämen. E b'a fɛ chances for all; Chancengleichheit, gleiche
ka ne kunnabila o la wa ? Tu veux me faire
Chancen und Rechte.
des reproches là-dessus ? You want to blame kunnadoni [ù-à] Morphemes: kun-na-doni. Nom.
me for that? Willst du mir das vorwerfen? charge, responsabilité; burden, load,
synonyme: kunnada. responsibility; Bürde, Last, Verantwortung.
An k'án kunnadoniw fɛgɛnya. Allégeons nos
kunnabiri [ù-à] Morphemes: kun-na-biri. 1 • Verbe.
charges. Let’s lighten our load. Laßt uns
voiler (la tête); veil one's face, wear a veil;
unsere Lasten erleichtern.
verschleiern.
kunnafa [ù-à] Morphemes: kun-na-fa. Verbe.
2 • Nom. voile (de femme), châle, toit de la
paillote; veil, shawl, straw roof of round-hut; combler, charger, donner satisfaction; fulfil,
Schleier, Schal, Strohdach einer Strohhütte. Ni fill up, lavish, satisfy, get bountiful; füllen,
befriedigen, stillen, Genüge leisten, grosszügig
i ye bugu dɔ kunnabiri ta ka a sigi dɔ
sein. O kunnafara denmisɛnw na. Elles ont
kunna, n'a ma dɔgɔya a ma, a bɛ bonya a
été comblées d'enfants. They got a bountiful
ma. Si tu retires le toit d'une paillote pour le
number of children. Sie wurden großzügig mit
mettre sur une autre, il sera ou trop petit ou
Kindern beschenkt. I kana a kunnafa lenburu
trop grand. (proverbe). If you remove the roof
kolon na. Ne la charge pas de mauvaises
from one straw hut to put it on another, it will
either be too small or too large. (proverb).
oranges. Don't load it with bad oranges.
Beladen Sie es nicht mit schlechten Orangen.
Wenn du das Dach von einer Strohhütte
entfernst und auf eine andere legst, wird es kunnafɛn [ù-à] Morphemes: kun-na-fɛn. Nom.
entweder zu klein oder zu groß sein.
1 • maladie mentale, folie; mental illness,
(Sprichwort).
madness; Geisteskrankheit, Wahnsinn.
kunnabɔ [ù-à] Morphemes: kun-na-bɔ. Verbe. synonyme: kunnabana.
donner un nom, nommer, appeler; give a name, 2 • crise d'épilepsie; epileptic seizure;
call, name; einen Namen geben, nennen. O y'a epileptischer Anfall. Category: Disease.
kunnabɔ ko Awa. Ils l'ont appelée Ève. They kunnafiɲɛ [ù-à] Morphemes: kun-na-fiɲɛ. Nom.
called her Eve. Sie nannten sie Eva.
pression atmosphérique; atmospheric
kunnada [ù-à] Morphemes: kun-na-da. Verbe. pressure; atmosphärischer Druck. Dugukolo
1 • faire des reproches, rappeler un bienfait, kunnafiɲɛ bɛ digi fan bɛɛ. La pression
faire honte à quelqu'un pour son ingratitude; atmosphérique s’exerce partout. Atmospheric
make reproaches, recall a favour or benefit, pressure is exerted everywhere. Überall
shame someone for his ingratitude; vorwerfen, herrscht Atmosphärendruck. Category: Sky.
Vorwürfe machen, eine Wohltat in Erinnerung synonyme: fiɲɛdigi.
rufen, jemanden für seine Undankbarkeit
beschämen. N'o kɛra... áw si tɛna se ka si
kunnafoni
1
[ù-à-ó-í] Morphemes: kun-na-foni.
kunnada. Ainsi, personne ne pourra faire des variante: kunnafoli. 1 • Nom. information,
reproches à quiconque. So no one can blame nouvelle, introduction, renseignement; news,
anyone. So kann niemand jemandem
introduction, information; Information,
Vorwürfe machen. Kunnadali tɛ mɔgɔ ni fa Neuigkeiten, Einleitung. Kunnafoniw lamɛn
cɛ, kunnadali tɛ mɔgɔ ni ba cɛ. Entre un père ka di n ye. J’aime écouter les informations. I
et un enfant, entre une mère et un enfant, les like listening to the news. Ich höre gerne die
bienfaits ne peuvent être rappelés. (proverbe). Neuigkeiten. A kunnafoni bɛ ɲɛ 2 la.
Between a father and a child, between a Informations en page 2. Informations on page
mother and a child, the benefits cannot be 2. Informationen auf Seite 2.
recalled. (proverb). Zwischen einem Vater 2 • vt. renseigner, informer; inform, give
und einem Kind, zwischen einer Mutter und information to; informieren. k'i yɛrɛ
einem Kind können die Wohltaten nicht in
kunnafoni s'informer. get informed. sich
Erinnerung gerufen werden. (Sprichwort).
informieren.
synonyme: kunnabila .
2
kunnafoni [ù-à-ó-í] Nom. solution; solution;
2 • humilier; humiliate; demütigen, 2
erniedrigen. Lösung.
29/01/2026 503

kunnafoni di kunnagosi
kunnafoni di [ù-à-ó-í] synonyme: lasɔmi. vi. kunnafonilasela Nom. journaliste; journalist,
aviser; notify; melden, anzeigen, reporter; Journalist, Journalistin, Reporter.
benachrichtigen. synonyme: kibarulasela, faseribaga,
kunnafonidila Morphemes: kun-na-foni-di-la. lakalitaɲinina, kunnafonidila,
synonyme: kunnafonijɛnsɛnna. Nom. kunnafonijɛnsɛnna.
journaliste; journalist; Journalist. Mɔgɔw ye kunnafoniɲinibaro comparer: koɲɛɲinibaro. Nom.
kuma da kunnafonidilaw tulo kan. Les gens interview; interview; Interview, Unterredung,
en parlent à des journalistes. People talk to Besprechung.
journalists about it. Die Leute reden mit
kunnafonisɛbɛn Morphemes: kun-na-foni-sɛbɛn.
Journalisten darüber. Category: Worker,
occupation. synonyme: faseribaga,
Nom. journal; newspaper; Zeitung.
lakalitaɲinina, kunnafonilasela, kunnafonisɔrɔjo Nom. droit à l'information; right to
kibarulasela. get informed; Recht auf Information.
kunnafonidilaw synonyme: kunnafonidibaarada. kunnafoniw Nom. renseignements; information;
Nom. presse; press, newspapers; die Presse.
Auskunft, Information. Category: Sign,
Symbol.
kunnafonidisɛbɛ variante: kunnafonisɛbɛ. Nom.
kunnafɔ [ù-à] Morphemes: kun-na-fɔ. Verbe. dire
journal, presse écrite; newspaper, magazine,
journal; Zeitung, Zeitschrift. ka
quelque chose à quelqu'un sans y mettre les
formes, dire en passant; say something to
kunnafonidisɛbɛ fasari... traduire les
someone without using the apolitical correct
journaux... translate newspapers... Zeitungen forms, say by the way; etwas zu jemandem
übersetzen... sagen, ohne formell zu sein, nur nebenbei
kunnafonidiso Morphemes: kun-na-foni-di-so. sagen. I bɛ mɔgɔ min boɲɛ, i tɛ ci kunnafɔ a
Nom. centre d'information, Ministère de ye. Celui qu'on respecte, on ne lui parle pas
l'information; information center, Ministry of n'importe comment. The one we respect, we do
Information; Informationszentrum, not talk to him in a bad way. Mit dem, den man
Ministerium für Information. respektiert, spricht man nicht so.
kunnafonifalen Jula: kunnafolifalen. Nom. kunnagɛlɛn [ù-à] Morphemes: kun-na-gɛlɛn.
communication; communication; Nom. récalcitrant; stubborn, reluctant;
Kommunikation. Hadamaden ka widerspenstig, unwillig. Fininden
kunnafonifalen koloma bɛ kɛ ni kuma ye. kunnagɛlɛn, n'a ma tara daga jula, a na taa
La communication entre les êtres humains se kanga fɛ. Le petit grain de «fonio»
fait essentiellement par la parole. récalcitrant, s'il ne colle pas au fond de la
Communication between human beings is marmite, sera emporté par l'écume. (proverbe).
mainly done through speech. Die The small grain of «fonio» recalcitrant, if it
Kommunikation zwischen Menschen erfolgt does not stick to the bottom of the pot, will be
hauptsächlich durch Sprache. washed away by the foam. (proverb). Das
kunnafonijɛnsɛ Morphemes: kun-na-foni-jɛnsɛ. widerspenstige Fonio-Körnchen, wenn es
nicht am Boden des Topfes klebt, wird vom
Nom. communication; communication;
Schaum weggespült. (Sprichwort).
Kommunikation.
kunnafonijɛnsɛnna kunnagosi [ù-á-ò-í] Morphemes: kun-na-gosi.
Morphemes: kun-na-foni-jɛnsɛn-na.
Verbe. 1 • réprimander, reprendre qqn, faire la
morale, relever les fautes de qqn; reprimand,
synonyme: kunnafolidila, kunnafolilasela.
correct somebody, show somebody his faults;
Nom. journaliste; journalist; Journalist. tadeln, jemanden zurechtweisen, Fehler
Category: Worker, occupation. aufzeigen, Moralpredigt halten. A ye den
synonyme: lakalitaɲinina, kunnafonilasela,
malobali kunnagosi. Il a réprimandé l'enfant
faseribaga, kibarulasela.
effronté. He rebuked the impudent child. Er
kunnafonijɛnsɛnsoba hat das freche Kind zurechtgewiesen.
Morphemes: kun-na-foni-jɛnsɛn-so-ba.
synonyme: bololagosi.
Nom. agence de presse; press agency; 2 • humilier; humiliate; demütigen,
Presseagentur.
erniedrigen.
29/01/2026 504

kunnagoya kunnasigi
3 • bien éduquer, bien élever; educate well, 2 • Nom. chance, bonne fortune, bonne étoile;
well educated, well raised; gut erziehen. A luck, chance, good fortune, good luck; Glück,
den kunnagosilen don. Son enfant est bien Glücksfall, guter Stern. Diɲɛ kunnandiya fɔlɔ
élevé. His child is well-behaved. Sein Kind ist ye musoɲumanfuru ye. La première chance
gut erzogen. de la vie est d'avoir une bonne épouse. The first
kunnagoya [ù-à-ò-á] Morphemes: kun-na-goya.
chance in life is to have a good wife. Das
größte Glück im Leben ist eine gute Frau.
Nom. malchance; bad luck; Unglück, Pech.
kunnango [ù-à] Morphemes: kun-na-n-go. Nom.
kunnajate [ù-à] comparer: jate. Jula: kunnajati.
malchanceux, de mauvais augure; unlucky,
Morphemes: kun-na-jate. Nom. calcul mental;
bad omen; Pech, schlechtes Omen. An ka taa
mental arithmetic; Kopfrechnen.
nin musokɔrɔnin kunnango bara dɛ...
Category: Mathematics. synonyme: kunfɛjate.
Allons chez cette petite vieille de mauvais
kunnajɛ [ũ̀-á-ɛ́] Jula: kunnagwɛ. augure... Let’s go to this little old lady of bad
variante: kunangwɛ. Nom. pique-bœufs;
omen... Gehen wir zu dieser unglücklichen
alten Frau...
ox-pecker; Vogelart. Category: Bird.
kunnangoya Morphemes: kun-na-n-go-ya.
kunnakali [ù-à] Morphemes: kun-na-kali. Verbe.
1 • n.comp. malchance, mauvaise fortune,
raconter (de tête), relater, rapporter; tell,
guigne; bad luck; Pech, Unglück, in der
describe, report; erzählen, berichten. Wuli
Patsche sein. Waso kɔ ye kunnangoya ye. La
koɲuman bɛ na ni sugo kunnakali ye. Pour
guigne est le salaire de la vantardise.
raconter ses rêves il faut se réveiller dans de
(proverbe). Bad luck is the reward of boasting.
bonnes conditions. (proverbe). To tell your
(proverb). Pech ist der Preis für Prahlerei.
dreams you have to wake up in good
(Sprichwort).
conditions. (proverb). Um seine Träume zu
2 • Verbe. porter malchance, être malchanceux,
erzählen, muß man in guten Bedingungen
avoir la guigne; bear bad luck, be unlucky,
aufwachen. (Sprichwort).
have the wrong; Pech haben. ... a bɛ kɛ
kunnakolon n.comp. neutre; neuter, neutral; neutral,
sababu ye k'i kunnangoya. ... cela entraînera
Neutrum. Category: Grammar. la malchance pour toi. ... it will bring bad luck
kunnala Verbe. faire des reproches; to find fault with to you. ... wird es Pech für dich bringen.
something, reproach; Vorwürfe machen. kunnasagon
kunnana Morphemes: kun-na-na. variante: kunnala. [ù-á-à-ó] Morphemes: kun-na-sagon.
Nom. surface, dessus; surface, top, upper side; Verbe. enjamber, éviter, éviter la vente de (en
Oberfläche, oben. ... ji basigilen kunnana prêtant de l'argent); step over, avoid;
dalen don ka kɛɲɛ. ... l'eau au repos a une
überspringen, vermeiden, umgehen. ka ji
surface parfaitement horizontale. ... the water
kunnasagon enjamber un ruisseau. crossing a
at rest has a perfectly horizontal surface. ... brook. einen Bach überqueren. ka jan
das Wasser in Ruhe hat eine perfekt kunnasagon éviter le piège. avoid the trap.
horizontale Oberfläche. der Falle ausweichen.
kunnandi [ù-à] Morphemes: kun-na-n-di. Nom. kunnasɛbɛnni Morphemes: kun-na-sɛbɛn-ni. Nom.
chanceux, fortuné; lucky, fortunate; Glück. dictée; dictation; Diktieren, Diktat.
kunnandiya [ù-à] Morphemes: kun-na-n-di-ya. Category: Learn. synonyme: ɲɛwaga.
1 • Verbe. porter chance, être chanceux; bring kunnasigi [ù-á-ì-í] Morphemes: kun-na-sigi.
luck, be lucky; Glück bringen, Glück haben. E
Verbe. installation de la femme au domicile de
kunnandiyara sa ! Ça alors tu es chanceux ! son mari, épouser une veuve sans avoir rien
Wow, you're lucky! Meine Güte, du hast déboursé; the woman’s installation in her
Glück! Dadiya tɛ kunnandiya ye. Bien parler husband’s home, marrying a widow without
est une chose, être chanceux en est une autre. having paid anything; die Frau in der
(proverbe). To speak well is one thing, to be Wohnung ihres Ehemanns unterbringen, eine
lucky is another. (proverb). Gut sprechen ist Witwe heiraten, ohne etwas auszuzahlen. A bɛ
eine Sache, Glück zu haben eine andere. taa cɛ kunnasigi la. Elle va s’installer chez
(Sprichwort). son mari. She’s moving in with her husband.
Sie zieht zu ihrem Mann. Musa y'a kɔrɔkɛ
salen muso kunnasigi. Moussa a épousé la
veuve de son frère aîné. Moussa married the
widow of his elder brother. Moussa hat die
Witwe seines älteren Bruders geheiratet.
29/01/2026 505

kunnasigiba kunnatigɛ
kunnasigiba n.comp. superlatif; superlative; kunnasumaya Morphemes: kun-na-suma-ya.
Superlativ. Verbe. rendre lent, rendre calme; make slow,
kunnasigibaga make calm; langsam machen, ruhig machen. A
[ù-à-ì-i] Morphemes: kun-na-sigi-baga.
y'a dɔgɔya fo ka a kunnasumaya. Il lui a
durement parlé, ce qui l'a fait se calmer. He
Nom. tuteur, gérant, administrateur; guardian,
spoke harshly, which calmed him down. Er
tutor, manager administrator; Vormund,
sprach hart mit ihm, was ihn beruhigte.
Verwalter, Manager, Administrator. Fo
kunnasigibaga ka kɛ mɔgɔ laadiri ye. Il faut kunnasuuli [ù-á-ù-í] Morphemes: kun-na-suuli.
que le gérant soit un homme de confiance. The Verbe. humilier, faire honte, décevoir;
manager must be a man of confidence. Der humiliate, shame, disappoint; demütigen,
Verwalter muß ein vertrauenswürdiger Mann beschämen, enttäuschen. Ni ba kasira dunan
sein. Category: Worker, occupation. na, dosokɔrɔ ta kɛra kunnasuuli ye faso
kunnasiri [ù-á-ì-í] Morphemes: kun-na-siri. kɔnɔ. Quand une chèvre bêle à l'arrivée de
1 • Verbe. embarrasser, mal à l'aise, embêter, l'étranger, le gros chien en est tout honteux
gêner, inquiéter, soucier; embarrass, put into dans la maison. (proverbe). When a goat
an unpleasant position, annoy, bother, disturb, bellows at the arrival of the foreigner, the big
dog is all ashamed in the house. (proverb).
worry; genieren, in eine unbequeme Lage
bringen, stören, belästigen, verlegen machen, Wenn eine Ziege bei der Ankunft eines
beunruhigen. A ye n kunnasiri. Il m'a Fremden meckert, schämt sich der große Hund
embarrassé. He embarrassed me. Er hat mich
im Haus. (Sprichwort). synonyme: madɔgɔya.
in Verlegenheit gebracht. kunnasuuru synonyme: maloya. n.comp. honte;
synonyme: lafilibagatɔ, lafilibagatɔ.
shame; Scham.
2 • Verbe. faire honte; shame; beschämen,
kunnata [ù-á-ǎ] Morphemes: kun-na-ta. Verbe.
blamieren.
franchir, passer par dessus, enjamber; cross,
3 • Nom. embarras, soucis, gêne, inquiétude;
pass over, step over; überqueren, überholen,
embarrassment, worry, inconvenience,
übersteigen. A sinna dingɛba ma ka a
discomfort; Verlegenheit, Sorge, Belästigung,
Unannehmlichkeit. U y'u to o kunnasiri n'o kunnata. Il se dirigea vers le grand fossé et le
kamanagan na. Ils restèrent dans cet état de
franchit. He went to the great ditch and
crossed it. Er ging zum großen Graben und
gêne et d'inquiétude. They remained in this
state of embarrassment and anxiety. Sie
überschritt ihn. synonyme: lasagon
2
.
blieben in diesem Zustand der Verlegenheit kunnatɛmɛ [ù-á-ɛ̀-ɛ́] Morphemes: kun-na-tɛmɛ.
und Unruhe.
Verbe. 1 • achever une œuvre; to complete the
4 • Nom. malchance, honte; bad luck, shame; work; ein Werk fertigstellen. A b'o
Pech, Schande. An ka kanw fɔli kunnasiri bɛ
kunnatɛmɛ fɔlɔ... Il achève d'abord ça... He
án ka jamana yɛrɛ den dɔw la hali sisan.
finishes that first... Er beendet dies zuerst ...
Certains de nos citoyens à l'heure actuelle
2 • dépasser, régler, résoudre; to overcome, to
éprouvent de la honte à parler nos langues.
regulate, to resolve; überwinden, regeln,
Some of our citizens today are ashamed to
lösen. N bɛ nin wari in di i ma walasa i ka se
speak our languages. Einige unserer Bürger
ka nin ko in kunnatɛmɛ. Je te donne cet
fühlen sich heute beschämt, unsere Sprachen
zu sprechen. argent afin que tu puisses dépasser cette
difficulté. I give you this money so that you can
kunnasirilan Morphemes: kun-na-siri-lan. Nom.
overcome this difficulty. Ich gebe Ihnen dieses
mouchoir de tête; headscarf; Kopftuch. Geld, damit Sie diese Schwierigkeit
kunnasirilan Category: Adornment, Clothing. überwinden können.
synonyme: musɔrɔ. kunnatigɛ [ù-á-ì-ɛ́] Morphemes: kun-na-tigɛ.
1
kunnasirilenya Morphemes: kun-na-siri-len-ya. Verbe. 1 • être sans honte, effronté; be without
shame, shameless, make honor; ohne Scham
Nom. 1 • gêne, embarras; embarrassment;
Peinlichkeit. synonyme: lafilibagatɔ. sein, schamlos, Ehre machen. A tɛ malo,
mɔgɔ kunnatigɛlen don. Il n'a pas honte,
2 • confusion, humiliation; confusion,
humiliation; Verwirrung, Demütigung. c'est quelqu'un d'effronté. He's not ashamed,
he's a cheeky person. Er hat keine Scham, er ist
frech.
2 • effronterie, impudence; brazenness,
impudence, effrontery; Frechheit,
Unverschämtheit.
29/01/2026 506

kunnatigɛ kunɲɛ
kunnatigɛ [ù-á-ì-ɛ́] Morphemes: kun-na-tigɛ. kunnawuli Morphemes: kun-na-wuli. Verbe. 1 • clore,
2
Verbe. faire honneur; honour; ehren, würdigen. achever (faire lever le bout de); close,
Ni i binna jama la, a bɛ kɛ i bolo kunnatigɛ complete (raise the end of); schließen,
ye ? Si tu tombes en public, est-ce que ce sera abschließen, beenden (das Ende anheben). ...
pour toi quelque chose d'honorable ? If you fall sani kuma kunna ka wuli... ... avant que la
in public, will it be something honourable for discussion ne soit close... ... before the
you? Wenn du in der Öffentlichkeit fällst, ist discussion is closed... ... bevor die Diskussion
das für dich etwas Ehrenhaftes? beendet ist...
kunnatiɲɛ [ù-à] Morphemes: kun-na-tiɲɛ. 2 • commencer (faire lever le bout de); start,
begin, (raise the end of); beginnen,, anfangen
1 • Verbe. détourner, dévoyer, séduire;
(das Ende anheben). A ko kunnawulilen don
misappropriate, misdirect, mislead, seduce;
veruntreuen, ablenken, verführen. Tubabuw sisan. C'est une chose qui est en train de
y'a ɲini k'o kunnatiɲɛ a fa ma. Les Français
commencer à présent. It is something that is
starting now. Es ist etwas, das jetzt beginnt.
ont cherché à le détourner de son père. The
French tried to take him away from his father. kunntan Morphemes: kun-ntan. Nom. 1 • sans raison,
Die Franzosen haben versucht, ihn von seinem inutile, sans valeur; without reason, without
Vater abzubringen. Kamalenninw bɛ ne value, useless; ohne Grund, grundlos,
nɛgɛn ka n kunnatiɲɛ... Les jeunes gens me unnütz, wertlos. baara kunntan travail sans
flattent pour me dévoyer... The young people intérêt (sans utilité, sans profit, sans raison).
flatter me to deceive me... Junge Leute work without interest (without use, without
schmeicheln mir, um mich in die Irre zu führen profit, without reason). uninteressante Arbeit
... (ohne Nutzen, ohne Gewinn, ohne Grund).
2 • Verbe. scandaliser; scandalise, shock; 2 • mystérieux, bizarre; mysterious, strange,
schockieren, Anstoß zu nehmen, Anstoß zu odd, peculiar; mysteriös, seltsam, eigenartig,
geben. komisch, ausgefallen, sonderbar. .... u bɛ
3 • Nom. détournement, déshonneur; bana kunntanw lase mɔgɔ kɛnɛkɛnɛw ma.
misappropriation, dishonour; Veruntreuung, ... donnent des maladies bizarres aux gens les
Schande. mieux portants. ...give strange diseases to
kunnawolo [ù-à] Morphemes: kun-na-wolo. even the healthiest people. ... den
gesündesten Menschen seltsame Krankheiten
1 • Verbe. honorer, faire honneur, faire la fierté;
zufügen.
honour, make pride, be a matter of honour;
ehren, stolz machen. Ala k'i kunnawolo ! Que 3 • stupide, idiot; stupid, idiot; Dummkopf,
Dieu t'honore ! May God honour you! Möge
Blödmann. mɔgɔ kunntan personne stupide.
Gott dich ehren! synonyme: jansan,
stupid person. dummer Mensch.
borokobaraka, kunmayɛlɛn, bonya , kunntanya [ù-à] Morphemes: kun-ntan-ya. Nom.
1
bonya . imbécillité, stupidité, inutilité; stupidity,
3
nonsense, uselessness; Dummheit,
2 • Nom. fierté, honneur, gloire; pride, honor,
Sinnlosigkeit, Nutzlosigkeit, Zwecklosigkeit.
glory; Stolz, Ehre, Herrlichkeit. Mali ye wasa,
Faantan ni kunntanya tɛ ban. Le pauvre
kunnawolo ani tɔgɔ minnu sɔrɔ... La
passe toujours pour un imbécile. (proverbe).
satisfaction, l'honneur, et le renom que le Mali
The poor man always passes for a fool.
a obtenus... The satisfaction, honour and
(proverb). Der arme Mensch wirkt immer wie
reputation that Mali has achieved... Die
ein Idiot. (Sprichwort).
Zufriedenheit, die Ehre und der Ruhm, den
Mali erlangt hat... kunɲɛ [ù] variante: kunɲa. Nom. coup, fois; blow,
kunnawolojala times; Schlag, mal. ... ka mugu kunɲɛ
[ù-à-ò-ò] Morphemes: kun-na-wolo-jala.
filanan ci Seku la. ... et tirer un deuxième
coup de feu sur Sékou. ...and fire a second
Nom. récompense, prix; reward, award, price;
shot at Sékou. ...und einen zweiten Schuß auf
Auszeichnung, Anerkennung, Preis,
Sékou abfeuern.
Belohnung. gafesɛbɛn kunnawolojala prix
littéraire. literary award, book award.
Literaturpreis. synonyme: ladiyalisɛbɛn.
kunnawolosɛbɛn
[ù-à-ò-ò] Morphemes: kun-na-wolo-sɛbɛ
n. Nom. diplôme; diploma, degree; Diplom,
Abschlusszeugnis, Urkunde,
Studienabschluss.
29/01/2026 507

kunɲɔgɔn kunsɔmɛ
kunɲɔgɔn Nom. 1 • huit jours après, semaine, en huit; kunsɛmɛ [ù] Morphemes: kun-sɛmɛ. Nom. cerveau;
in a week’s time, week, eight days after; in brain; Hirn, Gehirn. Dɔlɔmin bɛ kunsɛmɛ
einer Woche, acht Tage danach, in acht Tagen. fana tiɲɛ. L'alcoolisme détruit aussi le
tarata nata kunɲɔgɔn mardi en huit. Tuesday
cerveau. Alcoholism also destroys the brain.
in a week. Dienstag in einer Woche. Kabi Alkoholismus zerstört auch das Gehirn.
kunɲɔgɔn kelen, ne bɛ yan. Je suis ici depuis Category: Body. synonyme: kunkolontɛgɛn,
une semaine. I have been here for a week. Ich kunsɔmɛ, ntɛgɛn.
1
bin seit einer Woche hier.
kunsɛmɛforoko
2 • pair, égal, équivalent; peer, equal,
equivalent; Ebenbürtig, gleiche, gleichwertig. [ù-ɛ̀-ɛ̀] Morphemes: kun-ɛmɛ-foroko. Nom.
I bɛ «maharaba» fɔ i kunɲɔgɔn de ma. C'est méninge; meninges; Hirnhaut. Category: Body.
à un égal qu'on dit « maharaba ». An equal is kunsi Morphemes: kun-si. synonyme: kunsigi. Nom.
called a "maharaba." Es ist gleich wie wenn
cheveux; hair; Haar. Category: Body.
man «maharaba» sagt.
kunsigi [ũ̀-í-í] Morphemes: kun-sigi. Nom. cheveu;
kunpa [ú] variante: kunfan, kunpan. 1 • Verbe. être
hair; Haar. kunsigi den kelen une mèche de
impatient, être inquiet, être anxieux; be
cheveux. a strand of hair, a lock of hair. eine
impatient, be worried, be anxious, be
Haarsträhne,, eine Haarlocke. Category: Body.
concerned; ungeduldig sein, besorgt sein,
ängstlich sein. Anw balikukalandenw kunsigibɔrɔsi Nom. brosse à cheveux; hairbrush;
kunpalen bɛ ko dɔ la. Nous, élèves de Haarbürste. Category: Tool.
l'alphabétisation des adultes sommes inquiets kunsigiminɛnan Nom. pince à cheveux; hair grip;
pour une chose. We adult literacy students are
Haarspange. Category: Adornment.
concerned about one thing. Wir
Alphabetisierungsschüler machen uns über kunsigintan [ù-ì-ì] Morphemes: kun-sigi-ntan.
eine Sache Sorgen. Nom. chauve; bald, bald-headed; Glatzkopf.
2 • Verbe. étonner, surprendre; surprise; kunsigitigɛla Morphemes: kunsigi-tigɛ-la. Nom.
überraschen, erstaunen. Ko in y'án kunpa.
coiffeur; barber; Barbier. Category: Worker,
Cette affaire nous a étonnés. This case
occupation. synonyme: kunkanna.
surprised us. Diese Angelegenheit hat uns
überrascht. kunsin [ũ̀-ĩ́] Morphemes: kun-sin. vt. s'orienter vers,
3 • Nom. inquiétude, anxiété, hâte, impatience, se diriger vers; orientate, channel, direct, go
envie, curiosité, appréhension, angoisse; towards; weisen, orientieren, kanalisieren,
worry, anxiety, haste, impatience, desire, dirigieren, gehen in Richtung. A y'i kunsin
curiosity, apprehension, anguish; Sorge, woro la. Elle se dirigea vers le sud. She
Angst, Eile, Ungeduld, Verlangen, Neugier,
headed south. Sie machte sich auf den Weg
Besorgnis, Angst. A kunpa bɛ n na. J'ai hâte
nach Süden.
d'avoir de ses nouvelles. I look forward to
hearing from him. Ich kann es kaum erwarten,
kunsinnan [ù-ì] Morphemes: kun-sin-nan. Nom.
von ihm zu hören. Saya bɛ mɔgɔ to kunpa gouvernail (de l'éolienne); rudder (of the wind
turbine); Ruder (der Windkraftanlage).
jugu la. La mort laisse l'homme dans une
Kunsinnan : o bɛ fɛlɛfɛlɛ ɲɛsin fiɲɛ ma. Le
grande angoisse. Death leaves man in great
anguish. Der Tod hinterläßt beim Menschen
gouvernail : il oriente les pales en fonction du
große Angst.
vent. The rudder: it directs the blades
according to the wind. Das Ruder: Es richtet
kunsaalolan [ù-à-ò] Morphemes: kun-saalo-lan. die Blätter entsprechend dem Wind aus.
Nom. peigne; comb; Kamm. Category: Tool. kunsinyɔrɔ lɔn vi. s'orienter; direct towards, turn
synonyme: sabulan.
towards; sich hinwenden zu .
kunsalen [ǔ-à-é] Morphemes: kun-sa-len. Nom.
kunsirilan [ù-ì-ì] Morphemes: kun-siri-lan. Nom.
apathique, mou, amorphe; apathetic, limp,
mouchoir de tête, bandeau; headscarf,
amorphous; apathisch, schlaff, amorph. ... a
headband; Kopftuch, Stirnband. kunsirilan
kunsalen don a ɲɔgɔnnaw cɛla. ... il est mou
Category: Adornment, Clothing.
par rapport à ses semblables. ...he is soft
compared to his peers. ...er ist weich im
kunsɔmɛ Nom. cerveau; brain; Hirn. Category: Body.
Vergleich zu seinen Artgenossen. ... er ist im synonyme: kunsɛmɛ, kunkolontɛgɛn.
Vergleich zu seinen Mitmenschen weich.
kunsalenya [ù-à-è] Nom. apathie, mollesse; apathy,
slackness, softness; Apathie, Schwäche,
Trägheit.
29/01/2026 508

kunsuma kuntigɛ
kunsuma [ù] Morphemes: kun-suma. Verbe. se 2 • hasard; chance, random, coincidence;
Zufall.
calmer, parler peu, ne plus parler; calm down,
not speak much, not speak any more; sich 3 • dispositions et dons naturels, événements
fortuits heureux ou malheureux, qui affecte
beruhigen, nicht viel sprechen, nicht mehr
sprechen. I kunsuma i ka nin lamɛn.
quelqu’un; natural dispositions and gifts,
happy or unfortunate events that affect
Calme-toi et écoute un peu. Calm down an
someone; natürliche Veranlagungen und
listen a bit. Beruhige dich und höre ein
Gaben, glückliche oder unglückliche zufällige
bisschen zu. synonyme: lafiɲɛbɔ.
Ereignisse, die jemanden betreffen. O la, a
kunsuuruli 1 • vi. baisser la tête, avoir honte, kuntere mana a ɲɛsin yɔrɔ min ma, a b'i
humilier, décevoir; lower one’s head, be banban o kan. Alors, ce vers quoi le pousse
ashamed, humiliate, disappoint; den Kopf sa tendance naturelle, c'est là-dessus qu'il
senken, beschämt sein, demütigen, insiste. So, what his natural tendency is
enttäuschen. synonyme: kunmasuuli. pushing him towards, that’s what he insists on.
2 • Nom. honte, humiliation; shame, Also, worauf ihn seine natürliche Neigung
humiliation; Schande, Scham, Demütigung. antreibt, darauf besteht er.
kuntaala [ù-à] Morphemes: kun-taa-la. Nom. kuntigɛ [ǔ-ì-ɛ́] Morphemes: kun-tigɛ. Verbe.
1 • durée; duration; Dauer. ... k'áw si 1 • démarrer, débuter, commencer, introduire,
kuntaala janya. ... prolonger la durée de votre
(«couper le bout»); start (up), begin,
introduce, («cut the end»); starten, beginnen,
vie. ...extend your life span. ...verlängern Sie
anfangen, einführen («Das Ende
Ihr Leben.
abschneiden»). O baaraw bɛ kuntigɛ
2 • contenu, sens; content, meaning; Inhalt,
dɔɔnindɔɔnin. Ces activités commencent à
Bedeutung. Kumandan y'án ka kuma
démarrer petit à petit. These activities are
kuntaala faamu, a y'án babila. Le
beginning to take off. Diese Aktivitäten
gouverneur a compris ce que nous lui
beginnen allmählich. A ye kuma kuntigɛ. Il a
expliquions, lui nous a relâchés. The governor
introduit son discours. He introduced his
understood what we were explaining to him
speech. Er führte seine Rede ein.
and released us. Der Gouverneur verstand,
was wir ihm erklärten, und ließ uns frei. 2 • brosser rapidement, dire en gros; give an
outline, say roughly; kurz überfliegen, grob
3 • direction, but visé; direction, goal;
Richtung, Ziel.
sagen. Karamɔgɔ ye bi kalan taabolow
kuntigɛ. Le maître a présenté sommairement
kuntaga [ù] variante: kuntaa. Nom. 1 • durée;
la leçon d'aujourd'hui. The master has
duration; Zeitraum, Zeitabschnitt. Nɛnɛ summarily presented today’s lesson. Der
kuntaga bi bɔ desanburukalo la ka taa Lehrer hat kurz die heutige Lektion
feburuyekalo la. La saison froide dure à partir vorgetragen.
du mois de décembre jusqu’au mois de février. 3 • suspendre, arrêter provisoirement («couper
The cold season lasts from December to le bout»); suspend, temporarily stop, («cut the
February. Die kalte Jahreszeit dauert end»); aussetzen, vorübergehend anhalten
zwischen Dezember und Februar. Taasi bɛ («Das Ende abschneiden»). Tilegan mana se,
yɛlɛ kuntaga janya. La réflexion prolonge le á b'a kuntigɛ. Quand arrive midi, vous
rire. (proverbe). Reflection prolongs laughter. arrêtez. When it comes to noon, you stop.
(proverb). Die Reflexion verlängert das Wenn es Mittag ist, hören Sie auf.
Lachen. (Sprichwort).
2 • taille, longueur; size, length; Größe, Länge.
Ne ni Musa kuntaga ye kelen ye. Moussa et
moi avons la même taille. Moussa and I are
the same height. Moussa und ich sind gleich
groß.
kuntere [ù] Morphemes: kun-tere. Nom. 1 • chance,
malchance, sort; luck, bad luck, misfortune,
fate, chance; Glück, Unglück, Pech, Schicksal,
Los, Geschick. Kun bɛ di, nka kuntere tɛ se
ka di. On peut raser la tête, mais pas la chance.
(proverbe). You can shave your head, but not
your luck. (proverb). Man kann den Kopf
rasieren, aber nicht das Glück. (Sprichwort).
29/01/2026 509

kuntigi kuntugu
kuntigi [ũ-̀ í-í] comparer: faaman, ɲamɔgɔ, kuntilennaɲin Morphemes: kun-tilen-na-ɲin. Nom.
jamanakuntigi. Morphemes: kun-tigi. dent de devant; front tooth; Vorderzahn.
synonyme: ɲɛmɔgɔ. Nom. chef, patron, Category: Body. générique: ɲin 1 , ɲinkisɛ.
directeur, autorité, supérieur, dirigeant; chief, kuntilenyɔrɔ Nom. 1 • sens; direction; Richtung,
boss, director, authority, superior, leader;
Direktion.
Chef, Führer, Häuptling, Direktor, Leiter,
Vorgesetzte. Ala ye fɛn o fɛn da, a ye kuntigi
2 • signification, sens; significance, sense;
Bedeutung, Sinn.
kɛ o la. Tout ce que Dieu a crée a un chef à sa
3 • objectif, but, direction; objective, goal,
tête. Everything God created has a leader at
direction; Objektiv, Ziel, Richtung.
its head. Alles, was Gott geschaffen hat, hat
synonyme: ɲɛsinyɔrɔ.
einen Führer an der Spitze. Kuntigi bɛ bɔ wo
min fɛ, tɔw bɛ bɔ o fɛ. Le trou par lequel le kunto [ù] Morphemes: kun-to. Verbe. être victime,
chef est sorti, tous les autres y passeront pour mourir; be a victim, die; Opfer sein, sterben.
sortir. (proverbe). The hole through which the Tankɔn kuntora kɔɲinɛbinjeni na. Le feu a
leader came out, all the others will go through été mis aux herbes pour chasser les rats de
to get out. (proverb). Das Loch, durch das der marigots et l'antilope bubale en a été la
Anführer herauskam, werden alle anderen victime. (proverbe). The grass was set on fire
durchqueren, um herauszukommen. to drive out the river rats and the antelope was
(Sprichwort). jamana kuntigiba le chef de the victim. (proverb). Das Gras wurden
l’État. the Head of State. das Staatsoberhaupt. angezündet, um die Ratten zu vertreiben, aber
Category: Person. die Antilope war das Opfer. (Sprichwort). A
kuntigiya [ù-ì-ì] Morphemes: kun-tigi-ya. Nom. ma kunto kɛlɛ la. Il n'est pas mort à la guerre.
He did not die in the war. Er starb nicht im
chefferie, direction, commandement; kingship,
Krieg.
control, domination, management, in
command of; Herrschaft, Leitung, kuntɔnɔn [ù] Morphemes: kun-tɔnɔn. Nom. gain,
Befehlsherrschaft, Befehlsgewalt. Ala ka bénéfice, profit; earnings, savings, gain,
kuntigiya caman kalifa a ma... Que Dieu lui profit, benefit; Gewinn, Verdienst, Ausbeute.
confie beaucoup d'autres commandements... A ye kuntɔnɔn sɔrɔ a ka malo la. Il a eu du
May God entrust him with many other bénéfice avec son riz. He made a profit with
dominations... Möge Gott ihm noch viele his rice. Er machte einen Gewinn mit seinem
weitere Befehlsgewalten anvertrauen... Reis.
kuntilen [ù] Morphemes: kun-tilen. Verbe. se kuntu [ù] Morphemes: kun-tu. Nom. touffe de
diriger, se mettre en face; to turn, face; sich cheveux, crinière; tuft of hair, mane; Büschel
zuwenden, sich gegenüberstellen. U y'u Haare, Mähne. Na n k'i kuntu in di ka bɔ
kuntilen ka don Jɛnɛba kan. Ils se sont yen. Viens que je te rase cette touffe de
dirigés tout droit vers chez Diènèba. They cheveux. Come on, I’ll cut that tuft of hair.
headed straight towards Diènèba. Sie sind Komm, ich rasiere dir diesen Haarbüschel ab.
direkt zu Diebeba gegangen.
kuntugu [ǔ-ù-ú] Morphemes: kun-tugu. 1 • Verbe.
1
kuntilenna Morphemes: kun-tilen-na. Nom. 1 • but, mettre bout à bout, joindre, rejoindre, souder;
objectif, direction; goal, objective, direction; put together, join, meet up with, weld together;
Zweck, Ziel, Richtung. Balikukalan die Enden zusammenstecken,
kuntilenna ye... Le but de l'alphabétisation zusammenfügen, zusammenschweißen,
fonctionnelle est de... The goal of functional
miteinander verbinden. A ye jurukisɛw
literacy is to... Das Ziel der funktionellen kuntugu ɲɔgɔn na. Il a mis bout à bout les
Alphabetisierung ist... Marifakisɛ tɛ du, a b'a deux ficelles. He put the two strings end to
kuntilenna na. La balle de fusil ne fait pas de end. Er legte die beiden Schnürenden
virage, elle va droit devant elle. (proverbe). A
aneinander.
bullet doesn't turn, it goes straight ahead. 2 • Nom. nœud, articulation, jointure; knot,
(proverb). Die Gewehrkugel dreht sich nicht, articulation, joint; Knoten, Gelenk. Kunbere
sie geht geradeaus. (Sprichwort). ye sannakolo ni worokolo kuntuguyɔrɔ ye.
2 • sens, signification; sense, significance, Le genou est la jointure entre le tibia et l'os de
meaning; Sinn, Bedeutung. Ne ma la cuisse. The knee is the joint between the shin
kuntilenna sɔrɔ a ka kuma na. Je n'ai pas vu bone and the thigh bone. Das Knie ist das
le sens de ce qu'il a dit. I did not see the
Gelenk zwischen Schienbein und
meaning of what he said. Ich habe die
Oberschenkelknochen.
Bedeutung dessen, was er sagte, nicht
verstanden.
29/01/2026 510

kuntugu kunwilibana
kuntugu [ù] Morphemes: kun-tugu. Verbe. kunun [ú-ú] Jula: kunu. Verbe. 1 • se réveiller,
2 2
recouvrir complètement; completely cover; éveiller; to wake up, awake, come to oneself;
vollständig bedeckt. A y'i da k'i kuntugu ni erwachen, aufwachen, zu sich kommen. A y'a
kasa ye. Il s'est couché et s'est complètement ka gadaw kunun. Elle réveilla ses servantes.
recouvert d'une couverture. He went to bed She awoke her servants. Sie weckte ihre
and covered himself completely with a blanket. Dienerinnen auf. synonyme: makunun.
Er legte sich hin und bedeckte sich vollständig
2 • revenir à soi; return to oneself, come back
mit einer Decke.
to yourself; wieder zu sich kommen.
kuntugufinin Morphemes: kun-tugu-finin. Nom. 3 • ressusciter; resurrect, come back to life,
grande pièce d’étoffe offerte par le fiancé à la revive; wiederbeleben, auferstehen. Dɔw b'a
jeune fille, voile de mariage; large piece of fɔ su kununna Certains prétendent que le
fabric given by the fiancé to the young girl,
cadavre est ressuscité. Some claim that the
wedding veil; großes Stück Stoff, das der
corpse has risen from the dead. Manche
Verlobte dem jungen Mädchen schenkt,
behaupten, die Leiche sei wieder auferstanden.
Hochzeitsschleier. Kɔɲɔdon su,
kunun comparer: sini .[ú-ǔ] Jula: kunu. Adverbe.
kuntugufinin bɛ kɛ ka kɔɲɔmuso kun tugu. 3 1
1 • hier; yesterday; gestern. Musa nana
La nuit du mariage, le voile de mariage sert à
couvrir le visage de la mariée. On the wedding kunun. Moussa est venu hier. Moussa came
night, the wedding veil is used to cover the yesterday. Moussa ist gestern gekommen.
bride's face. In der Hochzeitsnacht wird der synonyme: kununwo.
Hochzeitsschleier verwendet, um das Gesicht
2 • le passé; the past; Vergangenheit. ka
der Braut zu verdecken.
kunun sennaweele évoquer le passé. evoke
kunturu [ú] variante: kuturu. adj. 1 • entier, intégral,
the past, bring up the past. an die
à part entière; whole, complete, full; ganz, Vergangenheit denken.
gesamt, unversehrt. Saga kunturu bɛɛ filɛ...
kununasini [ú] Nom. avant-hier; day before
Voici le mouton tout entier... Here is the whole
yesterday, two days ago; vorgestern.
sheep... Hier ist das ganze Schaf...
synonyme: kunasininko.
2 • morceau, bloc; piece, block; Stück, Block.
Kunturu kelen kana bɔ a la... Que pas un kununi Morphemes: kunu-ni. Nom. résurrection;
seul morceau n'en soit retiré... Let not a single resurrection; Auferstehung.
piece be removed... Laß kein einziges Stück
kununko [ú] comparer: donko. Nom. hier, autrefois;
entfernen...
yesterday, in the past; gestern, einst. Diɲɛ
3 • accompli, véritable, authentique; fulfilled,
true, authentic; erfüllt, wahr, echt, versiert. bilama ka di a kununko ye. La vie
numukɛ kunturu un forgeron accompli. an d'aujourd'hui est plus agréable que celle
accomplished blacksmith. ein versierter
d'autrefois. Life today is more pleasant than it
Schmied.
was in the past. Das Leben ist heute
angenehmer als früher. synonyme: kununwo.
kunu [ú-ú] vt. ressusciter; come back to life, rise
from the dead; auferwecken, auferstehen. A
kununwo comparer: donko. Nom. hier; yesterday;
kununa ka bɔ suw cɛma. Il est ressuscité
gestern. Bamakɔ sanbaradilanyɔrɔ
d’entre les morts. He rose from the dead. Er ist ciyakɛlaw ye baarabila kɛ kununwo. Les
vom Tode auferstanden. travailleurs de l'usine de chaussures de
Bamako était en grève hier. Workers at the
kunukunu avaler (gloutonnement); swallow
Bamako shoe factory went on strike yesterday.
greedily; gierig schlucken. Gestern streikten die Arbeiter der Schuhfabrik
kunun 1 [ù-ù] Jula: kunu. vt. avaler, engloutir; Bamako. synonyme: kununko, kunun 3 .
swallow, gulp down; schlucken, kunuta [ù-ù-á] synonyme: fɛɛn min bi tɛmɛ daa fɛ.
hinunterschlucken, hinunterwürgen,
Nom. voie orale; swallowing, taking in through
verschlingen. Fɛn min bɛ se ka mɔgɔ kunun,
the mouth; durch den Mund einnehmen.
i kana a to o k'i nɔn. La chose qui peut
kunwilibana [ũ-̀ ì-ì-á-á] Nom. maladie débilitante;
t'avaler, ne la laisse pas te lécher. (proverbe).
debilitating disease; deprimierende Krankheit.
The thing that can swallow you, do not let it
lick you. (proverb). Das Ding, das dich Category: Disease.
verschlingen kann, lass es nicht an dir lecken.
(Sprichwort).
29/01/2026 511

kunyanfan kurandinan
kunyanfan [ù] Nom. responsable, à la tête de; 2 • neuf; new; neu. Sabara kuraman, ni i y'a
responsible, at the head of; der san, a bɛ digi i sen na... Les chaussures
Verantwortliche, der Manager, an der Spitze neuves, quand tu viens de les acheter, elles te
von. wale kunyanfan responsable d'un acte. font mal aux pieds... New shoes, when you buy
responsible for an act. für eine Tat them, they hurt your feet... Die neuen Schuhe,
verantwortlich. wenn man sie gerade gekauft hat, tun einem
die Füße weh...
kuɲu [ù] variante: kuyu. Nom. nain, nabot, de petite
kuran [ù-ã́] Emprunt de : français: courant. Nom.
taille; dwarf, small, short; Zwerg, klein. Kuɲu
électricité, courant électrique; electricity;
ka surunya tɛ denmisɛnya ye. La petite taille
Elektrizität, Strom. Babiliw bɛ kuran fana
des nains ne signifie pas qu;'ils sont des
enfants. (proverbe). The small size of dwarves
di... Les barrages fournissent aussi du
does not mean that they are children. courant... Dams also provide electricity...
(proverb). Die geringe Größe der Zwerge Staudämme liefern auch Strom...
bedeutet nicht, dass sie Kinder sind. kuran fanga baraka sumanan
(Sprichwort). synonyme: masafɛn.
synonyme: kilowati. expr. kilowatt; kilowatt;
kura adj. 1 • nouveau, neuf, prochain; new, next; Kilowatt.
neu, nächstes, aktuell. Nɛgɛso kura Un vélo kuran fanga sumanan synonyme: kilovɔliti. Nom.
neuf. A new bike. Ein neues Fahrrad. Kalo kilovolt; kilovolt; Kilovolt.
kura tile 5 Le 5 du mois prochain. The 5th of kuran kilowatida min bi jeni lɛɛri kelen na
the next month. Der 5. des nächsten Monates.
expr. kilowatt heure; kilowatt-hour;
kalo kura tile 22 le 22 du mois prochain. on
Kilowattstunde.
the 22nd of next month. am 22. des nächsten
Monats. antonyme: kɔrɔ.
kuran latagacogo expr. mode de transport de
4
l’électricité ; manner of electricity
2 • récent, juste; recent, just; gerade, kürzlich.
transportation; Art des Stromtransportes.
A nalen kura tun don. Il venait juste
d'arriver. He had just arrived. Er war gerade kuran masuba Nom. danger électrique; electricity
angekommen. ... walima n'a jiginnen kura. danger; Stromgefahr. Category: Sign, Symbol.
... ou bien si elle vient d'accoucher. ...or if she kurana [ù-à-á] Emprunt de : arabe.
has just given birth. ...oder wenn sie gerade
synonyme: alikurana. Nom. le Coran; the
entbunden hat.
Koran; der Koran. synonyme: alikurana.
kuraba [ù-à] Nom. pot servant d'urinoir, pot de
kuranajigi n.comp. cérémonie de lecture de coran;
chambre; potty; Nachthafen. 1
ceremony of Koran reading;
kurakura Morphemes: kura-kura. adj. tout neuf, toute
Koranlesungs-Zeremonie.
neuve, très récent; brand new, recent, new;
kuranajigi n.comp. cérémonie de fin de lecture du
brandneu, nagelneu, fabrikneu. A taara n'a 2
coran; ceremony at the end of Koran reading;
kurakura ye. Il est parti avec sa chose toute
Zeremonie am Schluss der Koran Lesung.
neuve. He went away with his brand new
thing. Er ging mit seinem nagelneuen Ding kuranasaniman Nom. saint Coran; holy Koran;
fort. heiliger Koran. synonyme: alikurana.
kurakuraya [ú] Morphemes: kura-kura-ya. Verbe. kuranbɔyɔrɔ Nom. point d’alimentation; power
renouveler, rendre complètement neuf; renew, supply point; Strom Zuführstelle,
make completely new; erneuern, völlig neu Stromverteilstelle.
machen. ... min kuntaala ye san duuru ye,
kurandida Nom. boîte électrique; electric box;
min bɛ se ka kurakuraya. ... [un visa] dont la
Schaltkasten.
durée est de cinq ans, et qui peut être
renouvelé. ... [a visa] which lasts for five kurandifan Nom. borne négative; negative terminal,
years and can be renewed. ... [ein Visum] mit negative pole; Minuspol, negativer Pol.
einer Gültigkeitsdauer von fünf Jahren, das synonyme: barikatafan.
verlängert / erneuert werden kann.
kurandilanyɔrɔ Nom. centrale thermique; thermal
kuraman [ú] Morphemes: kura-man. Nom.
power station; Wärmekraftwerk,
1 • nouvellement, de nouveau; newly, again; Heizkraftwerk.
wieder neu.
kurandinan Nom. interrupteur d’alimentation; power
switch; Netzschalter, Ein- Aus-taste.
29/01/2026 512

kuranɛ kuru
kuranɛ [ù-à] Nom. Coran; Koran, Quran; Koran,, 3 • Nom. nouveauté; novelty, newness;
Neuheit. Foyi tɛ to kuraya la. Rien ne garde la
Quran. ka kuranɛ jigin réciter tout le Coran.
fraîcheur de sa nouveauté. (proverbe). Nothing
reciting the whole Quran. den ganzen Koran
keeps the freshness of its novelty. (proverb).
rezitieren. synonyme: alikurana.
Nichts behält die Frische seiner Neuheit.
kuranfɔlikɛnan Nom. instrument électronique; (Sprichwort).
electronic music instrument; elektronisches kurisimuguba Nom. pantalon bouffant; baggy
Musikinstrument. Category: Musical
trousers; aufgebauschte Hosen, Pumphose.
instrument.
Category: Clothing.
kurangitari Nom. guitare électrique; electric guitar; kuru [ù-ú] vt. 1 • plier, tordre, courber; fold, twist,
1
elektrische Gitarre. Category: Musical
bend, turn over, repeat; falten, drehen,
instrument.
beugen, umkehren, wiederholen. I bɛ sen
kuranjuru Morphemes: kuran-juru. variante: filijuru. kelen kuru ... Tu plies une jambe ... You bend
Nom. fil électrique, cordon d'alimentation, a leg ... Du biegst ein Bein ... tiiri kurulen
ligne électrique; electric cable, electrical line;
ligne courbée. curved line. gekrümmte Linie,
Elektronabel, Stromleitung, elektrische
gebogene Linie.
Leitung.
2 • retourner, répéter, reprendre; return, repeat,
kurankabaw Nom. piles électriques; batteries; resume; zurückkehren, wiederholen,
elektrische Batterien. fortfahren. I kuru ka na ! Fais demi-tour !
kuranlalɔnan Nom. disjoncteur; circuit breaker; Turn around! Dreh dich um! I nana cikan min
fɔ ne ye, kuru o kan, n ka a mɛn. Le message
Sicherungshalter, Schutzschalter,
Unterbrecher. que tu es venu m'annoncer, répète-le une fois
encore, que je l'entends bien. The message you
kuranlataganan Nom. transport de l’électricité;
have come to announce to me, repeat it once
electricity transmission, transport network of more, that I hear it well. Die Botschaft, die du
the electricity; Transport elektrischer Energie, mir verkündest, wiederhole sie noch einmal,
Elektrizitätstransport. daß ich sie gut höre.
kurannakunlinan Nom. rasoir électrique; electric 3 • contourner; bypass, circumvent, get
shaver; Rasierapparat. Category: Tool. around; umgehen. Sariya kurula. La loi a été
contournée. The law has been circumvented.
kurantayɔrɔ Morphemes: kuran-ta-yɔrɔ. Nom. prise
Das Gesetz wurde umgangen.
de courant; plug; Steckdose.
Category: Machine.
kuru
2
[ù-ú] Nom. 1 • boule, motte, bloc, morceau,
grumeau; ball, clod, block, piece, lump; Ball,
kurantigɛ [ù-ã̀-í-ɛ́] Morphemes: kuran-tigɛ. Nom.
Kugel, Klumpen, Block, Stück. tokuro boule
coupure d'électricité, panne de courant;
de to. porridge ball. kabakuru bloc de pierre,
power-cut; Stromunterbruch, Strompanne.
caillou. block of stone, pebble. Steinblock,
kuranyɛlɛmanan Nom. transformateur; transformer, Kiesel. ka kuru ci briser les mottes de terre.
converter; Transformator, Stromwandler. break up clods of earth. Erdklumpen
kurasaba [ú-á-à-á] Morphemes: kura-saba. Nom. aufbrechen. sogokuru morceau de viande.
chaussures sans talon, faites en pneu; heelless piece of meat. Stück Fleisch.
shoes made of tires; Schuhe ohne Absatz, aus 2 • bouton, grosseur, kyste, ganglion, caillot;
Reifen. button, lump, cyst, ganglion, clot; Pickel,
kuraya Morphemes: kura-ya. 1 • vt. renouveler, rendre
Knoten, Zyste, Ganglion, Blutgerinnsel. ka
kuru sigi faire des boutons (: sur le corps).
neuf, être neuf, recommencer; renew, make
make buttons (: on the body). Pickel bilden (:
new, to be new, start again; erneuern, neu sein,
wieder anfangen. Boloci dɔw dun, fo ka to am Körper). jolikuru caillot, sang coagulé.
k'u kuraya tuma ni tuma. Cependant
clot, coagulated blood. Blutgerinnsel,
geronnenes Blut.
certaines vaccinations doivent être
renouvelées de temps en temps. However, 3 • nœud, contracture, boule d'anxiété; knot,
contracture, ball of anxiety; Knoten,
some vaccinations must be renewed from time
to time. Einige Impfungen müssen jedoch von Kontraktion, ka kuru kɛ juru la faire un nœud
Zeit zu Zeit erneuert werden. à une corde. tie a knot in a rope. einen Knoten
in ein Seil binden.
2 • Nom. état de ce qui est neuf, nouveau;
condition of what is new, new; Zustand dessen, 4 • bûche; log, piece of wood; Holzscheit.
was neu ist, Neuzustand. jirikuru bûche, morceau de bois. piece of
wood. Stück Holz.
29/01/2026 513

kuru kurucɛfolon
5 • épi; cob, ear; Ähre. saɲɔkuru épi de petit kuruba [ù-ù] Verbe. 1 • remuer, battre, mélanger,
mil. ear of millet. Ähre der Hirse. tourner (la bouille), brasser; stir, toss, mix, turn
6 • over, brew; umrühren, rühren, mischen,
kuru Nom. 1 • but; goal; Tor. Kuru fila ninnu bɛɛ brauen. ka to kuruba / ka to pasa battre le to.
3
donna ntolatan kun filanan na. Ces deux stir the porridge. den Hirsebrei schlagen /
buts ont été marqués en seconde mi-temps.
umrühren. ka ji kuruba s'ébattre dans l'eau.
Both goals were scored in the second half. play in the water. im Wasser herumtoben.
Beide Tore wurden in der zweiten Halbzeit 2 • courir, parcourir; run, travel, go around;
erzielt. synonyme: bii . ablaufen, gehen. ka dugu kuruba battre tout
1
2 • point; point; Punkt. A ye kuru seegi sɔrɔ
le village, se promener dans tout le village.
walk around the whole village. im ganzen Dorf
tan kan. Il a eu huit points sur dix (8/10). He
herumlaufen.
got eight points out of ten points. Er erhielt
acht Punkte von zehn Punkten. ... jamana min kurubana 1 [ù-ù] Morphemes: kuru-bana. Nom.
ka kuru hakɛ mana caya tɔw ta ye... ... le maladie des articulations; disease of the joints,
joint disease; Krankheit der Gelenke,,
pays qui aura le plus de points... ...the country
with the most points... ...das Land mit den
Gelenkerkrankung. Kɔrɔ bɛ kurubana se
meisten Punkten... mɔgɔ ma. La vieillesse donne des maladies
kuru [ù] Nom. kyste, ganglion, caillot, nœud; cyst,
des articulations. Old age brings joint
4 diseases. Das Alter verursacht
ganglion, clot, knot; Zyste, Knotenpunkt,
Gelenkerkrankungen. Category: Disease.
Überbein, Klümpchen. Category: Disease.
kurubana [ù-ù] Morphemes: kuru-bana. Nom.
kuru [ù] Nom. articulation, jointure; articulation, 2
5 éruption de gros boutons sur et sous la peau;
joint; Gelenk, Artikulation. N kuru bɛɛ bɛ n eruption of large pimples on and under the
dimin. J'ai mal à toutes les articulations. I have skin; Ausschlag mit großen Pickeln auf und
pain in all my joints. Category: Body. unter der Haut.
kuru [ù] variante: kurun. Verbe. 1 • être ou mettre kurubɛkurubɛ [ù-ù-ɛ̀] Verbe. s'agiter, fureter,
6
en boule, faire une boule, nouer; to be or put s’affairer, tourner en rond; fidget, sneak
into a ball, to make a ball, to tie; zu einer around, fiddle around; herumtollen,
Kugel formen, eine Kugel formen, knüpfen, herumschnüffeln, herumschleichen. Muso
binden. Sa y'i kuru. Le serpent s'est mis en fana tun bɛ na i kurubɛkurubɛ gabugu
boule. The snake curled up into a ball. Die kɔnɔ. La femme aussi venait fureter dans la
Schlange rollte sich zu einer Kugel zusammen.
cuisine. The woman also came to rummage in
... a kun fila kurulen bɛ... ... les deux bouts the kitchen. Die Frau kam auch, um in der
sont noués... ...both ends are tied... ...beide Küche zu stöbern.
Enden sind gebunden...
kurubɔ [ù-ù] Nom. angle, tournant, virage,
2 • butter (un champ); hoe (a field), mound a
field; hacken (ein Feld), ein Feld anhäufen.
bifurcation; angle, bend, curve, fork, junction;
ka foro kuru butter un champ. mound a field.
Winkel, Biegung, Kurve, Abzweigung,
Verzweigung. Aw ka kurubɔ in yɛlɛma man
ein Feld anhäufen.
di. C'est difficile de tourner à votre virage. It’s
3 • creuser (une tombe); digging (a grave);
graben (ein Grab). Ni i ma fara cɛ in na, a b'i
hard to turn at your turn. Es ist schwer, an der
Kurve zu drehen. synonyme: kuruda.
ntugun kuru. Si tu ne laisses pas ce type
tranquille, il va creuser ta tombe. If you don't kurubukaraba [ù-ù-ù] Verbe. mettre sens dessus
leave this guy alone, he'll dig your grave. dessous; turn upside down, messing up; auf
Wenn du diesen Kerl nicht in Ruhe läßt, wird den Kopf stellen, umstürzen. I kana n ka finin
er dir das Grab schaufeln.
kolenw kurubukaraba dɛ ! Ne mets pas sens
4 • établir (un campement); establish (a camp);
dessus dessous mes habits lavés ! Don't mess
aufbauen (eines Zeltlagers). A nana a ka up my washed clothes! Stell meine
bugufyɛ kuru. Il vint établir son campement. gewaschene Kleidung nicht auf den Kopf!
He came to set up his camp. Er kam, um das kurucɛfolon [ù-ù-ɛ̀-ó-ṍ] Nom. vallée; valley; Tal.
Lager aufzuschlagen.
Category: Land.
kuru damunɛnin Nom. pic de montagne; pick of a
mountain; Bergspitze. Category: Land.
29/01/2026 514

kurucilan kurukuru
kurucilan [ù-ù-ì] Morphemes: kuru-ci-lan. Nom. kurukun [ù-ù] Morphemes: kuru-kun. Nom.
batte (pour écraser les mottes); mallet (to crush 1 • articulation; joint, hinge; Gelenk. A sen
clods); Schläger (zum Zerkleinern von karila a kurukun na. Sa jambe a cassé à
Erdklumpen). An bɛ ntɛgɛn gosi ni
l'articulation. His leg broke at the joint. Sein
kurucilan ye. On tasse la terre des planches de Bein ist am Gelenk gebrochen.
maraîchage avec une batte. The soil in the Category: Body.
vegetable beds is compacted with a mallet. 2 • nœud (d'un tige de plante); node (of a plant
Wir verfeinern die Erde aus den stem); Knoten (von einem Stiel), Knoten
Gemüsebeeten mit einem Schläger. (eines Pflanzenstammes). Sukarokala tigɛ a
Category: Agricultural tool.
kurukun ni ɲɔgɔn cɛ. Coupe la tige de canne
kurucinan [ù-ù-ì] Nom. binette; hoe; Hacke. entre les nœuds. Cut the cane stem between the
Category: Agricultural tool. nodes. Schneiden Sie den Rohrstiel zwischen
kuruda [ù-ù-á] Morphemes: kuru-da. Nom. virage,
den Knoten ab. Category: Parts of a plant.
tournant; curve, bend, turn; Kurve, Drehung. kurukúncɛ Nom. sommet de montagne; Mountain
synonyme: kurubɔ. peak; Berg Gipfel.
kurudon Morphemes: kuru-don. Nom. marquer de
kurukundimin
but; score a goal; ein Tor schießen. [ù-ù-ù] Morphemes: kuru-kun-dimin. Nom.
arthrite, douleur articulaire; arthritis, joint
kurufarancɛ jiwoyo Nom. chute d'eau; waterfall;
pain; Arthritis, Gelenkschmerzen.
Wasserfall. Category: Water.
Category: Disease. synonyme: wulɛ.
kurufili Morphemes: kuru-fili. Nom. lancer du poids;
kurukuru [ú-ú-ú-ú] variante: kulukulu. 1 • Nom.
shot putting; Kugelstossen.
1
poulailler; hen-house, coop; Hühnerstall.
kurufurancɛ Nom. vallée; valley; Schlucht, Tal. Category: Building. synonyme: syɛkulukulu.
Category: Land. 2 • interj. cri utilisé pour faire venir le volaille;
kurukan Morphemes: kuru-kan. Nom. col de call used to bring in poultry; Schrei, der
verwendet wird, um das Geflügel
montagne; mountain pass; Bergpass.
herbeizurufen. ka syɛw kurukuru appeler les
kurukanjiwoyo Nom. 1 • cascade; waterfall;
poulets. call the chickens. die Hühner rufen.
Wasserfall. Category: Water, Land.
kurukuru [ù-ú-ù-ú] 1 • Verbe. faire des nœuds,
synonyme: jisuuru. 2
produire des boutons, faire des pustules, faire
2 • torrent; torrent; Wasserflut.
des grumeaux, faire des boutons à plusieurs
Category: Water.
endroits; produce pimples, make pustules,
kurukara [ú] variante: kuurukaara, kuurukɛɛrɛ. make lumps, make pimples in several places;
Déterminant. total, totalité, ensemble; total, Knoten machen, Pickel produzieren, Pusteln
whole, together; Total, ganze, gesamt. San machen, Klumpen machen, Pickel an
kurukara. Une année entière. A whole year. .
mehreren Stellen machen. A fari kurukurula.
Son corps est couvert des petits boutons. His
Ein ganzes Jahr. tile kurukara toute la
body is covered with small pimples. Sein
journée. all day long, throughout the day. den
Körper ist mit kleinen Pickeln bedeckt.
ganzen Tag. A ye dugu kurukara bɛɛ mɔ. Il a
2 • Nom. petit bouton, petite boule, pustule,
fouillé tout le village. He searched the whole
grumeau; small knob, small ball, pustule,
village. Er hat das ganze Dorf durchsucht. I ka lump; kleiner Pickel, kleine Kugel, Pustel,
kalandenw kurukara ye joli ye ? Quel est le Klumpen. Ko kurukuru dɔw bɛ to ka a
nombre total de tes élèves ? What is the total tigimasinɛ na. Il y a des petits boutons sur le
number of your students? Wie hoch ist die
corps de la personne. There are small pimples
Gesamtzahl Ihrer Studierenden?
on the person’s body. Es gibt kleine Pickel am
kurukaseri Morphemes: kuru-ka-seri. Nom. espèce Körper der Person.
de chenille parasite de coton; species of cotton kurukuru [ù-ú-ù-ú] n.comp. 1 • bouton cutané;
3
parasitic caterpillar; Raupe (Art),
pimple on the skin; Muttermal.
Baumwollparasitäre Raupenart.
2 • acné; acne; Akne.
Category: Small animals.
kurukuru [ù-ù-ú-ú] Nom. espèce de plante, bouton
4
blanc; kind of plant, Whitewort; Pflanze (Art),
Weißwurz. Category: Grass, herb, vine.
leucas martinicensis.
29/01/2026 515

kurukuru kurunbolilan
kurukuru [ù-ù] Verbe. être fâché contre quelqu'un, se kurun comparer: pankurun,
5 2
renfrogner, bouder; to be angry with someone, sisikurun.[ú-ṹ] variante: kulun, kunun.
to sulk; auf jemanden wütend sein, schmollen. Nom. 1 • pirogue, barque; canoe, small boat;
A bɛ ka a fa kurukuru. Il boude son père. He Boot. U donna kurun kɔnɔ. Ils entrèrent dans
sulks at his father. Er schmollt über seinen la pirogue. They entered the canoe. Sie stiegen
Vater. in die Piroge. Category: Travel.
kurukuru [ù-ú-ù-ú] Verbe. replier; fold, withdraw; 2 • moyen de transport, véhicule (train,
6
zurückziehen, falten, zusammenklappen. Jama avion...); means of transport, vehicle (train,
plane...); Transportmittel, Fahrzeug (Zug,
y'i sen kurukuru, ka sira bila faama ye. Les
Flugzeug...) Category: Travel.
gens replièrent leur jambes et laissèrent le
3 • morceau de bois; piece of wood; Stück
passage au roi. The people folded their legs
Holz,, Holzstück.
and gave way to the king. Die Leute falteten
ihre Beine und ließen den König durch. 4 • auge de grande taille; large trough; großer
Trog.
kurukuru [ú] Verbe. trembler, grelotter; tremble,
7 kurun [ù-ṹ] n adj. court, coupé; short, cut; kurz,
shiver, shake; zittern, schlottern. ... a farikolo 3
geschnitten. Misinin ku kurun nana dumuni
bɛ kurukuru. ... son corps tremble. ...his
kɛ, a ma na ku fyeku. La génisse à la courte
body is shaking. ...sein Körper zittert.
queue est venue pour manger, et non pas pour
kurukurunin 1 [ù-ù-ù-ù] Nom. bourbouilles, remuer la queue. (proverbe). The short-tailed
furonculose, petits boutons; heat rush, heifer came to eat, not to move her tail.
furuncle, boil, carbuncle; Hitzeausschlag auf (proverb). Das Rind mit dem kurzen Schwanz
der Haut, Furunkel, Hautausschlag. ist gekommen, um zu essen und nicht, um den
Category: Disease. Schwanz zu bewegen. (Sprichwort).
kurukurunin variante: kurukurubanin. Nom. espèce kurunbo [ú] Nom. 1 • neuf (pour un tissu, un
2
de plante; kind of plant; Pflanze (Art). vêtement) qui n'a jamais été lavé; new (for a
Category: Grass, herb, vine. indigofera fabric, a garment) that has never been washed;
macrocalyx. neu (für einen Stoff, ein Kleidungsstück), das
kuruma [ù-ù-á] Morphemes: kuru-ma. Nom. noch nie gewaschen wurde. kurunbokulusi
un pantalon neuf. new pants. neue Hose.
1 • courbé, bossu; bent, hunchbacked; gekurvt,
gebeugt, bucklig. Muso tɔn kuruma. Femme
Category: Clothing.
à nuque bossue. A woman with a bent neck.
2 • vêtement épais fait de bandes de coton
neuves; thick garment made from new strips of
Eine Frau mit gebeugtem Nacken.
cotton; dickes Kleidungsstück aus neuen
2 • de sens caché; of hidden meaning; von
Baumwollstreifen.
verborgener Bedeutung. kuma kuruma une
parole avec un sens caché. a word with a
kurunbokari [ú] Morphemes: kurunbo-kari.
hidden meaning. ein Wort mit einer 1 • Verbe. laver pour la première fois; wash
verborgenen Bedeutung. for the first time; zum ersten Mal waschen. N
kurumankɔ [ù-ù-à] Morphemes: kuru-man-kɔ. ye kurunbosange tigɛ, a ma kurunbokari
variante: kurunkɔ. Verbe. revenir en arrière,
fɔlɔ. J'ai acheté une moustiquaire neuve, elle
n'a pas encore été lavée. I bought a new
régresser, retour en arrière; to go back, to
mosquito net, it has not yet been washed. Ich
regress; zurück gehen, zurückgehen. N'a ka di
habe ein neues Moskitonetz gekauft, es wurde
a ye, a ka taa, nka kurumankɔ kana ye a la.
noch nicht gewaschen.
S'il le souhaite, qu'il s'en aille, mais qu'il ne
2 • Nom. inauguration; inauguration;
revienne pas. (proverbe). If he wishes, let him
Eröffnung, Einweihung. Kabini o
go, but let him not come back. (proverb).
kurunbokari kɛra... Depuis que
Wenn er will, soll er gehen, aber nicht
wiederkommen. (Sprichwort).
l'inauguration a eu lieu... Since the
inauguration took place... Seit der
kurumunɛnin Nom. pic de montagne; mountain
Einweihung...
peak; Berggipfel.
kurunbolila Morphemes: kurun-boli-la. Nom. marin;
kurun
1
[ú] Nom. tabouret, escabeau; stool; Hocker. A
sailor; Matrose, Seemann. Category: Worker,
ye kurun ta k'i sigi a ka da la. Elle prit un occupation.
tabouret et s'assit devant la porte. She took a kurunbolilan Morphemes: kurun-boli-lan. Nom.
stool and sat down in front of the door. Sie
pagaie; paddle; Paddel, Ruder.
nahm einen Hocker und setzte sich vor die Tür.
Category: Household equipment.
synonyme: gɔmɛ .
1
29/01/2026 516

kurunden kuruwo
kurunden [ú] Morphemes: kurun-den. 2 • lacet pour pantalon; string for pants;
Schnur für Hosen. synonyme: cɛsirijala.
variante: kurunnin. Nom. 1 • maillet pour battre
le linge; mallet for beating linen; Schläger kurusinin Nom. caleçon; boxer shorts, underpants,
zum Ausklopfen der Wäsche. Category: Tool. leggings; Unterhose, Boxershorts.
2 • planche à laver; washboard; Waschbrett. Category: Clothing.
kurunin [ù-ù-ĩ́] synonyme: kongoli. Nom. colline; kurusumanan Nom. mesure de masse; mass
1
hill; Hügel. Category: Land. measurement; Dichtemessung,
kurunin Morphemes: kuru-nin. Nom. verrue, bouton; Gewichtsmessung. Category: Tool, Machine.
2
wart, spot, pimple; Warze, Pickel, Mitesser, kurutigɛ [ù-ú-ì-í] Morphemes: kuru-tigɛ. Verbe.
Fleck. ... kuruninw bɔlen don a ma. ... elle a 1 • supporter, endurer, venir au bout de qqch de
des verrues. ...she has warts. ...sie hat Warzen. difficile; bear, endure, go to the end, get over;
Category: Body. ertragen, ausharren, bis zum Schluss gehen,
überstehen. ... i jija ka sokɔnɔbaaraw bɛɛ
kurunin synonyme: kurubon. Nom. courbe; curve,
3
kurutigɛ. ... efforce-toi de supporter tous les
bend; Kurve, Biegung.
travaux domestiques. ...strive to bear all the
kurunjan Nom. banc en bois, tabouret, tronc-banc; domestic chores. ...versuchen Sie, alle
wooden bench, stool; Sitzbank, Bank, Hocker, Hausarbeiten zu ertragen. synonyme: laminɛ 2 .
Schemel. Category: Household equipment. 2 • aller au bout de; go to the end of, follow
kurunkurun [ú-ṹ-ú-ṹ] vt. couper (en plusieurs through on; bis ans Ende gehen. ka baara
morceaux); cut in several pieces; in Stücke kurutigɛ aller au bout d'un travail. to complete
schneiden. a job. zum Ende einer Arbeit kommen. U ye
kurunkurunni n.comp. segmentation; segmentation; kuma kurutigɛ. Ils sont allés au bout de la
Segmentierung. discussion. (et: «ils sont venus à bout de
problème»). They went to the end of the
kurunnin [ú] Morphemes: kurun-nin. Nom. navette;
discussion. (and: "they came to the end of the
shuttle; Weberschiffchen. problem"). Sie kamen zum Ende der
kuruɲɛdimin Morphemes: kuru-ɲɛ-dimin. Nom. Diskussion. (und: „Sie haben das Problem
gelöst“).
trachome; trachoma; Trachom. Kuruɲɛdimin
bɛ mɔgɔ ɲɛ tiɲɛ. Le trachome détruit la vue. kurutɔ [ù-ù] Morphemes: kuru-tɔ. Nom. qui a des
Trachoma destroys sight. Trachom zerstört kystes, qui a des furoncles; person with cysts
das Sehvermögen. Category: Disease. or boils; Person mit Zysten, oder Furunkel.
synonyme: ɲɛdimi siya dɔ. kurutukurutu [ù-ù-ù] Verbe. 1 • trafiquer,
kurusakurusa [ù-ù-à-ú-ú-á] Nom. gale; scabies, traficoter, être louche; trade, deal, be shady;
mange; Krätze, Räude. Category: Disease.
schmuggeln, handeln, zwielichtig sein. A y'i
synonyme: maɲa . kurutukurutu án ka dugu kɔnɔ. Il a traficoté
2
dans notre village. He’s been dealing in our
kurusamanɔnfɔn Jula: kurunsamanɔnfɔn. Nom.
village. Er hat in unserem Dorf zwielichtige
liane paulline; kind of liana; Liane (Art), Geschäfte gemacht.
Timbopflanze. Category: Grass, herb, vine. 2 • fraude, affairisme, escroquerie, magouille;
paullinia pinnata.
fraud, business, swindle, trickery; Betrug,
kurusi variante: kulusi. Nom. pantalon, culotte; Affäre, Schwindel. Cɛ in ye
trousers, pants, underwear; Hose, Unterhose, kurutukurutumɔgɔ de ye. Ce type-là est un
Unterwäsche. Category: Clothing. homme d'affaires véreux. This guy is a
synonyme: pantalɔn. crooked businessman. Dieser Typ ist ein
korrupter Geschäftsmann.
kurusigi [ù-ú-ì-í] Morphemes: kuru-sigi. Verbe.
kuruwa Emprunt de : français. Nom. courroie; strap,
rythmer, pauses régulières dans les chants;
pace, rhythm, regular breaks in the songs; belt; Gurt, Riemen.
Rhythmus, regelmäßige Pausen im Gesang. kuruwadisidi Emprunt de : français. Nom.
dɔnkili kurusigiyɔrɔ pause dans le chant.
Croix-du-Sud; the Southern Cross; Das Süd
break in the song. Pause im Gesang.
Kreuz. Category: Sky.
synonyme: junjun .
2 kuruwo Morphemes: kulu-wo. Nom. grotte; cave;
kurusijala n.comp. 1 • maladie sexuellement
Höhle. Category: Land. synonyme: farawo.
transmissible; sexually transmitted disease;
Geschlechtskrankheit. Category: Disease.
29/01/2026 517

kuruwɔɔrɔ kutukutu
kuruwɔɔrɔ [ù-ù] Morphemes: kuru-wɔɔrɔ. Nom. kusuba [ù-ù] Verbe. 1 • agiter (généralement un
scorpion (surnom nocturne du scorpion); liquide, ou dans un liquide); shake (usually
scorpion (nocturnal nickname of the liquid, or in a liquid); schütteln
scorpion); Skorpion (nächtlicher Spitzname (normalerweise in einer Flüssigkeit oder in
des Skorpions). Category: Spider. einer Flüssigkeit). ka ji kusuba agiter l'eau.
synonyme: buntenin. agitate the water. Wasser schütteln. A finin
kuruwulu [ù-ù] Nom. espèce de plante; kind of plant; kusubatɔ baɲuwari kɔnɔ... En remuant
Pflanzenart. Category: Grass, herb, vine. l’étoffe ans la grande bassine... Stirring the
blepharis linariifolia; hygrophilia fabric in the large basin... Indem man den
senegalensis. Stoff im großen Becken umrührt...
kuruzɛti Nom. courgette; courgette; Zucchini.
2 • faire brusquement une action; make a
sudden action; eine Aktion abrupt ausführen.
Category: Food.
kusukusu [ú] variante: kucukucu. Verbe. agiter (un
kus [ú] variante: kuus, kuusu. interj. cri utilisé
liquide) dans un contenant clos; to stir (a
pour chasser la volaille; call used to chase
liquid) in a closed container; in einem
away poultry; Ruf fürs wegjagen von
geschlossenen Behälter (eine Flüssigkeit)
Geflügel. Syɛnin bilen ma kus mɛn, a na schütteln. N ka n da kusukusu... Que je me
parawu mɛn. Si la poule n'entend pas les cris rince la bouche... Let me rinse my mouth...
qui la chassent, elle entendra bien lorsqu'on
kusukusunin Nom. hochet; rattle; Rassel.
s'emparera d'elle brusquement. (proverbe). If
the hen does not hear the cries that chase her Category: Musical instrument.
away, she will hear well when someone kutu synonyme: kuyɛri, kuru. Nom. cuillère; spoon;
suddenly seizes her. (proverb). Wenn die
Löffel. Category: Tool.
Henne die Schreie, die sie verfolgen, nicht
hört, wird sie es hören, wenn sie plötzlich kutuba 1 [ù-ù] Nom. 1 • sermon religieux; religious
gepackt wird. (Sprichwort). sermon; religiöse Predigt. Category: Religion.
kusa [ú] variante: kɔsa. Nom. estomac de 2 • lecture de textes religieux; reading
religious texts; Lesen religiöser Texte. Sani
crocodiles; crocodile stomach;
Krokodilmagen. Min ye bama faga, a b'a juma ka seli, kutuba bɛ kalan alimami fɛ.
kusa ta. C'est à celui qui a tué le crocodile que
Avant la prière du vendredi, l'imam lit des
testes religieux. Before Friday prayers, the
revient de prendre son estomac. (proverbe). It
imam reads religious texts. Vor dem
is up to the one who killed the crocodile to take
Freitagsgebet liest der Imam religiöse Tests
its stomach. (proverb). Derjenige, der das
vor.
Krokodil getötet hat, darf seinen Magen
nehmen. (Sprichwort). kutuba [ù-ù] Nom. bouille de mil, salée et contenant
2
kusaaba Nom. petit boubou, vêtement ample, sans du poisson séché; millet porridge, salted and
containing dried fish; Hirsebrei, gesalzen und
devant ni derrière, qui descend jusqu'aux
mit getrocknetem Fisch. Category: Types of
pieds; long garment, African bubu, loose
food.
garment, without front or back, which reaches
down to the feet; langes Gewand, lockeres kutubusu [ù-ù-ù] variante: kurubisu, kutubasu,
Kleidungsstück ohne Vorder- und Rückseite, kutukusu. Nom. fête musulmane (27 ième jour
das bis zu den Füßen reicht.
du mois de carême, pendant laquelle on lit le
Category: Clothing.
Coran), «nuit du destin»; Muslim holiday (27th
kusɛnkɔrɔla [ù-ɛ̀-ɔ̀-ɔ̀] Nom. place à côté du day of the month of Lent, during which the
chauffeur; seat next to the driver; Platz neben Koran is read), “night of destiny”;
dem Fahrer. soferemuso ani kusɛnkɔrɔla à Muslimischer Feiertag (27. Tag des
Fastenmonats, in dem der Koran gelesen
la femme du chauffeur la bonne place au
wird), „Nacht des Schicksals“.
coussin. to the wife of the driver the good place
at the cushion. der Frau des Fahrers den guten
Category: Religion.
Platz mit Kissen. kutukutu [ú] 1 • Verbe. être stupide; be stupid; dumm
kusu [ù] Verbe. être inerte, rester sans mouvement; sein.
be inert, remain without movement; 2 • Adverbe. parfait imbécile; complete idiot;
unbeweglich sein, bewegungslos bleiben. A ɲɛ vollkommener Dummkopf. nalonma
bɛ tɔw bɛɛ kusulen dalen la. Il voit tous les kutukutu un parfait imbécile. a blooming
autres, couchés inertes. He sees all the others, idiot, a perfect fool. ein vollkommener Narr.
lying inert. Er sieht alle anderen, die
bewegungslos liegen.
29/01/2026 518

kuturufin kwɛrɛ
kuturufin [ú] Nom. totalement nu, torse nu; totally kuwafe Emprunt de : français. vt. se faire coiffer; get
naked, torso bare; ganz nackt, Oberkörper hair done; sich die Haare machen / schneiden
frei. I kuturufin de bɛ taa wa ? Tu pars tout lassen. N bi taa n kun kuwafɛ. Je vais me
nu ? You go naked? Du gehst nackt? faire coiffer. I am going to get my hair done /
kuturunin [ú] Nom. petit, jeune; small, little, young;
to get a haircut. Ich gehe uns lasse mir die
Haare scheiden.
klein, jung. kamalen kuturunin toute jeune
homme. very young man. sehr junger Mann.
kuyɛri Emprunt de : français. Nom. cuillère; spoon;
synonyme: ncinin. Löffel. Category: Tool.
kuu [ú] bambara: ku. Nom. queue, bout, manche;
kuyu [ù] Nom. youyou, cris perçants des femmes
1
(pour un événement heureux); piercing cries of
tail, end, tip; Schwanz, Spitz, Ende.
women (for a happy event); durchdringende
Category: Parts of an animal.
Schreie von Frauen (für ein glückliches
synonyme: kukala.
Ereignis). Ni y ye kuyu dalen ye
kuu 2 [ú] bambara: ku. Nom. igname; yam; Yams. welewelecila ye, diwocila mago ɲɛ. Si on
Category: Food. dioscorea sp. pousse des cris de joie en voyant quelqu'un
kuun [ũṹ̀ ] bambara: kun. Nom. 1 • tête, bout, apporter du miel de moucheron, c'est que le
chercheur de miel d'abeilles est revenu
extrémité, sommet; head, tip, end, extremity,
bredouille. (proverbe). If we shout for joy when
peak, top; Kopf, Spitze, Gipfel. A y’a kalan
we see someone bringing midge honey, it
a kun fɛ. Il l’a appris par cœur. He learned it means that the seeker of bee honey has
by heart. Er hat es auswendig gelernt. returned empty-handed. (proverb). Wenn wir
Category: Body. vor Freude aufschreien, wenn wir jemanden
2 • raison, sens, objectif, but, sujet; reason, sehen, der Mückenhonig bringt, dann deshalb,
sense, motive, objective, aim; Grund, Motiv, weil der Bienenhonigsucher mit leeren Händen
Ziel. zurückgekehrt ist. (Sprichwort).
3 • chance, manière, façon; luck, manner; kuyudala [ù-ù-à] Morphemes: kuyu-da-la.
Glück, Art und Weise. Bɛɛ n'i kuun lo. À
variante: kuyusamana. Nom. griotte qui lance
chacun selon sa chance. To everyone
des cris de joie au cours d’événements
according to his luck. Jedem nach seinem
heureux, crieuse des youyous; woman who
Glück.
shouts with joy during happy events, shouter of
4 • morceau, part, partie, côté; part, bit, side; happy cries; Frau, die bei glücklichen
Stück, Teil. Ereignissen vor Freude schreit,
kuuru [ú] Déterminant. 1 • entier, tout (surtout pour Jubelschreierin.
1
une durée); whole, all (especially for a kwa [á] Adverbe. bruit sec, bruit de claquement;
duration); ganz, alles (besonders für eine popping noise, clicking noise, dry noise,
Dauer). A ye su kuuru bɛɛ kɛ, a bɛ kasi la. clapping noise; scharfes Geräusch,
Elle a pleuré toute la nuit. She cried all night. Klickgeräusch. A bolo kɔgɔ bɔra kwa ! Il se
Sie weinte die ganze Nacht. fait craquer les doigts, crac ! He gets his
2 • total, toujours; total, always; total, immer. fingers cracked, crac!
musaka kuuru l'ensemble des dépenses. all kwe [é] variante: kwɛ. Nom. guêpier à gorge rouge;
expenses. alle Ausgaben.
Bee-eater; Bienenfresser. Category: Bird.
kuuru [ú] Verbe. être sali par la poussière; to be merops apiaster.
2
soiled by dust; durch Staub verschmutzt sein. kwɛkwɛ variante: kɛkɛ. Nom. peigne afro; comb;
Kamm. Category: Tool.
kwɛrɛ [ɛ̀-ɛ́] variante: kwɛlɛ, kɛlɛ, kpɛrɛ. Nom.
métier à tisser, métier de basse lisse; weaving,
loom; Weben, Webstuhl.
L - l
29/01/2026 519

la -la
la 1 [á] variante: ra, na, nɔ. postp. 1 • postposition la 3 [à] 1 • vt. poser, mettre, déposer, décharger;
locative: à; locative postposition: at, to; zur, put, put down, deposit (sth.), drop, unload
zum, an, in (Lokative Postposition). Musa (sth.); hinstellen, abstellen, legen, hinlegen,
taara lakɔli la. Moussa est allé à l'école.
ablegen, ausladen. Á ye aw tigɛ fila la aw
Moussa went to school. Moussa ging zur
kunkolo kan ! Mettez les mains sur la tête !
Schule. Put both your hands on your head! Legt eure
2 • du, de; from, of; von, vom. A bɔra foro la.
beiden Hände auf den Kopf. tɔgɔ la X la
Il vient du champ. He comes from the field. Er
donner un nom à X. give a name to X. X einen
kommt vom Feld. sogo wusulen kɛmɛna
Namen geben. A y’a tɔgɔ la ko Hawa. Il lui a
cinq cents francs de viande fumée. five
donné le nom "Eve". He gave her the name
hundred francs of smoked meat. fünfhundert
"Eve". Er gab ihr den Namen Eva. bonya la X
Franken geräuchertes Fleisch. kan honorer/glorifier X. honour/glorify X. X
-la variante: -na. suf. suffixe qui indique l’agent; ehren/ verherrlichen. fan la pondre un œuf. lay
1
an egg. ein Ei legen. talen la raconter un
suffix indicating agent; Agent Suffix, der
Tuende. fani, feere, fanifeerela tissu, vendre, proverbe. tell a proverb. ein Sprichwort sagen
vendeur de tissu. cloth, sell, cloth seller. Stoff,
/gebrauchen. dɔnkili la chanter. sing. singen.
verkaufen, Stoff-Verkäufer. dɔlɔminna siirin la contenter un conte. tell a fable, story.
buveur, ivrogne. drinker, drunkard. Trinker, eine Geschichte / Fabel erzählen.
Trunkenbold. synonyme: da 6 .
la la [á] vt. accompagner, suivre, mettre 2 • v.ref. se coucher, allonger, étendre, étaler;
2
go to bed, lie down, stretch out, spread out; ins
ensemble, mettre à la suite, ; accompany,
Bett gehen, sich hinlegen, ausbreiten. N bɛ taa
follow, put together; begleiten, folgen,
zusammenstellen. U lara dugutigi kan ka na. la. Je vais me coucher. I am going to bed. Ich
Ils ont accompagné le chef du village. They gehe ins Bett. A la tile ra. Étale-le au soleil.
accompanied the village chief. Sie haben den Spread it out under the sun. Breite es an der
Dorfchef begleitet. synonyme: da . Sonne aus.
6
3 • v.ref. apaiser, combler, satisfaire un désir;
-la [á] variante: -ra, -na. vi. suffixe marquant
2 calm sb./sth., ease sb./sth., fill, satisfy;
l'accompli des verbes intransitifs; suffix beruhigen, stillen, lindern, besänftigen, füllen,
marking perfect tense, past tense intransitive befriedigen.
verb marker; Suffix markiert die
Vergangenheit der intransitiven Verben. Fati
-la
4
variante: -na. Nom. suffixe locatif ou temporel;
bɛ tɔɔrɔla. Fati est en train de souffrir. Fati
lactation or time suffix; Ort Suffix oder Zeit
is suffering. Fati ist am Leiden.
Suffix. sanfɛla, kɔfɛla, kunnana le haut,
l'arrière, le dessus. the hight, the back, the top.
-la
3
variante: -na. vt. suffixe d'un verbe transitif au
die Höhe, die Rückseite, die Oberfläche.
passé utilisé comme passive sans objet; suffix sufɛla, wulala la nuit, l'après-midi ou soir. at
indicating that a transitive verb is used in a
night, in the afternoon or in the evening.
passive way (past tense, but without object);
nachts, nachmittags oder abends.
Passiv Suffix für transitive Verben
(Vergangenheit ohne Objekt). Malo dumula.
Le riz a été mangé. The rice has been eaten.
Der Reis wurde gegessen.
29/01/2026 520

la laada
la [á] bambara: da. vi. croire, faire confiance; la [á] Emprunt de : arabe. interj. non !, faux !,
4 7
believe, trust; glauben, vertrauen. la X la utilisé en fin d'énoncé, marque le refus, la
croire à/en X. believe in X. an X glauben, X dénégation..; no!, false!, used at the end of a
vertrauen. N lanin tɛ i ka kuma na kosɛbɛ. Je statement, indicates refusal, denial..; nein!,
falsch!, wird am Ende einer Aussage
ne crois pas beaucoup à ce que tu dis. I don’t
verwendet und markiert eine Ablehnung, eine
really believe what you say. Ich glaube nicht
was du sagst. N lanin b’a la ko Ala bi yen. Je
Verleugnung ... A ma sɔn la ! Il a refusé
crois à l’existence de Dieu. I believe there is a
catégoriquement ! He categorically refused!
God. Ich glaube, daß Gott existiert. Ne ma la a
Er lehnte kategorisch ab! La ! N tɛ taa ! Non,
la. Je ne le crois pas. I don’t think so. Ich
je n'irai pas ! No, I won't go! Nein, ich werde
nicht gehen!
glaube nicht. Ne lanin bi Fa Ala la,
la- [á] pref. préfixe, qui indique souvent un sens
Sebaayabɛɛtigi, Sankolo ni dugukolo
Danbaga. Je crois en Dieu le Père, le Tout
causatif; prefix, often carrying a causative
sense; Vorsilbe die meist einen kausalen Sinn
Puissant, le Créateur de la terre et le ciel. I
anzeigt. A ka Musa lana. Il a fait venir
believe in God the Father, Almighty, Creator
of heaven and earth. Ich glaube an Gott, den
Moussa. He caused Moussa to come. Er hat
Allmächtigen, der Schöpfer der ganzen Welt. veranlaßt, daß Moussa kommt. A ye Awa
Note: Cidenw ka dannaya fòlen - Apostle’s Creed I lakasi. Il a fait pleurer Awa. He made that
lanin lo o la wa ? Est-ce que tu y crois ? Do Awa weeps. Er hat gemacht, daß Awa weint.
you believe that? Glaubst du das?
Er hat Awa zum Weinen gebracht.
synonyme: da . la yiduta Verbe. faire une promesse; make a promise;
6
-la variante: -na. Déterminant. pour la somme de ..; etwas versprechen.
5
for the value / amount of ..; für den Wert von ... laa [á] Adverbe. intense (pour un coup); intense (for
Sogo kɛmɛna. de la viande pour une valeur de a blow); intensiv (für ein Schlag). A ka misi
cinq cent francs. Meat for five hundred francs. y'a tan laa! Sa vache lui donne un coup de
Fleisch für 500 Franken. A bi jolila fɛ? A bi pied très fort ! His cow kicks him very severely.
kɛmɛna fɛ. Il en veut pour combien ? Il en Seine Kuh gibt ihm eine sehr harten Schlag.
veut pour cinq cents francs. He wants for how laabaasa [á] Emprunt de : arabe. inter. tout va bien, il
much money? He wants for 500 francs. Für
n'y a pas de mal; everything is fine, there’s no
wieviel Geld will er? Er will für 500 Franken.
harm; alles ist in Ordnung, es gibt keinen
la 5 [á] conj. connecteur reliant les éléments d'une Schaden. synonyme: tɔɔrɔ t'u ra.
construction superlative; connector relating
laabi [á] Verbe. exaucer; grant, answer, fulfill,
superlative elements; Bindeglied in einem
Superlativ Satz. O bɛɛ la dɔgɔnin. Le plus satisfy; erhören. Ala ma kumakan laabira!
petit d'eux tous. The smallest of them all. Der
Dieu exauce notre demande ! God grants our
Kleinste von ihnen allen. ... nka a tɔ y'a la request! Gott erhört unseren Wunsch! Ala ye n
gɛlɛn ye... ... mais le reste est le plus difficile... ka layidu laabi. Dieu a exaucé mon vœu. God
...but the rest is the hardest part... ...aber der
granted my wish. Gott hat meinen Wunsch
Rest ist am schwierigsten...
erfüllt.
Category: Grammar. laada [à] Jula: landa. Nom. 1 • coutume, usage,
la bambara: da. vt. coucher, aliter; put to bed; ins / habitude, tradition; custom, usage, habit,
6
zu Bett bringen. Awa y’a den la. Awa a
tradition; Brauch, Gebrauch, Gewohnheit,
couché son enfant. Awa put her child to bed.
Tradition. An ka dugu laada kɔrɔ ye ɲɔsɛnɛ
Awa hat ihre Kinder zu Bett gebracht. ye. La culture du mil est une vieille habitude
synonyme: da . de notre village. Millet growing is an old habit
6
of our village. Der Anbau von Hirse ist eine
-la
6
abstrait, non concret; abstract, not concrete;
alte Gewohnheit unseres Dorfes.
abstrakt, nicht konkret. nege -» negela désir laadalasɔnnikɛ religion traditionnelle.
-» besoin. desire - » need. Wunsch - » traditional religion. traditionelle Religion.
Bedürfnis. hakili -» hakilila réfléchir - » synonyme: landa .
1
opinion, idée. to think - » opinion, idea.
denken - » Meinung, Idee.
29/01/2026 521

laadama laaminɛ
2 • règles, menstrues; menstruation, period; laadilikɛla [á] Morphemes: laadi-li-kɛ-la. Nom.
Periode, Menstruation. Muso ye laada ye o, a
conseiller; advisor, adviser, counsellor;
ma a ye o, a bɛ se ka kɔnɔ ta. Que la femme Berater. Bɛɛ bangebaga ye i ka laadilikɛla ye
ait ou non eu ses règles, elle peut devenir
i ka denmisɛnya kɔnɔ. Les parents de chacun
enceinte. Whether or not the woman had her
sont tes conseillers pendant ton enfance. The
period, she can become pregnant. Ob die Frau
parents of each are your counsellors during
ihre Periode hatte oder nicht, sie kann
your childhood. Die Eltern eines jeden sind
schwanger werden. synonyme: jibɔn, kalo,
deine Berater während deiner Kindheit.
koli, kalolaada. synonyme: ladilikɛla, ladibaga, laadibaga,
laadama [à-à] Morphemes: laada-ma. Nom. qui a kɔnseye.
ses règles, indisposée; woman who has her laadiri [à] Emprunt de : arabe. Nom. 1 • personne
period, indisposed; Frau mit
juste, de confiance, sincère; fair, trustworthy,
Menstruationsbeschwerden.
sincere person; faire, vertrauenswürdige,
laadatɔnsigi [à-à] Morphemes: laada-tɔnsigi. aufrichtige Person. Mɔgɔ sɛbɛ don, laadiri
Nom. réunion ordinaire; ordinary meeting, don. C'est une personne sérieuse, de
regular meeting; ordentliche Sitzung, confiance. He is a serious, trustworthy person.
reguläres Treffen. An ka laadatɔnsigi ye bi Er ist eine ernsthafte, vertrauenswürdige
ye. Notre réunion ordinaire a lieu aujourd'hui. Person.
Our regular meeting is today. Unser reguläres 2 • sûr, loyal, franc; safe, loyal, frank;
Treffen ist heute. zuverlässig, loyal, offen.
laadi [á] Verbe. conseiller, prévenir, avertir, mettre 3 • honnêteté, loyauté, noblesse d'esprit,
conscience; honesty, loyalty, nobility of spirit,
en garde; advise, warn; beraten, warnen, raten.
conscience; Ehrlichkeit, Loyalität,
Á y'áw sɔmɔgɔw ni áw teriw laadi, u bolo ka
Vornehmheit, Bewußtsein, Gewissen. K'u tɛ
ci. Conseillez à vos parents et amis de se faire
nin kɛ ? U laadiri ka bon nin ma. Ils ne font
vacciner. Advise your parents and friends to
pas ça ? Ils sont trop nobles pour cela. They
get vaccinated. Raten Sie Ihren Eltern und
don’t do that? They’re too noble for that. Das
Freunden, sich impfen zu lassen.
tun sie nicht? Dafür sind sie zu adlig.
synonyme: bololagosi, daladon, ladi,
2
laadibaga. laadirima [à-ì-ì] Morphemes: laadiri-ma. Nom.
consciencieux, loyal, intègre, sûr;
laadibaga [á] Morphemes: laadi-baga. Nom.
conscientious, loyal, honest, confident;
conseiller; advisor; Berater. jamanakuntigi gewissenhaft, loyal, redlich, sicher. Mɔgɔ
laadibaga conseiller du président. advisor to laadirima dɔgɔyara. Il y a moins de gens
the president. Berater des Präsidenten. intègres. There are fewer people with integrity.
synonyme: kɔnseye, ladilikɛla, laadi, / There are fewer honest people. Es gibt
laadilikɛla, kankɔrɔsigi. weniger anständige Menschen. / Es gibt
weniger integre Menschen.
laadili [á] Morphemes: laadi-li. Nom. conseil, mise
laadiriya [à-ì-ì] Morphemes: laadiri-ya. Nom.
en garde, avertissement; advice, warning,
caution; Rat, Warnung. ... i kana i ban mɔgɔ 1 • honnêteté, piété, fidélité; honesty, piety,
fidelity; Ehrlichkeit, Frömmigkeit, Treue. A ka
ka laadili la. ... ne refuse pas les conseils de
laadiriya de y'a to mɔgɔw bɛ Musa lamɛn.
quelqu'un. ...do not refuse someone's advice.
...lehnen Sie den Rat von jemandem nicht ab.
C'est à cause de son honnêteté que les gens
synonyme: laadilikan, ladiri, ladilikan.
écoutent Moussa. It is because of his honesty
that people listen to Moussa. Es ist seiner
laadilikan [á] Morphemes: laadi-li-kan. Nom. Ehrlichkeit zu verdanken, dass die Menschen
conseil, mise en garde; advice, warning; Rat, Moussa zuhören.
Warnung. Sibankɔnɔ tɛ laadilikan mɛn. 2 • intégrité, loyauté, noblesse d'esprit,
L'imprudent n'écoute aucune mise en garde. conscience; integrity, loyalty, nobility of spirit,
(proverbe). The unwary do not listen to any conscience; Integrität, Loyalität,
warning. (proverb). Die Unvorsichtigen hören Vornehmheit, Bewußtsein.
auf keine Warnung. (Sprichwort). laaminɛ [à] comparer: lamɔnɛ. 1 • Verbe. attrister;
synonyme: laadili, ladilikan, ladiri, ladili
2
.
sadden, grieve; betrüben, traurig machen.
29/01/2026 522

laamu labanfan
2 • Nom. vexation, souffrance, mortification, laban [á-ã́] Morphemes: la-ban. Déterminant.
1
amertume; vexation, suffering, mortification,
dernier, final, ultime, terminal, finalement;
bitterness; Ärger, Schmach, Leiden,
last, final, ultimate, finally; letzter, letzte,
Verbitterung, Bitterkeit, Demütigung. ... a
letztes, endgültig, letztlich, schliesslich,
tilalen, a laaminɛ y'a tɔɔrɔ. ... quand il eut endlich. A laban... Finalement... Finally...
fini, la vexation le fit souffrir. ... when he had
Letztendliches ... / Schlussendlich... jaabi
finished, the vexation made him suffer. ... als er
laban résultat final. final result, end result.
fertig war, tat ihm die Verärgerung weh.
Endergebnis, Endresultat. a ka dumuni laban
laamu Emprunt de : français. variante: lamu. Nom.
son dernier repas. his last meal. seine letzte
lame; blade; Klinge. Mahlzeit.
labaara [á] Morphemes: la-baara. Verbe. préparer, laban [á-ã́] Morphemes: la-ban. 1 • vt. achever,
2
apprêter, arranger, mettre en valeur; prepare, finir, terminer; finish, end; enden, beenden,
arrange, highlight, enhance; vorbereiten, fertig machen. ... a bɛ laban ka kɛ furu ye. ...
arrangieren, präsentieren. A ka fininw ma
ça finira par un mariage. ... it will end in a
labaara ka kɛɲɛ ni seli ye. Ses vêtements marriage. ... wird es mit einer Hochzeit enden.
n'ont pas été prêts pour la fête. His clothes 2 • Nom. fin; end; Ende. Mɔgɔ t'i laban dɔn.
were not ready for the party. Ihre Kleider
On ne connaît pas le jour de sa fin. (proverbe).
waren nicht für das Fest bereit.
The day of our end is not known. (proverb).
synonyme: ɲabɛn, babaara, ɲabila.
Der Tag seines Endes ist nicht bekannt.
labalan [á] Morphemes: la-balan. Verbe. retarder; (Sprichwort). Laban tɛ diɲɛ na. Le monde n'a
delay; verzögern, hinauszögern. U bɛ mɔgɔw pas de fin. (proverbe). The world has no end.
(proverb). Die Welt hat kein Ende.
labalan yan dɔrɔn. Ils ne font que retarder les
(Sprichwort). synonyme: wili.
gens ici. They only delay people here. Sie
halten die Leute hier nur auf. 3 • Nom. bien finir, mal finir; end well, end
synonyme: yakaro.
badly; gut enden, schlecht enden.
Sinamusoma fila ka teriya bɛ mɛɛn, nka a tɛ
labalima [á] Morphemes: la-balima. Verbe. louer,
laban. L'amitié entre deux coépouses peut
glorifier, chanter les louanges de quelqu’un; to
durer, mais elle se termine [toujours mal].
praise, glorify, sing someone's praises;
(proverbe). Friendship between two co-wives
jemanden loben, verherrlichen, lobsingen.
may last, but it always ends badly. (proverb).
jeliw y'a labalima. Les griots ont chanté ses Die Freundschaft zwischen zwei Ehefrauen
louanges. The griots sang his praises. Die kann dauern, aber sie endet [immer schlecht].
Griots sangen sein Lob. (Sprichwort).
labalo [á] Morphemes: la-balo. Verbe. nourrir, labana [á] Morphemes: la-bana. Verbe. rendre
élever, faire vivre; nourish, feed, raise, keep malade; make you sick, cause illness; krank
alive; ernähren, aufziehen, am Leben erhlaten. machen.
... k'u ka denbaya labalo. ... nourrir leur
labanbali Morphemes: la-ban-bali.
famille. ...feed their families. ...ernähren
variante: labambali. Nom. 1 • inaccompli,
ihre Familien. baganw labaloli l'élevage du
inachevé; unfinished, in the course of
bétail. cattle breeding. Viehzucht.
happening, imperfect tense, unfinished;
labalolan [á] Morphemes: la-balo-lan. Nom. ce qui machend, geschehend, der Verlauf ist am
sert à nourrir, à faire vivre, à élever; that which Stattfinden, unvollendet. A ka baara bɛɛ ye
serves to feed, to sustain, to raise; was dazu labanbali de ye. Son travail reste toujours
dient, zu nähren, Leben zu spenden, zu
inachevé. His work is always unfinished. Seine
erziehen. Kɔɔrikolo ye misiw labalolan de ye Arbeit ist immer unvollendet.
ánw fɛ. La bourre de coton sert de nourriture 2 • qui n'achève pas ce qu'il entame; who does
pour les vaches chez nous. Cotton fluff is used not finish what he starts; der nicht zu Ende
as cow feed in our country. Die Baumwolle bringt, was er begonnen hat.
Watte wird hier als Futter für die Kühe
labanfan [á] Morphemes: la-ban-fan. Nom. fin, fin
verwendet.
approximative; end, approximate end; Ende,
labambali variante: labanbali. Nom. inaccompli,
ungefähres Ende. K'a daminɛ sɛtanburu
inachevé; imperfective, -ing form, unfinished;
labanfan na... Depuis la fin du mois de
Imperfektiv, unvollendet. Category: Grammar.
septembre... Since the end of September... Seit
Ende September...
29/01/2026 523

labanko labi
labanko Nom. 1 • fin; end; Ende. I ye baara labanko labɛn [á-ɛ̌] 1 • vt. organiser, préparer, structurer,
ɲɛna. Tu as mené ton travail à bonne fin. You arranger, se préparer; prepare, organize,
brought your work to a good end. Du hast structure, arrange, prepare oneself, get ready;
deine Arbeit zu einem guten Ende gebracht. vorbereiten, organisieren, zurechtmachen, sich
vorbereiten. ka foro labɛn préparer un champ.
2 • fin de vie, mort; end of life, death; Ende des
Lebens, Tod, Lebensende. Ala ma labanko prepare a field. ein Feld vorbereiten. A y'i
ɲuman dira án ma ! Que Die nous donne une labɛn ka taa sugu la. Elle se prépare pour
fin honorable ! May the Die give us an aller au marché. She is getting ready to go to
honourable end! Möge die uns ein ehrenvolles the market. Sie bereitet sich darauf vor, auf
Ende bereiten! den Markt zu gehen. I labɛn ka bila seli ɲɛ.
labanmubɛ Nom. ensemble d'arrivé; the finish line,
Prépare-toi pour la fête. Get ready for the
party. Machen Sie sich bereit für das Fest.
end product; Endprodukt.
2 • v.ref. réparer; repair, fix; reparieren,
Category: Mathematics. antonyme: mumɛfɔlɔ.
beheben. Musow bɛ filen cilenw labɛn. Les
labannan Nom. final, dernier; final, last; letzte. femmes réparent les calebasses cassées.
Women repair broken gourds. Die Frauen
labannin variante: labanni. Nom. accompli;
reparieren die kaputten Kalebassen.
accomplished, perfect tense (the action is
done); vollendet. ka bɔ. Musa bɔra. «sortir».
labɛn ka kɛɲɛ [á-ɛ ̀ á ɛ́-ɛ́] vt. adapter; to adapt, to fit;
Moussa est sorti. gone out. «rausgehen». angleichen, anpassen. Category: Grammar.
Moussa ist rausgegangen. labɛncogo Variant: sigicogo. n.comp. structuration;
labanta [á] Morphemes: la-ban-ta. part. 1 • qui doit structuring; Struktur, Strukturierung.
(peut, va) s'achever; who must (can, will) labɛnfɛn n.comp. constituant; constituent, element;
finish; die (kann, wird) enden muß. N ka
Bestandteil, Teil, Komponente.
baara bɛ kɛ baara labanta ye. Mon travail Category: Grammar.
sera terminé à temps. My work will be finished
labɛnkokura comparer: labɛnnikokura. n.comp.
on time. Meine Arbeit wird pünktlich erledigt
sein.
recomposition; resetting, reconstruction;
Wiederaufbau, Umbau, Rekonstruktion.
2 • terminé, achevé, arrivé à terme, accompli;
finished, completed, accomplished; labɛnkulu synonyme: jɛnkulu, tɔɔn, tɔn. Nom.
abgeschlossen, vollendet. ... o ma kɛ ko mouvement; movement; Bewegung.
labanta ye ? ... ce n'est pas quelque chose de labɛnni [á-ɛ ́-í] Nom. préparation; preparation;
terminé ? ... isn’t that something finished? ...
Vorbereitung. labɛnni kɛ faire des
Ist das nicht etwas Fertiges? / ...ist das nicht
préparations. make preparations.
schon fertig?
Vorbereitungen treffen.
labato [á-à-ó] Morphemes: la-bato. Verbe.
labɛnni ka kɛɲɛ Nom. adaptation; adaptation;
respecter, suivre, se confier à, obéir, accomplir
Anpassung, Angleichung.
(une loi), se conformer à; respect, follow, obey,
Category: Grammar.
comply; respektieren, folgen, befolgen,
gehorchen, sich fügen. ka ladilikan labato. labɛnnikokura comparer: labɛnkokura. n.comp.
Suivre les conseils. Follow the advices. Die recomposition; resetting, reconstruction;
Ratschläge befolgen. ka diinɛ labato suivre Wiederaufbau, Umbau, Rekonstruktion.
une religion. follow a religion. einer Religion labi [á] Verbe. remplacer, suppléer, relayer, relever,
folgen. ka layidu labato respecter une
substituer; replace, supplement, relay, relieve,
promesse. keep a promise. ein Versprechen substitute, take turns; ersetzen, weiterleiten,
halten. I wolola k'a sɔrɔ dɔnniya min b'i ka entlasten, ich abwechseln. Ni dɔw sɛgɛnna,
bulonda la, n'i ma o labato, i kana a tiɲɛ. mɔgɔ wɛrɛw b'olu labi. Quand certains sont
Même si tu ne veux pas tenir compte des fatigués, d'autres les remplacent. When some
traditions familiales reçues à ta naissance, ne get tired, others replace them. Wenn einige
les dénigre pas. (proverbe). Even if you don't müde sind, ersetzen andere sie. U ka kan ka
want to take into account the family traditions
ɲɔgɔn labi. Ils doivent se relayer. They have
you were born with, don't disparage them.
(proverb). Auch wenn Sie die bei Ihrer Geburt
to take turns. Sie müssen sich abwechseln.
erhaltenen Familientraditionen nicht
berücksichtigen möchten, verunglimpfen Sie
sie nicht. (Sprichwort).
29/01/2026 524

labila labonya
labila [á-ì-à] Morphemes: la-bila. 1 • vt. permettre, labin [á-ǐ] Morphemes: la-bin. Verbe. faire tomber,
laisser partir, relâcher, libérer, être libre; let go, faire chuter, renverser, ruiner; bring down,
relax, release, allow, permit, be free; erlauben, overturn, ruin; fallen lassen, umstürzen,
gestatten, gehen lassen, befreien, frei sein. U ruinieren. A y'i ɲɛsin nsiraju ma, k'i dɛn o la,
y'a labila, a taara. Ils le laissèrent partir, il k'o labin. Il se dirigea vers un baobab,
s'en alla. They let him go, and he went away. s’adossa contre et le fit tomber. He went to a
Sie ließen ihn gehen, er ging weg. Jɔnw bɛɛ baobab, leaned against it and threw it down.
labilala fon'a kɛra ánw ye. On a libéré tous Er ging auf einen Baobab zu, lehnte sich an ihn
les esclaves mais pas nous. They freed all the
und ließ ihn umfallen.
slaves, but not us. Sie haben alle Sklaven labitani [à-ì-ì] Emprunt de : français» hôpital.
befreit, aber nicht uns. variante: labitaniso. Nom. hôpital; hospital;
2 • vi. laisser, abandonner; leave, give up, Krankenhaus, Spital. Bamakɔ labitani
abandon; lassen, aufgeben, verlassen. ...
l'hôpital de Bamako. Bamako hospital.
kungo bɛ jirintanya ka dugukolo labila ja Krankenhaus in Bamako.
ani dugukolonɔn ye. ... la brousse perd ses synonyme: dɔgɔtɔrɔso, dɔgɔtɔrɔsoba,
arbres et laisse les sols à la merci de la dɔkɔtɔrɔso.
sécheresse et à l'érosion. ...the bush is losing its
laboli [á-ò-í] Morphemes: la-boli. Verbe. 1 • faire
trees and leaving the soil at the mercy of
drought and erosion. ...der Busch verliert courir, faire fuir, mettre en œuvre, mener (une
seine Bäume und macht den Boden anfällig für politique...); cause to run away, make flee,
Dürre und Erosion. implement, carry out a work, to lead (a
3 • vi. remettre, céder; hand over; übergeben. policy...); zum fortrenne veranlassen, in die
Nyagalen labilala a ye. Niagalé lui a été Flucht schlagen, eine Arbeit ausführen, (eine
remise. Niagalé was handed over to him.
Richtlinie...) ausführen. jamana politiki
Niagalé wurde ihm übergeben. Bɛɛ niyɔrɔ labolili la mise en œuvre d'une politique
labilala i ye. La part de chacun t'a été cédée.
nationale. the implementation of a national
policy. die Umsetzung einer nationalen Politik.
Each one's share has been assigned to you. /
The share of each has been given to you. Jeder 2 • exister (pour quelque chose d'abstrait, entre
personnes ou entre groupes); to exist (for
Anteil wurde Ihnen zugewiesen. / Der Anteil
eines jeden wurde dir abgetreten.
something abstract, between people or
between groups); existieren (für etwas
4 • vi. laisser à la disposition de, autoriser; to
Abstraktes, zwischen Menschen oder
make available to, to authorize; zur Verfügung
stellen, genehmigen. An ye labilali ɲini. Nous
zwischen Gruppen). Jɛɲɔgɔnya labolila án ni
avons demandé l'autorisation de partir. We
ɲɔgɔn cɛ. Une entente existe entre nous.
asked for permission to leave. Wir haben um There is an understanding between us.
Erlaubnis gebeten, zu gehen. Zwischen uns besteht ein Verständnis.
labilali [á-í-á-í] Morphemes: labila-li. Nom. labolisira [á] Morphemes: la-boli-sira. Nom. mise
permission; permission; Erlaubnis. en œuvre, conduite, voie, politique;
implementation, conduct, behavior, way,
labilali diyabɔli expr. jouissance de liberté;
politics; Umsetzung, Ausführung, Benehmen,
enjoyment of freedom; Ausübung seiner Weg, Politik. jamana kalanko labolisira
Rechte und Freiheiten.
politique d'éducation nationale. national
labilanin [à-ì-à-ĩ́] adj. vulnérable; vulnerable; education policy. nationale Bildungspolitik. ...
verletzbar, gefährdet. ka balimaya labolisira ka ca... ... les voies
labilaworo [á-í-á-ó-ó] n.comp. cola pour demander
d'entente sont nombreuses... ...there are
many ways to reach an agreement... ...es gibt
le droit de célébrer le mariage; kola nut to get
viele Möglichkeiten zum Verständnis...
permission for marriage; Kolanuss zur
Erlaubnis für eine Heirat. labonya [á-ò-á] Morphemes: la-bon-ya. Verbe.
labili synonyme: bɔli ɲɔgɔn kɔrɔ. Nom. commutation; faire grossir, honorer, exagérer; fatten, honour,
exaggerate; dick machen, mästen, ehren,
commutation; ; Vermittlung, Umschaltung,
übertreiben. A y'a lakali ka a labonya
Kommentierung.
kojugu. Il l'a raconté en exagérant beaucoup.
He told it with great exaggeration. Er erzählte
es mit großer Übertreibung.
29/01/2026 525

labonyalan laci
labonyalan [á] Morphemes: la-bon-ya-lan. Nom. laburentura [á] Morphemes: labure-ntura. Nom.
microscope, loupe; microscope, magnifying bœuf de labour; plowing ox; Pflügender
glass; Mikroskop, Lupe, Vergrösserungsglas. Ochse. laburenturatigiw ceux qui possèdent
Dimɔgɔ kunkolo lajɛ ni labonyalan ye. des bœufs de labour. the owners of oxen with
Regarde la tête de la mouche à l'aide d'une ploughs. die Besitzer von Ochsen mit Pflügen.
loupe. Look at the fly's head with a magnifying Category: Agriculture. synonyme: sarimisi.
glass. Category: Tool. synonyme: boɲananba,
lacaya [á] Morphemes: la-ca-ya. Verbe. multiplier,
fɛnnabonyalan.
accroître; multiply, increase; vermehren,
labɔ [á] Morphemes: la-bɔ. vt. 1 • faire sortir, ôter, multiplizieren, steigern, erhöhen, vergrössern.
extraire, évacuer, curer; pull out, bring out, ... k'u lacaya k'u feere da ɲɔgɔn na... ... les
take off, remove, extract,, evacuate, clean up; multiplier et les vendre à bon marché...
herausziehen, herausbringen, wegnehmen, ...multiply them and sell them cheaply... ... sie
evakuieren, aufräumen. U ye Daniyɛlɛ labɔ vermehren und günstig verkaufen ...
warabaw dingɛ kɔnɔ. Ils ont fait sortir Daniel lacɛ [á-ě] Morphemes: la-cɛ. Verbe. 1 • lécher,
de la fosse des lions. They pulled Daniel out of torcher; lick, wipe; lecken, wischen. Terikɛ y'i
the lions’ den. Sie haben Daniel aus der
bolo lacɛ... L'ami se lécha la main... The
Löwengrube gezogen. Aw bɛ misiw labɔ...
friend licked his hand... Der Freund leckte
Vous faites sortir les vaches... You get the
sich die Hand... N ma bo kɛ, n ka n boda
cows out... Sie lassen die Kühe raus... ka kɔlɔn
lacɛ ! Que je me torche le derrière alors que je
labɔ curer un puits. clean a well. ein Brunnen
n'ai pas chié ! That I wipe my ass while I did
reinigen.
not shit! Daß ich mir den Hintern abwische,
2 • suffire, convenir, égaler; to suffice, to suit, obwohl ich nicht geschissen habe!
to equal, be sufficient, enough; genügen,
2 • effacer; to erase, delete; löschen. ... min
übereinstimmen, gleich sein. ... suman tɛ
ye n ɲɛji lacɛ ni yɛlɛ misɛnw ye... ... celle qui
labɔli kɛ... ... le grain ne suffira pas... ... the
a effacé mes pleurs de ses sourires... ... the one
grain will not be enough... ... das Korn wird
who has erased my tears from her smiles... ...
nicht reichen...
die meine Tränen von ihrem Lächeln
3 • envahir; invade; eindringen. Biɲɛ baga y'a wegwischte...
fari bɛɛ labɔ. Le poison de la flèche a envahi 3 • retirer; withdraw; zurückziehen. N ye n
tout son corps. The poison of the arrow has
bolo lacɛ ka bɔ a kɔrɔ. J'ai retiré mon bras de
invaded his whole body. Das Gift des Pfeils hat
lui. I pulled my arm away from him. Ich zog
seinen ganzen Körper durchdrungen.
meinen Arm von ihm weg.
4 • aider, dépanner, remplacer; help,
laci [á] Morphemes: la-ci. Verbe. annoncer,
troubleshoot, replace; helfen, reparieren, 1
ersetzen. diffuser; announce, broadcast, spread;
5 • relayer, succéder; relay, succeed; ablösen. ankünden, verkünden, ausbreiten, ausstrahlen.
Su ni tile bɛ ɲɔgɔn labɔ. La nuit et le jour se Sanga lacilen dugaw ma... Quand le décès
succèdent. (proverbe). Night and day follow
fut annoncé aux charognards... When the death
each other. (proverb). Nacht und Tag folgen
was announced to the scavengers... Als den
aufeinander. (Sprichwort). Aasfressern der Tod mitgeteilt wurde ... ka
6 • être fatigué; be tired; müde sein. Ne kunnafoni laci diffuser une information.
labɔlen bɛ bi dɛ ! Je suis très fatigué disseminate information. Informationen
verbreiten.
aujourd'hui ! I’m very tired today! Ich bin
heute sehr müde! laci [á-ǐ] Morphemes: la-ci. Verbe. 1 • désenfler,
2
labɔli [á-ɔ́-í] synonyme: bɔli, wogili. Nom. dégonfler; deflate; entlüften, die Luft ablassen.
Funun lacira. La grosseur a désenflé. Swelling
évacuation; evacuation; Evakuierung,
Entsorgung, Abfließen. has decreased. Die Schwellung hat sich
verringert.
labugun [á] Morphemes: la-bugun. Verbe. faire
2 • dépérir, maigrir, amaigrir, fondre; to
augmenter, augmenter, multiplier, croître;
waste away, to lose weight, to thin out, to melt
make raise, increase, multiply, grow; erhöhen,
away; abnehmen, dahinschmelzen. Bana y'a
steigern, vermehren, multiplizieren, wachsen.
laci. La maladie l'a amaigri. The disease has
mɔgɔw labugunni la croissance de la
made him thin. Die Krankheit hat ihn dünner
population. population growth.
gemacht.
Bevölkerungswachstum.
29/01/2026 526